Maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in patients with habitual abortion-influence on first-trimester screening for chromosomal abnormalities.To explore if maternal serum free beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) levels in the first-trimester of pregnancy are altered in patients with habitual abortions and if there is an effect on first-trimester screening for Down syndrome.A retrospective study was conducted on 913 normal singleton fetuses that underwent first-trimester combined screening for Down syndrome. Maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG were compared between patients with (n = 64) and without habitual abortions (n = 849).The medians +/- SD log(10) MoM of PAPP-A and free beta-hCG +/- SD in patients with and without habitual abortions were 0.063 +/- 0.28 versus - 0.014 +/- 0.27 and - 0.001 +/- 0.27 versus - 0.018 +/- 0.31, with a p value of 0.042 and 0.87, respectively. The screen positive rate setting the cut off at 1:350 looking at the background risk for trisomy 21 was 71.4% in women with and 81.2% in women without habitual abortion, after combined first-trimester screening it was 7.8% in women with and 10.1% in women without recurrent abortion.Patients with habitual abortions have slightly increased maternal serum PAPP-A levels in the first-trimester. This marginal difference seems not to effect risk calculation in combined first-trimester screening for trisomy 21.Dimeric inhibin A as a fourth marker for Down's syndrome maternal serum screening in native Japanese women.This study was conducted to assess the usefulness of dimeric inhibin A as a fourth marker for Down's syndrome screening in addition to AFP, hCG and uE3 markers for native Japanese women.Serum specimens from 367 native Japanese women in the second trimester were assayed for dimeric inhibin A levels. Day specific dimeric inhibin A medians were established for gestational ages 15.0-21.9. Weekly median values for the native Japanese were compared with those of a U.S. population. Selected Japanese specimens from 15 diagnosed Down's syndrome and 3 trisomy 18 cases were also assayed for dimeric inhibin A.Dimeric inhibin A levels did not vary greatly over the gestational age range as expected. Median value comparison showed that native Japanese dimeric inhibin A medians are higher than the U.S. population medians by an average of 7.95%. Native Japanese dimeric inhibin A median values in this study are 1.77 times higher in Down's syndrome cases than in unaffected pregnancies. Trisomy 18 dimeric inhibin A levels show no significant difference from the unaffected pregnancies.This report shows for the first time that dimeric inhibin A can be informative as a fourth marker for Down's syndrome screening in native Japanese women. We expect the addition of dimeric inhibin A to a triple marker protocol will increase the accuracy of predicted risk for all pregnancies screened and increase the detection rate of Down's syndrome affected pregnancies.Maternal midtrimester serum AFP and free beta-hCG levels in in vitro fertilization twin pregnancies.We aimed to compare the levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) levels as multiples of the median (MoM) values between spontaneous and in vitro fertilized (IVF) twin pregnancies. The control group of spontaneous singleton pregnancies was used for calculating the gestational age specific median levels of the values. Within a cohort of 19 310 pregnancies, 145 twin pregnancies were identified. The data were collected from Down syndrome (DS) screening programmes in four University catchment areas in Finland between 1994-98. Maternal midtrimester serum marker levels were measured across gestational weeks 14-18. There were no fetal chromosome anomalies in either of the twin groups or the singleton group. Serum AFP of 145 and beta-hCG values of 39 spontaneous twin pregnancies were compared to the values of 6548 singleton pregnancies. In IVF twins 30 AFP and 29 beta-hCG values were compared to the levels of the control group. Both AFP and beta-hCG values were twice as high in the spontaneous twin pregnancies (medians 2.18 and 1.83 MoM respectively) as in the singleton group (medians 1.00 and 1.00 MoM respectively). In IVF twin pregnancies beta-hCG levels were higher (median 2.20 MoM) than in spontaneous twins (p=0.08), whereas no significant difference was found in AFP levels (2.30 MoM). In conclusion, the higher levels of beta-hCG levels in IVF twin pregnancies should be considered in DS screening to avoid high false positive rates.Down syndrome screening in women under 35 with maternal serum hCG.Human chorionic gonadotropin and maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) concentrations were measured in frozen maternal serum samples from 16 pregnancies with Down syndrome and from 614 unaffected pregnancies in women younger than 35. By using only maternal age and MSAFP level to determine Down syndrome risk, four of 16 (25%) Down syndrome pregnancies were identified, using risk estimates as a screening variable. This detection rate required performing amniocentesis on 4.8% of pregnancies with a normal outcome. By adding hCG level as a third risk parameter, ten of 16 (62.5%) Down syndrome pregnancies were detected. To achieve this detection rate, 4.7% of women under 35 would be recommended for amniocentesis. These results indicate that the estimation of risk for Down syndrome based on the addition of maternal hCG level to MSAFP level and maternal age will substantially improve the detection rate for Down syndrome, with no change in the amniocentesis rate. These findings are in agreement with other studies that suggest that hCG is a valuable addition to screening programs for Down syndrome.Accuracy of Down's syndrome risks produced in a prenatal screening program.Down's syndrome screening in the second trimester using a variety of combinations of maternal serum markers has become an established part of antenatal care over the past decade. The methodology of calculating Down's syndrome risk using statistical models based on the Gaussian distribution functions of the various markers used is often considered daunting, and many screening centres rely on specific screening computer software to undertake the relevant calculations. Such software is often a closed system which does not allow the user to check or change any of the parameters within the model. It is clear from a recent UK NEQAS survey of Down's syndrome screening laboratories (Spencer, Ellis, Seth, 1997, unpublished data) that many centres are unsure what method of calculating risk and what population parameters are used in their software, and how appropriate these are for the population being screened. This confusion has led to uncertainty over the reliability of the risk estimates produced in Down's syndrome screening programs.Comparison of urinary free beta (hCG) and beta-core (hCG) in prenatal screening for chromosomal abnormalities.To evaluate the potential utility of free beta (hCG) and beta-core (hCG) in a prenatal screening protocol for Down syndrome we analysed these markers in dried maternal urine specimens from 163 control, 13 Down syndrome and 5 trisomy 18 pregnancies from 8 to 25 weeks' gestation. All results are reported after normalization for urinary creatinine determined by modified Jaffe reagent assay. The correlation of urinary free beta (hCG) and urinary beta-core (hCG) was 0.61 in controls and 0.93 in Down syndrome. Median MoM values in Down syndrome were 2.42 for urinary free beta (hCG) and 2.40 for beta-core (hCG). In trisomy 18 the Median MoM was 0.35 and 0.34 for free beta (hCG) and beta-core (hCG), respectively. The degree of elevation observed in DS cases with urinary free beta (hCG) is consistent with previous reports. Studies of beta-core (hCG) in Down syndrome have yielded discrepant results. In this study, beta-core (hCG) in Down syndrome is lower than values observed in early reports but consistent with more recent reports.The effect of ethnic origin on nuchal translucency at 10-14 weeks of gestation.Fetal nuchal translucency (NT) increases with gestation and is affected by fetal posture and fetal gender. A recent report suggested that there might also be ethnic differences. We investigated the effect of ethnic origin on NT in an Asian population.NT was measured at 10-14 weeks. The measurements were converted into multiples of the median (MoM) for gestational day. The risk of Down syndrome was calculated by combining NT and maternal age. Cases affected by chromosomal and major structural abnormalities were excluded. NT measurements of different ethnic groups were compared.Between January 1997 and October 2001, 16 981 pregnancies with known ethnic origin and normal fetal outcome were analysed. Median NT MoM (95% CI) of the Filipinos was 1.07 (1.04-1.11). This was significantly higher than that of the Chinese, 1.01 (1.01-1.02); other Asians (Indians, Pakistanis and Nepalese), 0.96 (0.94-0.99), and Caucasians, 0.98 (0.93-1.06) (p<0.05, respectively; Mann-Whitney U-test). An NT risk cut-off of 1:180 would classify 5% of the Chinese, 4.6% of the Caucasians, 5.6% of the Filipinos and 4.2% of the other Asians as screen-positive. There were no statistically significant differences between these screen-positive rates (p>0.05, Chi-square test).Although there were statistically significant differences in NT measurements between different ethnic groups, it was clinically insignificant, as reflected by similar screen-positive rates.Maternal serum free beta hCG screening: results of studies including 480 cases of Down syndrome.The median maternal serum free beta human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) multiple of the median (MOM) of 480 Down syndrome cases in the second trimester was 2.64, significantly greater than the reported median MOM of intact hCG (p < 0.0001). In 234 of these cases from retrospective and prospective studies, the effectiveness of maternal serum free beta hCG was evaluated in combination with alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and maternal age in second-trimester Down syndrome screening. Down syndrome detection in the gestational age range of 14-16 weeks was 82 per cent. In all gestational weeks (14-22), a 77.7 per cent Down syndrome detection rate was achieved. In prospective screening of 44,272 patients under the age of 35 years, 69 per cent of Down syndrome cases were detected (73 per cent in gestational weeks 14-16). The false-positive rate for the prospective study was 3.8 per cent. The use of free beta hCG combined with maternal serum AFP and maternal age-related risk for Down syndrome in a screening population (i.e., women under 35 years) yields an improved detection efficiency over other protocols.[Significance of nuchal edema in fetuses of pregnant women under 35 years of age].The aim of this study was to survey the connection between the fetal nuchal oedema and the increased risk of the aneuploidies. According to the prenatal care the thickness of the nuchal fold was measured on the 11-12th gestational week by 6.5 MHz transvaginal transducer (ATL-HDI and Hitachi EUB-450). Cases were underlined where the presence of nuchal oedema (> or = 3 mm) made the indication for chromosomal analysis among the 280 single pregnancies and fetal karyotyping was carried out. Nuchal oedema was observed in 72/280 cases of pregnant women under 35 years old and in 20/280 cases of that above 35 years old, the nuchal oedema was another indication beside the age. Abnormal karyotype was observed in 9/72 (12.5%) cases among the pregnant women under 35 years old and in 10/92 (10.87%) cases among the pregnancies with fetal nuchal oedema. It was also observed abnormal karyotype in 6/188 (3.19%) cases of pregnancies without nuchal oedema and in 16/280 (5.71%) cases of chromosomal analyses with or without nuchal oedema. This can be an effective method for screening the fetal aneuploidies and other fetal anomalies, both in the high risk and the normal pregnant population, especially in cases of pregnant women under 35 years old belonging to the normal genetical risk population.Maternal ethnic origin and fetal nasal bones at 11-14 weeks of gestation.Failure to visualise the fetal nasal bones at 11-14 weeks of gestation is associated with a significant increase in the risk for trisomy 21. However, it is not known whether the ethnic origin of the mother has any effect on the fetal profile and the prevalence of this marker.Prospective study.London Teaching Hospital.Four thousand and four hundred and ninety-two consecutive fetuses undergoing routine first trimester ultrasound scanning at 11-14 weeks of gestation in a multiethnic population.Examination of the nasal bones was attempted in the fetuses.Rate of visualisation of the fetal nasal bones.Five hundred fetuses were excluded from the analysis because of chromosomal abnormalities or a technically unsatisfactory examination. In the remaining 3992 fetuses, the maternal ethnic origin was African in 13.0%, Asian in 15.3% and Caucasian in 66.0%. Compared with Caucasians, the failure to visualise the fetal nasal bones was significantly higher in women of African (P= 0.0001) but not Asian origin (P= 0.24). A multivariable logistic regression model showed that having a mother of African origin is still significantly associated with an increased likelihood of absent fetal nasal bones compared with Caucasians (odds ratio 2.33), even after correcting for maternal age, parity and crown-rump length.There is a significant difference in the rate of visualisation of the fetal nasal bones in the first trimester in mothers of different ethnic origin. This suggest that corrections for maternal ethnicity will be required to ensure equity of fetal nasal bone screening in multiracial populations. Whether corrections are required for the father's ethnic origin remains to be determined.Sonographical integrated test for detection of chromosomal aberrations.Different sonographical and biochemical methods for the detection of an elevated risk of chromosomal abnormality are used. The aim of our study was to establish a diagnostic scheme with the highest sensitivity by means of an algorithm incorporating all parameters.In a group of 1490 pregnant women, ultrasound examination including nuchal translucency and nasal bone measurement was performed in the first trimester. Then, in the early second trimester, a second ultrasound examination combined with measuring nuchal thickness and nasal bone was carried out.The combination of the NT and NB measurement showed the highest sensitivity (94.7%), specificity (99.21%), PPV (85.7%) and NPV (99.73%).The proposed integrated test is characterised by a high predictive value for the detection of chromosomal abnormalities, low cost of performance and absolute safety for the foetus and could be offered to all pregnant women. The combination of two ultrasound examinations and biochemistry greatly increased the value of the test.Six year survey of screening for Down's syndrome by maternal age and mid-trimester ultrasound scans.To assess the effectiveness of antenatal screening for Down's syndrome by maternal age and routine mid-pregnancy ultrasound scanning.Retrospective six year survey.Maternity units of a district general hospital.Pregnant women booked for delivery in hospital between 1 January 1993 and 31 December 1998.All cases of Down's syndrome occurring in district identified from regional congenital anomaly register and cytogenetic laboratory records. Women's case notes were examined to identify indication for karyotyping, gestation at diagnosis, and outcome of pregnancy.31 259 deliveries occurred during study period, and 57 cases of Down's syndrome were identified, four in failed pregnancies and 53 in ongoing pregnancies or in neonates. The analysis was confined to ongoing pregnancies or liveborn children. Invasive antenatal tests were performed in 6.6% (2053/31 259), and 68% (95% confidence interval 56% to 80%) of cases of Down's syndrome were detected antenatally, giving a positive predictive value of 1.8%. There were 17 undetected cases, and in seven of these the women had declined an offer of invasive testing. In women aged less than 35 years the detection rate was 53% (30% to 76%). Most of the cases detected in younger women followed identification of ultrasound anomalies.The overall detection rate was considerably higher than assumed in demonstration projects for serum screening. As a result, the benefits of serum screening are much less than supposed. Before any new methods to identify Down's syndrome are introduced, such as nuchal translucency or first trimester serum screening, the techniques should be tested in properly controlled trials.Human placental growth hormone is increased in maternal serum in pregnancies affected by Down syndrome.To evaluate the relationship between maternal serum levels of human placental growth hormone (hPGH) and fetal Down syndrome at gestational midtrimester.We retrospectively analyzed samples of serum from 21 women with Down syndrome pregnancies detected at gestational midtrimester. The samples were obtained at 16-23 weeks' gestation during amniocentesis for fetal karyotyping. Sixty-two serum samples were used as controls, which were obtained at 16-23 weeks' gestation from women with singleton, uncomplicated pregnancies, who gave birth to healthy neonates with a birth weight appropriate for gestational age. The hPGH levels were measured by a solid-phase immunoradiometric assay using 2 different epitopes.The median hPGH values in the serum of the Down-syndrome-affected pregnancies were significantly higher (p < 0.05) than those of the normal pregnancies at 16-23 weeks' gestation: the median value in the serum was 9.4 ng/ml (5th to 95th percentiles = 1.49-39.03) versus 4.7 ng/ml (0.53-7.88).The hPGH levels in maternal serum were found to be higher at 16-23 weeks' gestation in pregnancies affected by fetal Down syndrome. Further investigation is needed to examine if maternal serum hPGH could be used as an additional marker in prenatal screening of Down syndrome at gestational midtrimester.Cost-effectiveness and accuracy of prenatal Down syndrome screening strategies: should the combined test continue to be widely used?We analyzed the cost-effectiveness (CE) and performances of commonly used prenatal Down syndrome (DS) screening strategies.We performed computer simulations to compare 8 screening options by applying empirical data from Serum, Urine, and Ultrasound Screening Study trials on the population of 110,948 pregnancies. Screening strategies outcomes, CE ratios, and incremental CE ratios were measured.The most CE DS screening strategy was the contingent screening method (CE ratio of Can$26,833 per DS case). Its incremental CE ratio compared to the second-most CE strategy (serum integrated screening) was Can$3815 per DS birth detected. Among the procedures respecting guidelines, our results identified the combined test as the screening strategy with the highest CE ratio (Can$47,358) and the highest number of procedure-related euploid miscarriages (n = 71).In regard to CE, contingent screening is the best choice. The combined test, which is the most popular screening strategy, shows many limitations.The influence of maternal insulin-dependent diabetes on fetal nuchal translucency thickness and first-trimester maternal serum biochemical markers of aneuploidy.To evaluate the influence of maternal insulin dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM) on maternal serum free beta-hCG, PAPP-A and fetal nuchal translucency (NT), thickness at 11 to 13(+6) weeks of gestation in a large cohort of women screened prospectively for chromosomal anomalies.Information on maternal IDDM status, maternal serum biochemical marker levels and fetal NT were collected from the prenatal screening computer records in two first-trimester screening centres. In total the control group included 33 301 pregnancies of which 16 366 had NT and maternal serum biochemistry results and 16 305 with NT only. The IDDM group included 195 pregnancies of which 79 had NT and maternal serum biochemistry results and 127 with NT only. The median maternal weight corrected free beta-hCG and PAPP-A, expressed as multiple of the median (MoM), and fetal NT, expressed as delta values, in the IDDM and non-IDDM groups were compared.There were no significant differences between the IDDM and non-IDDM groups in median maternal weight corrected free beta-hCG (IDDM 0.87 MoM, 95% Confidence Interval 0.75 to 1.16 MoM, non-IDDM 1.00 MoM), median maternal weight corrected PAPP-A (IDDM 1.02 MoM, 95% Confidence Interval 0.83 to 1.05 MoM, non-IDDM 1.01 MoM), or mean delta NT (IDDM 0.0358 mm, non-IDDM 0.0002 mm).In pregnancies with maternal IDDM, first-trimester screening for chromosomal defects does not require adjustments for the measured fetal NT. However, more data are required before the possible reduction in maternal serum free beta-hCG and the reduction of PAPP-A suggested by the published world series can be considered sufficiently important to take into account in the calculation of risks for chromosomal defects.The genetic sonogram: comparing the use of likelihood ratios versus logistic regression coefficients for Down syndrome screening.The purpose of this study was to compare the screening efficiency for Down syndrome using likelihood ratios versus logistic regression coefficients.We conducted a retrospective study of women at increased risk for Down syndrome referred for a second-trimester genetic sonogram. Likelihood ratios were calculated by multiplying the risk ratio from maternal serum screening by the likelihood ratios of sonographic markers. Logistic regression coefficients were calculated using a formula derived from β coefficients generated from a multivariable logistic regression model. The screening efficiency of both methods was tested in an independent population of patients. The McNemar test was used to compare the predictive ability of the two methods.In the validation population, the use of likelihood ratios had an area under the receiver operator characteristic curve of 0.90 for Down syndrome detection, whereas the use of logistic regression coefficients had an area under the curve of 0.86. Adopting a risk cutoff point of 1/270, the sensitivity of likelihood ratios was 77.4% (95% confidence interval [CI], 58.9%-90.4%) with a false-positive rate of 17.9% (95% CI, 15.0%-21.1%), whereas the sensitivity of logistic regression coefficients was 93.5% (95% CI, 78.6%-99.2%) with a false-positive rate of 34.6% (95% CI, 30.9%-38.4%). There was significant difference in screening efficiency for Down syndrome detection between the two methods (exact McNemar χ(2), P < .001 ).With a slight reduction in the Down syndrome detection rate, the use of the likelihood ratio approach was associated with a significantly lower false-positive rate compared with the logistic regression approach.First trimester intact hCG as an early marker of trisomy 21: a promise unrecognised?An initial study of trisomy 21 cases showed that prior to 10 weeks, maternal serum levels of intact hCG in the early first trimester are lower than normal. Here we further study the levels prior to and after 10 weeks of gestation to further establish whether or not the intact hCG is effective as a very early screening marker.Fifty-nine samples from pregnancies with trisomy 21 were identified, 31 were collected between the sixth and ninth weeks of gestation and 28 after the tenth week. A series of 629 gestational age-matched samples collected during the same period formed the control group. Intact hCG was measured by a DELFIA assay.The multiples of the median (MoM) in cases (n = 31) collected prior to 10 weeks were 0.79 (CI 0.62-0.98) at a median gestation of 9.1 weeks. Prior to 9 weeks (n = 14) the median was 0.774 (CI 0.54-1.09) at a median gestation of 8.5 weeks. Modelling the detection rate for a 3 or 5% false-positive rate when screening using intact hCG, free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 8-10 weeks of gestation indicated that 71 or 77% of cases would be detected.More data are needed to establish a secure MoM for intact hCG in pregnancies prior to 10 weeks, before it could be considered a suitable screening marker.Maternal urine alpha-fetoprotein concentrations between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation.The aim of this study was to ascertain the normal range of the midtrimester maternal urine alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) concentrations in Taiwanese pregnancies.AFP was measured in the urine samples, obtained before genetic amniocentesis, from 268 women with normal singleton pregnancies between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation. Week-specific median values for urine AFP/creatinine (Cr) were calculated by weighted linear regression after log transformation and the data were converted to units in the multiple of the median (MoM). The gestational age in all cases was determined by ultrasound parameters.The levels of urine AFP and AFP/Cr increased gradually with advancing gestational age. The AFP/Cr MoM values of singleton pregnancies after log transformation showed a normal distribution with a mean (standard deviation) of 0.0071 (0.3228). The median, 10th and 90th centiles of AFP/Cr were 0.98, 0.43 and 3.61 MoM, respectively. Of the pregnant Taiwanese women studied, 4.9% (13/268) and 16% (43/268) had urine AFP/Cr MoM levels less than 0.31 MoM and 0.5 MoM respectively.The establishment of a reference range which allows for gestational differences in AFP/Cr levels is essential for further antenatal testing.Variation of fetal nasal bone length in second-trimester fetuses according to race and ethnicity.The purpose of this study was to determine the influence of race and ethnicity on the expected nasal bone length (NBL) based on biparietal diameter (BPD) measured in second-trimester fetuses.We searched our ultrasound, obstetric, and cytogenetic databases for all second-trimester fetuses with measured NBLs. Fetuses with Down syndrome were identified and excluded from the analysis. Linear regression curves were generated for NBL by BPD according to race and ethnicity. Categories used were African American, Hispanic, Asian, and white. Analysis of variance was used to compare mean variation of observed from expected NBL by BPD according to race and ethnicity.There were 717 fetuses with NBL-by-BPD pairs who were available for analysis in our population, including 139 African American, 58 Hispanic, 22 Asian, and 498 white fetuses. Nasal bone length was highly correlated with BPD for each race (P < .001). Mean variances of observed from expected NBL by BPD were statistically different according to race or ethnicity (P = .0092).Race and ethnicity significantly affect the mean regression line of expected NBL by BPD among fetuses in the second trimester. Genetic sonographic norms, therefore, appear to require race- and ethnicity-specific formulas for NBL.Maternal serum ADAM12 (A disintegrin and metalloprotease) in chromosomally abnormal pregnancy at 11-13 weeks.The objective of this study was to investigate the potential value of ADAM12 (A disintegrin and metalloprotease) in first-trimester screening for trisomy 21 and other major chromosomal abnormalities.The concentration of ADAM12 was measured at 11-13 weeks in cases of trisomy 21 (n = 49), trisomy 18 (n = 28), trisomy 13 (n = 20), Turner syndrome (n = 29), triploidy (n = 10), and euploid pregnancies (n = 272). The levels of ADAM12, expressed as multiples of median (MoM), were compared in cases and controls and were assessed for association with free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A).The median ADAM12 value in trisomy 21 (0.961 MoM) was not significantly different from the euploid fetuses (1.013 MoM), but in trisomy 18 (0.697 MoM), trisomy 13 (0.577 MoM), triploidy (0.426 MoM), and Turner syndrome (0.747 MoM), the levels were significantly lower. In both the euploid and aneuploid pregnancies, there was a significant association between ADAM12 and free beta-hCG and PAPP-A.Maternal serum ADAM12 concentration at 11-13 weeks of gestation is unlikely to be useful in first-trimester screening for chromosomal abnormalities because in trisomy 21 the levels are not significantly different from normal, and in the other chromosomal defects, there is a significant association between ADAM12 and the traditional biochemical markers of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A.First-trimester screening for Down syndrome in singleton pregnancies achieved by intrauterine insemination.To evaluate whether achieving a singleton pregnancy by IUI affects the results of first-trimester screening for Down syndrome compared to naturally conceived pregnancy.Forty-nine IUI and 3059 naturally conceived singleton pregnancies were included in the study. Ovulation in IUI pregnancies was induced by clomiphene and human menopausal gonadotropin. Progesterone was given after insemination for 2 weeks. Down syndrome screening was performed using a combination of maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency, and maternal serum concentrations of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A during the period of 10-14 weeks' gestation.In IUI pregnancies, nuchal translucency thickness and the levels of PAPP-A were significantly higher. The values of free beta-hCG were not statistically different between the two groups. The screen-positive rate in IUI pregnancies was significantly higher (14.3% vs. 7.1%).Singleton pregnancies achieved by IUI have a higher screen-positive rate. Not only elder maternal age but also exogenous hormones given during the process of ovulation induction and after conception may play an important factor influencing positive screening results.Screening for triploidy by the risk algorithms for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 at 11 weeks to 13 weeks and 6 days of gestation.To examine the effectiveness in screening for triploidy at 11 weeks to 13 weeks and 6 days of gestation by the combined use of the risk algorithms for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 based on maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness, fetal heart rate (FHR) and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A.Prospective screening for trisomy 21, including 56 376 normal singleton pregnancies and 31 cases with triploidy (24 digynic and 7 diandric). Patient-specific risks for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 were calculated by multiplying the age related risk for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 with the likelihood ratio (LR) for fetal NT and with a combined LR for FHR, free beta-hCG and PAPP-A, respectively. Detection rates (DRs) and false positive rates (FPRs) for triploidy were calculated by taking the proportion with risks above a given risk threshold and standardized for maternal age according to the distribution of pregnancies in England and Wales in 2000 to 2002.In digynic triploidy, free beta-hCG was 0.16 (range 0.02-0.95) MoM and PAPP-A was 0.06 (range 0.02-0.47) MoM and the respective values for diandric triploidy were 8.74 (range 2.83-47.0) and 0.74 (range 0.32-1.51) MoM. Use of the trisomy 21 algorithm identified 5 of the 7 diandric cases and 3 of the 24 digynic ones at a 3% FPR. Combined use of the risk algorithms for trisomies 18 and 13 identified 20 of the 24 cases with the digynic triploidy at the FPR of 0.2%. When screen positivity was defined by a 3% FPR using the algorithm for trisomy 21 and an additional 0.2% FPR using the algorithms for trisomies 18 and 13, the total FPR was 3.1% and the DR was 84%.A beneficial side-effect of first trimester combined screening for trisomies is the detection of a high proportion of fetuses with triploidy.Prenasal thickness in trisomy-21 fetuses at 16-24 weeks of gestation.To construct a reference range for fetal prenasal thickness between 16 and 24 weeks of gestation and to evaluate the thickness in fetuses with trisomy 21.We acquired three-dimensional (3D) volumes of the fetal profile from 135 normal fetuses and 26 fetuses with trisomy 21 at 16-24 weeks' gestation. We used the multiplanar mode to obtain the exact mid-sagittal plane and measured the prenasal thickness as the shortest distance between the anterior edge of the lowest part of the frontal bone (at the junction with the nasal bone when present) and the skin anteriorly.In the normal group prenasal thickness increased with gestation from a mean of 2.4 mm at 16 weeks to 4.6 mm at 24 weeks. Repeatability studies demonstrated that in 95% of the cases the difference between two measurements of prenasal thickness by the same operator and by different operators was less than 1 mm. In the trisomy-21 fetuses the mean prenasal thickness was significantly larger than in normal fetuses and in 19 (73.1%) cases it was above the 95(th) centile of the normal range. There was no significant difference in prenasal thickness between the trisomic fetuses with and without ventriculomegaly, nuchal edema, absent nasal bone or a cardiac defect.The fetal profile is routinely examined during the second-trimester scan and therefore the skill needed to obtain the view necessary for the measurement of prenasal thickness is widely available. If the finding of our study--that in more than 70% of fetuses with trisomy 21 prenasal thickness is above the 95(th) centile--is confirmed in prospective screening studies this measurement alone could prove a highly sensitive method of second-trimester screening for trisomy 21.Is maternal serum total hCG a marker of trisomy 21 in the first trimester of pregnancy?In a study of 130 first trimester cases of trisomy 21 and 959 controls we have shown that the median MoM for alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) is lower (0.82) and that for total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) is higher (1.31) than in the control group. For AFP 15.3% of cases were below the 5th centile and for total hCG 19. 8% were above the 95th centile. The median shift observed for AFP and total hCG is poorer than that for pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) or free beta-hCG and together with maternal age, AFP and total hCG could only be expected to detect 40% of cases. In combination with PAPP-A, total hCG would identify 52% of cases, somewhat less than the 67% observed with free beta-hCG and PAPP-A. However, we have demonstrated for total hCG a significant temporal change in median MoM with gestational age. Before 70 days the median MoM was less than 0.5, between 70 and 83 days this increased to 1.13, and between 84 and 97 days this increased to 1.52. This median shift has significant implications for interpreting previous studies and even more significant implications for detection rates. When population parameters specific to the gestational age in question are used, detection rates with total hCG and PAPP-A increase from 47% at 70-83 days to 60% at 84-97 days. This observation explains much of the confusion around total hCG in the first trimester and shows the importance of selecting analyte pairs and population parameters appropriate to the time in gestation when screening is performed.Second-trimester unconjugated oestriol levels in maternal serum from chromosomally abnormal pregnancies using an optimized assay.Second-trimester unconjugated oestriol (UE3) levels were measured retrospectively in maternal serum from 78 chromosomally abnormal pregnancies and 390 matched controls using a radioimmunoassay kit (Amersham AMERLEX-M) optimized for use in the second trimester. Reduced levels of UE3 were found in a group of 49 Down's syndrome pregnancies with a median UE3 level of 0.79 multiples of the median (MOM) of the controls. Four trisomy 18 pregnancies had UE3 levels less than 0.7 MOM. There was a highly significant level of correlation between alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and UE3 levels in the controls (r = 0.25, p < 0.01), the Down's syndrome pregnancies (r = 0.44, p < 0.01), and the other chromosome abnormalities (r = 0.61, p < 0.01). When used as an additional marker to AFP and human chorionic gonadotrophin in screening for Down's syndrome, UE3 does not appear to add to the sensitivity of such screening.Is prostate-specific antigen a marker for pregnancies affected by Down syndrome?Frontomaxillary facial angles in screening for trisomy 21 at 14-23 weeks' gestation.The objective of the study was to investigate the potential value of the frontomaxillary facial (FMF) angle in second-trimester ultrasound screening for trisomy 21.We examined stored images of fetal profiles taken before amniocentesis at 14-24 weeks from 100 euploid fetuses and 34 with trisomy 21. The FMF angles between the upper surface of the upper palate and the frontal bone (FMF(bone)) and the skin over the forehead (FMF(skin)) were measured.In the euploid group the FMF angles decreased with gestation. In the fetuses with trisomy 21, the FMF(bone) and FMF(skin) angles were 79.4% and 87.9% above the 95th percentile for gestation of the respective values from the euploid group. In trisomy 21 fetuses, there was no significant difference in FMF angles between those with nasal bone hypoplasia (n = 19) and those without (n = 15).The FMF angle is substantially higher in trisomy 21 than euploid fetuses. Measurement of the FMF angles is likely to prove a useful method in prenatal screening for trisomy 21 in the second trimester.A new approach to calculating the risk of chromosomal abnormalities with first-trimester screening data.First-trimester screening at 11 - 14 weeks has been proven to be very useful in the early detection of chromosomal defects. The aim of this project was to develop a CE-certified new risk calculation program (PRC = Prenatal Risk Calculation) using a nationwide database.The database underlying the new risk calculation procedure was established in Germany from 2003 through 2006. Overall, the database includes measurements from 70,030 pregnant women having given birth to healthy children. Following consideration of all pregnancies associated with a chromosomally abnormal outcome, the sample size was 451. The algorithm used for calculating the risk of a chromosomally abnormal outcome comprises the following variables: maternal age, crown-rump length (CRL) (restricted to a range from 45 - 84 mm or, equivalently, 11 + 1 - 14 + 0 weeks of gestation), nuchal translucency (NT), as well as the maternal serum parameters PAPP-A (pregnancy associated plasma protein A) and free beta-hCG (free human chorionic gonadotropin). In a preliminary cross-validation study, we applied both the new algorithm and the FMF UK program to an independent sample containing n = 40,568 pregnancies with negative outcome, n = 187 cases of trisomy 21, n = 34 trisomies 18 and n = 13 trisomies 13.Using the primary sample of 70,030 pregnancies with a negative outcome, reference bands were constructed for the sonographic parameter fetal nuchal translucency and the biochemical parameters PAPP-A and free beta-HCG. Instead of MoM values we used "degree of extremeness" (DoE) values. This statistical parameter has been proven to give more precise results than the MoM measure because it assesses the deviation of the actual measurement value from the centre of the reference band expressed as a multiple of the width of the respective band section. The result of the risk calculation is visualized by means of a traffic light graph which allows the patient to comprehend her individual risk at first glance. The red color indicates a high risk, green a low risk, and yellow represents a moderate risk. In our preliminary cross-validation study the detection rate obtained for the German algorithm was 86.6 % for trisomy 21, 94.1 % for trisomy 18 and 92.4 for trisomy 13. The corresponding detection rates obtained with the same data by the FMF UK program were 86.1 %, 82.3 % and 69.2 % throughout. The false-positive rate was 5.0 % throughout.The new risk calculation procedure of the FMF Germany (PRC) has been made available as a CE-certified computer program. In screening for trisomy 21 it yields results comparable to those of the program used by the FMF UK. Regarding the diagnosis of trisomy 13 and 18, even higher detection rates are currently achieved with the German algorithm. Program, data base and license key are available free of charge to registered members of the FMF Germany.Maternal serum triple analyte screening and adverse pregnancy outcome.The prognostic value of maternal serum triple analyte screening with AFP, hCG and uE3 (unconjugated estriol) was studied early in the second trimester of pregnancy. In this case-control study of 38 women and 76 matched controls derived from a consecutive screened population of 28,897, case selection was based upon elevated MSAFP and MShCG (> or = 2 MOM) and low MSuE3 (< or = 0.6 MOM). Adverse pregnancy outcome was found in 65.8% of cases and 2.6% of controls (RR 25, 95% CI 6.3-100.0). When increased odds (> or = 1 in 270) for Down's syndrome were considered with the abnormal analyte screen, fetal/congenital defects, fetal neonatal loss or low birth weight were noted in 17/26 cases (65.4%). Elevated MSAFP and MShCG with low values for estriol, with or without increased odds for Down's syndrome, imply an unfavorable prognosis for both the fetus and the child.FlashFISH: "same day" prenatal diagnosis of common chromosomal aneuploidies.Fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) and quantitative fluorescence (QF)-PCR are rapid molecular methods that test for common chromosomal aneuploidies in prenatal diagnosis. While cytogenetic analysis requires approximately 7-14 days before fetal karyotypes are available, these molecular methods release results of sex chromosome aneuploidies, Down syndrome, Edward's syndrome, and Patau's syndrome within 24-48 h of fetal sampling, alleviating parental anxiety. However, specific diagnosis or exclusion of aneuploidy should be available within the same day of amniocentesis. We developed "FlashFISH," a low cost FISH method that allows accurate results to be reported within 2 h of fetal sampling. Here, we report our experience of using FlashFISH in prenatal diagnosis, and we illustrate in detail the protocols used for the purpose in our laboratory.Screening for trisomy 21 in Flanders: a 10 years review of 40.490 pregnancies screened by maternal serum.To evaluate maternal serum screening for trisomy 21 (MSS) in Flanders between 1992 and 2002.Data of a large database on the results of MSS, nuchal translucency (NT) and pregnancy outcome were analysed retrospectively.Despite an excellent performance of second trimester MSS at a maternal age > or = 35 years (94.4% detection rate (DR) of trisomy 21 at a false positive rate (FPR) of 22.4%), the proportion of patients above 35 years of age in the study population was significantly lower than in the Flemish general pregnant population (5.5% versus 8.9%, P < 0.001). In the population screened by MSS and NT, the DR of second trimester MSS at a 5% FPR was 44.4%, which was lower than 66.6% in the population screened by MSS without NT. When nine trisomy 21-affected pregnancies were compared to 3265 normal pregnancies, the mean NT-MoM values were not significantly different (1.16 +/- 0.89 versus 1.00 +/- 0.46, P > 0.05). Both the findings comply to a sequential screening practice where second trimester MSS is only performed after a normal measurement of NT in the first trimester.In Flanders, the uptake of second trimester maternal serum screening is low in women aged 35 years or more. Its screening performance decreased after the introduction of sequential screening.Multiple marker screening for Down syndrome in twin pregnancies.This study documents the screening performance, in practice, of a published protocol for interpreting second-trimester Down syndrome risk in twin pregnancies, using maternal serum biochemical markers. Within a cohort of 35,150 pregnancies, 410 twin pregnancies were identified. The rate of twinning was positively associated with maternal age. Of the 274 twin pregnancies known prior to screening, 15 (5.5 per cent) were classified as being screen-positive for Down syndrome. When maternal age and dating method were taken into account, the screen-positive rates in twin and singleton pregnancies did not differ significantly. Nine of the 14 screen-positive women with viable twin pregnancies chose amniocentesis [64 per cent, 95 per cent confidence interval (CI) 35-87]. No cases of Down syndrome were identified. Based on modelling, an estimated 73 per cent of monozygotic twin pregnancies and 43 per cent of dizygotic twin pregnancies with Down syndrome would be identified at a 5 per cent false-positive rate. The overall detection rate would be about 53 per cent. When laboratories offer multiple marker screening to women with twin pregnancies, the false-positive rate ought to be similar to that found in singleton pregnancies; the detection rate is, however, likely to be lower for dizygotic twins.Increased first trimester nuchal translucency: pregnancy and infant outcomes after routine screening for Down's syndrome in an unselected antenatal population.Although increased nuchal translucency (NT) has been linked to a wide range of fetal chromosomal abnormalities and genetic syndromes, very few studies have looked at the outcomes of chromosomally normal pregnancies in unselected obstetric populations. This study aims to evaluate the outcomes of pregnancies with nuchal translucency measurements greater than or equal to 4 mm in a low risk obstetric population attending for routine first trimester screening. Women attending for booking scans were routinely offered nuchal translucency measurement as a screening test for Down's syndrome between 10 and 14 weeks gestation. The prevalence of increased nuchal translucency was 0.8% (n = 53). There were 15 (28.3%) chromosomal abnormalities, the commonest of which was Down's syndrome. Of the 38 chromosomally normal pregnancies, seven resulted in intrauterine death, early neonatal death or termination of pregnancy. The remaining 31 cases resulted in livebirths, of which two infants now exhibit developmental delay of unknown aetiology and one has been diagnosed as having Noonan's syndrome. 10 (19%) pregnancies were diagnosed as having major anatomical malformations resulting in fetal or neonatal demise or requiring postnatal surgery. In a routine obstetric population, the finding of an NT measurement greater than or equal to 4 mm is associated with a poor pregnancy outcome in the majority of cases, mainly owing to chromosomal abnormality. This study establishes the need for focused fetal assessment in cases with such first trimester findings.Screening for Down syndrome using first-trimester combined screening followed by second-trimester ultrasound examination in an unselected population.Recent studies have reported the efficacy of first-trimester combined screening for Down syndrome based on maternal age, serum markers (human chorionic gonadotropin, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A), and ultrasound measurement of fetal nuchal translucency. However, those do not incorporate the value of the widely accepted routine 20-22 weeks' anomaly scan.We carried out a multicenter, interventional study in the unselected population of a single health authority in order to assess the performance of first-trimester combined screening, followed by routine second trimester ultrasound examination and/or screening by maternal serum markers (free beta-hCG and alpha-fetoprotein measurement or total hCG, alpha-fetoprotein, and unconjugated estriol measurement) when incidentally performed. Detection and screen positive rates were estimated using a correction method for nonverified issues. A cost analysis was also performed.During the study period, 14,934 women were included. Fifty-one cases of Down syndrome were observed, giving a prevalence of 3.4 per 1000 pregnancies. Of these, 46 were diagnosed through first (n = 41) or second (n = 5) trimester screening. Among the 5 screen-negative Down syndrome cases, all were diagnosed postnatally after an uneventful pregnancy. Detection and screen positive rates of first-trimester combined screening were 79.6% and 2.7%, respectively. These features reached 89.7%, and 4.2%, respectively, when combined with second-trimester ultrasound screening. The average cost of the full screening procedure was 108 euros (120 dollars) per woman and the cost per diagnosed Down syndrome pregnancy was 7,118 euros (7909 dollars).Our findings suggest that 1 pragmatic interventional 2-step approach using first-trimester combined screening followed by second-trimester detailed ultrasound examination is a suitable and acceptable option for Down syndrome screening in pregnancy.Effect of fetal gender on first trimester markers and on Down syndrome screening.The purpose of the present study was to evaluate whether a gender-related difference exists in first trimester markers used for Down syndrome screening, namely nuchal translucency (NT), maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG), and whether this has an influence on screening performance.A total of 1325 patients with a singleton pregnancy underwent combined first trimester screening at 10-13 weeks' gestation. Maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG were analyzed by fluoroimmunoassay, nuchal translucency (NT) was measured by transvaginal sonography. Only patients with normal outcomes and known fetal gender were included in the study. Data were categorized by gestational age and by fetal gender.There were no significant gender-related differences in NT and PAPP-A levels. However, free beta-hCG was significantly higher (p=0.00004) in the presence of a female fetus than in the presence of a male fetus. Women with female fetuses had a higher median calculated Down syndrome risk (1:5490) compared to those having males (1:6451). This difference was not, however, statistically significant.First trimester free beta-hCG is significantly higher in pregnancies with a female fetus.Human chorionic gonadotropin and unconjugated oestriol measurements in insulin-dependent diabetic pregnant women being screened for fetal Down syndrome.This prospective study investigates the relationship between insulin-dependent diabetes and maternal serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), and human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG). It also examines the potential impact on screening for Down syndrome. The population-based cohort included 20,321 pregnant women in Maine who underwent routine serum screening for Down syndrome in the second trimester. The cohort included 52 women with insulin-dependent diabetes. Maternal serum AFP levels are now routinely adjusted for insulin-dependent diabetes. These adjustments, therefore, were made routinely in the diabetic women, but no equivalent adjustments were made for uE3 and hCG values. The initial false-positive rate (using all three markers) among the women with diabetes was not significantly different from that in the non-diabetic population (7.7 and 5.4 per cent, respectively). Prior to adjustment for insulin-dependent diabetes, the median AFP level in the 52 women was 0.73 multiples of the median (MOM); the median levels of uE3 and hCG were 0.93 and 0.98 MOM, respectively. When the uE3 and hCG levels were adjusted, the initial false-positive rate was unchanged. Median serum levels of uE3 were significantly higher in the 33 women whose onset of diabetes was prior to 19 years of age (0.99 MOM) than in the 19 women whose onset of diabetes was at age 19 or older (0.84 MOM). This is the first population-based study to investigate the relationship between diabetes and serum levels of AFP, uE3, and hCG, and confirms earlier observations from a case-control study that found only slightly lower uE3 and hCG levels.Evaluation of an assay of the free beta-subunit of choriogonadotropin and its potential value in screening for Down's syndrome.In this study I investigated the analytical and clinical performance of the measurement of the free beta-subunit of choriogonadotropin (hCG) in normal pregnancies and in pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome. Free beta-hCG in maternal serum has been shown to be increased in Down's syndrome-affected pregnancies and is proportionally increased in more cases than is total hCG. This study confirms previous findings of low concentrations of unconjugated estriol and alpha-fetoprotein in maternal serum in Down's syndrome-affected pregnancies. Using a multivariate risk analysis of maternal age and concentrations of alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, and hCG in maternal serum, I determined that, at a risk cutoff value of 1 in 300, 52% of Down's cases could be detected with total hCG in the calculation, compared with 66% with the free beta-hCG concentration. The false-positive rate was 5.9% in both cases. Therefore, free beta-hCG can be used effectively in a screening program for Down's syndrome; however, further studies are required to ascertain whether the measurement of free beta-hCG has any advantages over the use of total hCG for detecting Down's syndrome.Clinical impact of systematic genetic sonogram screening in a low-risk population.To determine the clinical impact of a genetic sonogram (GS) on a population at low risk for trisomy 21 (T21).A GS evaluating common major and minor markers was created and prospectively applied to consecutive women at 15-20 weeks' gestation presenting for routine ultrasound and at low T21 risk. Prenatal diagnosis (PND) referral occurred if 1 major marker, 2 minor markers, major malformation or choroid plexus cysts (CPCs) were seen. Neonatal outcomes were determined by chart review for neonates born at our institution and by letter for those born elsewhere. Using an ultrasound database, a similar population was identified prior to study inception and the GS retrospectively applied. PND referrals in both periods were confirmed by chart review. The rates of isolated minor marker (IMM), positive GS and PND referrals were compared using chi2 analysis.IMM detection was unchanged (43 of 434, 10.1%) in the study vs. (23 of 243, 9.5%) control group. Excluding CPCs, 6 of 18 (33.3%) subjects of vs. 2 of 28 (7.1%) controls with IMM were referred for prenatal diagnosis (p < 0.03). The frequency of positive GS was unchanged: 14 of 434 (3.2%) subjects vs. 5 of 243 (2.1%) controls.Currently no prospectively studied, effective ultrasound models exist for screening low-risk populations at 15-20 weeks. A GS with clear criteria for counseling on an increased T21 risk decreased inappropriate referrals without increasing positive screens.Combined second-trimester biochemical and ultrasound screening for Down syndrome.To evaluate the efficacy of a Down syndrome screening protocol that combines second-trimester maternal serum analytes and the continuous ultrasound measures of nuchal fold thickness and proximal long bone length.Ultrasound measurements of nuchal fold, femur length, and humerus length were reviewed for 72 second-trimester Down syndrome and 7063 unaffected fetuses. Derived statistical variables for these parameters were entered into a multivariable Gaussian model together with the statistical variables used in the "quad" test (maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, human chorionic gonadotropin, and inhibin A). Maternal age-specific sensitivities, false-positive rates, and positive predictive values were generated together with receiver operating characteristic curves. Overall efficacy of ultrasound screening alone, the quad test, and the combination of the ultrasound and quad test were compared using a 1:270 second-trimester risk cutoff applied to 1999 US births.Using ultrasound, a sensitivity of 79.9% and false-positive rate of 6.7% may be achieved (positive predictive value: 1 in 42). The quad test has a sensitivity of 81.5% and false-positive rate of 6.9% (positive predictive value: 1 in 42). The combination of the quad test with nuchal fold and long bone measurements may achieve 90% sensitivity and a 3.1% false-positive rate (positive predictive value: 1 in 18).Combining second-trimester serum testing and fetal biometry is a feasible approach to Down syndrome screening, compatible with current obstetric practice. This modality is substantially more effective than either serum screening or ultrasound alone. Efficacy may be comparable to that reported for combined first- and second-trimester (integrated) screening.First-trimester screening: lessons from clinical trials and implementation.Fetal tricuspid regurgitation at the 11 + 0 to 13 + 6-week scan: association with chromosomal defects and reproducibility of the method.To determine the reproducibility of diagnosing tricuspid regurgitation (TR) at 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks' gestation, to examine further the relationship between TR and the presence of chromosomal defects and to calculate the likelihood ratios for trisomy 21 and trisomy 18 in fetuses with TR.Pulsed wave Doppler of flow across the tricuspid valve was carried out by 12 obstetricians, trained in fetal echocardiography, to ascertain the presence or absence of TR in 1557 fetuses at 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks. The assessment was carried out immediately before chorionic villus sampling for fetal karyotyping. In 128 cases, assessment of tricuspid flow was also performed by experienced fetal cardiologists to examine the reproducibility of the method.Tricuspid flow was successfully assessed in 1538 (98.8%) cases and TR was present in 58 (4.4%) of the 1323 chromosomally normal fetuses, 77 (67.5%) of the 114 cases with trisomy 21, and 14 (33.3%) of the 42 cases with trisomy 18. The kappa coefficient of agreement between obstetricians and cardiologists was 0.872 (P < 0.0001). Logistic regression analysis demonstrated that, in chromosomally normal fetuses, significant prediction of the likelihood of TR was provided by delta nuchal translucency (NT). The likelihood ratio for trisomy 21 and trisomy 18 for TR, derived by dividing the likelihood (%) of TR in trisomy 21 by the likelihood (%) in normal fetuses, decreased with delta NT.At 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks, TR is a common finding in fetuses with trisomies 21 and 18. Assessment of the tricuspid flow can be performed by sonographers trained in fetal echocardiography.Midtrimester maternal serum screening after multifetal pregnancy reduction in pregnancies conceived by in vitro fertilization.Data about the effect of multifetal pregnancy reduction on midtrimester maternal serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE3) are scarce and contradictory. Differing gestational ages at fetal reduction, transvaginal versus transabdominal needle insertion, and injection of different feticidal agents compound the analysis of published data.We examined clinical and laboratory data about 27 high-order gestations that were reduced to twins in the first trimester. Fetal reductions were performed transabdominally at 11.41 +/- 1.15 weeks' gestation by fetal intrathoracic injection of KCl, and maternal blood sampling was performed at 16.48 +/- 1.05 weeks. "Pseudo-risks" for singleton pregnancies were calculated by correcting serum analyte levels for twins.Twenty-four (88.9%) of 27 patients had maternal serum AFP levels above 2.0 MoM (mean, 4.60 +/- 3.48 MoM; range, 1.49-14.85 MoM), however, none of the newborns had structural anomalies. AFP serum levels did not correlate with the number of reduced fetuses or with adverse obstetric outcome. The mean hCG levels were 1.22 +/- 0.49 MoM (range, 0.14-2.47), and the mean uE3 levels were 1.15 +/- 0.31 MoM (range, 0.56-1.84). Based on maternal age alone, seven patients (25.9%) would have been offered amniocentesis for a term Down syndrome risk greater than 1:384, whereas combined risk calculations with hCG and uE3 levels resulted in 1 (3.7%) screen-positive case (P < 0.01).Comparison of serum markers in first-trimester down syndrome screening.The role of ultrasound in screening for Down syndrome.[Fetal nuchal translucency].In addition to its role in the assessment of risk for trisomy 21, increased nuchal translucency (NT) thickness can also identify a high proportion of other chromosomal defects and is associated with major abnormalities of the heart and great arteries, and a wide range of genetic syndromes. In the first trimester, the term translucency is used to describe the accumulation of fluid behind the fetal neck, irrespective of whether it is septated or not and whether it is confined to the neck or envelopes the whole fetus. During the second trimester, the translucency usually resolves and, in a few cases, it evolves into either nuchal edema or cystic hygromas with or without generalized hydrops. Increased NT is associated with trisomy 21, Turner syndrome and other chromosomal defects as well as many fetal malformations and genetic syndromes. The incidence of these abnormalities is related to the thickness, rather than the appearance, of NT The ability to achieve a reliable measurement of NT is dependent on appropriate training and adherence to a standard technique in order to achieve uniformity of results among different operators. Furthermore, the success of a screening program necessitates the presence of a system for regular audit of results and continuous assessment of the quality of images.First trimester screening for Down syndrome in rhesus negative women.To explore the effect of maternal rhesus status on first-trimester screening markers for Down syndrome.We accessed a database of singleton pregnancies undergoing first-trimester genetic screen with maternal Rh status documented and pregnancy outcome information available. Excluded were cases of fetal chromosomal or structural abnormalities, or maternal systemic disease. Results of maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) adjusted for gestational age were compared between Rh-negative and Rh-positive women with p < 0.05 considered significant.Two thousand two hundred and two pregnancies fulfilled the study criteria, and 160 of them (7%) were Rh negative. Only free beta-hCG corrected multiples of the median (MoM) values were statistically increased in Rh-negative women (p < 0.009). Using a cut-off of 1:300, screen-positive rates of maternal serum biochemistry were not significantly different between Rh-negative and Rh-positive women (12.5 vs 10.4%, p = 0.41).The present study focused on measurements of beta-hCG and PAPP-A in the sera of women with Rh-negative blood group. Women with Rh-negative blood type have similar first-trimester serum PAPP-A MoM values as Rh-positive women, but significantly higher beta-hCG MoM values. However, there was no significant difference in the screen-positive rate for Down syndrome between the two groups.Changes in nuchal translucency thickness in normal and abnormal karyotype fetuses.To investigate the dynamic trend of the nuchal translucency thickness between fetuses with normal and abnormal karyotype.Prospective observational study.Ospedale Microcitemico, Cagliari, Italy.A cohort of 305 first trimester fetuses.Fetuses with a nuchal translucency greater than or equal to the 95th centile were invited for a second nuchal translucency measurement. The finding of an 'increased or unchanged' or 'diminished' thickness was compared in fetuses with normal and abnormal karyotype.Nuchal translucency and karyotype. Median maternal age was 35 years (min 17, max 44) and median crown-rump length at first visit was 50 mm (min 38, max 80). A second nuchal translucency measurement was carried out in 292 fetuses, resulting in increased or unchanged values in 95 cases and decreased nuchal translucency in 197 cases. Two hundred and twenty-six (77.4%) fetuses had normal karyotype and 66 (22.6%) had abnormal karyotype (44 trisomies 21, 10 trisomies 18, 5 trisomies 13, 4 cases of 45 X0, 1 case of 47,XXY, 1 case of 47,XXX and 1 translocation). In the 66 chromosomally abnormal fetuses, the second nuchal translucency measurement was enlarged or unchanged in 37 (56%), and diminished in 29 (44%), while in the 226 normal fetuses the second nuchal translucency measurement was enlarged or unchanged in 58 cases (25%) and diminished in 168 (75%) (relative risk 2.6, 95% confidence interval 1.7-4.0).In fetuses with abnormal karyotype, the second nuchal translucency measurement tends to be increased or unchanged, while in normal cases the size of nuchal translucency is generally reduced.Maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome, open neural tube defects and trisomy 18.Maternal serum screening identifies women at an increased risk of a pregnancy with Down's syndrome or trisomy 18 or an open neural tube defect. The triple test, consisting of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol and human chorionic gonadotropin was carried out by a chemiluminescence immunoassay method in our laboratory. The study consisted of 373 pregnant women. The gestational range for the study group was 14-22 weeks. The mean maternal age for the study group was 28.53 +/- 5.46 years (range 17.4 to 43.5 years); 9.1% of the women were considered at high risk for Down's syndrome based on the test results. In our study the detection rate for Down's syndrome by prenatal karyotyping was 66.6%. Maternal serum screening allows reduction of the number of women requiring amniocentesis without a significant decrease in the detection rate.Second-trimester levels of maternal urinary gonadotropin peptide in Down syndrome pregnancy.Urinary gonadotropin peptide (UGP; beta-core fragment), a major metabolite of human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), was shown recently to be markedly elevated in Down syndrome pregnancy between 19 and 22 weeks of gestation. To confirm and extend this finding, we obtained maternal urine and matching maternal serum samples from 14 cases of Down syndrome and six other aneuploidies between 17 and 21 weeks of gestation. UGP was measured in all these samples and in 91 singleton control urines. Results were corrected for urinary creatinine level and expressed as multiples of the control median (MOM). hCG levels were assayed in all serum samples from the cases and compared with previously established reference values. The median UGP level in Down syndrome cases was 5.34 MOM (range 2.71-12.57); 88 per cent of the values were above the 95th centile of control levels after modelling. The median maternal serum hCG level for the same cases was 2.20 MOM (range 0.84-3.40); 36 per cent of the values were above the 95th centile. The level of UGP in every case including all other aneuploidies was higher than the comparable maternal serum hCG level. Elevated UGP measurements are strongly associated with fetal Down syndrome during the second trimester and could contribute to improved Down syndrome screening protocols that are more accessible and less expensive than are currently available.Relation between increased fetal nuchal translucency thickness and chromosomal defects.To examine the prevalence and distribution of all chromosomal defects in fetuses with increased nuchal translucency thickness.Assessment of risk for trisomy 21 was carried out by a combination of maternal age and fetal nuchal translucency thickness at 11-13 + 6 weeks. A search of the database was made to identify, first, all singleton pregnancies in which fetal karyotyping was carried out and, second, the cases where the fetal nuchal translucency was equal to or above the 95th centile for fetal crown-rump length. The prevalence and distribution of chromosomal defects were determined for each nuchal translucency category: between the 95th centile for crown-rump length and 3.4 mm, 3.5-4.4 mm, 4.5-5.4 mm, 5.5-6.4 mm, 6.5-7.4 mm, 7.5-8.4 mm, 8.5-9.4 mm, 9.5-10.4 mm, 10.5-11.4 mm, and 11.5 mm or more.The search identified 11,315 pregnancies. The median maternal age was 34.5 (range 15-50) years, and the median fetal crown-rump length was 64 (range 45-84) mm. The fetal karyotype was abnormal in 2,168 (19.2%) pregnancies, and the incidence of chromosomal defects increased with nuchal translucency thickness from approximately 7% for those with nuchal translucency between the 95th centile for crown-rump length and 3.4 mm to 75% for nuchal translucency of 8.5 mm or more. In the majority of fetuses with trisomy 21, the nuchal translucency thickness was less then 4.5 mm, whereas in the majority of fetuses with trisomies 13 or 18 it was 4.5-8.4 mm, and in those with Turner syndrome it was 8.5 mm or more.In fetuses with increased nuchal translucency, approximately one half of the chromosomally abnormal group is affected by defects other than trisomy 21. The distribution of nuchal translucency is different for each type of chromosomal defect.II-3.Fetal aberrant right subclavian artery in normal and Down syndrome fetuses.To evaluate the prevalence of fetal aberrant right subclavian artery (ARSA) in a low-risk population and compare it with that among Down syndrome fetuses, in order to estimate its potential as a marker in Down syndrome screening.Women undergoing routine fetal sonographic examination between 13 and 26 weeks of gestation were evaluated once for the presence of ARSA using either a transvaginal multifrequency 5-9-MHz probe or a transabdominal 4-8-MHz probe as appropriate. Early pregnancy outcome was obtained in all cases.Nine hundred and twenty-four fetuses were recruited. An ARSA was detected in 13 fetuses (1.4%) with normal karyotype. During the study period, eight fetuses with Down syndrome referred either with known karyotype or with signs suspicious for Down syndrome were evaluated by the same protocol. Three of eight fetuses (37.5%) were found to have an ARSA. In none of these cases was ARSA an isolated finding. The odds ratio for ARSA in Down syndrome compared with normal fetuses was 42.04 (95% CI, 9.08-194.6).An ARSA was found in 1.4% of the normal population. In the small group of Down syndrome fetuses we observed a trend towards a higher rate of ARSA than in normal fetuses. In none of the Down syndrome fetuses was ARSA an isolated finding. Larger prospective studies are needed to examine the significance of ARSA as an isolated finding and the potential of ARSA as a marker in Down syndrome screening.Costs and effects of prenatal screening methods for Down syndrome and neural tube defects.To evaluate prenatal screening methods for Down syndrome and neural tube defects (NTD) with regard to costs per detected case and the number of screening-related miscarriages.The screening methods compared were risk assessment tests, i.e. serum tests and nuchal translucency measurement (NT), and invasive testing through chorionic villus sampling (CVS) or amniocentesis. Costs, the number of cases detected and screening-related miscarriages were calculated using a decision tree model.The costs per detected case of Down syndrome ranged from EUR 98,000 for the first-trimester (serum) double test to EUR 191,000 for invasive testing. If NTD detection was included, the (serum) triple test had the lowest costs, EUR 73,000, per detected case of Down syndrome or NTD. The number of screening-related miscarriages due to invasive diagnostic tests varied from 13 per 100,000 women for the (serum) first- and second-trimester combined test to 914 per 100,000 women for invasive testing.Considering screening for both Down syndrome and NTD favors the triple test in terms of costs per detected case. Compared to invasive testing, risk assessment tests in general substantially lower screening-related miscarriages, which raises the question of whether invasive testing should still be offered in a screening program for Down syndrome.Maternal serum analyte levels in pregnancies with fetal Down syndrome resulting from translocations.Our purpose was to determine whether pregnancies affected by fetal Down syndrome resulting from Robertsonian translocations are associated with second-trimester maternal serum analyte levels different from those resulting from fetal trisomy 21.Pregnancies with Down syndrome caused by Robertsonian translocations were identified through the cytogenetics laboratories at the participating institutions. Those with maternal serum screening values between 15 and 20 weeks were evaluated.Eleven cases of fetal Down syndrome caused by Robertsonian translocations were identified. The median alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, and human chorionic gonadotropin levels were 0.68, 0.67, and 2.83 multiples of the median, respectively. These analyte levels are similar to those for fetal trisomy 21.These data suggest that Down syndrome resulting from either Robertsonian translocations or trisomy 21 will be detected in a similar percentage of cases because the second-trimester maternal serum analyte levels are similar.Identification of haptoglobin alpha-2FF variants in mid-trimester maternal serum as potential markers for Down syndrome.Exploratory protein analysis in mid-trimester maternal sera by 2-dimensional electrophoresis and image analysis was performed to determine the differences between mothers carrying fetuses with Down syndrome (DS) and control mothers. Nine haptoglobin alpha-1 and alpha-2 (Hp1 and Hp2) variants were detected. Three apparent isoforms of the Hp2FF protein having the same relative charge but different Mr's were detected, with the two smaller variants--Hp2FF (-0.7k) and Hp2FF (-1.3k)--believed to be first reported here. Ninety-two percent of the cases (n = 83) had the Hp2FF (-0.7k) protein, and 61% had Hp2FF (-1.3k). The geometric mean concentration of Hp2FF (Mr = 18.0 kd) was found to be significantly increased (P less than 0.01) in mid-trimester sera from cases (n = 27) compared to controls (n = 56). When the concentrations of the three Hp2FF isoforms were added, the cases had larger sums on average than controls (P less than 0.01).[A study on the screening of prenatal trisomy 21 using the fucosylated alpha-fetoprotein ratio measured by a liquid-phase binding assay].Pregnancy outcome in fetuses with increased nuchal translucency.The aim of this study was to examine fetal and neonatal outcomes in the setting of nuchal translucency (NT) > or =3 mm at routine first-trimester screening.A nested case-series study within a retrospective cohort of women screened for Down syndrome at 11-14 weeks of gestation. Crown-rump length, NT values and additional anomalies at first and early second trimesters were recorded. Follow-up information was obtained by a review of medical records and self-report from patients. Adverse outcomes included fetal death and termination of pregnancy due to structural or chromosomal anomalies.A total of 1930 pregnant women were screened between 11 and 14 weeks of gestation. The prevalence of increased fetal NT (> or =3 mm) was 1.4% (n=27). Among these, 12 showed increased fetal NT as an isolated finding. In this group, 2 women experienced fetal demise (16%) and 10 delivered healthy babies. In the group with additional abnormalities (n=15), 9 (60%) were found to have chromosomal abnormalities, all of which were terminated. For all cases with increased fetal NT, total incidence of adverse outcome was 62%.At first-trimester ultrasonography, a fetal NT > or =3 mm was associated with a high incidence of chromosomal abnormalities in the presence of associated abnormalities. For cases with the increased fetal NT at first-trimester fetal assessment and follow-up is necessary to detect possible adverse outcomes.Evaluation of maternal serum immunoreactive inhibin as a first trimester marker of Down's syndrome.Maternal serum immunoreactive inhibin has been shown to be significantly elevated in Down's affected pregnancies in the second trimester, suggesting that it may be useful in prenatal diagnosis. We have investigated whether it is similarly elevated in the first trimester.Stored maternal sera from women with Down's affected pregnancies and chromosomally normal control pregnancies were retrieved for analysis. These sera had been collected prospectively at either 11 or 12 weeks gestation as a routine antenatal booking procedure.From records, 11 women were identified as having had a Down's pregnancy. For each of these, 4 controls matched for gestation and duration-of-storage were also identified.Two different inhibin immunoassays were evaluated, one using an antibody raised against 31 kDa bovine inhibin and the other, a commercial two-site assay, using two antibodies directed against two distinct alpha-subunit epitopes.Neither assay detected a significant effect of gestation on serum inhibin levels. After combining the data from both gestations, no significant difference between the Down's samples and controls for either assay was detected. However, analysis of the data for each gestation separately revealed that one assay detected a significant difference in inhibin levels between Down's affected and unaffected pregnancies at 11 weeks gestation (mean +/- SEM 3186 +/- 195 vs 2020 +/- 172 ng/l, P < 0.01) but not at 12 weeks. The other, commercial, assay did not detect a significant difference at either gestation. In addition, there was poor association between the results of the two assays.These data suggest that immunoreactive inhibin, as detected by these assays, will not be useful as a late first trimester marker for Down's syndrome and also that these two assays detect different inhibin species in pregnancy serum.Levels of urinary beta-core fragment, total oestriol, and the ratio of the two in second-trimester screening for Down syndrome.Levels of beta-core fragment and total oestriol in second-trimester maternal urine samples were measured in 32 Down syndrome pregnancies and 206 control pregnancies. Beta-core fragment and total oestriol values were corrected for the urinary creatinine level and expressed as multiples of the control medians (MOM). In addition, the ratio of the beta-core fragment level to the total oestriol level, without creatinine correction, was calculated, and expressed as MOM values. The median beta-core fragment, total oestriol, and ratio levels in Down syndrome cases were 5.42, 0.64, and 9.32 MOM, respectively. In the Down syndrome pregnancies, 66 per cent of the beta-core fragment levels were above the 95th centile of control levels, while 22 per cent of the total oestriol levels were below the fifth centile of control levels. In combination with maternal age, measurement of beta-core fragment and total oestriol levels in Down syndrome pregnancy resulted in an 80 per cent detection rate at a 5 per cent false-positive rate. Use of the ratio resulted in a univariate detection rate of 72 per cent. In combination with maternal age, the ratio resulted in a detection rate of 81 per cent at a 5 per cent false-positive rate. Based on this unmatched study, the measurement of a ratio of beta-core fragment to total oestriol levels, without the need for creatinine correction, may be useful in screening for fetal Down syndrome in second-trimester urine.Clinical validation of a new dimeric inhibin-A assay suitable for second trimester Down's syndrome screening.To compare the Down's syndrome screening performance of a simplified dimeric inhibin-A assay (Diagnostic Systems Laboratories (DSL)) with an assay whose clinical utility has been established (Serotec).A case control set consisting of 51 Down's syndrome and 245 matched unaffected pregnancies collected as part of an earlier multicentre cohort study.Sera were assayed for dimeric inhibin-A using the DSL assay and Serotec reference assay. Data analysis included a method comparison of mass values, fit of data to a logarithmic Gausian distribution, and determination of detection and false positive rates. In addition, 234 fresh sera were assayed using the simplified method.The two assays showed a high correlation (r = 0.93) but average concentrations of the DSL assay were 48% higher. However, the differences were basically proportional over the range of values important for screening. The detection rate was essentially equivalent for the DSL assay whether analysed univariately or in combination with other markers (for example, 79% v 75% at a 5% false positive rate for the DSL and Serotec assays for the combination of alpha fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol, human chorionic gonadotrophin, and dimeric inhibin-A, respectively). The 234 dimeric inhibin-A values measured on fresh sera fitted a logarithm Gaussian distribution for the DSL assay, as indicated by the fit to a probability plot.The Down's syndrome screening performance of a simplified dimeric inhibin-A immunoassay was equivalent to a more labour intensive established dimeric inhibin-A assay.Population screening for aneuploidy using maternal age and ultrasound.The coexistence of an epidemiological register and a multidisciplinary centre for prenatal diagnosis promoted us to report data collected during six years (1990-1995) in Isère county on prenatally detected chromosomal aberrations. During the whole study period prenatal diagnosis strategy towards chromosome aberrations was based solely on maternal age and ultrasound examination. Results showed a respective contribution of one-third/two-thirds for the two detection modes (maternal age/ultrasound signs). From 1990 to 1995 a significant increase in the proportion of prenatally detected autosomal aneuploidy was observed, from 52 per cent to 75 per cent (P < 0.001). This significant variation was mainly due to an increase in the proportion of prenatally detected trisomy 21 cases, and to an increase in the proportion of aberrations which were detected through first trimester ultrasound examination. The highest positive predictive values were observed for polymalformation, cardiac anomalies and cystic hygroma ultrasound signs (51 per cent, 21 per cent and 26 per cent, respectively). Our results for trisomy 21 are close to those obtained in other studies, even when prenatal strategies are different. Their interest lies in the fact that they can be considered as a reference level of prenatal diagnosis efficiency due to a strategy based on maternal age and ultrasound signs, a level which has to be taken into account when evaluating the benefits of additional serum screening policies in other studies.[Specificity of biochemical markers of pregnancy second trimester].During the second trimester of 21 trisomy pregnancies, median of maternal serum concentrations of alpha-fetoprotein, not conjugated estriol, beta fraction, and inhibin A differ from normal values, and it can be used to select high risk patients.To evaluate specificity of different forms of second trimester biochemical markers association in a group of healthy pregnant women and determine levels considered as low risk.Random and cross-sectional study in 363 pregnant women with prenatal diagnosis to evaluate specificity of different combinations of biochemical markers. Down's syndrome and defects of neural tube rates of detection were defined as the percentage of pregnancies with tests of detection of true negatives and false positives.Total beta fraction has differences during weeks 13 to 14, with 70% of cases between 23,000 to 70,000 units, with 1.38% of false positives; alpha-fetoprotein fluctuated between 22 to 30 units, with 5.2% of false positives; conjugated estriol increases between 1.2 to 2.2 units during 2nd quarterly, with 6.3% of false positives; and inhibin has an increase, with 70% of cases located between 125 to 486.5 units, with 10.44% of false positives.Marker formula with greater specificity was type IV, included alpha-fetoprotein, not conjugated estriol and beta fraction. In the isolated form, alpha-fetoprotein marker demonstrates greater specificity.Screening for Down's syndrome: changes in marker levels and detection rates between first and second trimesters.To monitor changes with gestation in levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (F beta hCG) and pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) in Down's syndrome pregnancies and to compare risks estimated in the first trimester with those obtained by routine screening in the second trimester for the same pregnancies.In each of 47 Down's syndrome pregnancies two maternal serum samples were obtained, one in the first trimester and one in the second trimester. Comparison of marker levels with 10,600 first trimester controls and a smaller sample of second trimester controls allowed case identification criteria based on optimum marker combinations to be developed and compared directly between trimesters.Biochemical genetics laboratory.F beta hCG was an effective marker of Down's syndrome in both the first and second trimesters. PAPP-A levels were significantly reduced in trisomy 21 pregnancies in the first trimester only. Using a population model, these two markers in combination with maternal age gave an overall detection rate of 55% for a 5% false positive rate in the first trimester. For the paired first and second trimester samples, three of six cases classified as low risk by routine second trimester screening were classified as high risk by the first trimester screening protocol of F beta hCG/PAPP-A/maternal age. However, fifteen cases identified as high risk by routine second trimester screening were classified as low risk in the first trimester, a net loss in detection of 12 cases by first trimester screening.The data suggest that first trimester detection rates for Down's syndrome using a combination of F beta hCG and PAPP-A may vary with gestation and will be lower than those currently obtained by routine second trimester screening with AFP/hCG.Serum screening for Down's syndrome between 8 and 14 weeks of pregnancy. International Prenatal Screening Research Group.To determine the value of serum screening for Down's syndrome at 8-14 weeks of pregnancy using seven potential serum markers (alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol, total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), free alpha-hCG, free beta-hCG, pregnancy associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A), and dimeric inhibin A).Stored blood samples collected from women at about 10 weeks of pregnancy, prior to having chorionic villus sampling procedure on account of advanced maternal age, were retrieved from pregnancies associated with Down's syndrome and from matched unaffected pregnancies.Twenty-one obstetric centres in nine countries.Seventy-seven pregnancies associated with Down's syndrome each matched with five controls (except in two cases that were matched with four controls) for maternal age (same five year age groups), duration of storage of the serum sample (same calendar year), and gestational age (usually same week of pregnancy).The levels of two potential markers differed between affected and unaffected pregnancies sufficiently to be of value in screening--free beta-hCG and PAPP-A. The median free beta-hCG level in affected pregnancies was 1.79 times the median level for unaffected pregnancies, and the median PAPP-A level was 0.43 times the normal median. These two markers were combined with maternal age to estimate a woman's risk of having a fetus with Down's syndrome. A screening programme that used a risk cutoff level of 1:300 would detect 63% of affected pregnancies and also classify 5.5% of unaffected pregnancies as screen positive. None of the other five markers added more than 2% detection for the same false-positive rate.The performance of screening using maternal age and serum-free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 10 weeks of pregnancy was better than the double test (alpha-fetoprotein and hCG with maternal age) and similar to the triple test (alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol and hCG with maternal age) at 15-22 weeks.An association between low maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and fetal chromosomal abnormalities.An index case of "undetectable" maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein at 16 weeks in the first pregnancy of a 28-year-old woman was associated with birth of an infant with trisomy 18. This fortuitous finding stimulated a retrospective study of prenatally diagnosed chromosomal abnormalities. From among a series of 3,862 genetic amniocenteses, 32 cases of fetal autosomal trisomy were diagnosed for which corresponding maternal serum and amniotic fluid alpha-fetoprotein data could be retrieved. From a second laboratory, nine additional cases were added. The maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein levels expressed as multiples of the median were significantly lower in distribution for these 41 women than those from a group of normal matched control subjects (p less than 0.001). Since maternal age is shown to be a less than adequate predictor of autosomal trisomic birth, we proposed that a low level of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein obtained through routine screening may prove to be valuable in improving the prenatal detection of these serious anomalies.Predictive value of the triple screening test for the phenotype of Down syndrome.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE3) are routinely measured in the second trimester ("triple" test) and combined with maternal age to evaluate risk for fetal Down syndrome. Triple test results and clinical findings were retrospectively reviewed for 30 newborns with Down syndrome to determine whether analyte values or second trimester risks for Down syndrome were more extreme in affected pregnancies where cardiac or other severe congenital malformations were present compared to those cases where major anatomical abnormalities were absent. Mean MS-AFP, uE3, maternal age, and second trimester Down syndrome risk were all similar in the two groups of pregnancies. However, hCG concentrations did appear to be higher in the group of Down syndrome pregnancies with anatomical anomalies (mean 1.74 MoM versus 1.19 MoM) (P<0.05). Overall, there was no significant difference in the incidence of major anomalies in patients with screen-positive test results versus those cases that were not identified by the triple test. Prenatal counseling should therefore reflect the general expectations of the Down syndrome phenotype that have been established from live-born infants with this disorder.Maternal serum screening of fetal chromosomal abnormalities by AFP, UE3, hCG and free-beta hCG. Prospective and retrospective results.We have conducted a prospective study to ascertain the reliability of the triple test in detecting aneuploid fetuses in a Mediterranean, pregnant population. 2978 singleton pregnancies in the 15-22 completed week's gestational range were enrolled in this study between January 1992 and June 1994. The measurements of the analytes AFP, hCG and UE3 in the maternal serum combined with maternal age in a multivariate risk approach were utilized to detect pregnancies at increased risk (cut of > or = 1:270) to undergo prenatal diagnosis by amniocentesis. This screening was preferentially reserved to young patients (median age of the population 29 years). 212 pregnancies resulted screen positive to triple test and 178 accepted fetal chromosomal analysis. Three Down's syndrome, a Turner 45XO and a triploidy 69XXY were detected in the sample undergoing prenatal diagnosis. One aneuploid pregnancy (Down's syndrome) was recorded in the population with negative result (risk < 1:270). As part of this study we have subsequently compared the sensitivity of the test substituting total hCG with free-beta marker in samples from aneuploid pregnancies (16 cases) and unaffected pregnancies (300 cases). The detection rate for the two combinations was identical (81%) as well as the false positive rate (5.7% versus 5.3%) derived from the normal samples. All together these combined results of our study support the increasing call for triple test in screening programmes and indicate that further data be collected before recommending the replacement of total hCG with free-beta analyte.The implications of a false positive second-trimester serum screen for Down syndrome.To investigate the genetic and obstetric implications of false positive Down syndrome serum screening results.The study population comprised 162774 women underwent triple marker screening in the Ontario Maternal Serum Screening program between October 1995 and September 1998, with outcomes obtained from the Canadian Institute of Health Information. The study compares the incidence of chromosomal abnormalities other than Down syndrome in screen positive women with background incidence from the literature. It also compares the risks of having a fetus with congenital abnormalities or of developing obstetric complications in 11549 screen positive women with their matched controls.A higher incidence of trisomy 13 (12.4 per 10000) was seen in screen positive women; the incidence of other chromosomal abnormalities in screen positive women was not increased relative to the general population. The higher incidence of trisomy 13 may have been biased by the selective uptake of amniocentesis in women who had high risks for Down syndrome or abnormal ultrasound findings. Incidences of fetal congenital abnormality in screen positive and negative women were similar. Women who screened positive for Down syndrome had increased risk of spontaneous fetal loss (odds ratio 1.80; 95% confidence interval 1.54, 2.07) but no other obstetric complications.Among women who screened positive for Down syndrome, we found a higher number of spontaneous fetal losses and a possibly higher risk of having a fetus with trisomy 13. We did not find an increased risk for other chromosomal abnormalities, congenital abnormalities, or other adverse obstetric outcomes.Prenatal screening for Down syndrome with maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin levels.Human chorionic gonadotropin levels in midtrimester pregnancies may be predictive of Down syndrome. A commercially available enzyme immunoassay kit was used to measure the beta-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin in maternal sera from 38 Down syndrome pregnancies and 114 gestational age matched controls. The human chorionic gonadotropin levels were also assayed in 236 normal sera and plasma samples to determine normative values and appropriate individual corrections. Serum and plasma human chorionic gonadotropin levels are closely correlated and are stable at room temperature, during refrigeration, and throughout freeze-thaw cycles. There is no correlation between the human chorionic gonadotropin level and maternal age, weight, or race. However, the human chorionic gonadotropin level decreases with each week of gestation from 15 to 19 weeks. Medians for each week of gestation were established to account for this variable. Up to 63% of the Down syndrome pregnancies were detected with a cutoff of 2.0 multiples of the normal median. A computational combination of human chorionic gonadotropin and maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein testing will detect additional Down syndrome pregnancies and decrease the false-positive rate. The measurement of human chorionic gonadotropin appears to be a valuable addition to maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening programs that can significantly increase the proportion of Down syndrome cases diagnosed.First-trimester fetal nasal bone length in an ethnic Chinese population.To determine reference ranges of fetal nasal bone length (NBL) in a Chinese population and to assess the value of NBL measurement in screening for chromosomal defects in the first trimester.In this prospective study the fetal profile was examined and the fetal NBL and crown-rump length (CRL) were measured in Chinese women presenting with singleton pregnancies for first-trimester screening for aneuploidy between January 2004 and June 2007. Screening was performed on the basis of nuchal translucency (NT) measurement and maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A levels.NBL was measured in 7543 fetuses, of which 7517 were euploid. The best fit equation for median NBL in euploid fetuses in relation to CRL was: NBL (mm) = 0.4593 + (0.0186 x CRL(mm)). The NBL for gestational age (GA, in days) was given by the equation NBL(mm) = 0.2392 + (0.0027 x GA). There was no correlation between log(10)(NBL multiples of the median (MoM)) and log(10)(NT MoM) in unaffected pregnancies (r = - 0.009; P = 0.43). Only two of the 11 cases with trisomy 21 had an NBL outside the 5(th) or 95(th) centiles of the reference range for euploid fetuses.Reference ranges for NBL in a Chinese population suitable for screening for aneuploidy between 11 and 13 + 6 weeks' gestation have been derived. The NBL in Chinese fetuses is similar to that of other ethnic groups. However, unlike the determination of presence vs. absence of the nasal bone, NBL measurement is unlikely to further improve screening for aneuploidy.Simultaneous detection of trisomies 13, 18, and 21 with multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification-based real-time PCR.Trisomies 13, 18, and 21 account for the majority of chromosomal aneuploidies detected in prenatal diagnosis. Diagnosis of these trisomies relies mainly on karyotype analysis. Several molecular methods have been developed for trisomy detection, but performance or throughput limitations of these methods currently constrain their use in routine testing.We developed multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification-based real-time PCR (MLPA/rtPCR) to simultaneously detect these 3 trisomy conditions with a single reaction. We applied the method to DNA isolated from 144 blinded clinical samples that included 32 cases of trisomy 21, 11 cases of trisomy 18, 1 case of trisomy 13, and 100 unaffected control samples; results were compared with karyotype analysis.As judged by the results of the karyotype analysis, MLPA/rtPCR correctly detected all 44 cases of trisomy in the analysis of the blinded clinical samples. The method was able to detect a change in chromosome dosage as low as 1.2-fold.This novel PCR-based technology simultaneously identified 3 types of trisomy in a single reaction and accurately detected trisomy with mosaicism, while reducing assay times and costs compared with conventional methods. The MLPA/rtPCR approach may have applicability in noninvasive prenatal diagnosis with maternal blood samples.Comparison of nuchal and detailed morphology ultrasound examinations in early pregnancy for fetal structural abnormality screening: a randomized controlled trial.To compare the effectiveness of a nuchal scan at 10 to 14 + 6 weeks and a detailed morphology scan at 12 to 14 + 6 weeks in screening for fetal structural abnormalities.From March 2001 to November 2004, 8811 pregnant women were randomized into either the control group (10 to 14 + 6-week nuchal scan followed by routine 16-23-week scan) or the study group (10 to 14 + 6-week nuchal scan and 12 to 14 + 6-week detailed scan followed by routine 16-23-week scan).We analyzed 7642 cases of singleton pregnancies with viable fetuses at first-trimester ultrasound examination and with known pregnancy outcome. In the control group, the detection rate of structural abnormalities in the first trimester was 32.8% (21/64; 95% CI, 21.6-45.7%) and the overall detection rate was 64.1% (41/64; 95% CI, 51.1-75.7%). In the study group, the detection rate in the first trimester was 47.6% (30/63; 95% CI, 34.9-60.6) and the overall detection rate was 66.7% (42/63; 95% CI, 53.7-78.0%). The overall detection rate in the control group did not differ significantly from that in the study group (P > 0.05).When the nuchal scan is offered, a basic anatomical survey can be done in conjunction with nuchal translucency thickness measurement. A detailed ultrasound examination at this early gestational age may not be superior to the nuchal scan in screening for fetal abnormalities in the low-risk population. Though a wide range of abnormalities can be detected at 10 to 14 + 6 weeks, the routine 16-23-week scan cannot be abandoned.Second-trimester cancer antigen 125 and Down's syndrome.This study explores if assay of cancer antigen 125 (CA 125) in maternal serum might aid the detection of Down's syndrome in the second trimester of pregnancy. CA 125 levels were determined retrospectively in stored maternal serum samples from ten Down's syndrome pregnancies and 78 controls matched for gestational and maternal age. In addition, second-trimester amniotic fluid samples from nine Down's syndrome and 109 unaffected pregnancies were analysed for CA 125. Maternal serum CA 125 values for Down's syndrome pregnancies were lower, with the median being 0.72 multiples of the unaffected population median. The medians for affected and unaffected pregnancies did not differ significantly and there was a considerable overlap in the range of values of cases and controls. The distribution of amniotic fluid CA 125 levels for Down's syndrome pregnancies resembled that for controls. From our present results, we could not find an association between Down's syndrome and second-trimester maternal serum or amniotic fluid CA 125 levels.Second-trimester ultrasound to detect fetuses with Down syndrome: a meta-analysis.Second-trimester prenatal ultrasound is widely used in an attempt to detect Down syndrome in fetuses, but the accuracy of this method is unknown.To determine the accuracy of second-trimester ultrasound in detecting Down syndrome in fetuses.English-language articles published between 1980 and February 1999 identified through MEDLINE and manual searches.Studies were included if they recorded second-trimester findings of ultrasonographic markers, chromosomal abnormalities, and clinical outcomes for a well-described sample of women. A total of 56 articles describing 1930 fetuses with Down syndrome and 130 365 unaffected fetuses were included.Articles were independently reviewed, selected, and abstracted by 2 reviewers. Discrepancies in data abstraction were resolved by consensus with a third reviewer. Overall estimates of sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative likelihood ratios were calculated for the following markers: choroid plexus cyst, thickened nuchal fold, echogenic intracardiac focus, echogenic bowel, renal pyelectasis, and humeral and femoral shortening. Results were stratified by whether markers were identified in isolation or in conjunction with fetal structural malformations.When ultrasonographic markers were observed without associated fetal structural malformations, sensitivity for each was low (range, 1%-16%), and most fetuses with such markers had normal outcomes. A thickened nuchal fold was the most accurate marker for discriminating between unaffected and affected fetuses and was associated with an approximately 17-fold increased risk of Down syndrome. If a thickened nuchal fold is used to screen for Down syndrome, 15 893 average-risk women or 6818 high-risk women would need to be screened for each case of Down syndrome identified. For each of the other 6 markers, when observed without associated structural malformations, the marker had marginal impact on the risk of Down syndrome. Because the markers were detected in only a small number of affected fetuses, the likelihood of Down syndrome did not decrease substantially after normal examination findings (none of the negative likelihood ratios were significant).A thickened nuchal fold in the second trimester may be useful in distinguishing unaffected fetuses from those with Down syndrome, but the overall sensitivity of this finding is too low for it to be a practical screening test for Down syndrome. When observed without associated structural malformations, the remaining ultrasonographic markers could not discriminate well between unaffected fetuses and those with Down syndrome. Using these markers as a basis for deciding to offer amniocentesis will result in more fetal losses than cases of Down syndrome detected, and will lead to a decrease in the prenatal detection of fetuses with Down syndrome.Trisomy 21 and cystic hygromas in early gestational age fetuses.Chromosomal aberrations are associated with 60% of cystic hygromas and the majority of these are females with a 45,X karyotype. Trisomy 21 has rarely been reported. Six cases of cystic hygromas with trisomy 21 were detected during a 6-month time period in our laboratory. An earlier gestational age of 14 weeks was present in our cases compared with a gestational age of 18 weeks reported in the literature. Because of the high rate of fetal loss prior to 16 weeks, many cases of trisomy 21 with cystic hygromas may go undetected. This suggests that cystic hygromas detected before 16 weeks of gestation may be clinically different from those detected later in gestation. With the increasing use of chorionic villus sampling and amniocentesis at 10 to 12 weeks of gestation, trisomy 21 may be a common finding in fetuses with cystic hygromas.First-trimester simple hygroma: cause and outcome.First-trimester fetuses with simple nuchal hygromas represent a population that is different from midgestation nuchal cystic hygroma in terms of karyotype abnormalities and long-term prognosis.Sixty-eight consecutive fetuses diagnosed with simple nuchal hygromas between 10 and 14 weeks' gestation were evaluated ultrasonographically and karyotyped. Those with normal chromosome complements were ultrasonographically monitored throughout the remainder of the pregnancy for resolution of their hygromas.Twenty-three of 27 fetuses with normal karyotypes resolved their hygromas within 4 weeks of diagnosis and were phenotypically normal at birth. Forty-one fetuses were karyotypically abnormal, with trisomy 21 being the most common abnormality.Fetuses with first-trimester simple nuchal hygromas are at high risk for aneuploidy and should be offered prenatal testing. Such fetuses with normal karyotypes will likely resolve their hygromas by 18 weeks' gestation, and most will be phenotypically normal at birth.First-trimester maternal serum biochemical indicators in Down syndrome.A set of 21 early maternal serum samples (19 first-trimester and two at 14 weeks) from pregnancies resulting in a child with Down syndrome was matched for gestation and length of storage with 63 samples from unaffected pregnancies. The concentrations of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), pregnancy-specific beta 1-glycoprotein (SP1), and placental alkaline phosphatase (PALP) were measured. The ratios of the medians for Down syndrome pregnancies compared with the medians for controls were AFP 0.71, uE3 0.67, hCG 1.43, SP1 0.79, and PALP 0.92. Although the differences between the medians for affected and unaffected pregnancies were not significant, the trends for AFP, uE3, and hCG confirm earlier findings on first-trimester samples.Maternal serum CA 125 levels in pregnancies with chromosomally-normal and -abnormal fetuses. Dutch Working Party on Prenatal Diagnosis.We measured the maternal serum cancer antigen 125 (MS-CA 125) levels in 98 nonpregnant women, 765 first- and second-trimester pregnancies with chromosomally-normal fetuses, and 54 chromosomally-abnormal pregnancies. To determine the MS-CA 125 concentration, we used a new automated microparticle enzyme immunoassay with low inter-assay variability. The median MS-CA 125 level decreased from the first to the second trimester of pregnancy and was higher than that in non-pregnant women. We found no difference between normal and Down's syndrome (n = 29) pregnancies (t-test: t = 0.57, p > 0.5). The MS-CA 125 levels in pregnancies with other chromosomal abnormalities showed no difference either, compared with the normals. We conclude that MS-CA 125 is not a useful marker for fetal Down's syndrome, nor for other chromosomal disorders in pregnancy.Prenatal screening for Down's syndrome with use of maternal serum markers.Approximately 35 percent of all cases of Down's syndrome in fetuses can be detected by measuring maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein during the second trimester in the general population of pregnant women. Recent case-control studies indicate that this detection rate could be approximately doubled by measuring serum levels of unconjugated estriol and chorionic gonadotropin, which are abnormally low and abnormally high, respectively, in women carrying fetuses affected by Down's syndrome.We prospectively screened 25,207 women and adolescents in the second trimester of pregnancy and assigned each a risk of fetal Down's syndrome with an algorithm that took into account measurements of all three serum markers in combination with maternal age. On this basis, 1661 subjects (6.6 percent) were initially assigned a second-trimester risk of fetal Down's syndrome of at least 1 in 190, and 962 (3.8 percent) were offered amniocentesis for chromosomal analysis after verification of gestational age. Gestational age was determined on the basis of the first day of the last menstrual period or, when available, by ultrasonography.Among the 760 women and adolescents who chose amniocentesis, 20 cases of fetal Down's syndrome were detected, along with 7 other chromosomal disorders. There was 1 additional case of fetal Down's syndrome among the 202 women who chose not to have amniocentesis. The rate of detection of Down's syndrome was thus 58 percent (21 of 36 expected cases), and the frequency of identifying a fetus with Down's syndrome in women undergoing amniocentesis was 1 per 38 amniocenteses (95 percent confidence interval, 1 in 25 to 1 in 62).Measuring serum alpha-fetoprotein, chorionic gonadotropin, and estriol is more effective in screening for fetal Down's syndrome than measuring maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein alone. Such an expanded protocol can readily be incorporated into existing prenatal screening programs.First trimester maternal serum concentrations of fetal antigen 2 in normal pregnancies and those affected by trisomy 21.Serum concentrations of fetal antigen 2 (FA-2), the amino-propeptide of the alpha1 chain of collagen type I, were measured in peripheral blood from women with normal (n = 234) and trisomy 21 affected (n = 14) pregnancies between 9 and 11 weeks gestation. Serum FA-2 concentrations were seen to be stable throughout this period, and though raised FA-2 concentrations were seen at the 10th week of gestation, a statistically significant difference between normal and trisomy 21 affected pregnancies was not found overall. Therefore it seems unlikely that FA-2 has a role in first trimester screening for trisomy 21, despite the fact that significantly higher FA-2 concentrations in trisomy 21 and significantly lower concentrations in trisomy 18 had been previously demonstrated in amniotic fluid in the second trimester.Nuchal translucence incorporated into a one-stage multifactorial screening model for Down syndrome prediction at second-trimester pregnancy.The aim of this study was to achieve one-stage screening for trisomy 21 using a combination of nuchal translucency (NuT) measurement and maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) biochemistry levels in the second trimester among a high-risk study population. From January 1998 to June 2001, 45 cases of trisomy 21 were prenatally found and confirmed in the hospital-based cytogenetic diagnosis laboratory. A total of 867 normal singleton pregnancies were enrolled as controls from the antenatal care clinics in the hospital. All study and control subjects between 13 weeks and 18 weeks of gestation with a mean age of 15.2 +/- 1.3 weeks underwent one-stage nuchal translucence measurements and maternal serum biochemical screening for Down syndrome. The final logistic model contained beta-hCG (multiples of the gestational median or MoM), maternal age (matA), nuchal translucence (NuT MoM) and AFP (MoM) as covariates. Also, the estimated coefficients of the regression were highly significant. This model provided the estimated probability of Down syndrome as follows: Pr (Down syndrome) = exp (Z)/ [1 + exp (Z)], where Z = -11.18 + 0.64 x (beta-hCG MoM) + 0.25 x matA + 1.32 x NuT MoM -2.23 x AFP MoM. The logistic regression with estimated coefficients was installed in a Palm digital assistant (PDA) equipped with Excel (Microsoft). The risk probability of Down syndrome could be readily calculated after inputting data for all four predictor variables.Comparison of multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification and karyotyping in prenatal diagnosis.To estimate whether multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification (MLPA), a molecular technique used for detecting the most common chromosomal aneuploidies, is comparable with karyotyping for the detection of aneuploidies of chromosomes X, Y, 13, 18, and 21 in routine clinical practice and to estimate the costs differences of both techniques.In this prospective, nationwide cohort study, we consecutively included 4,585 women who had an amniocentesis because of their age (36 years or older), increased risk after prenatal screening, or maternal anxiety. Amniotic fluid samples were tested independently with both MLPA and karyotyping. The primary outcome was diagnostic accuracy of MLPA to detect aneuploidies of chromosomes X, Y, 13, 18, and 21. Secondary outcome measures were turnaround time for test results and costs. A sample size was calculated using a critical noninferiority margin of 0.002; therefore, at least 4,497 paired test results were needed (one-sided alpha 0.05, power 0.90).Diagnostic accuracy of MLPA was 1.0 (95% confidence interval [CI] 0.99-1.0), sensitivity was 100% (95% CI 0.96-1.0) and specificity was 100% (95% CI 0.999-1.0). Diagnostic accuracy of MLPA was statistically similar (noninferior) to that of karyotyping (P<.001). In 75 cases, MLPA failed (1.6%); karyotyping failed once (0.02%). Compared with karyotyping, MLPA shortened the waiting time by 14.5 days (P<.001, 95% CI 14.3-14.6) and cost less (-47, P<.001).In routine clinical practice, diagnostic accuracy of MLPA for detection of trisomies X, Y, 13, 18, and 21 is comparable with that of karyotyping, and it reduces waiting time at lower costs.II.First trimester CA 125 and Down's syndrome.First-trimester Down's syndrome screening using nuchal translucency: a prospective study in patients undergoing chorionic villus sampling.The value of the measurement of nuchal translucency thickness for predicting fetal Down's syndrome and other aneuploidies was prospectively evaluated at 8-15 weeks of gestation in 1819 consecutive pregnancies scheduled for karyotyping by chorionic villus sampling. In 43 cases, a chromosomal unbalanced aberration was found. Two teams of ultrasonologists who examined patients attending either National Health Service (Series 1) or private practice clinics (Series 2) were involved in the study. The same type of ultrasound machine and standardized approach were used in both study groups. In those cases in which the maximum subcutaneous thickness of the translucency was 3 mm or greater, the incidence of chromosomal aberration was 18.6% compared to 1.7% in the cases in which this was below 3 mm. The sensitivity, specificity and relative risk for all aneuploidies were 30%, 96% and 10.83, respectively, and no difference was found between trisomy 21 and other types of aneuploidy. The sensitivity and specificity and relative risk were significantly higher at 9-10 weeks than between 11 and 15 weeks. The results were concordant in the two series; however, the overall values for sensitivity (20% vs. 39%), specificity (94% vs. 98%) and relative risk (4.13 vs. 24.20) were clearly higher in the group of private patients. The results obtained confirm the potential application of the measurement of nuchal translucency thickness for fetal aneuploidy screening before the end of the first trimester and suggest that a multiplicity of individual, structural and organizational factors may interact and play a crucial role in determining the actual efficiency of ultrasound screening programs.Alpha-fetoprotein microheterogeneity: a potential biochemical marker for Down's syndrome.Our purpose was to examine the utility of analyzing alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) microheterogeneity assessed by lectin affinity in Down's syndrome (DS) screening. Maternal sera and amniotic fluids were collected from 18 women who were carrying DS fetuses and 70 unaffected pregnancies around 16 weeks of gestation. The percentages of AFP which reacted with Lens culinaris agglutinin (AFP-L2,3) were determined by lectin affinity electrophoresis. AFP-L2,3 levels were significantly increased (P<0.0001) in both maternal serum and amniotic fluid from DS-affected versus unaffected pregnancies. The fractional areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves were 0.835 and 0.700 (P=0.106) for AFP-L3 and AFP MoM (multiples of the median) in maternal serum. No correlation was found between AFP-L3 and AFP MoM in maternal serum (r=0.006). Our data suggest that the measurement of AFP-L3 in maternal serum is a potential biochemical marker for DS.Maternal urinary beta-core hCG in chromosomally abnormal pregnancies in the first trimester.We evaluated urinary beta-core human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-core hCG) in the detection of fetal Down's syndrome (DS) in the first trimester of pregnancy. Urine was collected prior to performing chorionic villous sampling (CVS) between 10 and 12 completed weeks from the last menstrual period. In the 9 months of the study, there were 15 chromosomal abnormalities detected by CVS: five trisomy 21, four monosomy X, two trisomy 18, and four cases of confined placental mosaicism (CPM). In these 15 aneuploid pregnancies, the levels of urinary beta-core hCG were expressed as multiples of the median (MOM) of the ratio of beta-core hCG/creatinine for gestational age. The MOMs of this ratio in each of the five DS pregnancies were 0.2, 0.5, 1.3, 1.4, and 1.7. No difference was found between fetuses with DS or any of the other chromosomal abnormalities tested and normal fetuses. Contrary to optimistic reports of urinary beta-core hCG in the second-trimester detection of fetal DS, our data suggest that this is not a useful screening test for DS in the first trimester of pregnancy.[Measurement of pregnancy-associated plasma protein A in maternal peripheral blood and Down syndrome].A prospective evaluation of a second-trimester screening test for fetal Down syndrome using maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, hCG, and unconjugated estriol.To test the efficacy of a screening protocol using a combination of maternal age plus three biochemical markers--maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP), hCG, and unconjugated estriol (E3)--for the antenatal detection of fetal Down syndrome.We conducted a prospective cohort study of 7718 women who underwent the triple-marker analysis between weeks 15-18 of pregnancy. A second-trimester risk for Down syndrome of 1:195 or greater was considered positive. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and their 95% confidence intervals (CIs) were calculated. We evaluated test performance for various maternal age groups and screen-positive cutoffs, as well as the relative screening efficacies of maternal age and MSAFP, MSAFP plus hCG, and MSAFP, hCG, and unconjugated E3.Four hundred sixty-one of the 7718 women screened (6%) were identified as positive; 319 women chose amniocentesis, for an overall amniocentesis rate of 4.1%. Twenty of 22 pregnancies affected with Down syndrome were correctly identified, as were 7255 of 7696 unaffected pregnancies, yielding a sensitivity and specificity of 91% (95% CI 79-100%) and 94% (95% CI 93.8-94.8%), respectively. The use of maternal age plus all three analytes improved test performance compared with maternal age plus MSAFP and hCG, but either had a significantly improved detection rate compared with that for maternal age and MSAFP alone.The triple-marker screen appears to be an effective method of detecting Down syndrome pregnancies while maintaining an acceptable amniocentesis rate.Measurement of nuchal translucency and the prenatal diagnosis of Down syndrome.To estimate the sensitivity of nuchal-translucency measurement and compare it with that of second-trimester serum screening using population-based data and to evaluate the effect of nuchal-translucency measurement on the gestational age at prenatal diagnosis of Down syndrome and pregnancy termination.We used The Paris Registry of Congenital Malformation data on 594 cases of Down syndrome (live births, fetal deaths, and pregnancy terminations) from 2001-2006. Analyses were done separately for women younger than 38 years and women aged 38 years or older. Analyses included binomial regression and fractional polynomials to model time trends in gestational age at diagnosis and at pregnancy termination.Ninety percent of the fetuses had undergone nuchal-translucency measurement as compared with only 22% that underwent second-trimester serum screening. This was principally because half of the pregnant women were given a diagnosis of Down syndrome during the first trimester after an abnormal result of nuchal-translucency measurement. Second-trimester serum screening had a higher sensitivity than did nuchal-translucency measurement (72% compared with 56%). The increasing use of nuchal-translucency measurement led to an increase in early diagnosis of Down syndrome in women younger than 38 years of age; diagnosis before 15 weeks of gestation increased from 21.7% in 2001 to 51.6% in 2006 (P=.016). Pregnancy termination before 15 weeks also increased from 18.8% in 2001 to 47.5% in 2006 (P=.02).The main effect of the increased use of nuchal-translucency measurement was a substantial increase in the early detection of Down syndrome, principally in younger women. This is an important advantage because several studies have shown that women prefer early diagnosis of Down syndrome.III.Down syndrome maternal serum marker screening after 18 weeks' gestation.Women having access to prenatal care late in pregnancy may still wish to benefit from maternal serum screening for Down syndrome. Therefore, we established reference values for alpha-feto protein (AFP) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG), and assessed the diagnostic value of maternal serum marker screening at 18-35 weeks' gestation based upon a series of 4072 sera from unaffected pregnancies and 118 sera from pregnant women with fetuses affected by Down syndrome. Using a 1/250 risk cut-off, a detection rate of 72.9% (95% CI = 71.5-74.3%) was achieved with a false-positive rate of 7.51% (95% CI = 6.71-8.3%). This was not significantly different from the percentages observed in our 14-17 weeks routine screening (50 596 patients): 71.9% (95% CI = 71.5-72.3%) and 6.48% (95% CI = 6.28-6.68%), respectively. Detection and screen-positive rates were, respectively, 51.3% (95% CI = 35.6-67.0%) and 5.95% (95% CI = 5.12-6.68%) in women aunder 35 years of age, and 84.8% (95% CI = 76.9-92.7%) and 24% (95% CI = 20.7-27.3%) in women aged 35 years and over. In conclusion, maternal serum marker screening is feasible at 18 weeks' gestation and later, which may be of interest in selected cases.The significance of choroid plexus cysts, echogenic heart foci and renal pyelectasis in the first trimester.To determine the significance of certain soft ultrasonographic markers for chromosomal abnormalities in the first trimester.This was a prospective cross-sectional study.University Department of Obstetrics and Gynaecology, London, UK.A total of 5385 women from an unselected population underwent a detailed assessment of fetal anatomy at 11-14 weeks of gestation (confirmed by crown-rump length) by transabdominal sonography (5.0 MHz) and transvaginal sonography (6.0 MHz) when necessary.In normal fetuses, the prevalences of choroid plexus cysts, pyelectasis and echogenic heart foci were 2.2, 0.9 and 0.6%, respectively in the first trimester and 2.0, 0.8 and 0.8%, respectively in the second trimester. Pyelectasis (likelihood ratio = 8.0, p = 0.03) and echogenic heart foci (likelihood ratio = 10.3, p = 0.02) were found to be associated significantly with fetal aneuploidy, while choroid plexus cysts were not.Although the majority of aneuploidies were detected by increased nuchal translucency and/or the presence of structural abnormalities (78%; 25/32), the use of soft ultrasonographic markers in the first trimester would have increased the overall detection by a further 3%. These data are preliminary and many thousands of pregnancies will need to be examined to determine the significance of the individual markers in different chromosomal abnormalities.Similarity of insulin-dependent diabetics' and non-insulin-dependent diabetics' levels of beta-hCG and unconjugated estriol with controls: no need to adjust as with alpha-fetoprotein.To determine if the same systematic alteration of serum values seen for alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) in diabetic patients is also seen for beta-hCG and unconjugated estriol (uE3).Serum AFP, beta-hCG, and uE3 results were obtained in 18,639 patients for whom complete follow-up information was obtained. Patients were divided into euglycemic (n = 18,088), insulin-requiring diabetics (n = 104), and non-insulin-requiring diabetics (n = 437), as well as by race.The 20% adjustment used for AFP appropriately corrects serum values. No such systematic variation is seen for either beta-hCG or uE3 by glycemic status or race.No adjustment for beta-hCG or uE3 is necessary for diabetes for biochemical screening programs.Maternal levels of pregnancy-specific beta 1-glycoprotein (SP-1) are elevated in pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome.Concentrations of pregnancy-specific beta 1-glycoprotein (SP-1) were measured in maternal blood and amniotic fluid of patients with a trisomic fetus and compared with that of a cytogenetically normal fetus at weeks 16-19 of pregnancy. The SP-1 concentrations were significantly elevated in the sera of women with a Down's syndrome fetus, whereas amniotic fluid levels were only slightly increased. It is suggested that high levels of maternal SP-1 in the second trimester of pregnancy may be a valuable indicator in the prenatal detection of fetal trisomy 21.Race-ethnicity-specific variation in multiple-marker biochemical screening: alpha-fetoprotein, hCG, and estriol.To identify any race-ethnicity-specific differences in serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), hCG, and unconjugated estriol (E3) levels in women between 14 and 21 weeks' gestation.Data from the 3-year period 1992-1994 were analyzed from 208,257 women who had AFP screening, of whom 155,142 also had hCG and 62,121 also had E3 screened, between 14 and 21 weeks' gestation. Subjects were categorized into four groups: white, black, Asian, and Hispanic.There was a consistent pattern of analyte differences across gestational ages. Levels for AFP were generally higher in Asian and black women than in Hispanic and white women (median AFP at 16 weeks-31.2, 30.9, 27.4, 27.3, respectively), and levels of hCG and E3 were highest in Asians (hCG at 16 weeks-34.7, 30.3, 28.2, 26.8, respectively). Weight correction for AFP, hCG, and E3 levels did not compensate for the ethnic differences.Because hCG and E3 demonstrate the same general pattern of differences as AFP among ethnic groups, averaging values for all ethnic groups tends inappropriately to lower calculated Down syndrome risks for black and Asian women. Additionally, the slopes of the curves are not parallel, such that separate data bases are preferable to multiplicative correction factors. Separate data bases should be used in laboratories with volume sufficient to permit the establishment of race-ethnicity-specific regressions. Use of separate data bases should result in more accurate screening.CA-125 as a maternal serum marker for Down's syndrome in the first and second trimesters.CA-125, alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), and human chorionic gonadotropin (HCG) were determined in maternal serum in the first trimester from 14 women with a Down's syndrome fetus and 61 women with a healthy fetus. In the second trimester, 15 and 60 serum samples were determined from women with a Down's syndrome and a healthy fetus respectively. In both trimesters, maternal serum CA-125 was found to be elevated in Down's syndrome pregnancies compared with controls. Using discrimination functions, our preliminary results indicate that CA-125 is a better marker than AFP and HCG respectively for a Down's syndrome fetus in the first trimester and improves the detection rate in the second trimester.Prenatal diagnosis of diverse chromosome abnormalities in a population of patients identified by triple-marker testing as screen positive for Down syndrome.Our purpose was to determine the incidence of all types of chromosome abnormalities (i.e., trisomy 21 and other abnormalities) in women receiving prenatal chromosome analysis after a Down syndrome screen-positive result by maternal serum triple-marker testing (alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated estriol analyses).A total of 11,434 patients between 15.0 and 21.9 weeks' gestation received second-trimester Down syndrome risk evaluation by triple-marker testing. By use of a 1:270 midtrimester Down syndrome risk cutoff value, and after ultrasonographic confirmation of gestational age, 677 patients were screen positive for Down syndrome (corrected screen-positive rate 5.92%). Karyotypes were reviewed for 468 (69%) of these patients who received prenatal chromosome analysis.In addition to 12 cases of Down syndrome, 12 other fetal chromosome abnormalities were found (i.e., 5.13% had a chromosome abnormality of some type). Expressed as a proportion of all patients with a corrected Down syndrome screen-positive result, at least 3.69% had a chromosome abnormality. The overall spectrum of abnormal karyotypes (approximately 50% autosomal trisomy, 25% structural and 25% sex chromosome abnormality) appears to be comparable to that seen in patients undergoing amniocentesis because of advanced maternal age.As is the case for women of advanced maternal age, preamniocentesis counseling for patients with positive triple-marker testing results should reflect the relatively high probability that an abnormality other than Down syndrome may be identified.Second-trimester maternal serum inhibin-A screening for fetal Down syndrome in Asian women.Case control studies in the Caucasian population showed that maternal serum inhibin-A is elevated in Down syndrome pregnancies and may be a useful second-trimester marker in addition to human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP). Data in the Asian population are lacking. We measured inhibin-A levels in the stored maternal sera of 49 Down syndrome pregnancies and 341 controls with a commercially available assay and expressed them as the multiples of the median of the gestational week. The log means and standard deviations for case and control inhibin-A MOMs were 0.209, 0.226, and 0.002 and 0.177, respectively. Median inhibin-A MOM in Down syndrome cases was elevated to 1.62 (95 per cent confidence interval, 1.29-1.82). 36 per cent of Down syndrome cases were expected to be detected at a 5 per cent false-positive rate. However, inhibin-A MOMs were strongly correlated with hCG MOMs in the cases (r=0.73, p<0.001) and the controls (r=0.56, p<0.001). This will diminish the value of adding inhibin-A to the existing hCG and AFP screening protocol.Early pregnancy screening for fetal aneuploidy with serum markers and nuchal translucency.We determined the aneuploidy detection rate achievable by early pregnancy screening with pregnancy associated plasma protein (PAPP)-A, free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and ultrasound nuchal translucency (NT) measurement. Women having prenatal diagnosis were scanned, and a blood sample was taken and stored. Stored samples were tested and a total of 37 were found to have Down syndrome, 8 to have Edwards syndrome and 255 were controls. Results were expressed in multiples of the gestation-specific median (MOM) value in the controls after regression and, for the serum markers, maternal weight adjustment. In Down syndrome the medians were for PAPP-A 0.63 MOM (95 per cent confidence interval (CI) 0.45-0.87); free beta-hCG 1.88 MOM (1.33-2.66); and NT 2.34 MOM (1.70-3.22). Using these parameters the expected detection rate for a 5 per cent false-positive rate for different marker combinations were: 55.3 per cent for PAPP-A and free beta-hCG; 68.4 per cent for NT alone; and 84.6 per cent for PAPP-A, free beta-hCG and NT. The median values for Edwards syndrome were: 0.17 MOM for PAPP-A; 0.18 MOM for free beta-hCG; and 2.64 MOM for NT. Early pregnancy screening with the combined measurement of maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG and fetal nuchal translucency could achieve a high Down syndrome detection rate.The effect of fetal gender in predicting Down syndrome using long bone ultrasonographic measurements.To determine if fetal gender affects the screening efficiency of short femur and humerus lengths in the prediction of trisomy 21.Retrospective cohort study of 62 111 patients presenting for ultrasound from 1990 to 2006. Short humerus and femur lengths were defined using (1) biparietal diameter (BPD) to femur/humerus length (FL/HL) ratios > 1.5 standard deviations above the mean, (2) the observed to expected (O/E) ratio of femur length ≤ 0.91 or humerus length ≤ 0.89, and (3) femur and humerus lengths < 5th percentile. The sensitivity, specificity, and likelihood ratios were calculated for the association of short FL/HL and trisomy 21 stratified by gender.Both BPD/long bone ratios as well as O/E ratios demonstrated a statistically significant higher specificity for the detection of trisomy 21 in female fetuses. This difference was most clinically significant when using the O/E ratio, which yielded a specificity of 82.6% in males and 90.6% in females for short femur, and 69.7% in males and 77.9% in females for short humerus, when these markers were evaluated as isolated findings.Gender-specific differences in the effectiveness of both short femur and humerus lengths for the prediction of trisomy 21 may exist, but their presence and magnitude are largely dependent on the formula used.First trimester isolated fetal nuchal lucency: significance and outcome.In this study, we determined the outcome in cases of isolated nuchal lucency seen sonographically in the first trimester in fetuses without karyotypic abnormalities. We reviewed all cases of isolated localized fetal nuchal lucency (3 mm or greater) in 9 to 14 week fetuses over a 4 year period. Fetuses with additional sonographic abnormalities were excluded. The width of the nuchal lucency at initial sonogram as well as findings on subsequent scans were tabulated. Karyotypic, pathologic, and clinical follow-up data were obtained. Of 44 fetuses with an isolated, localized first trimester nuchal lucency, one was lost to follow-up and two were excluded owing to pregnancy termination without karyotype or pathologic analysis, thus resulting in 41 fetuses in our study group. Five fetuses (12%) had abnormal karyotypes. Twenty-seven of the remaining 36 fetuses had normal karyotypes, eight others showed no evidence of aneuploidy at birth, and one patient underwent spontaneous abortion prior to a karyotypic analysis. Among the 36 fetuses without evidence of aneuploidy, six had a poor outcome: two were spontaneous abortions, one was a therapeutic abortion of a fetus with hydrops and a pericardial effusion seen on fetopsy; one fetus died at birth of pulmonary hypoplasia associated with autosomal recessive polycystic kidney disease, and one fetus each had Noonan syndrome, and Joubert syndrome. In addition, three patients delivered their infants prematurely. Overall, 32 of 41 fetuses survived, and two (6%) were abnormal. Excluding premature infants, 27 were normally grown, term survivors. We conclude that other than having an increased risk for aneuploidy, fetuses with isolated nuchal lucency are also at risk for spontaneous miscarriage, premature delivery, and congenital anomalies unassociated with an abnormal karyotype.Second-trimester maternal serum screening for Down syndrome in in vitro fertilization pregnancies.To examine whether second-trimester maternal serum triple marker screening results differ between in vitro fertilization (IVF) pregnancies and naturally conceived pregnancies.Second-trimester maternal serum triple marker screening results from 88 IVF pregnancies were compared with 596 naturally conceived pregnancies (controls). Controls were matched to each IVF pregnancy by maternal age, gestational age and date of blood collection. All pregnancies in the study were known to have normal outcome. Multiple of the median (MoM) levels of human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), unconjugated estriol (uE3) and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), and the false-positive rate for Down syndrome were compared between the two groups.No statistically significant differences in analyte levels or in Down syndrome false-positive rate were observed between the IVF and naturally conceived pregnancies.IVF patients can be counselled about maternal serum triple marker screening in the same manner as patients with naturally conceived pregnancies. There is no evidence to support the general use of analyte correction factors in the interpretation of second-trimester maternal serum screen results in IVF pregnancies.First-trimester maternal serum PAPP-A, SP1 and M-CSF levels in normal and trisomic twin pregnancies.To study PAPP-A and SP1 for biochemical trisomy screening in twin pregnancies and to investigate the role of maternal and placental compartments in marker production by comparing the levels of the decidual cytokine M-CSF with the PAPP-A and SP1 from the placenta.Thirteen twin pregnancies with at least one chromosomally abnormal fetus were compared with 68 normal twin pregnancies. Sera were obtained between 11 + 3 and 13 + 6 weeks of gestation, and PAPP-A, SP1 and M-CSF levels were determined by immunoassay. These concentrations were also compared with gestation-matched groups of 18 singleton normal pregnancies and 18 singleton Down syndrome pregnancies.PAPP-A and SP1, but not M-CSF, levels were higher in normal twin pregnancy than in normal singleton pregnancy. SP1 levels, but not PAPP-A, correlated to M-CSF. PAPP-A, but not SP1, levels were reduced in abnormal twin pregnancies, with an increasing effect according to the number of affected fetuses, and were more pronounced in pregnancies with trisomy 18 or 13 than in trisomy 21 fetuses. M-CSF was inconsistent, with a trend towards increased levels in trisomy 21.PAPP-A remains the best biochemical screening marker for fetal trisomies 21, 18 or 13, in singleton as well as in twin pregnancy. In contrast to SP1, its site of production is not likely to be restricted to the placenta. The role of the (maternally produced) M-CSF remains to be further investigated.Sequential pathways of testing after first-trimester screening for trisomy 21.To evaluate the performance and use of second-trimester multiple-marker maternal serum screening for trisomy 21 by women who had previously undergone first-trimester combined screening (nuchal translucency, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A, and free beta-hCG), with disclosure of risk estimates.In a multicenter, first-trimester screening study sponsored by the National Institute of Child Health and Human Development, multiple-marker maternal serum screening with alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, and total hCG was performed in 4,145 (7 with trisomy 21) of 7,392 (9 with trisomy 21) women who were first-trimester screen-negative and 180 (7 with trisomy 21) of 813 (52 with trisomy 21) who were first-trimester screen-positive. Second-trimester risks were calculated using multiples of the median and a standardized risk algorithm with a cutoff risk of 1:270.Among the first-trimester screen-negative cohort, 6 of 7 (86%) trisomy 21 cases were detected by second-trimester multiple-marker maternal serum screening with a false-positive rate of 8.9%. Among the first-trimester screen-positive cohort, all 7 trisomy 21 cases were also detected in the second trimester, albeit with a 38.7% false-positive rate.Our data demonstrate that a sequential screening program that provides patients with first-trimester results and offers the option for early invasive testing or additional serum screening in the second trimester can detect 98% of trisomy 21-affected pregnancies. However, such an approach will result in 17% of patients being considered at risk and, hence, potentially having an invasive test.II-2[Noninvasive prenatal test in the first trimester of pregnancy (NT and estimation of beta-hCG and PAPP-A) in the diagnosis of fetal abnormalities in Polish population--comparison of the biochemistry own normal ranges and literature reported data].Estimation of Polish population standards of the concentrations of pregnancy-associated plasma protein--A (PAPP-A) and free beta--human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-HCG) in the maternal blood between 10.0 and 13.6 week of pregnancy and comparison of the biochemistry own normal ranges and literature reported data. Estimation the sensitivity of the fetal nuchal translucency measurement, biochemical concentrations of PAPP-A and free beta-HCG in detection of the fetal chromosomal abnormalities.582 women in the age 14 to 46 years old with singleton pregnancies were included to the study The screening was performed between 10.0 and 13.6 week of gestation. The fetal nuchal translucency serum concentrations of PAPP-A and free beta-HCG were measured. The specific risk was calculated using the Fetal Medicine Foundation software (FTS) by accredited sonographers.Standards for serum concentrations of PAPP-A and free beta-HCG in normal pregnancies were determined. The measurement sensitivity of the fetal nuchal translucency in detection of the fetal chromosomal abnormalities was 80% and sensitivity of serum concentrations of PAPP-A and free beta-HCG was 40% and 80%.There is no significant differences between estimated biochemistry standards (PAPP-A and free beta-HCG) for Polish population and literature reported data. Observed differences in measurements of fetal NT, serum concentrations of PAPP-A and free beta-HCG in a control group and the group with the aneuploidies confirmed usefulness of these methods for the first trimester prenatal screening.Single-step maternal serum screening for trisomy 21 in the era of combined or integrated screening.Single-step maternal serum screening (MSS) in the first (1MSS) or second (2MSS) trimester at maternal age > or =35 years was evaluated in the North Belgian region Flanders, where difficulties are encountered in the general introduction of combined or integrated screening algorithms. The fetal aneuploidy screening database of General Medical Laboratory AML in Antwerp was searched for 2MSS tests between 1992 and 1999 (alpha-fetoprotein, beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-HCG) and unconjugated estriol, cut-off 1:300) and for 1MSS tests between 1999 and 2003 (free beta-HCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A, cut-off 1:85). At > or =35 years, the detection rate for trisomy 21 (DR) was 93.8% (15/16) for 2MSS and the screen-positive rate (SPR) was 24.5% (504/2061). For 1MSS, these figures were 85.7% (6/7) and 17.7% (109/615) respectively. To detect one trisomy 21, missed by MSS at > or =35 years of age, an additional number of 1,557 and 506 primary invasive procedures would be needed for 2MMS and 1MSS respectively. We conclude that the performance of both single-step 1MSS and 2MSS at maternal age > or =35 years in Flanders is excellent, even without the combination with ultrasound parameters or integration of first and second trimester parameters. The simplicity of both methods allows to consider them valuable options for fetal aneuploidy screening at advanced maternal age, until high quality combined or integrated screening is accessible to all pregnant women in Belgium.First-trimester Down syndrome screening in women younger than 35 years old and cost-effectiveness analysis in Taiwan population.Outcome of the first-trimester Down syndrome screening in younger population was less reported before. We present the outcome of this screening in Taiwanese women younger than 35 years old. We also test whether or not the first-trimester Down syndrome screening of women <35 years of age and women >35 years old routinely receiving amniocentesis is cost-effective compared with all pregnant women screened with this test in the setting of increased maternal age.From 1999 to 2007, the first-trimester Down syndrome screening including nuchal thickness, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A and free beta-hCG are provided to 10 811 singleton women <35 years of age with the cut-off of 1/270. A cost-effectiveness analysis of young women receiving this screening and older women undergo amniocentesis versus all women undergo this screening was performed in Taiwan population from 1987 to 2006, in which advanced age pregnancies increased from 2.8% to 11.6% of total pregnancies.Detection rates of trisomy 21, trisomy 18, Turner syndrome and other chromosome anormalies in women <35 years of age are 87.5% (14/16), 50% (2/4), 80% (8/10) and 63% (12/19), respectively, with a false-positive rate of 5.5% (590/10 811). As advanced age pregnancies reached 11.6%, the average cost per one case averted for all women screened ranged from $77 204 to $98 421, while the cost ranged from $99 647 to $116 433 for only women <35 years of age receiving this screening.In an aging population, the first-trimester Down syndrome screening should be implemented for all pregnant women when it is available.Analysis of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin in the first trimester: implications for Down's syndrome screening.The aim of this study was to determine the maternal population, pregnancy, serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotrophin (F beta hCG) parameters in a large series of women attending prenatal clinics before 15 weeks' gestation and to assess the practical problems of population screening for Down's syndrome in the first trimester using these markers. Serum samples were collected from 8600 women attending prenatal clinic booking visits. Maternal serum AFP and F beta hCG medians were calculated for each day of gestation (49-104 days), using both dates and ultrasound estimates of gestation. The effects of maternal weight, twin pregnancies, and threatened abortion on AFP and F beta hCG levels were analysed. The median age of the population was 27.1 years and the median weight 62.1 kg. Twenty-six per cent of samples were collected before 70 days and 50 per cent before 78 days' gestation. Eighty-nine per cent of all samples had gestational estimates by dates, 60 per cent by ultrasound and 52 per cent by both dates and ultrasound. The AFP median was 5 kU/l at 49 days, 5.9 kU/l at 70 days, and 17.9 kU/l at 100 days. The peak median F beta hCG level was 66.4 ng/ml at 64 days, falling to 20.6 ng/ml at 100 days' gestation. Both AFP and F beta hCG levels showed log Gaussian distributions but the standard deviation for AFP was 20 per cent greater than that found in the second trimester. AFP and F beta hCG levels showed an inverse relationship with maternal weight and were increased in twin pregnancies (1.68 and 1.97 multiples of the median, respectively). AFP and F beta hCG can be readily measured in a large screening population in the first trimester. Down's syndrome screening protocols based on these markers could be refined by the use of gestations in individual days but AFP is likely to be a less effective marker and detection rates are likely to be lower than in the second trimester. To realize the potential of first-trimester screening, more women should be encouraged to attend the prenatal clinic in early pregnancy and ultrasound dating should be carried out for all pregnancies at this stage.Midtrimester triple-test levels in women with chronic hypertension and altered renal function.To study the association between midtrimester triple-test levels and renal function in pregnant women with chronic hypertension.Forty-three patients with chronic hypertension for whom renal function was evaluated by the creatinine clearance test between 14- and 20-weeks gestation were studied. Midtrimester triple-test values obtained as part of Down screening program were correlated with renal function.hCG correlated inversely with creatinine clearance (r = -0.345; p = 0.002) and directly with alpha-fetoprotein (r = 0.499; p = 0.003).In pregnant women with chronic hypertension, impaired renal function may alter midtrimester maternal serum hCG levels.Improved performance of first-trimester combined screening for trisomy 21 with the double test taken before a gestational age of 10 weeks.To evaluate if there is a performance difference in the combined screening for trisomy 21 between the double tests performed before and after 10 + 0 weeks of gestation.The study included all 97 trisomy 21 cases from January 2004 to December 2007, in a screening program where the double test was measured in week 8 + 0 to 13 + 6 and the nuchal translucency in week 11 + 3 to 13 + 6.As many as 87 of the 97 cases were diagnosed in the screening program (detection rate = 90%). Among the 53 cases having the double test taken before 10 + 0 weeks, no cases were missed [detection rate (DR) = 100%, CI = 0.94-1.00] and among the 44 having the double test taken after 10 + 0 weeks, 10 cases were missed (DR = 77%, CI = 0.65-0.90). This difference in DR was highly significant (P = 0.0009). No difference was observed between false positive rates or median maternal age of the two groups.A significantly higher DR was obtained when the double test was taken early in pregnancy (<10 + 0 weeks), than when it was taken later (>or=10 + 0 weeks). The results could not be explained by a difference in either the false positive rate or the maternal age between the two groups.First-trimester pregnancy scanning as a screening tool for high-risk and abnormal pregnancies in a district general hospital setting.This study set out to evaluate the feasibility and acceptability of routine early ultrasound (12-14 weeks) within a district general hospital (DGH) for identifying high-risk and abnormal pregnancies. This was a pilot study for screening by ultrasound examination all women who presented to their community midwife before 12 weeks' gestation. The study involved 991 women who presented clinically pregnant before 12 weeks' gestation between May 1998 and May 1999. Women were offered routinely two ultrasound examinations during their pregnancy, the first at 12-14 weeks' gestation and the second at 20-21 weeks' gestation. The main outcome measures were: range and number of abnormal/high-risk pregnancies identified during an ultrasound scan at 12-14 weeks' gestation; range and number of abnormalities diagnosed during scans at later gestations; outcomes of the pregnancies; questionnaires assessing how the women viewed early pregnancy ultrasound as a method of screening. Nine hundred and eighty-four (99%) women accepted the offer of an early ultrasound scan at 12-14 weeks' gestation; of these 840(85%) women accepted screening for trisomy 21 (T21) by fetal nuchal translucency thickness (NT) and maternal age (fetal medicine foundation risk assessment programme) and this was completed successfully in 797(80%) of cases. Twenty-four women (2%) had a failed pregnancy and where necessary an ERPC was performed following a planned admission. Thirty pregnancies (3%) were diagnosed as abnormal or having high risk of abnormality at the early scan. A major abnormality was confirmed before the expected anomaly scan at 20 weeks in five (17%) pregnancies; all of these patients opted for an elective termination. Twenty-six (3%) pregnancies had a diagnosis of abnormality at their anomaly scan. Of these, three pregnancies were diagnosed as major abnormalities with two resulting in termination of the affected pregnancy before 24 weeks' gestation. Eight hundred and thirty-seven women (85%) completed questionnaires, 833 women (84.5%) were satisfied with the counselling they received before the ultrasound scan and 827 women (84%) answered that they would accept an early pregnancy scan if offered during their next pregnancy. Early pregnancy ultrasound at 12-14 weeks' gestation can be used as an effective method of identifying and screening for major abnormalities of pregnancy within a DGH setting, but it is appropriate to use this in conjunction with an anomaly scan at around 20 weeks' gestation. Women found this method of screening acceptable.[Increased nuchal translucency with normal karyotype].Increased fetal NT thickness is a common phenotypic expression of trisomy 21 and other chromosomal abnormalities, but it is also associated with fetal death and a wide range of fetal malformations, deformations, dysgenesis, and genetic syndromes. This paper reviews the outcome of chromosomally normal fetuses with increased NT On the basis of these data it is possible to estimate, for each NT group, the chances of intrauterine survival and delivery of a healthy baby with no major abnormalities. These data are useful in counselling parents of pregnancies with increased fetal NT and in planning the appropriate follow-up investigations. In normal fetuses NT thickness increases with fetal crown-rump length (CRL). The median and 95th centile of NT at a CRL of 45 mm are 1.2, and 2.1mm and the respective values at CRL of 84mm are 1.9 and 2.7 mm. The 99th centile does not change significantly with CRL and it is about 3.5 mm. Increased NT, refers to a measurement above the 95th centile and the term is used irrespective of whether the collection of fluid is septated or not and whether it is confined to the neck or envelopes the whole fetus. After 14 weeks, increased NT usually resolves but in some cases it evolves into nuchal edema or cystic hygromas.Assessment of the gap between the fetal nasal bones at 11 to 13 + 6 weeks of gestation by three-dimensional ultrasound.To detect the presence of a gap between the fetal nasal bones at 11 to 13 + 6 weeks of gestation and to verify if this gap could lead to the erroneous diagnosis of absent nasal bone.Three-dimensional (3D) ultrasound was used to assess the fetal nose in 450 singleton pregnancies, immediately after two-dimensional (2D) evaluation of the nasal bones and screening for chromosomal defects by a combination of maternal age and the measurement of fetal nuchal translucency at 11 to 13 + 6 (median, 12) weeks of gestation. A 3D volume of the fetal face was acquired and then analyzed using the multiplanar mode. A sequence of transverse views was used to confirm the presence or absence of the nasal bones and when they were present any visible gap between them was measured. A perfectly mid-sagittal plane was then examined to determine if the nasal bone was visible or not.In 421/450 (93.6%) cases the nasal bone was present during 2D ultrasound. Using the multiplanar mode of 3D ultrasound, in 83/421 (19.7%) fetuses a gap between the nasal bones could be demonstrated and in 36/83 (43.4%) cases the nasal bone was found to be absent in the perfect mid-sagittal view. In 29/450 (6.4%) cases the nasal bones were absent during the 2D scan. In the 3D assessment there was absence of both bones in 25/29 (86.2%) cases and absence of one of the two bones in 4/29 (13.8%) cases. Chorionic villus sampling demonstrated that the fetal karyotype was normal in 404 and abnormal in 46 cases, including 31 cases of trisomy 21. There was absence of one or both nasal bones in three (0.7%) of the chromosomally normal fetuses, in 19 (61.3%) with trisomy 21 and in seven (46.7%) with other chromosomal defects.At 11 to 13 + 6 weeks of gestation there is a gap between the nasal bones in about 20% of fetuses, and in about 40% of these cases in the perfect mid-sagittal plane the nasal bone may erroneously be considered to be absent.Three-stage contingent screening for Down syndrome.To demonstrate the potential value of three-stage sequential screening for Down syndrome.Protocols were considered in which maternal serum pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) measurements were taken on all women in the first trimester. Those women with very low Down syndrome risks were screened negative at that stage and nuchal translucency (NT) was measured on the remainder and the risk reassessed. Those with very low risk were then screened negative and those with very high risk were offered early diagnostic testing. Those with intermediate risks received second-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, free beta-hCG, unconjugated estriol and inhibin-A. Risk was then reassessed and those with high risk were offered diagnosis. Detection rates and false-positive rates were estimated by multivariate Gaussian modelling using Monte-Carlo simulation.The modelling suggests that, with full adherence to a three-stage policy, overall detection rates of nearly 90% and false-positive rates below 2.0% can be achieved. Approximately two-thirds of pregnancies are screened on the basis of first-trimester biochemistry alone, five out of six women complete their screening in the first trimester, and the first-trimester detection rate is over 60%.Three-stage contingent sequential screening is potentially highly effective for Down syndrome screening. The acceptability of this protocol and its performance in practice, should be tested in prospective studies.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein prenatal screening for Down syndrome.The relationship between maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) levels, maternal age and Down syndrome risk factors were studied in the greater Birmingham and North Alabama areas. After adjustment for race and maternal weight, 3.84 percent of women in this study were determined to have Down syndrome risk factors equal to or greater than that of a 35 year old woman with a normal pregnancy. Maternal weight adjustment was of special importance, reducing the number of MSAFP values considered low from 5.12 percent to 3.40 percent. The use of race and area specific medians was also important in the use of prenatal MSAFP screening for Down syndrome affected pregnancies.Preliminary evidence for associations between second-trimester human chorionic gonadotropin and unconjugated oestriol levels with pregnancy outcome in Down syndrome pregnancies.Fifty-six cases of Down syndrome were identified in a population of women who had undergone maternal serum triple marker screening [alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) analyses]. These affected pregnancies represented all known cases present in the population of 34,368 women screened. Using a 1:270 mid-trimester Down syndrome risk to define the screen-positive group, 42 affected pregnancies were screen-positive (medians: AFP = 0.79 MOM, hCG = 2.13 MOM, uE3 = 0.62 MOM, age 34.6 years) and 14 pregnancies were screen-negative (medians: AFP = 0.82 MOM, hCG = 1.57 MOM, uE3 = 0.92 MOM, age 24.2 years). Four affected pregnancies were associated with in utero death and each of these cases was associated with relatively extreme values of AFP, hCG, and uE3, including the three highest levels of hCG in the entire series of Down syndrome pregnancies. Twenty-nine (15 screen-positive and 14 screen-negative) affected pregnancies resulted in liveborns. Down syndrome pregnancies had a significantly shorter gestational term than controls, and Down syndrome babies were also lighter than controls, even after adjustment for sex and gestational age. In affected pregnancies, a low uE3 level appeared to be associated with a greater chance of a small-for-gestational age baby. No correlations could be demonstrated between AFP or hCG levels and gestational age-adjusted term weight. Based on this small series, it would appear that uE3 may be particularly useful in detecting those Down syndrome cases associated with small-for-gestational age fetuses. A very high hCG value may indicate a higher probability of fetal death.Median parameters for Down's syndrome screening should be calculated using a moving time-window method.In Down's syndrome screening, the change in analyte concentrations in maternal serum with advancing gestational age is compensated for by converting concentration to multiples of the median (MoM) by using a mathematical equation describing the expected relationship. However, owing to assay drifts and shift, the equation may be incorrect, leading to deviation of the observed MoM distribution from the ideal MoM distribution. The NHS Fetal Anomaly Screening Programme has produced standards limiting acceptable deviation, and has provided the Down's Syndrome Screening Quality Assurance Service (DQASS) to monitor it. DQASS recommends monitoring by cumulative sum plot.Down's screening data for 61,368 consecutive samples (12 October 2004 to 31 December 2007) was evaluated using different median assignment techniques.A change in the paradigm for median equation derivation is described, which significantly improves the probability that medians will be correct at any point in time.Software developers need to change the way medians are derived in their programmes.Effect of adjustment of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein levels in insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.Our objective was to determine the effect of the 20% upward adjustment of maternal serum alphafetoprotein (MSAFP) in patients with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM) on the number of patients that would be classified at increased risk for pregnancy complicated by either Down syndrome (DS) or neural tube defect (NTD). We retrospectively evaluated a database containing 63,110 patients who underwent multiple serum marker screening between 14 and 22 weeks gestation; 620 patients with IDDM had measurements of MSAFP of which 479 also had measurements of beta-HCG, allowing calculation of DS risk. Increased NTD risk was defined as MSAFP >2.5 MOM while increased DS risk was defined as a calculated risk > or =1/270. One IDDM patient delivered an infant with a NTD; it was not detected on serum screening. No infants were born with DS. Of the 620 patients with MSAFP determinations, 9 had values >2.5 MOM before adjustment. After upward adjustment, 7 additional patients were identified. Sixteen patients were identified at increased risk for DS before and after adjustment. Our data suggest that the 20% upward adjustment of MSAFP increases by 78%, the number of patients who would require further evaluation for NTD's. Although we were able to identify 620 women with IDDM who underwent serum screening for NTD, the low prevalence of NTD's did not allow us to demonstrate an increased detection rate. The effect of upward adjustment of MSAFP on the number of patients categorized at increased DS risk appears to be minimal.Detection of aneuploidy with fetal nuchal translucency and maternal serum markers in Japanese women.Clinical and cytogenetic findings on 31,615 mid-trimester amniocenteses.Since amniocentesis made prenatal diagnosis feasible in 1967, the method has become a popular tool in obstetric practices. In Korea, the demand for genetic counseling and prenatal tests has increased markedly because the number and proportion of pregnancies in women aged 35 yr and older have increased over a 20-yr period. Here we report clinical and cytogenetic findings on 31,615 mid-trimester amniocenteses.To investigate the changes in the annual number of amniocentesis, distribution of indications and age, and cytogenetic findings and abnormality rate according to indications, this study retrospectively analyzed 31,615 cases of mid-trimester amniocentesis performed at Seoul Clinical Laboratories, an independent medical laboratory center, during the past 13 yr (1994-2007).The annual number of amniocenteses has increased substantially since 1994. Among the 31,615 amniocentesis cases, the maternal age between 30 and 34 yr was the most common age group (35.4%). Among clinical indications, abnormal maternal serum screening results have been the most common indication for amniocentesis since 1994. Chromosomal abnormalities were detected in 973 cases (3.1%). Down syndrome was the most common abnormality found (36.9%, 359/973). In sex chromosomal abnormalities, 53 cases of Turner syndromes, 32 cases of Klinefelter syndromes, 20 cases of triple X syndromes, and 15 cases of 47,XYY were diagnosed. Of structural rearrangements, reciprocal translocations between two autosomes were the most common (15.5%, 151/973). Abnormal ltrasonographic findings showed the highest positive predictive value (5.9%) among the clinical indications.The present study could be used for the establishment of a database for genetic counseling. The discovery of an abnormality provides the option of termination or continuation in the pregnancy, a more suitable obstetric management in Korea.Predicting the result of additional second-trimester markers from a woman's first-trimester marker profile: a new concept in Down syndrome screening.To describe a method for deciding whether an individual's first-trimester Down syndrome screening test result justifies further testing in the second trimester.Statistical modelling was used to estimate the distribution of second-trimester marker profiles for a given first-trimester profile and hence the probability of a final positive result, using a 1 in 250 term cut-off. A multi-variate log Gaussian model was used with published parameters. Markers were maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) at 10 weeks, nuchal translucency at 11 weeks, and second-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, total hCG, unconjugated estriol and inhibin-A. To illustrate the method, the model was applied to a published series of 24 Down syndrome and 367 unaffected pregnancies.Modelling predicts that for 63% Down syndrome and 0.4% unaffected pregnancies having first-trimester tests, there is a 50% or more probability of a final positive result. A step-wise sequential screening policy based on immediate prenatal diagnosis for those with high probability and second-trimester testing for the remainder would have a 90% detection rate and 1.7% false-positive rate. Modelling also predicts 8.0% Down syndrome and 89% unaffected pregnancies with probabilities below 3%. A contingent screening policy restricting second-trimester testing to those with 3-49% probabilities would have an 88% detection rate and 1.4% false-positive rate.Predicting the probability of a positive final result from the first-trimester marker profile has potential utility, either as a decision aide for individual women or as a formal part of screening policy in selecting a subset of women for second-trimester testing.Is maternal serum triple screening a better predictor of Down syndrome in female than in male fetuses?Among euploid gestations, female fetuses have been reported to have significantly lower maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) and higher human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) levels than male fetuses. Since in maternal serum triple screening, low MSAFP and high hCG MOM independently confer greater risk of a Down syndrome fetus, we investigated the hypothesis that maternal serum triple screening is more efficacious at detecting female than male Down syndrome fetuses. A database containing all karyotypes from amniocentesis performed between August 1994 and August 1996 was accessed. All trisomy 21 cases were identified. The male-to-female ratio among trisomy 21 fetuses detected at amniocentesis after abnormal maternal serum triple screening was compared with that among trisomy 21 fetuses detected at amniocentesis for advanced maternal age (AMA), which served as the control group. Statistical analysis utilized chi-square, Fisher's exact test, and Student's t-test. A P value of less than 0.05 was considered statistically significant. Forty-nine trisomy 21 fetuses were detected in the women who underwent amniocentesis because of abnormal triple screening and 311 were detected in the control group. The proportion of male fetuses among the triple screening group was not significantly different from that of the AMA group (55 per cent vs. 57 per cent; P=0.9). Our study had a power of 80 per cent to detect a difference of 25 per cent in the male-to-female ratio (alpha=0.05, beta=0.20). The reported differences in MSAFP and hCG levels between male and female euploid fetuses do not appear to affect the sex ratio among Down syndrome fetuses detected because of an abnormal maternal serum triple screening.Detection of beta-core fragment in second trimester Down's syndrome pregnancies.Estimating a woman's risk of having a pregnancy associated with Down's syndrome using her age and serum alpha-fetoprotein level.The risk of an individual woman having a pregnancy associated with Down's syndrome was estimated from her age and her serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) level at 14-20 weeks gestation. The estimates were made using published data on the risk of Down's syndrome in relation to maternal age from 4528 affected and over 5 million unaffected pregnancies, and on the risk in relation to serum AFP from 68 affected and 36,645 unaffected pregnancies. Separate estimates were derived for AFP levels using gestational age based on the time since the first day of the last menstrual period and on an ultrasound biparietal diameter measurement. In each case this was done with and without adjusting AFP levels to take account of maternal weight. The same sources of data were also used to construct six Down's syndrome screening policies, each combining information on maternal age and serum AFP. For example with one policy the detection rate would be 28% and would involve selecting 2.8% of unaffected pregnancies for amniocentesis; using age alone the same detection rate could only be achieved by selecting 4.3% of unaffected pregnancies for amniocentesis--an increase of 50%. In general, screening for Down's syndrome using both maternal age and serum AFP is more efficient than either alone.Nuchal translucency cannot be used as a screening test for chromosomal abnormalities in the first trimester of pregnancy in a routine ultrasound practice.We decided to assess the practicability of introducing nuchal translucency (NT) measurements as a screening programme for fetal Down's syndrome in the first trimester of pregnancy, within the population of women who receive ultrasound examinations in our department. Over a 1-year period, measurements were made in 923 fetuses at < or = 13 weeks' gestation. Fifty-two per cent of the mothers were 36 years or older or had a past history of a chromosomally abnormal fetus or child. Measurements were only successful 58 per cent of the time; this improved to 74 per cent if the fetus was > or = 10 weeks' gestation. Inter-observer variability did not cause a major problem. There were 36 fetuses with an NT > or = 3 mm. Two of these fetuses had a chromosomal abnormality (both trisomy 21). The translucency in these two cases was so large that they would have been detected and offered prenatal diagnosis even prior to this study. There was a total of ten aneuploidies in the study group. Only two of these fetuses were detected by this screening method; five had an NT measurement < 3 mm and in three fetuses (all trisomy 21), measurements were not successful. We outline the practical problems that could be expected by introducing ultrasound screening in a routine setting. Although the efficacy of the test in a research setting may seem good, the effectiveness in everyday usage appears much less impressive, making its uptake as a screening technique in a general ultrasound practice at this stage imprudent.ADAM 12 as a first-trimester maternal serum marker in screening for Down syndrome.A Disintegrin And Metalloprotease 12 (ADAM 12) is a glycoprotein synthesised by placenta and it has been shown to be a potential first-trimester maternal serum marker for Down syndrome (DS) in two small series. Here we analyse further, the potential of ADAM 12 as a marker for DS in a large collection of first-trimester serum samples.The concentration of ADAM 12 was determined in 10-14-week pregnancy sera from 218 DS pregnancies and 389 gestational age-matched control pregnancies, which had been collected as part of routine prospective first-trimester screening programs (DS = 105) or as part of previous research studies (DS = 113). ADAM 12 was measured using a semi-automated time resolved immunofluorometric assay and median values for normal pregnancies were established by polynomial regression. These medians were then used to determine population distribution parameters for DS and normal pregnancy groups. Correlation with previously established PAPP-A and free beta-hCG multiple of the medians (MoMs) and delta nuchal translucency (NT) were determined and used to model the performance of first-trimester screening with ADAM 12 in combination with other first-trimester markers at various time periods across the first trimester. The benefits of a contingent testing model incorporating early measurement of PAPP-A and ADAM 12 were also explored.The maternal serum concentration of ADAM 12 was significantly reduced (p = 0.0049) with an overall median MoM of 0.79 in the DS cases and a log(10) MoM SD of 0.3734 in the DS cases and 0.3353 in the controls. There was a significant correlation of ADAM 12 MoM in DS cases with gestational age (r = 0.375) and the median MoM increased from 0.50 at 10-11 weeks to 1.38 at 13 weeks. ADAM 12 was correlated with maternal weight (r(controls) = 0.283), PAPP-A (r(controls) = 0.324, r(DS) = 0.251) but less so with free beta-hCG (r(controls) = 0.062, r(DS) = 0.049) and delta NT (r(controls) = 0.110, r(DS) = 0.151). ADAM 12 was significantly (p = 0.026) lower in smokers (0.87 vs 1.00) and elevated in Afro-Caribbean women compared to Caucasian women (1.34 vs 1.00). Population modelling using parameters from this and an earlier study showed that a combination of ADAM 12 and PAPP-A measured at 8-9 weeks and combined with NT and free beta-hCG measured at 12 weeks could achieve a detection rate of 97% at a 5% false-positive rate or 89% at a 1% false-positive rate. PAPP-A and ADAM 12 alone at 8-9 weeks could identify 91% of cases at a 5% false-positive rate. Using this as part of a contingent-screening model to select an intermediate risk group of women for NT and free beta-hCG at 11-12 weeks would enable the detection of 92% of cases with a 1% false-positive rate at a cost of providing NT and free beta-hCG for 6% of women with 94% of women having completed screening by the 10th week of pregnancy.ADAM 12 in early first trimester is a very efficient marker of DS. In combination with existing markers, it offers enhanced screening efficiency in a two-stage sequential first-trimester screening program or in a contingent-screening model, which may have benefits in health economies where universal access to high quality ultrasound is difficult. More data on early first-trimester cases with DS are required to establish more secure population parameters by which to assess further the validity of these models.Maternal serum screening in Ontario using the triple marker test.To summarise the experience and evaluate the performance of the Ontario maternal serum screening (MSS) programme.The Ontario MSS programme between October 1993 and September 2000.This study used information collected in the Ontario MSS database, which contains data on each screened pregnancy. In the Ontario MSS programme, women are screened between 15 and 20 weeks of gestation. The risk cut-off for Down's syndrome was >or= 1 in 385 at term and women with a serum alpha-fetoprotein >or= 2.2 multiples of the unaffected population median were defined as screen-positive for open neural tube defects.Between 1 October 1993 and 30 September 2000, 428410 women residing in Ontario were screened for open neural tube defects, and 423895 women were screened for Down's syndrome and trisomy 18. Approximately 48% of all pregnant women in the province had MSS. The uptake rate of amniocentesis following a positive Down's syndrome screening was 67%. Of 717 cases of Down's syndrome ascertained in the screened population, 531 were detected by MSS, giving a term detection rate (DR) of 70.6%, with a false-positive rate (FPR) of 7.2%. For neural tube defects, the DR was 72.7%, with a FPR of 2.0%. The screen also detected 50% of cases of trisomy 18 at term, with a FPR of 0.2%. Coincidentally, 113 cases of chromosome aneuploidies other than Down's syndrome and trisomy 18 were detected.In the Ontario MSS programme, MSS performed as expected in the detection of Down's syndrome, open neural tube defects and trisomy 18. MSS is an effective and practical method for large-scale second trimester screening for Down's syndrome, open neural tube defects and trisomy 18, and the MSS database is an extremely useful tool in monitoring the performance of this screen.First-trimester screening for Down syndrome using nuchal translucency measurement with free beta-hCG and PAPP-A between 10 and 13 weeks of pregnancy--the combined test.In a population of 1467 women attending the 'G. Gaslini' Institute for antenatal care, we evaluated first-trimester risk screening for Down syndrome using the 'combined test' based on ultrasound measurement of nuchal translucency (NT), maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and free beta-hCG, and maternal age. No clinical action was taken on these results. The gestational age, determined by scan measurement of crown rump length, ranged from 10 weeks to 13 weeks 6 days. The median maternal age was 31 years 8 months. There were 13 Down syndrome pregnancies. The risk of having an affected pregnancy was estimated from a multivariate Gaussian distribution, using commercially available software. With a risk cut-off of 1 in 350, 11 affected pregnancies were detected (detection rate 85 per cent, 95 per cent confidence interval: 56-100 per cent) with a 3.3 per cent false-positive rate. The odds of being affected given a positive result were 1 in 30. Further data are needed to determine, with greater statistical reliability, the relative performance of the combined test with current second-trimester screening.Effect of in vitro fertilization on human chorionic gonadotropin serum concentrations and Down's syndrome screening.To investigate the association between IVF and Down's syndrome screening analytes (alpha-fetoprotein [AFP] and hCG) during the second trimester.Retrospective analysis.University-based tertiary care infertility clinic.Data on 41 consecutive singleton IVF pregnancies and 4,935 naturally occurring singleton pregnancies.Maternal serum hCG concentrations were elevated (mean 1.52 multiples of the median [MoM]) in IVF pregnancies, whereas there were no significant differences in AFP levels (mean 1.02 MoM). The mean maternal age was higher in the subjects than in controls (33.8 compared with 28.7 years). In relation to Down's syndrome risk assessment, the pattern of the two markers, together with maternal age, indicated high risk more often in the study subjects than in the controls. In vitro fertilization patients had a false-positive rate of 26.8% compared with 6.6% in women without fertility problems.The increased false-positive rate in Down's syndrome screening is related not only to advanced maternal age but also, in part, to the elevated hCG concentrations observed in pregnancies after assisted reproduction. The mechanism behind increased hCG production remains to be elucidated, but it may be an effect associated with infertility or the procedures by which these women conceive. To provide an objective assessment of an individual patient's risk of fetal abnormality, the impact of IVF on hCG biochemistry should be studied further in larger samples and adjustments made if appropriate.Impact of smoking on maternal serum markers and prenatal screening in the first and second trimesters.To examine the effects of smoking on first and second trimester screening markers and to determine the overall impact of these effects on Down syndrome and trisomy 18 risks in first trimester combined, second trimester quadruple and integrated tests.Examination of screening records at Women and Infants Hospital during 2006-2008. First trimester pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and nuchal translucency and second trimester alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated estriol (uE3), hCG and inhibin A (inhA) multiple of the median (MoM) values were extracted from the database along with risk results, smoking status and relevant demographic information.Smoking led to significantly reduced median levels of first trimester PAPP-A (0.89 MoM) and hCG (0.80 MoM), reduced second trimester uE3 (0.96 MoM) and hCG (0.84 MoM), and increased AFP (1.03 MoM) and inhA (1.39 MoM). After accounting for the differences in age between groups, smokers had higher Down syndrome screen positive rates for the second trimester quadruple test, but not for first trimester combined or integrated tests. Screen positive rates for trisomy 18 were markedly increased in smokers relative to age-matched non-smokers when using first trimester combined or integrated tests.Smoking leads to increased screen positive rates, especially for trisomy 18 using combined or integrated tests.Combining nuchal translucency and serum markers in prenatal screening for Down syndrome in twin pregnancies.A method is described to combine the ultrasound marker nuchal translucency (NT) with serum markers so that they can be used together in prenatal screening for Down syndrome in twin pregnancies. For monochorionic twin pregnancies (taken as monozygous), the two fetus-specific NT measurements are averaged before risk is calculated and before the contribution of the serum markers is incorporated. For dichorionic twin pregnancies (taken as dizygous), the risk for each fetus based on the individual NT measurements is calculated, the two fetus-specific risks are added together, and then the contribution of the serum markers is incorporated. In this way, all the screening markers can be used in combination to produce a pregnancy-specific "pseudo-risk", rather than a fetus-specific pseudo-risk. We refer to pseudo-risk because in the absence of sufficient data on the screening markers in affected twin pregnancies, a true risk estimate cannot be calculated. Tentative estimates are given of screening performance in twins using NT, the combined test (NT with first-trimester serum markers), and the integrated test (NT with first- and second-trimester serum markers), all interpreted with maternal age.Combined first- and second-trimester screening for Down syndrome: an evaluation of proMBP as a marker.To estimate the screening performance of different combinations of first- and second-trimester markers, including a new marker, the proform of eosinophil major basic protein (proMBP).The population comprised 195 singleton pregnancies with a normal outcome enrolled in the Copenhagen First Trimester Study, in which a serum sample was available from both the first and the second trimester. The performance of different marker combinations was estimated by receiver-operator-characteristics (ROC) analysis using a Monte Carlo simulation and distributions of log(10)MoM markers and their correlations, derived from our normal material and Down syndrome cases from the literature.Using a fixed screen-positive rate (SPR) of 5%, the first-trimester combined test [nuchal translucency (NT), PAPP-A and free beta-hCG] yielded a detection rate (DR) of 76%, and the integrated test (NT, PAPP-A, AFP, hCG, uE3 and inhibin A) yielded a DR of 86%. With a DR of 90%, the best combination was the first-trimester beta-hCG and NT with the second-trimester proMBP and AFP. ProMBP combined with the triple test increased the DR from 62 to 83%, whereas the addition of inhibin A only increased the DR to 69%.These results suggest that proMBP may be an important new marker in Down syndrome screening and, in particular, a good substitute for inhibin A.Abnormal biochemical serum screening versus 2nd-trimester ultrasound-detected minor anomalies as predictors of aneuploidy in low-risk patients.To compare the yield of multiple-marker biochemical screening with that of minor fetal anomalies observed on ultrasound for detection of aneuploidy in low-risk patients.The results of 1,073 amniocenteses performed because of abnormal biochemical screening tests were compared against 197 amniocenteses performed for minor anomalies as detected on level II ultrasound at 15-22 weeks of gestation.False-positive results were observed in about 7% of serum screening patients and in 1.7% of the ultrasound cases. Chromosomally abnormal fetuses were detected in 2% of the amniocenteses performed because of abnormal serum screening and in 2.5% of the cases with ultrasound-defined minor anomalies.Both methods identify patients at risk for abnormal karyotypes. Although the evaluation of serum biochemical markers yielded more false-positive results, it is more suitable than ultrasound for mass population screening.[Ultrasound screening for chromosomal anomalies by assessment of the fetal nasal bone during 11-14 weeks of gestation--a pilot study].To assess the feasibility of ultrasound screening for chromosomal anomalies by verification of the fetal nasal bone at 11-14 weeks gestation.A prospective longitudinal pilot study was performed in State University Hospital "Maichin dom" from September 2006 till September 2007. Thirty-six high-risk singleton pregnancies were examined between 11+0 and 14+0 weeks gestation with high-resolution ultrasound equipment. The first trimester scan included assessment of fetal number, viability and biometry, nuchal translucency measurement and fetal anatomy survey In each case the presence or absence of the fetal nasal bone was documented. The exam was performed in the mid-sagittal plane according to standardized published protocols. Increased NT > or = 95th centile and/or absence of the fetal nasal bone was considered as indication for invasive prenatal diagnosis. Pregnancy outcome was ascertained from hospital records, referring physicians or the patients themselves.Absence of the fetal nasal bone was verified in 11.1% (4/36) of cases. In all four cases an invasive prenatal procedure was performed. Chromosomal anomalies were found in three cases with absent fetal nasal bone (1--trisomy 21, 1--trisomy 18, 1--triplody), while the fourth case had normal fetal karyotype. In all three cases with chromosomal fetal anomalies termination of pregnancy was performed. The remaining 33 pregnancies had normal perinatal outcome.Absence of the nasal bone at 11-14 weeks gestation is a new potential marker for chromosomal fetal anomalies in the first trimester of pregnancy.Comparison of modes of ascertainment for mosaic vs complete trisomy 21.We sought to compare the indications for amniocentesis leading to the detection of either mosaicism of trisomy 21 (mosaic-T21) or complete trisomy 21 (T21).A retrospective review of a large amniocentesis database (n = 494,163) was conducted. All specimens with mosaic-T21 (n = 124) were compared with a maternal age-matched group of T21 fetuses (n = 496). Samples with normal karyotypes were matched for maternal age and served as normal controls (n = 496). The chi(2) testing was used for statistical analysis.The presence of an abnormal first-trimester screen, abnormal sonographic findings, and specifically the single sonographic abnormalities of either a cystic hygroma or a cardiac anomaly were significantly less common in the mosaic-T21 as compared with the T21 group. There were no such differences between the mosaic-T21 and the normal control group.Fetuses with mosaic-T21, similar to those with normal karyotype, do not present with the same abnormal screening tests as fetuses with T21.ADAM 12 as a second-trimester maternal serum marker in screening for Down syndrome.ADAM 12 is a placenta-derived glycoprotein that is involved in growth and differentiation. The maternal serum concentration of ADAM 12 is a potential first-trimester maternal serum marker of Down syndrome (DS). Here we examine the potential of ADAM 12 as a second-trimester maternal serum marker of DS.The concentration of ADAM 12 was determined in gestational week 14-19 in 88 DS pregnancies and 341 matched control pregnancies. Medians of normal pregnancies were established by polynomial regression and the distribution of log(10) MoM ADAM 12 values in DS pregnancies and controls determined. Correlations with alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (free beta-hCG) were established and used to model the performance of maternal serum screening with ADAM 12 in combination with other second-trimester serum markers.The ADAM 12 maternal serum concentration was significantly increased with a median MoM of 1.85 and a mean log(10) MoM (SD) of 0.268 (0.2678) compared to a mean log(10) MoM (SD) of 0.013 (0.4318) in controls. ADAM 12 correlated with maternal weight and ethnicity (with the serum concentration increased in Afro-Caribbeans), but neither with maternal age nor gestational age, and only marginally with AFP (r(DS) = 0.078, r(controls) = 0.093) and free beta-hCG (r(DS) = 0.073, r(controls) = 0.144. The increase in detection rate-for a false positive rate of 5%--by adding ADAM 12 to the double test (AFP + free beta-hCG) was 4%, similar to that of adding uE3 to the double test.ADAM 12 is an efficient second-trimester marker for DS. Further studies should be conducted to determine whether it may be a useful additional or alternative marker to those currently used in the second-trimester.Sequential and contingent prenatal screening for Down syndrome.To compare the Integrated test in three policies for prenatal Down syndrome screening: Integrated screening for all women, sequential screening (first-trimester tests allowing early completion of screening for high-risk pregnancies), and Contingent screening (early completion of screening for high- and low-risk pregnancies).Estimation of detection rates (DRs) and false-positive rates (FPRs) using Monte Carlo simulation and cost effectiveness for each method.Down syndrome affected and unaffected pregnancies studied in the Serum Urine and Ultrasound Screening Study (SURUSS). RESULTS AND MAIN OUTCOMES: Integrated screening has the best screening performance. The performance of the other two policies approached that of Integrated screening as the first-trimester test FPR decreased. If the first-trimester FPR is set to 0.5% (risk >or= 1 in 30) with an overall DR of 90%, sequential and contingent screening yield overall FPRs of 2.25% and 2.42%, respectively, and 66% of the affected pregnancies are detected by the first-trimester test. The Integrated test on all women yields an FPR of 2.15%. With sequential screening, 99.5% of women would proceed to an Integrated test, or 30% with contingent screening if those with first-trimester test risks of <or=1 in 2000 are classified screen-negative and receive no further testing. About 20% of affected pregnancies identified in the first trimester using sequential or contingent screening would have unnecessary terminations (they would miscarry before the early second trimester). Contingent screening is the most cost-effective if there is no alphafetoprotein screening for neural tube defects, otherwise Integrated screening is more cost-effective.Integrated screening for all women is the simplest, most effective, and the safest policy. Contingent screening is the most complex with the lowest screening performance. Making an earlier diagnosis with sequential and contingent screening has adverse consequences that are sufficient to discourage their use.[Share with women. Prenatal tests for Down syndrome].Risk assessment for Down syndrome with genetic sonogram in women at risk.To evaluate the algorithms of risk assessment for Down syndrome (DS).Cohort study conducted in women at risk undergoing midtrimester genetic sonogram. Univariate and logistic regression analysis were used to relate findings to the occurrence of DS. The resulting model was validated in an independent population of patients.In a multivariable model adjusted for gestational age and maternal age, nuchal fold thickness (NFT) >or= 5 mm (OR = 4.6, 95% CI 0.9-23.9), presence of renal pelvic dilation (OR = 18.0, 95% CI 2.9-110.5), absent mid-phalanx of the 5th finger (OR = 29.9, 95% CI 6.1-145.8), presence of noncardiac malformations (OR = 20.1, 95% CI 2.6-154.7) or isolated heart defects (OR = 60.2, 95% CI 9.5-382.8), the interactions of gestational age with NFT >or= 5 mm (P = 0.04) and malformations with heart defects (P = 0.03) were significantly associated with DS. Utilizing this model and a risk cutoff point of 1/270, the sensitivity was 83.3% (5/6) with a false positive rate (FPR) of 28.5% (159/558).Genetic sonogram has adequate accuracy to be incorporated into management algorithms for risk assessment of DS in women at risk.Is there any effect of fetal gender on the markers of first trimester Down's syndrome screening?At present, the most effective trisomy 21-screening method is the estimate of risk combining maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency, beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated PAPP-A.The aim of this study was to investigate the possible effect of fetal gender in first trimester Down's syndrome screening markers.Retrospective study.Prenatal Diagnosis Centre in a tertiary hospital in Lagos.Of a total of 350 pregnancies in which fetal nuchal translucency and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were performed were included in this study. These markers were investigated to see if they differed on the basis of fetal gender.PAPP-A levels were higher in female fetuses although the difference was not statistically significant. Nuchal translucency was 0.099 mm more in male fetuses.The results suggest that first trimester markers differ on gender but are of no clinical significance, confirming the result of other authors.[AFP, uE3, beta-hCG levels applied for prenatal diagnosis of Down's syndrome].To investigate the relationship between fetal trisomy 21 and alpha fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3) and beta human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) levels in maternal serum, amniotic fluid and fetal serum.AFP, uE3 and beta-hCG levels in maternal serum, amniotic fluid and fetal serum from 17 pregnancies with fetal trisomy 21 and 131 unaffected control pregnancies were measured between 16 to 28 weeks gestation using radioimmunoassay.In these pregnancies with fetal trisomy 21, the AFP and uE3 levels in maternal serum, amniotic fluid and fetal serum were lower than those in controls; but beta-hCG levels were higher (P < 0.05).To measure maternal serum AFP, uE3 and beta-hCG levels will be useful in prenatal detection of trisomy 21.Pregnancy outcomes with increased nuchal translucency after routine Down syndrome screening.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the outcomes of pregnancies with nuchal translucency greater or equal to 3 mm for routine first trimester screening in unselected populations.A total of 2980 pregnant women for first trimester ultrasonography were routinely offered crown-rump length (CRL) and nuchal translucency (NT) for screening for Down syndrome between 11 and 14 weeks' gestation. A complete follow-up was obtained in all cases by a review of medical records.Using a cut-off value of 3 mm, the prevalence of increased fetal NT was 0.7% (n=22). Among the 22 cases, there were five (22.7%) chromosomal abnormalities. Of the 17 chromosomally normal pregnancies, four resulted in fetal demise (spontaneous abortion, intrauterine death or termination of pregnancy due to fetal abnormalities). The remaining 13 pregnancies resulted in live births, including one gestational hypertension and one preterm delivery, respectively. The total incidence of an adverse outcome in the group of increased fetal NT was 45.5%.In a routine population with first-trimester ultrasonography, fetal NT measuring greater than or equal to 3 mm was associated with a poor pregnancy outcome with not only chromosomal abnormalities and congenital cardiac diseases, but also poor maternal and fetal health or adverse pregnancy outcomes. In addition, this study also demonstrated the necessity for fetal assessment and follow-up in cases where the fetal NT is increased in the first trimester.Heat-stable and immunoreactive placental alkaline phosphatase in maternal serum from Down's syndrome and trisomy 18 pregnancies.Placental alkaline phosphatase (ALP) activity was investigated in second-trimester maternal sera from 37 pregnancies with Down's syndrome, 28 pregnancies with trisomy 18, and in a series of 497 controls using a fluorimetric heat inactivation assay and specific immunoassay. After conversion of individual analyte values to multiples of the normal gestational median (MOM), no significant differences in total or placental ALP activities were found in the trisomy 21 or trisomy 18 cases (P > 0.01). In the Down's syndrome pregnancies, total ALP activity was 0.93 MOM, heat-stable ALP activity was 1.09 MOM, and placental ALP (by immunoassay) 0.96 MOM. In the trisomy 18 cases, total ALP activity was 0.90 MOM, heat-stable ALP activity was 0.79 MOM, and placental ALP (by immunoassay) 0.94 MOM. We conclude that neither total nor placental ALP activity is a useful marker for Down's syndrome or trisomy 18 screening.Doppler assessment of cardiac function at 11-14 weeks' gestation in fetuses with normal and increased nuchal translucency.To investigate cardiac dysfunction as a potential underlying mechanism for increased nuchal translucency (NT) in fetuses with chromosomal abnormality or heart defects.Myocardial performance index (MPI) and atrioventricular valve E/A ratios for both sides of the heart were measured by Doppler echocardiography in fetuses at 11-14 weeks' gestation. The study groups consisted of 159 normal control fetuses, 199 otherwise normal fetuses but with increased NT > or = 4 mm, 142 fetuses with trisomy 21, 58 with trisomy 18, 19 with trisomy 13, 37 with Turner's syndrome and 24 with isolated heart defects. Groups were compared using Student's t-test and confidence intervals for differences between groups were calculated.Otherwise normal fetuses with increased NT showed no difference in any of the cardiac Doppler parameters from normal controls. Mean E/A ratio was slightly but significantly increased in trisomy 21 fetuses compared with normal controls (0.604 vs. 0.578 on the right, P = 0.011; 0.581 vs. 0.542 on the left, P = 0.0001). E/A ratio was not significantly different between any of the other groups and the normals but there was a small increase in absolute E-wave velocity in trisomy 18 fetuses. MPI was significantly decreased in trisomy 21 fetuses, (0.330 vs. 0.378, P = 0.002 on the left) and also in Turner's syndrome fetuses (0.301 vs. 0.352 on the right, P = 0.04; 0.320 vs. 0.378 on the left, P = 0.034) implying better performance, but not in the other groups.The magnitude and/or direction of the differences shown do not support a major role for cardiac functional abnormality in the development of NT. Important cardiac dysfunction could not be demonstrated in association with increased NT in normal or abnormal fetuses.Second trimester maternal serum beta human chorionic gonadotrophin and pregnancy outcome.The aim of this prospective, controlled study was to examine the relation between second trimester maternal serum beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (HCG) and birthweight. The study population consisted of 192 women with maternal serum betaHCG > or = 3.5 multiple of the median and a control group with the same number of women with maternal serum betaHCG < or = 2.0 multiple of the median. There was no difference in birthweight and other pregnancy outcomes between the two groups. When used prospectively, elevated betaHCG in the mid-trimester is not a predictor for intrauterine growth restriction or other pregnancy complications.[Analysis of Down syndrome screening by maternal serum detection in mid-pregnancy].To study the clinical value of screening chromosomal diseases and abnormal pregnancy by maternal serum examination in mid-pregnancy.Maternal serum AFP and F-beta hCG were detected in the mid-pregnancy (16-20 weeks) using commercially available detection kits, and the risk of Down syndrome was calculated taking into account of such factors as the maternal age, gestational age, and body weight. Those at high risk underwent amino fluid or cordocentesis for fetal karyotpying. The pregnant women were divided into >or=35 years and <35 years groups, and high and low risk for Down syndrome groups for test results and pregnancy outcome analysis.Of the 6000 pregnant women undergoing antenatal screening, 552 were identified to be at high risk of Down syndrome (9.2%) with one missing case of detection, and 463 of the high-risk cases underwent amino fluid or cordocentesis examination. Twenty-seven cases were found to have abnormal chromosomes, and abortion was suggested in 14 cases but not in the other 13 cases where other chromosomal abnormalities such as polymorphic mutations were found. The screening positive rate in >or=35 years and <35 years group was 95.5% and 8.2% (P<0.0001), with fetal chromosomal abnormality rate of 4.5% and 2.9%, respectively (P>0.5). The rate of abnormal pregnant outcomes for high and low risk groups was 5.6% and 0.05% (P<0.0001), with pregnancy complication rate of 11.8% and 3.7% (P<0.0001) and fetal chromosomal polymorphic mutation rate of 2.8% and 1.1% (P>0.5), respectively.Maternal serum AFP and F-beta hCG levels in second trimester have important values in predicting fetal chromosomal diseases, and their detection may help reduce the birth defect rate and prevent abnormal pregnancy outcomes and complications.Nuchal thickness, urine beta-core fragment level, and maternal age for down syndrome screening.Our purpose was to report the midtrimester Down syndrome screening efficiency of a 2-analyte algorithm, urine beta-core fragment (a metabolite of human chorionic gonadotropin) and nuchal thickness, along with maternal age in a high-risk population undergoing genetic amniocentesis.Nuchal thickness, humerus length, and maternal urine beta-core fragment levels were measured prospectively before genetic amniocentesis in 1360 singleton pregnancies, 21 (1.5%) of which had fetal Down syndrome. All analyte levels were expressed as multiples of the normal medians based on biparietal diameter. Backward-stepwise logistic regression was used to determine whether the markers were significant independent predictors of fetal Down syndrome. Matrix analysis was used to calculate an adjusted Down syndrome likelihood ratio for each patient based on the significant screening markers. Multiplication by age-related midtrimester risk gave the adjusted Down syndrome risk. The sensitivity and false-positive rates at different Down syndrome screening thresholds were used to generate a receiver-operator characteristics curve. The area under the curve was used to assess the value of this screening test.On the basis of logistic regression, beta-core fragment level (P 1/60 the sensitivity and false-positive rate for Down syndrome were 85.7% and 4.9%, respectively, when beta-core fragment level, nuchal thickness, and maternal age were used. Correspondence screening values at a risk threshold > 1/150 were 95.2% and 10.8%, respectively. The area under the receiver-operator characteristics curve was 0.9357 (SE = 0. 0137), indicating that the algorithm is excellent for Down syndrome screening.In this study, a combination algorithm consisting of nuchal thickness, urine beta-core fragment level, and maternal age had a high screening efficiency for Down syndrome. This algorithm should be investigated as a new option for women at high risk of having a fetus with Down syndrome.First-trimester screening for trisomy 21 in singleton pregnancies achieved by assisted reproduction.The possible effect of assisted reproduction on first-trimester screening for trisomy 21 was examined by fetal nuchal translucency thickness (NT), maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (HCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).Parameters were measured at 11-14 weeks in 411 singleton pregnancies achieved by controlled ovarian stimulation, including 220 that had undergone IVF. Results were compared with 1233 singleton pregnancies conceived spontaneously.In the IVF pregnancies, the median fetal NT was not significantly different from that in controls, whilst the median free beta-HCG was significantly increased, and PAPP-A was significantly decreased. In the intracytoplasmic sperm injection group, fetal NT and free beta-HCG values were not significantly different from those in controls, but PAPP-A was significantly decreased. In those pregnancies achieved by ovarian stimulation, neither fetal NT, free beta-HCG nor PAPP-A were significantly different from the control group.In IVF pregnancies, screening for trisomy 21 by fetal NT, maternal serum free beta-HCG and PAPP-A levels may be associated with a 1.2% higher false-positive rate than in natural conception.First trimester biochemical screening for Down's syndrome in singleton pregnancies conceived by assisted reproduction.Serum biochemical markers [free betahCG (fbetahCG); pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A)] used in first trimester Down's syndrome screening have not been fully investigated in pregnancies achieved by assisted reproduction techniques. We present data on pregnancies conceived by all types of assisted reproduction techniques, including pregnancies following ovum donation (OD) and a large sample by ICSI.First trimester Down's syndrome screening was performed in 1054 normal singleton pregnancies: natural conception (n = 498), ovulation induction (OS, n = 97), IVF (n = 47), ICSI (n = 222) and OD (n = 190).No differences in maternal levels of fbetahCG and PAPP-A, measured by the Kryptor system, appeared between naturally conceived pregnancies (n = 498) and those obtained with assisted reproduction techniques (n = 556). Several differences were apparent when comparing fbetahCG levels between different technologies but PAPP-A levels only differed between OS and IVF pregnancies (P < 0.05). In a further small study, no differences were observed using frozen embryos (n = 37), preimplantation genetic diagnosis (n = 53) or sperm from testicular biopsy (n = 21).Data accumulated so far suggest that first trimester biochemical markers either do not need any adjustments (e.g. in pregnancies obtained after OS and ICSI), or have very little impact (e.g. IVF pregnancies) or no impact (e.g. OD pregnancies) on the false positive rates.The effect of temporal variation in biochemical markers of trisomy 21 across the first and second trimesters of pregnancy on the estimation of individual patient-specific risks and detection rates for Down's syndrome.In a previous study we examined the changes in the median multiple of the median (MoM) with gestation of free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (F beta-hCG), total human chorionic gonadotrophin (ThCG), alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) in a large series of Down's syndrome pregnancies. Results showed that there was a significant temporal variation of the MoM for each marker. In this paper, we assess the impact of this temporal shift on the estimation of patient-specific risks and the detection rates (DRs) for Down's syndrome pregnancies.Individual patient-specific risks, DRs and false positive rates were estimated using statistical modelling techniques and computer simulations. The data for these simulations were the regressed mean log(10) analyte MoMs, marker standard deviations (as log(10) MoM) and correlation coefficients derived from the analysis of over 1000 cases of Down's syndrome and 150,000 unaffected pregnancies between 6 and 20 weeks of gestation reported in our previous study. Two models were compared: the classical constant median separation model, which assumes no variation in median shift with gestation (model 1), and a variable median separation model (model 2), which takes account of the changes in median shift with gestation as described in our previous study.When individual patient-specific risks calculated for various MoM values using model 1 were compared with those derived from model 2, considerable differences in risk estimates were observed for all marker combinations, particularly in the first trimester. Using a 1 in 250 cut-off risk, DRs at each gestation in the second trimester for the AFP+F beta-hCG combination were maximized at 14-17 weeks of gestation and were virtually identical at 63-65% for model 1 and model 2. A similar trend was observed for the AFP+ThCG combination, with an optimum gestational range of 15-18 weeks and DRs of 66-68%. In the first trimester, using a 1 in 250 cut-off risk, DRs were more variable with gestation for the prime marker combination of F beta-hCG+PAPP-A, varying from 73% at 8 weeks to 65% at 13 weeks with model 1 and from 75% to 66% with model 2.Risk algorithms should take into account temporal variation in marker MoMs in order to produce accurate patient-specific risks. This also helps to maximize DRs, particularly when samples are taken out with the optimal gestational range.Correlation and overlapping between nuchal translucency and triple test among Down syndrome-affected pregnancies.To examine the correlation and extent of overlapping between first-trimester nuchal translucency (NT) and second-trimester triple test (TT) results in Down syndrome (DS)-affected pregnancies.Results of both tests were obtained in 28 cases with DS. Inter-test correlation was performed by comparing the likelihood ratios (LRs). Screen-positive rates (risk >1:380) were calculated for different age groups by adjusting age-dependent background risk and tests' LRs. Overlapping referred to ratio between screen-positive cases by both tests simultaneously and total screen-positive cases by either one or both tests.No correlation was found between the tests' LRs (Pearson correlation test, r = 0.0487). The overlapping between the tests was 25% and 38.5% among young patients of 20 and 35 years of age, respectively. The average overlapping among patients between 25 and 35 years of age was approximately 33%. Only 3 of the 28 DS cases demonstrated LRs <1 by both tests and moreover none exhibited LRs <0.2 by both tests.The degree of overlapping of one third, between NT and TT, confirms the assumption that both tests utilized together improves DS detection. Screen- negative result, by both tests simultaneously, may reassure low-risk population and aid to reduce the number of non-indicated invasive tests.Second and first trimester estimation of risk for Down syndrome: implementation and performance in the SAFER study.Document patient choices and screening performance (false positive and detection rates) when three improved Down syndrome screening protocols were introduced coincidentally.Second-trimester 'triple marker' screening was expanded by adding second-trimester dimeric inhibin-A (four-marker), with or without first-trimester pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (five-marker). Nuchal translucency (NT) measurements were included when available from accredited sonographers (six-marker). For assigning risk, two sets of marker distribution parameters were evaluated.Over 3.5 years, 8571 women enrolled (median age 30.6 years). Uptake of the four-, five- and six-marker protocols was 18%, 46% and 36%, respectively. Of those selecting an integrated test (five or six markers), 9.7% did not provide the second trimester serum sample. False positive rates decreased with added markers (5.2%, 5.1% and 2.5%, respectively) and varied between the two parameter sets, while detection remained high. Overall, 21 of 23 cases were detected (91%, 95% CI 73-98%) at a 4.2% false positive rate (95% CI 3.3-5.1%).Integrated screening protocols were chosen 4.6 times more often than four-marker screening (82% vs. 18% uptake). Overall detection was higher and false positives lower, consistent with recent guidelines. Important performance factors include gestational dating method, risk cut-off, and the parameter set used to assign risk.Screening for Down syndrome based on maternal age or fetal nuchal translucency: a randomized controlled trial in 39,572 pregnancies.Nuchal translucency (NT) screening increases antenatal detection of Down syndrome (DS) compared to maternal age-based screening. We wanted to determine if a change in policy for prenatal diagnosis would result in fewer babies born with DS.A total of 39,572 pregnant women were randomized to a scan at 12-14 gestational weeks including NT screening for DS (12-week group) or to a scan at 15-20 weeks with screening for DS based on maternal age (18-week group). Fetal karyotyping was offered if risk according to NT was > or = 1:250 in the 12-week group and if maternal age was > or = 35 years in the 18-week group. Both policies included the offer of karyotyping in cases of fetal anomaly detected at any scan during pregnancy or when there was a history of fetal chromosomal anomaly. The number of babies born with DS and the number of invasive tests for fetal karyotyping were compared.Ten babies with DS were born alive with the 12-week policy vs. 16 with the 18-week policy (P = 0.25). More fetuses with DS were spontaneously lost or terminated in the 12-week group (45/19,796) than in the 18-week group (27/19 776; P = 0.04). All women except one with an antenatal diagnosis of DS at < 22 weeks terminated the pregnancy. For each case of DS detected at < 22 weeks in a living fetus there were 16 invasive tests in the 12-week group vs. 89 in the 18-week group. NT screening detected 71% of cases of DS for a 3.5% test-positive rate whereas maternal age had the potential of detecting 58% for a test-positive rate of 18%.The number of newborns with DS differed less than expected between pregnancies that had been screened at 12-14 weeks' gestation by NT compared with those screened at 15-20 weeks by maternal age. One explanation could be that NT screening--because it is performed early in pregnancy--results in the detection and termination of many pregnancies with a fetus with DS that would have resulted in miscarriage without intervention, and also by many cases of DS being detected because of a fetal anomaly seen on an 18-week scan. The major advantage of the 12-week scan policy is that many fewer invasive tests for fetal karyotyping are needed per antenatally detected case of DS.Maternal serum hCG and alpha-fetoprotein levels in pregnancies conceived after IVF or ICSI with fresh and frozen-thawed embryos.Studies have shown that levels of serum markers of Down's syndrome were altered in pregnancies conceived after IVF, though the reason for this remains unknown.Second-trimester maternal serum levels of hCG and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) in pregnancies conceived with fresh and frozen-thawed embryos after assisted reproduction were compared with those conceived spontaneously.There were 203 pregnancies with fresh embryo transfers (130 IVF cases, 73 ICSI cases) and 98 pregnancies with frozen-thawed embryo transfers (61 IVF cases, 37 ICSI cases). The controls consisted of 17 145 spontaneous pregnancies. The median hCG multiples of the median (MoM) was significantly increased to 1.24 in 98 pregnancies conceived after frozen embryo transfer. This elevation was observed only in the IVF-frozen embryo transfer subgroup (P < 0.001), but not in the ICSI-frozen embryo transfer subgroup. The median AFP MoM for 203 pregnancies after fresh embryo transfer was 0.90. Among the subgroups, the median AFP MoM was significantly reduced to 0.90 and 0.86 in IVF-embryo transfer (P = 0.04) and ICSI-embryo transfer (P = 0.001) pregnancies respectively, and significantly raised to 1.20 in the IVF-frozen embryo transfer subgroup.The degree of alterations in maternal serum hCG and AFP levels varied between fresh and frozen-thawed embryos, and also between the mode of fertilization. Pregnancies resulting from ICSI or frozen embryo transfer should be regarded as distinct entities from those of IVF-embryo transfer.Second-trimester maternal serum screening using alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotrophin, and unconjugated oestriol: experience of a regional programme.Over a 2-year period from January 1991 to December 1992, second-trimester maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome using alpha-fetoprotein (alpha FP), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) was made available to five health districts in East Anglia, with a total population of 1.2 million. Amniocentesis was offered when the risk of Down's syndrome at term was 1:200 or greater. 25,359 singleton pregnancies were screened, representing an uptake of 77 per cent. The recall rate for the 24 per cent of women who had not had a dating scan prior to the test was 9.4 per cent compared with 3.9 per cent for those who had been scanned (P < 0.0005). Seventy-five per cent (36/48) of Down's syndrome pregnancies were detected for a false-positive rate of 4.0 per cent. Twenty-five out of 36 of detected Down's syndrome pregnancies were dated by scan prior to sampling, and in the 11 remaining cases, the dates were confirmed by scan after a high-risk result was obtained. The exclusion of uE3 from the screening protocol would have reduced the detection rate to 52 per cent (25/48) for the same false-positive rate. Eighty-five per cent of women identified at high risk accepted the offer of an amniocentesis. Other fetal abnormalities detected were trisomy 18 (3), trisomy 13 (2), 45,X (6), 69,XXX (5), other chromosome abnormalities (9), open neural tube defects (26), hydrocephalus (7), abdominal wall defects (4), and steroid sulphatase deficiency (6).Elevated levels of maternal serum inhibin immunoreactivity in second trimester pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome.[Screening for trisomy 21 in France].Ultrasonography of the fetal neck in the first and second trimesters. Part 2. Anomalies of the posterior nuchal region.Over a 5-year period, the author examined the posterior nuchal region of the fetus in 7200 first- and second-trimester sonograms. Nuchal fluid collections were analysed to differentiate physiologic collections, which resolve spontaneously, from pathologic ones, which necessitate invasive testing for chromosomal abnormalities. Recommendations for evaluating ultrasonographic findings, based on the results of the study, are presented algorithmically in this pictorial essay. A single echogenic line representing a skin reflection was usually visible in normal fetuses. Thin double echogenic lines, observed in eight cases in this series, were due to fetal rotation or the presence of an amniotic membrane adjacent to the normal dorsal pseudomembrane and were not indicative of abnormality. In three cases the spectral reflection of the fetal neck surface was relatively thick, leading to the appearance of thick double echogenic lines; of these, two cases involved Down's syndrome. Therefore, karyotyping is suggested in all cases of thick echogenic lines. Of the 11 nuchal fluid collections up to 5 mm in diameter observed in this series, 10 resolved spontaneously by 24 weeks gestational age. In the other case the collection enlarged, and karyotyping revealed Turner's syndrome. Of the 16 cases of nuchal fluid collections greater than 5 mm in diameter, 5 were associated with an abnormal karyotype (Down's syndrome in 4); karyotyping is recommended in all such cases. Nuchal edema occurred in 22 cases. It was associated with Down's syndrome in 8 cases and with trisomy 18 in 1 case. Among fetuses with nuchal edema, the frequency of aneuploidy was substantially greater if other abnormalities were also present.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Screening for fetal Down's syndrome in pregnancy by measuring maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein levels.Although the risk of Down's syndrome increases with maternal age, women under 35 bear about 80 percent of the infants born with this condition. We prospectively investigated the utility of measuring maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein during the second trimester in women under 35 in order to identify pregnancies in which the fetus was affected with Down's syndrome. Over a two-year period, 34,354 women in this age group were screened. Amniocentesis was offered when the risk of Down's syndrome, calculated as a function of maternal age and maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein concentration adjusted for maternal weight and race, was 1:270 or higher, the risk for a 35-year-old woman. This threshold was exceeded in 1451 women in whom gestational age was confirmed by ultrasound; 9 women in this group had a fetus with the syndrome. In three women whose fetuses had trisomy 18 and one whose fetus had trisomy 13, the calculated risk of Down's syndrome was 1:270 or higher. Thus, among women in whom the risk exceeded our cutoff point, 1 in 161 were found to have a pregnancy in which the fetus was affected with Down's syndrome; the figure was 1 in 112 for all autosomal trisomies. Eighteen pregnancies involving Down's syndrome, three involving trisomy 18, and two involving trisomy 13 were not associated with a calculated risk above the cutoff point. The available data indicate that in our population, using a cutoff for risk at which 5 percent of women under 35 are offered amniocentesis, we will detect one quarter to one third of pregnancies in which the fetus has Down's syndrome.The comprehensive midtrimester test: high-sensitivity Down syndrome test.The purpose of this study was to develop a highly sensitive algorithm for midtrimester Down syndrome detection.Urine (hyperglycosylated human chorionic gonadotropin, beta-core fragment of human chorionic gonadotropin), serum (alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin and unconjugated estriol [uE(3)]), and ultrasound biometry (nuchal thickness, humerus length, the presence of gross ultrasonographic anomalies), and maternal age were measured at genetic amniocentesis. Stepwise logistic regression analysis was used to identify the most significant markers. A multivariate Gaussian algorithm plus age was used to derive patient-specific Down syndrome risk. Sensitivity and false-positive rates at different risk thresholds and the area under the receiver-operating characteristic curve were determined. A probability value of <.05 was significant.There were 568 study cases with 17 Down syndrome cases (3.0%). The mean (+/-SD) maternal and gestational ages for the study group were 36.9 (+/-3.5) years and 16.2 (+/-1.4) weeks, respectively. The significant markers were nuchal thickness (P =.0001), hyperglycosylated human chorionic gonadotropin(P <.001), and beta-core fragment (P <.002). Neither maternal age nor gross sonographic anomaly contributed significantly to Down syndrome detection. The comprehensive midtrimester test was extremely efficient for Down syndrome detection in advanced maternal age only cases with a sensitivity of 92.3% at a 0.8% false-positive rate. In women <35 years old, all the Down syndrome cases were detected at 2.2% false positive rate. For the overall population, the sensitivity was 93.7% at 5% false-positive rate.In a preliminary study, the comprehensive midtrimester test appeared highly sensitive in different age groups. Gross anomaly detection was not required for high performance, which makes the comprehensive midtrimester test potentially suitable for low-risk screening and as an alternative to amniocentesis in women who wish to avoid the procedure. This was a small study; thus, the clinical value of this test can only be established in large trials.The influence of smoking on maternal serum AFP and free beta hCG levels and the impact on screening for Down syndrome.I have studied the impact of maternal smoking on the levels of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) during the second trimester in a large series (30,727) of self-reported smokers and non-smokers whose pregnancy resulted in the birth of a normal fetus. I have confirmed in a smaller subset of this population that self-reporting is an accurate method of assessing smoking status as confirmed by biochemical (serum cotinine) assessment. In addition, I have investigated marker levels among 195 pregnancies affected by Down syndrome with smoking status confirmed by measurement of serum cotinine. In both unaffected and Down syndrome groups, the incidence of smoking was 19 per cent but a considerable variation was observed with maternal age when the incidence in younger women (under 25) was 32 per cent. AFP median levels in unaffected smokers were 3 per cent higher, whilst in the Down syndrome group smoker medians were increased by 10 per cent compared with the non-smoker group. Free beta hCG levels in unaffected smokers were reduced by 14 per cent, whilst in the Down syndrome group smoker median levels were decreased by 16 per cent. In the smoker group, the Down syndrome detection rate was 10 per cent lower than in the non-smoker group, whilst the false-positive rate was also 2 per cent lower. Correcting for smoking status would redress this inequality and produce an overall 2 per cent increase in the detection rate for a 0.4 per cent increase in the false-positive rate. This increase in screening performance may be worth building into screening programmes, particularly in populations with a high smoking incidence.Nuchal translucency in pregnancies conceived after assisted reproduction technology.Levels of maternal serum markers of fetal Down syndrome in pregnancies conceived after assisted reproduction are different from those of normal spontaneous pregnancies. The present study examined the effects of conventional in-vitro fertilization (IVF), intracytoplasmic sperm injection (ICSI) and embryo cryopreservation on nuchal translucency (NT) thickness.A retrospective analysis on 16 673 spontaneous pregnancies, 119 pregnancies with fresh embryos from IVF, 62 pregnancies with frozen-thawed embryos from IVF, 81 pregnancies with fresh embryos from ICSI and 39 frozen-thawed embryos from ICSI was performed. All were singletons with known normal outcomes. Multiples of the median (MoM) of NT were compared.The median NT MoM of spontaneous pregnancies was 1.01. In the assisted reproduction pregnancies, the median NT MoM were significantly increased to 1.07 (P = 0.003), 1.09 (P = 0.009) and 1.09 (P = 0.001) in pregnancies conceived with fresh embryos from IVF, frozen-thawed embryos from IVF and fresh embryos from ICSI, respectively. A non-significant increase in median NT MoM (1.04; P = 0.489) was also observed in pregnancies with frozen-thawed embryos from ICSI.Increased NT in assisted reproduction pregnancies is postulated to be due to some delay in fetal development. Another possible reason might be related to adverse antenatal course in these pregnancies.Free alpha-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin in Down syndrome.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the potential value of maternal serum free alpha-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin concentrations in discriminating between pregnancies associated with Down syndrome and normal matched controls.Maternal serum concentrations were evaluated in 36 cases of fetal Down syndrome and compared with concentrations in 180 control unaffected pregnancies within the gestational age range 16 to 20 weeks matched for maternal age, gestational age, and storage duration.The results of the study indicate that free alpha-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin concentrations in the Down syndrome group were not significantly different from those in the unaffected group (median multiple of the median: for Down syndrome group, 0.991; for unaffected group, 1.000).Caution is urged in the interpretation of published data; a case for using this subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin in Down syndrome screening protocols in the second trimester is not yet proved.Screening for maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein: what about the low side?Triple marker screening in native Japanese women.Prenatal screening using the maternal serum markers alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated oestriol was investigated in a native Japanese population. Comparison with a Caucasian U.S. population revealed differences which led to modification of the generally used equations for risk calculations. Prenatal screening was shown to be clinically useful.Comparison of Nicolaides' risk evaluation for Down's syndrome with a novel software: an analysis of 1,463 cases.The individual risk assessment of fetal Down's syndrome based on measurement of nuchal translucency (NT) according to Nicolaides, optionally complemented by the determination of PAPP-A and free beta HCG has progressively supplanted other search strategies for fetal aneuploidies. It could be shown that this diagnostic strategy equally detects other numeric aneuploidies at a comparable rate. A positive test result is also predictive for the presence of a fetal malformation. In this field, several computer programs are available for clinical use. The objective of our study was to re-evaluate the first consecutive 1463 NT-risk calculations determined by Nicolaides' method and to compare the risk calculation to the JOY software (NT-risk calculation module, JOY Patient Database) introduced in 2002.At the Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology, Hannover Medical School, 1463 consecutive complete data sets comprising first trimester screening performed between May 2, 2000 and June 26, 2003 and corresponding fetal outcome were analysed using risk assessment based on the Nicolaides method (PIA Fetal Database NT-Module) and compared with the risk evaluation as determined by the JOY software (JOY Patient Database NT module). A risk exceeding 1:300 was considered to indicate the need for further invasive testing. In a first step, only cytogenetically detectable chromosomal aberrations were analysed. Then, a second evaluation including fetal malformations was performed.Among the 1463 cases, 1445 (98.77%) fetuses revealed to be cytogenetically healthy. Both softwares showed identical detection rates at the genetic and somatic level:13 cases of Down-Syndrome (0.89%), 2 cases of trisomy 18 (0.14%), one case of triploidy, one Turner-Syndrome, one Klinefelter-Syndrome (0.07% each) were detected. A positive test result was found in 15 cases ending in a spontaneous abortion, intrauterine death or peripartum death (1.03%) and in 22 cases of fetal malformation (1.50%). At the level of genetic detection the test positive rate dropped from 92 (PIA) to 71 (JOY) (-22.8%). At the level of combined adverse outcome the test positive rate was reduced from 100 (PIA) to 76 (JOY) (-22.0%), thus yielding in a marked improvement of the characteristic test performance parameters.The novel, recently developed JOY software package allowed reliable evaluation of the risk for aneuploidy with increased specificity whereas sensitivity was unchanged. Our data suggest an improvement of the screening for aneuploidy when using this novel software: With an identical detection rate, the number of unnecessary invasive measures may be reduced.Sequential Down syndrome screening: the importance of first and second trimester test correlations when calculating risk.Down syndrome screening can be particularly effective when both first and second trimester tests are performed. However, the counseling of women who have received sequential first and second trimester screening can be problematic. We evaluated an approximation where the post-test risk from the first trimester screening is used as the new a priori risk for the second trimester screening. The approximation disregards between-trimester test correlations. The Down syndrome detection rate based on the approximation (90.2%) would be close to that obtained when all correlations were considered (90.8%) but the false positive rate would be 26% higher (3.9% versus 3.1%, respectively). For any particular woman, the use of the approximation could result in highly inaccurate risks. We conclude that the correlations that exist between first and second trimester screening tests preclude the use of second trimester risks derived from the direct product of separate first and second trimester screening. Counseling issues in the delivery of sequential screening are discussed.Is there a nuchal translucency millimeter measurement above which there is no added benefit from first trimester serum screening?The purpose of this study was to evaluate whether there is a nuchal translucency (NT) measurement, independent of gestational age, above which immediate diagnostic testing should be offered without waiting for first trimester serum markers.Thirty-six thousand one hundred twenty patients had successful measurement of simple NT at 10 3/7 to 13 6/7 weeks and had first trimester serum screening. No risks were reported until second trimester serum screening was completed.Thirty-two patients (0.09%) had NT > or = 4.0 mm; the lowest combined first trimester trisomy 21 risk assessment in euploid cases was 1 in 8 and among aneuploidy cases was 7 in 8. One hundred twenty-eight patients (0.3%) had simple NT > or = 3.0 mm: the lowest combined first trimester trisomy 21 risk assessment of any patient in this group was 1 in 1479 and the lowest risk assessment among aneuploid cases was 1 in 2. Ten patients (8%) had first trimester trisomy 21 risk assessments lowered to less that 1:200 and none of these 10 cases had an abnormal outcome.During first trimester Down syndrome screening, whenever an NT measurement of 3.0 mm or greater is obtained there is minimal benefit in waiting for serum screening results, and no benefit for NT of 4.0 mm or greater. Differentiation between cystic hygroma and enlarged simple NT (> or = 3.0 mm) is now a moot point as both are sufficiently high risk situations to warrant immediate CVS.First-trimester screening for Down's syndrome in in vitro fertilization pregnancies.Triple-marker test as screening for Down syndrome: a meta-analysis.The effectiveness of triple-marker testing as screening for Down syndrome needs to be evaluated by means of formal meta-analytic techniques. We did a MEDLINE search to identify studies evaluating the detection of Down syndrome by use of the triple-marker test. Reference lists of articles were also checked. Papers published in either English, French, or German from 1966 to November 1996 were eligible for this review. Twenty cohort studies were identified. Results of sensitivities and false-positive rates from different subgroups of the study sample were compared by using summary receiver-operating characteristic curve analysis. Medians of sensitivities and false-positive rates were also estimated. A total of 194,326 patients were included. In women of all ages, the medians for sensitivities were 67, 71, and 73 percent when the cutoffs used were 1:190-200, 1:250-295, and 1:350-380, respectively. The median false-positive rates fluctuated between 4 and 8 percent. For women at or above 35 years old, the medians of sensitivity and false-positive rate were 89 and 25 percent, respectively, when the chosen cutoff was 1:190-200. In patients below 35 years old, the median sensitivity was 57 percent if the cutoff used was 1:250-295. Summary receiver-operating characteristic curves showed that 1:190 was the best cutoff for predicting Down syndrome. The triple-marker testing is an effective screening method of detecting Down syndrome pregnancies. It is less effective in younger than in older age groups and may be offered as an alternative to amniocentesis to pregnant women over 35.Maternal plasma levels of follistatin-related gene protein in the first trimester of pregnancies with Down syndrome.To determine maternal plasma levels of follistatin-related gene protein (FLRG) in the first trimester of pregnancy and assess its potential role as a marker for prenatal screening of Down syndrome.Maternal plasma levels of FLRG were determined in 100 pregnant women with normal fetuses in their first trimester of pregnancy (i.e. 11th to 15th weeks). These results were compared with 20 cases with Down syndrome fetuses, taking into consideration clinical and demographic variables, such as maternal age, maternal weight, gestational age, smoking status and ethnicity.Maternal plasma median of FLRG in the normal population was 1.41 ng/mL with 95% confidence interval (CI) of 1.37-1.70 and interquartile range (IQR) of 0.88, during the 11th to 15th weeks of pregnancy. Maternal age and weight were the only variables significantly related to FLRG levels (p = 0.030 and 0.020, respectively). Only maternal and gestational ages were related to Down syndrome (p = 0.039 and 0.006, respectively). Maternal plasma levels of FLRG were not significantly different in the presence of Down syndrome fetuses compared to normal population (p = 0.63).FLRG can be successfully detected in maternal plasma in the first trimester of pregnancy. However, its levels are not significantly altered in the presence of Down syndrome fetuses.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening of fetal trisomies.Thirty-two trisomy pregnancies were retrospectively studied in which the maternal serum level of alpha-fetoprotein was determined prior to amniocentesis. Median levels of alpha-fetoprotein in serum (0.83 multiples of the median) and in amniotic fluid (0.72 multiples of the median) were lowered, but this was statistically significant only in the case of amniotic fluid.Maternal serum s100b protein is ineffective for Down syndrome screening.Nuchal translucency thickness measurements for fetal aneuploidy screening: Log NT-MoM or Delta-NT, performer-specific medians and ultrasound training.To evaluate in fetal aneuploidy screening the desirability of using Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF) normal medians of nuchal translucency thickness (NT) measurements or performer-specific medians, and whether the NT measurements should be expressed as Delta-NT or Log NT-MoM values.First trimester-combined screening programme in a low risk population in Flanders, Belgium (Algemeen Medisch Laboratorium, Antwerp).Pregnancies unaffected by trisomy 21 (T21) were screened by FMF-trained or other ultrasonographers. Performer-specific NT medians were established for FMF-trained and other ultrasonographers. NCSS Statistical Software was used to establish probability plots for Log NT-MoM and Delta-NT values, relative to performer-specific references or to the FMF-reference.A total of 16,096 pregnancies were evaluated. Six FMF-trainees and five other ultrasonographers each performed between 83 and 658 NT measurements. For the FMF-trainees, FMF-specific NT-MoM medians were close to one at a crown-rump length (CRL) between 50 and 80 mm, whereas the population-specific NT-MoM medians of the other ultrasonographers were close to one at a CRL between 40 and 80 mm. Performer-specific Delta-NT values fitted a Gaussian distribution between the 5th and 90th percentiles, while for the Log NT-MoM values this was between the 10th and 95th percentiles.We conclude that (i) the use of screening would benefit from performer-specific NT-medians based on Log NT-MoM values; (ii) the use of Log NT-MoM values is marginally better than the use of delta-NT MoMs; and (iii) NT measurements are valid at about 10 weeks (crown-rump length 40-45 mm) as well as at 11-13 weeks.Analysis of triple test results in 27 cases of twin pregnancies.The study comprises 889 pregnant women between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation. The control group consisted of 862 pregnant women with unburdened obstetric anamnesis with an uneventful singleton pregnancy. The examined group consisted of 27 pregnant women with uncomplicated twin pregnancy. In the sera of pregnant women AFP (Microparticle Enzyme Immunoassay AxSYM Abbott), total beta-hCG (Microparticle Enzyme Immunoassay AxSYM Abbott) and unconjugated estriol (Radioimmunoassay Amerlex-M. 2T Johnson & Johnson Ortho Clinical Diagnostics Ltd.) were determined. The risk of fetal trisomy 21 was calculated with the use of PRISCA 3.0 software, which corrected the MoM values for twin pregnancy. Ulm Index was also calculated. In the majority of twin pregnancies increased concentrations of AFP, total beta-hCG and uE3 in the range over 1.0 MoM was noted. In the group of women below 35 years of age with singleton pregnancies using PRISCA 3.0 software it approximated to 95%. For women older than 35 optimum index for fetal trisomy 21 risk calculation was Ulm Index with the specificity 93.8%. The specificity of AFP determination in the detection of fetal open NTD in singleton pregnancy was 99%. In the group of women with twin pregnancy the obtained specificity of 77.8% for PRISCA 3.0 software is low, a more advantageous way to calculate the risk of fetal trisomy 21 is Ulm Index with the specificity of 85.2%. The specificity of AFP determination as a screening for fetal open NTD in twin pregnancy was 96.3%.[Evaluation of pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and free beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin (beta hCG) levels and sonographic assesement of fetal nuchal translucency (NT) in singleton pregnancies between 11 and 14 weeks of gestation--Polish multi-centre research].Evaluation of pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and free beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin (beta hCG) levels and sonographic assessment of fetal nuchal translucency (NT) in singleton pregnancies between 11 and 14 weeks of gestation--Poland's multi-centers research.Pregnancy-associated plasma protein A has been reported to be low in Down syndrome affected pregnancies during the first trimester of pregnancy. Enlarged nuchal translucency (NT) is observed in about 80% of fetuses affected with chromosomal abnormalities and congenital heart defects (CHD).The aim of this study were to determine value and the medians of free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and nuchal translucency thickness in the first trimester in a prospective study of a non-selected Polish population.All examinations have been performed according to the Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF) rules. We have included 800 women between 11 weeks 0 days and 13 weeks 6 days gestation into a biochemical examination. Women booked into the clinic were offered screening, using a combination of maternal serum free beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and fetal nuchal translucency thickness. The maternal serum were measured using the Kryptor analyzer (Brahms Diagnostica). All pregnant women have been divided into 2 groups younger than (first group) and older than (second group) 35 years of age.Nomogrames for free beta-hCG and PAPP-A levels in physiological pregnancy between 11(+0) and 13(6) weeks were determined in the examined population. A positive correlation between PAPP-A and CRL levels, as well as a weak negative correlation between free beta-hCG and CRL, were demonstrated.Second trimester levels of maternal serum total activin A and placental inhibin/activin alpha and betaA subunit messenger ribonucleic acids in Down syndrome pregnancy.Previous data have shown that inhibin A (alpha/betaA) is increased about twofold in maternal serum samples from Down syndrome pregnancy. Our objectives were to determine whether activin A (betaA/betaA) was similarly increased in maternal serum from pregnancies affected with fetal Down syndrome, and to investigate whether increased expression of each inhibin/activin subunit occurred in placental tissue from cases of fetal Down syndrome.Maternal serum total activin A levels were measured in 20 cases of fetal Down syndrome and 100 unaffected pregnancy samples. In addition, analysis of inhibin/activin alpha and betaA subunit mRNA levels was performed in placental tissue extracts from six cases of fetal Down syndrome and six tissues with a normal karyotype.The median total activin A level in the Down syndrome cases was 0.82 MoM (multiples of the median); values did not differ significantly (P = 0.36, Mann-Whitney U analysis) from those in unaffected pregnancies. The inhibin alpha subunit/GAPDH mRNA ratio, but not that of betaA subunit/GAPDH mRNA, was significantly greater (P < 0.01, ANOVA) in placental tissue from Down syndrome than in control placental tissue.Unlike inhibin A, activin A is not significantly increased in Down syndrome relative to unaffected pregnancy. Furthermore, increased amounts of maternal serum inhibin A in Down syndrome pregnancy probably result from increased placental expression of inhibin alpha, but not betaA, subunit.Maternal serum Schwangerschafts protein-1 (SP1) and fetal chromosomal abnormalities at 10-13 weeks' gestation.Maternal serum SP1 concentration was measured at 10-13 weeks' gestation in samples from 87 pregnancies with fetal chromosomal abnormalities (trisomy 21 n = 45; trisomy 18 n = 19; trisomy 13 n = 8; Turner syndrome n = 7; 47,XXX or 47,XXY n = 4; triploidy n = 4), and in samples from 348 matched controls. In the control group, SP1 increased significantly with fetal crown-rump length (r = 0.20, P < 0.0001) and there was no significant association with fetal nuchal translucency thickness (r = 0.03). Similarly, in the group with fetal chromosomal abnormalities, SP1 increased significantly with crown-rump length (r = 0.31, P < 0.01) and there was no significant association with nuchal translucency thickness (r = -0.08). In the groups with fetal trisomy 18 and trisomy 13, the median SP1 (0.76 MoM and 0.57 MoM, respectively) was significantly lower than in the controls (z = 2.64 and z = 3.27, respectively); in 21% and 25% of the cases, values were below the 5th centile. In the group with trisomy 21 and other chromosomal abnormalities the median SP1 (0.96 MoM and 0.93 MoM, respectively) was not significantly different from controls (z = 1.17 and z = 0.67, respectively). Measurement of SP1 concentration at 10-13 weeks' gestation is not likely to be useful in the prediction of fetal chromosomal abnormalities.Role of ultrasound evaluation of nuchal translucency in prenatal diagnosis.Nuchal translucency (NT) is the ultrasonographic pattern of the accumulation of subcutaneous fluid (> or = 3 mm) behind the fetal neck. The measurement of NT thickness by ultrasound examination at 11-14 weeks of gestation has been associated with maternal age and to be an effective screening tool for trisomy 21; with an invasive method rate of 5%, about 75% of trisomical pregnancies can be identified. With the association of some biochemical markers like maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) to ultrasonography at 11-14 weeks, it is possible to identify about 90% of chromosomal abnormalities. An increase of NT also allows us to identify most other chromosomal abnormalities, a large number of major cardiac defects, skeletal dysplasias, and genetic syndromes. In monochorial twins the discordance in the measurement of NT represents an early sign of twin-to-twin transfusion syndrome (TTTS).The objective of our study was to assess the detection of fetal structural defects with an ultrasound scan at 11-14 weeks of gestation. We submitted 3,157 pregnant women to a routine ultrasound examination at 11-14 weeks. The patients were then submitted to ultrasound scan in the second or third trimester of pregnancy. An isolated increased NT thickness was not considered an abnormality, but these patients, nonetheless, were submitted to an early echocardiographic evaluation. Fetal structural abnormalities were classified as major or minor and of early or late onset.A detection rate of 4.3% (135 cases) of abnormalities was found and 22.6% of these (30 cases) were diagnosed by ultrasound scan at 11-14 weeks, including seven cardiac defects associated with increased NT. The antenatal ultrasound detection rate was 73.5%, and 33.2% were diagnosed in the first trimester assessment. A rate of 76.8% of the major defects were diagnosed by the prenatal scan and 35.8% by the scan at 11-14 weeks. Fetal structural defects with the ultrasonography at 11-14 weeks were diagnosed in about 24.3% of the cases, therefore, a second trimester abnormality is important in routine antenatal care to increase the prenatal assessment of fetal anomalies.As for the introduction of every new technique in routine clinical practice, the operators who perform the ultrasound scan at 11-14 weeks should be submitted to adequate training and to strict quality control.[Prenatal screening for Down's syndrome by measuring the AFP concentration in the maternal serum].First trimester fetal nuchal translucency.This review examines the development of a new method of screening for Down's syndrome based on the combination of fetal nuchal translucency thickness, maternal age and maternal serum biochemistry at 10-14 weeks of gestation. This method can potentially identify more than 80% of affected fetuses for a false-positive rate of less than 5%.Second trimester trisomy 21 maternal serum marker screening. Results of a countrywide study of 854,902 patients.In France, maternal serum marker screening is governed by specific legislation. We conducted a study of the countrywide trisomy 21 screening based on second trimester maternal serum markers.We reviewed the medical records of 854,902 patients prospectively screened for second trimester maternal serum markers in the 60 authorized laboratories over the two-year period 1997-1998. All patients screened in France were included. The risk of trisomy 21 was calculated from the combination of maternal age and maternal serum markers. The same cut-off (1/250) was used in all laboratories.In 1998, 65% of pregnant women underwent maternal serum screening. In the 837,765 patients under 38 years of age who were screened, 54,321 (6.48%; 5% CI 6.42-6.53%) had a calculated risk >1/250. Of the 884 Down syndrome cases observed, 626 were detected by maternal serum markers (70.8%; 5% CI 67.8-73.8%). These good results can be explained by a strict quality control of all steps. For the 13,891 patients over 38 years of age, the Down syndrome detection rate was 98.9% for a 34% false-positive rate.Strict rules covering prenatal trisomy 21 screening are of benefit to patients, practitioners and laboratories alike, and ensure good quality control, a high trisomy 21 detection rate and a low amniocentesis rate.Influence of maternal smoking on the birth prevalence of Down syndrome and on second trimester screening performance.To determine the influence of maternal smoking on the birth prevalence of Down syndrome and on second trimester screening performance.First, a meta-analysis of cohort and case-control studies was performed to estimate the effect of maternal smoking on the live birth prevalence of Down syndrome. Then, data from 8779 women screened using the quadruple test (alphafetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated estriol (uE(3)), human chorionic gonadotrophin (free beta-hCG), and inhibin-A levels with maternal age) were used to determine the effect of smoking on the serum markers. A Monte Carlo simulation was used to assess the impact of adjusting for smoking status on screening performance.The relative risk of Down syndrome in smokers (versus non-smokers) was 0.95 (95% confidence interval (CI) 0.87 to 1.03). Serum marker levels were determined as multiples of the median for non-smokers of the same gestational age and adjusted for maternal weight (MoM). The MoM values for AFP were 5% higher (95% CI 2-7%), uE(3) 4% lower (95% CI 2-5%), free beta-hCG 20% lower (95% CI 17-23%) and inhibin-A 62% higher (95% CI 57-67%) in smokers compared with non-smokers. Adjusting marker levels for smoking resulted in less than a 1 percentage point increase in the detection rate for a 5% false positive rate with the double, triple or quadruple tests.There is no evidence of an association between the birth prevalence of Down syndrome and maternal smoking. The case for adjusting screening marker levels for smoking is not compelling. But if smoking data are collected routinely adjustment could be made and this would yield similar detection and false positive rates in smokers and non-smokers.Agreement between predicted risk and prevalence of Down syndrome in first trimester nuchal translucency screening.The agreement between predicted risks of Down syndrome and observed prevalence was investigated in a population of 11,847 singleton pregnancies screened by first trimester nuchal translucency at a single institution. Twenty-seven cases of Down syndrome were observed; 20 were detected prenatally by nuchal translucency and maternal age screening, three by other means and four postnatally. The screened women were grouped according to their predicted risk of having an affected pregnancy, and this was compared with the observed prevalence. A significant correlation between predicted and observed prevalences was noted, thus demonstrating that risk estimates for Down syndrome based on first trimester nuchal translucency screening are accurate.Screening for chromosomal anomalies in the first trimester: does repeat maternal serum screening improve detection rates?To assess the within person biological variability of first trimester maternal serum biochemical markers of trisomy 21 across the 10-14 week gestational period. To evaluate whether repeat sampling and testing of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A during this period would result in an improved detection rate.Women presenting at the first trimester OSCAR clinic have blood collected prior to ultrasound dating and nuchal translucency measurement. All samples are analysed for free beta-hCG and PAPP-A before an accurate estimate of gestation is available. In 10% of cases the gestation is prior to the minimum time for NT measurement (11 weeks) and these women are rebooked for a repeat visit to the clinic at the appropriate time. Our fetal database was interrogated to obtain cases in which two maternal blood samples had been collected and analysed in the 10-14 week period. Using data from the marker correlations and statistical modelling, the impact of repeat testing on detection rate for trisomy 21 at a fixed 5% false positive rate, was assessed.261 pairs of data were available for analysis collected over a 3 year period. The correlation between free beta-hCG in sample 1 and sample 2 was 0.890 and that for PAPP-A was 0.827. The average within person biological variation for free beta-hCG was 21% and 32% for PAPP-A. The increase in detection rate when using both sets of marker data was 3.5% when using serum biochemistry and maternal age, and 1.3% when using nuchal translucency, serum biochemistry and maternal age.Repeat sampling and testing of maternal serum biochemical markers is unlikely to substantially improve first trimester screening performance.An outcomes analysis of five prenatal screening strategies for trisomy 21 in women younger than 35 years.This study was undertaken to examine the cost-effectiveness and procedural-related losses associated with 5 prenatal screening strategies for fetal aneuploidy in women under 35 years old.Five prenatal screening strategies were compared in a decision analysis model: triple screen: maternal age and midtrimester serum alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol; quad screen: triple screen plus serum dimeric inhibin A; first-trimester screen: maternal age, serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A and free beta-hCG and fetal nuchal translucency at 10 to 14 weeks' gestation; integrated screen: first-trimester screen plus quad screen, but first-trimester results are withheld until the quad screen is completed when a composite result is provided; sequential screen: first-trimester screen plus quad screen, but the first-trimester screen results are provided immediately and prenatal diagnosis offered if positive; later prenatal diagnosis is available if the quad screen is positive. Model estimates were literature derived, and cost estimates also included local sources. The 5 strategies were compared for cost, the numbers of Down syndrome fetuses detected and live births averted, and the number of procedure-related euploid losses. Sensitivity analyses were performed for parameters with imprecise point estimates.In the baseline analysis, sequential screening was the least expensive strategy ($455 million). It detected the most Down syndrome fetuses (n=1213), averted the most Down syndrome live births (n=678), but led to the highest number of procedure-related euploid losses (n=859). The integrated screen had the fewest euploid losses (n=62) and averted the second most Down syndrome live births (n=520). If fewer than 70% of women diagnosed with fetal Down syndrome elect to abort, the quad screen became the least expensive strategy.Although sequential screening was the most cost-effective prenatal screening strategy for fetal trisomy 21, it had the highest procedure-related euploid loss rate. The patient's perspective on detection versus fetal safety may help define the optimal screening strategy.The influence of parity and gravidity on first trimester markers of chromosomal abnormality.We have studied changes in first trimester fetal nuchal translucency (NT) and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A with gravidity and parity in 3252 singleton pregnancies unaffected by chromosomal abnormality or major pregnancy complications. We have shown that gravidity and parity is associated with a small but progressive decrease in fetal NT and a small but progressive increase in free beta-hCG and PAPP-A. None of these small changes with increasing gravidity or parity are statistically significant and hence correction for these variables is not necessary when considering first trimester screening for chromosomal abnormalities.Combined first trimester nuchal translucency and second trimester biochemical screening tests among normal pregnancies.We prospectively examined whether first trimester nuchal translucency (NT) and second trimester triple test (TT) results are correlated, and determined overlapping and mutual screen-positive rates. Results of NT, TT, amniocentesis and pregnancy outcome were obtained in 508 normal pregnancies. Inter-test correlation was performed by comparing the likelihood ratios (LR). Overlapping of screen-positive cases, of NT and TT, was determined by comparing mutual risks for Down syndrome (DS) livebirth of > or = 1:380. Combined screen-positive rates were evaluated by using summation risk (NT and/or TT exhibiting a risk > or = 1:380) and calculated risk (new risk > or / =1:380, based on multiplication of LR(NT) and LR(TT)). Screen-positive rates between NT and TT differed significantly and when either test showed an increased risk for DS, the probability of the other to predict the same was negligible (p<0.001). Overall screen-positive rates, at a risk > or = 1:380, were 2% and 5.7% for NT and TT, respectively. Summation and calculated combining methods were associated with 7.5% and 2.0% screen-positive rates, respectively. Amniocentesis was performed on 20.7% of the cases, mostly screen-negative ones. Our results showed that, in normal pregnancies, NT and TT do not correlate and that their combined calculated risk in normal pregnancies is associated with a low screen-positive rate of 2.0%.QF-PCR as a stand-alone test for prenatal samples: the first 2 years' experience in the London region.To analyse the results of the first 2 years of a QF-PCR stand-alone testing strategy for the prenatal diagnosis of aneuploidy in the London region and to determine the advantages and disadvantages of this policy.A review of the results of 9737 prenatal samples received for exclusion of chromosome abnormalities. All samples were subjected to QF-PCR testing for common aneuploidies but only samples fulfilling specific criteria subsequently had a full karyotype analysis.Of the 9737 samples received, 10.3% had a chromosome abnormality detected by QF-PCR testing. Of the 7284 samples received with no indication for karyotype analysis, 25 (0.3%) received a normal QF-PCR result but subsequently had an abnormal karyotype detected either prenatally as a privately funded test or postnatally. Of these samples, without subsequent abnormal ultrasound findings, five had a chromosome abnormality associated with a poor prognosis, representing 0.069% of samples referred for Down syndrome testing.While back-up karyotyping is required for some samples, using QF-PCR as a stand-alone prenatal test for pregnancies without ultrasound abnormalities reduces costs, provides rapid delivery of results, and avoids ambiguous and uncertain karyotype results, reducing parental anxiety.Raised maternal serum placenta growth factor concentration during the second trimester is associated with Down syndrome.To compare early second-trimester maternal serum placenta growth factor concentrations in Down syndrome pregnancies and those in normal pregnancies.A case-control study was performed to evaluate the maternal serum placenta growth factor concentrations in 36 Down syndrome and 320 normal pregnancies with matched gestational age during the second trimester. For the detection of serum concentrations of placenta growth factor, a quantitative sandwich enzyme immunoassay technique (R & D Systems Inc., Minneapolis, Minnesota, USA) was performed.Using a multiple linear regression model, maternal serum placenta growth factor level was associated with gestational age (p<0.001) and the existence of Down syndrome pregnancy (p<0.001). After converting maternal serum placenta growth factor concentrations of each analyte to multiples of the appropriate gestational median (MoM), placenta growth factor MoM (p<0.001) was revealed to be an independent variable for Down syndrome pregnancies after adjusting for the effects of maternal age (p<0.001), free beta-hCG (p<0.001) and AFP (p=0.014) by multivariate logistic regression analysis.Maternal serum placenta growth factor concentration was elevated in Down syndrome pregnancies during the early second trimester. Placenta growth factor might be a novel marker for maternal serum Down syndrome screening.Prenatal screening using maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated estriol: two-year experience in a health maintenance organization.The objective of this study was to evaluate a 2-year experience in a health maintenance organization with mid-trimester maternal serum screening with alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (HCG), and unconjugated estriol (UE) as a screen for fetal Down's syndrome. Women at 15-20 weeks gestation were offered triple marker screening. A patient-specific second trimester risk of 1:295 for Down's syndrome was used as a threshold for referral. Women at risk for trisomy 18 were identified by a protocol with fixed low cutoffs. The AFP threshold for referral for neural tube defects (NTD) was 2.0 multiples of the median (MoM). Patients at risk were offered ultrasonography, genetic counseling, and prenatal diagnosis. A total of 6,474 samples were drawn. The initial screen positive rate for Down's syndrome was 7.1%. After ultrasound evaluation, 351 (5.7%) of the remaining 6,197 women were still at risk for Down's syndrome. After genetic counseling, 292 (4.7%) women underwent prenatal diagnosis. Overall, 12 of 16 (75%) cases of Down's syndrome were detected antenatally by triple marker screening. Using AFP alone, only 3 of 14 (21%) cases of Down's syndrome in women under 35 years would have been detected. We detected 1 abnormal karyotype (including one 45, X) for every 22 amniocenteses performed for abnormal Down's syndrome screening. For trisomy 18, 13 women (0.2%) were at risk and, of these, 3 cases were diagnosed. All 6 cases of NTD during the study period were detected by AFP after identifying 3.8% of women as at risk. In conclusion, in the setting of a health maintenance organization where abnormal screening tests were managed by a single referral center, triple marker screening was effective not only for screening for fetal Down's syndrome, but also for trisomy 18 and NTD.Maternal serum inhibin-A levels in twin pregnancies: implications for screening for Down's syndrome.A nested case-control study using stored serum samples collected as part of a prospective study of the outcome of pregnancy was performed to investigate concentrations of (dimeric) inhibin-A in maternal serum between 15 and 22 weeks of pregnancy in 200 twin pregnancies and 600 singleton control pregnancies. Each twin pregnancy was matched with three singleton pregnancies for gestational age (same completed week) and duration of sample storage (same calendar year), although for one twin there was insufficient serum. The median inhibin-A level in the twin pregnancies was 1.99 multiples of the median (MOM) for singleton pregnancies (P < 0.001) [95 per cent confidence interval (CI) 1.83-2.16]. These results enable inhibin-A values to be adjusted so that prenatal screening for Down's syndrome can be performed using this marker in twin pregnancies as well as in singleton pregnancies.Combining maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein measurements and age to screen for Down syndrome in pregnant women under age 35. New England Regional Genetics Group Prenatal Collaborative Study of Down Syndrome Screening.Eight prenatal diagnostic centers in New England enrolled 77,273 second-trimester pregnant women between January 1986 and March 1987 to study prospectively the sensitivity and detection efficiency of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein measurement as a screening test for Down syndrome. The study was limited to women under the age of 35 because it is accepted practice to offer amniocentesis to all women above that age. Based on risk estimates derived from a combination of maternal age and maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein measurement, 4.7% of the study population was initially classified as being at high risk for having a Down syndrome fetus (second-trimester odds for Down syndrome greater than or equal to 1:270). Forty percent of the high-risk population were subsequently placed in the low-risk category, usually because ultrasound findings corrected the gestational dates and caused the maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein interpretation to be changed. Seventy-six percent of the 2.7% of women remaining at high risk had amniocentesis; 18 fetuses with Down syndrome and 4 fetuses with trisomy 18 were identified in that group. Overall, one fetus with Down syndrome was detected per 89 amniocenteses, and an estimated 25% of all fetuses with Down syndrome were identified. These data establish the feasibility of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein measurements as a method to screen for Down syndrome and suggest the possibility that such screening might be applicable in women over age 35 as well.[Abnormal second trimester screening for fetal chromosomal abnormalities as a predictor of adverse pregnancy outcome].Second-trimester maternal serum markers (triple test) is common used to estimate of the fetal risk of genetic abnormalities and open neural tube defects. Positive results of the triple test concomitant with the normal fetus karyotype pattern can also predict the adverse pregnancy outcome. Many authors have been indicated such false positive results of the triple test in the cases of the uterine myomas, PIH, IUGR, and IUD.The purpose of this study was to determine the association between abnormal second trimester Down syndrome screening markers and adverse pregnancy outcome.A total of 775 pregnant women underwent maternal serum screening. Pregnancy complications were studied in the groups of pregnancies with structurally and chromosomally normal fetuses--with: elevated AFP > 1,89MoM, elevated beta-hCG > 1,69MoM or low beta-hCG < 0,48MoM.Increased maternal serum AFP > 1,89MoM were found to be significantly associated with IUGR, PIH and placental pathology. Increased beta-hCG > 1,69MoM were significantly associated with PIH and IUGR. Finally decreased beta-hCG < 0,48MoM were found to be significantly associated with IUGR, PIH and IUD.Triple test can be used not only for the detection of fetal chromosomal and NTD abnormalities but also for the detection of high-risk pregnancies.Maternal serum unconjugated oestriol and human chorionic gonadotrophin levels in twin pregnancies: implications for screening for Down's syndrome.To investigate maternal serum unconjugated oestriol (uE3) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) levels in twin pregnancies and to consider the implications of the results for antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.Measurement of maternal serum uE3 and hCG levels from 15-22 weeks of gestation in twin and singleton pregnancies. Previously available maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels were also presented.Stored serum samples collected from women receiving routine antenatal care in Oxford were used.200 women with a twin pregnancy and, for each, three singleton control pregnancies matched for gestational age (same completed week of pregnancy) and duration of storage of the serum sample (same calendar quarter).The median uE3, hCG and AFP levels in the twin pregnancies were respectively, 1.67 (95% CI 1.56-1.79), 1.84 (95% CI 1.64-2.07) and 2.13 (95% CI 1.97-2.31) multiples of the median (MoM) for singleton pregnancies at the same gestational age. The variance of values for the three serum markers (expressed in logarithms), and the correlation coefficients between any two, were similar in the twin and singleton pregnancies.In maternal serum screening programmes for Down's syndrome dividing uE3, hCG and AFP MoM values in twin pregnancies by the corresponding medians for twin pregnancies will, in expectation, yield a similar false-positive rate in twin pregnancies as in singleton pregnancies.Non-invasive prenatal assessment of trisomy 21 by multiplexed maternal plasma DNA sequencing: large scale validity study.To validate the clinical efficacy and practical feasibility of massively parallel maternal plasma DNA sequencing to screen for fetal trisomy 21 among high risk pregnancies clinically indicated for amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling.Diagnostic accuracy validated against full karyotyping, using prospectively collected or archived maternal plasma samples.Prenatal diagnostic units in Hong Kong, United Kingdom, and the Netherlands.753 pregnant women at high risk for fetal trisomy 21 who underwent definitive diagnosis by full karyotyping, of whom 86 had a fetus with trisomy 21. Intervention Multiplexed massively parallel sequencing of DNA molecules in maternal plasma according to two protocols with different levels of sample throughput: 2-plex and 8-plex sequencing.Proportion of DNA molecules that originated from chromosome 21. A trisomy 21 fetus was diagnosed when the z score for the proportion of chromosome 21 DNA molecules was >3. Diagnostic sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were calculated for trisomy 21 detection.Results were available from 753 pregnancies with the 8-plex sequencing protocol and from 314 pregnancies with the 2-plex protocol. The performance of the 2-plex protocol was superior to that of the 8-plex protocol. With the 2-plex protocol, trisomy 21 fetuses were detected at 100% sensitivity and 97.9% specificity, which resulted in a positive predictive value of 96.6% and negative predictive value of 100%. The 8-plex protocol detected 79.1% of the trisomy 21 fetuses and 98.9% specificity, giving a positive predictive value of 91.9% and negative predictive value of 96.9%.Multiplexed maternal plasma DNA sequencing analysis could be used to rule out fetal trisomy 21 among high risk pregnancies. If referrals for amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling were based on the sequencing test results, about 98% of the invasive diagnostic procedures could be avoided.Maternal serum free beta-hCG at 10 to 14 weeks of gestation in trisomic twin pregnancies.Maternal serum free beta-hCG was measured at 10 to 14 weeks of gestation in 136 normal twin pregnancies and in 12 twin pregnancies where one or both fetuses had trisomy 21. The values were compared with a normal range from 4181 singleton pregnancies. In the normal twins the median free beta-hCG (65 ng/mL) was about twice as high as in singletons (34 ng/mL z = -12.1, P < 0.0001). In the trisomy 21 group the median free beta-hCG (95 ng/mL) was significantly higher than in normal twins (z = 2.1, P < 0.05). However, only one of the trisomic pregnancies had a level above the 95th centile. In twin pregnancies maternal serum free beta-hCG at 10 to 14 weeks of gestation is unlikely to be useful in the prediction of fetal trisomy 21.Stepwise sequential screening for fetal aneuploidy.The purpose of this study was to evaluate stepwise sequential screening for fetal aneuploidy.Women who received first-trimester screening were also offered second-trimester tests with second-trimester risks that were based on both sets of markers. Screen-positive rates, use of second-trimester testing and invasive testing, sensitivity, and changes in risks were evaluated.Of 1528 women who received first-trimester screening, 133 women (8.7%) had an indication for invasive testing that was based on first-trimester results alone; 1173 women (76.8%) received second-trimester tests, which reduced the net number of women with an indication for invasive testing to 105 (6.9%). In unaffected pregnancies, the addition of the second-trimester testing reduced the median Down syndrome risk from 1:2368 to 1:10,301. Six of 10 chromosome abnormalities (60%) were identified by first-trimester screening, and 9 of 10 chromosome abnormalities (90%) were identified by sequential screening.Sequential screening can be introduced successfully into clinical practice, is effective, and can reduce the number of invasive tests that are performed.[Prenatal diagnosis of chromosome aberrations after implementation of screening for Down's syndrome].First trimester screening for Down's syndrome was evaluated by the National Board of Health in 2004, and recommended to all pregnant women in the form of an informed choice. We have reviewed prenatal and postnatal chromosome aberrations in 3 counties in Denmark during the years of implementation in 2004, 2005 and 2006.Risk evaluation based on combined screening (fetal nuchal translucency measurement and serum screening of the pregnant woman) was introduced in the counties of Copenhagen, Roskilde and Storstrom, covering approximately 1.1 million inhabitants. We registered the number of chorionic villus biopsies (CVS) and amniocenteses (AC), as well as the number of cases with trisomy, triploidy and sex chromosome aberrations found prenatally. We also registered the number of children born with Down's syndrome during the period.The number of CVS/AC decreased from 1382 to 790, or 40%. There was an increase in the number of foetuses diagnosed with trisomy 21: in 2004 trisomy 21 was diagnosed in 12 foetuses, in 2006 the number was 30. The number of children born with Down's syndrome was 10 and 5 in 2004 and 2006, respectively. National figures from the Danish central cytogenetic registry confirm a decrease in children born with Down's syndrome.The implementation of combined screening in 3 counties resulted in a reduction in invasive procedures (chorionic villus samples and amniocenteses) by 40%, which is in accordance with the aims of the National Board of Health. As expected, a significant increase in the number of prenatally diagnosed foetuses with trisomy 21 was observed. The number of children born with Down's syndrome decreased, but the numbers are small. The investigation does not review aspects of organisation or counselling and psychosocial issues.[Quality control of prenatal screening].In 2004 the Danish National Board of Health (DNBH) published new guidelines for the prenatal risk assessment and diagnostic service. The new guidelines are nationally implemented. DNBH has pointed out the importance of quality control, but has not given any specific guidelines concerning this. We demonstrate the feasibility of a quality assessment of a considerable part of the screening programme.The quality assessment is conducted on a cohort from Holbaek Hospital during 12 months by merging data from one local hospital database to data from the Danish Cytogenetic Centralregistry and the Danish National Newborn Screening Registry.The study included 1796 singleton pregnancies and 47 twin pregnancies. 46 invasive procedures were carried out among the singleton pregnancies, which corresponds to an invasive rate of 2.6%. Two fetuses with Down's syndrome (DS) and one with trisomy 18 were found and the pregnancies were terminated. One fetus with Turners syndrome was diagnosed prenatally, but ended as a missed abortion. One child with DS was not diagnosed prenatally. The detection rate for DS was 2/3 (67%).We suggest that the outlined quality program is implemented as a national programme.The association between fetal nasal bone hypoplasia and aneuploidy.To determine the association between fetal nasal bone hypoplasia and aneuploidy in women undergoing prenatal diagnosis.A prospective cohort study involving women undergoing chorionic villus sampling and amniocentesis for an increased risk of aneuploidy. Fetal biometric and nasal bone measurements were obtained at the time of prenatal diagnosis and compared with karyotypes. Nasal bone hypoplasia was defined as nasal bone less than 2.5th percentile for the gestational age.A total of 632 fetuses were evaluated. Twenty-nine (4.6%) had an aneuploidy (18 trisomy 21, 5 trisomy 18, 1 Turner's syndrome, one Marker chromosome 1, 2 sex chromosome anomalies, and 2 triploidy). Nasal bone measurements were documented in 29 aneuploid fetuses. The nasal bone was either absent or hypoplastic in 12 of 29 (41%) fetuses with aneuploidy and in 8 of 18 (44%) with trisomy 21. By using receiver operating characteristics curves, the optimal threshold of nasal bone hypoplasia associated with fetal aneuploidy was a biparietal diameter/nasal bone ratio of 11 or greater. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for the detection of fetal aneuploidy were 50%, 93%, 24%, and 98%, respectively.Absent or hypoplastic nasal bone is a marker for fetal aneuploidy in a high-risk population. However, this marker needs to be evaluated by larger prospective studies in low-risk populations before adoption for clinical use.Evaluation of multiple-marker screening for Down syndrome in a statewide population.Our purpose was to evaluate our experience with a statewide, multiple-marker Down syndrome screening program.The results of 18,712 screening tests performed from July 1, 1991, to Oct. 31, 1992, were reviewed. Amniocentesis and aneuploidy detection rates were compared with the experience of a previous year (1989-1990) in which material serum alpha-fetoprotein was used for detection of Down syndrome.Positive screening tests (Down syndrome risk > or = 1/190) occurred in 665 of 18,712 (3.5%) patients; 516 of 665 (78%) patients accepted amniocentesis. Fifteen aneuploidies were identified: 12 trisomy 21, one trisomy 18, one trisomy 13, and one 48,XXXY. The overall detection rate was one in 34 amniocenteses performed; for trisomy 21 it was one in 43. In a previous year in which maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein alone was used, 3.6% had positive screening tests (Down syndrome risk > or = 270); the detection rate for all aneuploidies was one in 57 amniocenteses, and for trisomy 21 it was one in 114. The expanded maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein test was well accepted by clinicians, with 36% of gravid state residents undergoing screening.The multiple marker test is a good screening tool and is superior to material serum alpha-fetoprotein alone.Antenatal screening for Down's syndrome with the quadruple test.Second trimester screening for Down's syndrome is widely practised throughout the world. We assessed the performance of antenatal serum screening for Down's syndrome with the quadruple test in 46193 pregnancies from 14 hospitals over 5 years. Women who screened positive (risk > or =1 in 300) were offered diagnostic amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling. Of 88 observed Down's syndrome pregnancies, 71 (81%) had a positive screening result (81% detection rate, 95% CI 72-89), and of 46105 unaffected pregnancies, 3200 tested positive (7% false-positive rate). These results show that the quadruple test is a better method of screening for Down's syndrome than use of maternal age alone (51% detection rate, 14% false-positive rate) and is more effective than other second trimester screening tests. Therefore, we conclude that the quadruple test should be the test of choice in second trimester screening for Down's syndrome.Maternal serum urea resistant alkaline phosphatase in Down syndrome pregnancy.The normal levels of alkaline phosphatase (AP) activity in maternal serum are virtually the same as those observed in Down syndrome (DS) pregnancies at 14-20 weeks' gestation. Using urea inhibition of AP, we observed an atypical AP isoenzyme in the neutrophils of mothers with trisomy 21 fetuses.To assess the use of urea as a selective inhibitor of serum AP in order to seek a possible diagnostic difference between normal and DS pregnancies.Serum AP samples from 24 DS pregnancies and 204 control cases were examined at 12-22 weeks' gestation with and without 2.5 M urea AP inhibition at 18 degrees C for 2 h. The levels of AP activity obtained without urea and the percentage urea AP inhibition were analyzed in the two groups.Without urea treatment, no significant difference of total alkaline phosphatase activity levels was detected between the 204 normal controls and the 24 DS samples. Using 2.5 M urea AP inhibition, after 120 min of exposure at 18 degrees C, the residual activity, as a percentage of initial values of AP, showed significantly higher resistance in the DS samples (> or = 50 IU/l of total AP activity) at 15-22 weeks' gestation. However, at 12-14 weeks (< or = 45 IU/l of total AP activity), no significant difference was found between the DS and control cases.Serum urea resistant alkaline phosphatase in DS pregnancies showed a significant difference only at 15-22 weeks' gestation, compared with normal controls.Total alpha-fetoprotein and Lens culinaris agglutinin-reactive alpha-fetoprotein in fetal chromosomal abnormalities.To examine the differences in multiples of the median (MoM) of total alpha-fetoprotein, and the proportion of Lens culinaris agglutinin reactive alpha-fetoprotein (% alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3) in the maternal serum and amniotic fluid of pregnant women whose fetuses were diagnosed with autosomal or sex chromosomal abnormalities.Prospective consecutive series.University hospital.Maternal sera and amniotic fluids from 46 pregnant women with trisomy 21 fetuses, 10 pregnant women with trisomy 18 fetuses, one pregnant woman with a trisomy 13 fetus, six pregnant women with fetal sex chromosomal abnormalities, and 100 pregnant women for whom the fetal karyotype was diagnosed as normal following a genetic amniocentesis.The proportion of alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3 in maternal serum for trisomy 21 (40.3%. P < 0.0001) and trisomy 18 (39.8%, P < 0.05) showed a significantly higher value compared with normal (32.6%). The proportion of alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3 in amniotic fluid was significantly higher (P < 0.0001) for trisomy 21 (46.6%) than for a normal karyotype (41.5%). Only for the trisomy 21 group was there a strong correlation in the % alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3 between maternal serum and amniotic fluid (r = 0.840, P < 0.0001). For all groups, there was no correlation between alpha-fetoprotein MoM and % alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3 in maternal serum and amniotic fluid.The proportion of alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3 in maternal serum is an appropriate choice for a trisomy 21 biochemical marker, and it is possible that combining alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3 analysis with assays of alpha-fetoprotein in maternal serum could further improve the sensitivity and specificity of multiple marker screening.Nuchal translucency in multiple pregnancies.To evaluate the prevalence of increased nuchal translucency (NT) in multiple pregnancies and its relation to fetal karyotype and pregnancy outcome.We measured fetal nuchal translucency (NT) in 6,338 women pregnant from 10+3 to 13+6 weeks by ultrasound and evaluated the prevalence of NT=95th centile in 115 multiple pregnancies, including 100 pairs of twins (70 dichorionic and 30 monochorionic placentas), 9 triplets, 5 quadruplets, and one quintuplet. Chorionicity, fetal karyotype, and pregnancy outcome were also evaluated in 400 singleton pregnancies.NT=95th centile in a single fetus was found in 10/70 cases of dichorionic twin pregnancies (14%), in two quadruplets, in 7/30 monochorionic twin pregnancies (23.3%), and in both fetuses in one dichorionic twin pregnancy. In the control group, NT=95th centile was found in 17/400 (4.2%) cases. In multiple pregnancies, two cases of trisomy 21 and one of 47, XXY were found. NT=95th centile was found in 2/2 fetuses with trisomy 21 (one dichorionic twin pregnancy and one tetrachorionic pregnancy), but not in the 47, XXY trisomy (trichorionic triplet pregnancy). A skeletal dysplasia and a Goldenhar syndrome were found among the 10 dichorionic pregnancies with increased NT. Three intrauterine deaths of both fetuses, one congenital heart disease, and a case of twin-to-twin transfusion occurred in 7 monochorionic pregnancies with increased NT.Increased NT in multiple pregnancies indicates fetuses at risk of chromosomal abnormalities and fetal malformation, and monochorionic twin pregnancies at higher risk of adverse outcome.Low second trimester maternal serum unconjugated oestriol in pregnancies with Down's syndrome.Second trimester maternal serum unconjugated oestriol levels were measured in the stored serum samples from 22 pregnancies associated with Down's syndrome and 110 unaffected control pregnancies, matched for maternal age, gestational age, duration of storage of the serum sample, smoking habits and maternal weight. The serum unconjugated oestriol level of each affected pregnancy was expressed as a multiple of the median (MoM) of its five matched controls. The unconjugated oestriol levels were significantly lower in the affected pregnancies than in the unaffected pregnancies; the median MoM was 0.79 (P less than 0.05). This association between low serum unconjugated oestriol and fetal Down's syndrome early in pregnancy raises the possibility that serum unconjugated oestriol measurement may be added to maternal age and alpha-fetoprotein measurement in the antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.Fetal head-to-trunk volume ratio in chromosomally abnormal fetuses at 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks of gestation.To determine the pattern of early growth disturbance in chromosomally abnormal fetuses by comparing the volume of the fetal head to that of the trunk.The fetal trunk and head volume was measured using three-dimensional (3D) ultrasound in 145 chromosomally abnormal fetuses at a median gestational age of 12 (range, 11 + 0 to 13 + 6) weeks. The head volume was measured separately and then subtracted from the total head and trunk volume to obtain the volume of the fetal trunk. The head-to-trunk ratios were then calculated and the Mann-Whitney U-test was used to determine the significance of differences from 500 chromosomally normal fetuses.The fetal head volume for crown-rump length (CRL) was significantly smaller than normal in trisomy 21, trisomy 13 and Turner syndrome (P < 0.001, P < 0.001 and P = 0.001, respectively), whereas no significant differences were found in trisomy 18 and triploidy (P = 0.139 and P = 0.070, respectively). The fetal trunk volume for CRL was significantly smaller in all chromosomal abnormalities (P < 0.001) except Turner syndrome (P = 0.134). The head-to-trunk ratio for CRL was significantly larger in trisomy 18, trisomy 13 and triploidy (P < 0.001), but normal in trisomy 21 (P = 0.221) and Turner syndrome (P = 0.768).In trisomy 21 and Turner syndrome, the growth deficit was symmetrical with the head and trunk being equally affected, whereas in triploidy and trisomies 18 and 13 there was asymmetrical growth restriction with the trunk being more severely compromised than the head.Down syndrome screening: determining the cutoff level of risk for invasive testing.Maternal age- and gestation-specific risk for trisomy 21.To provide estimates of maternal age- and gestational age-related risks for trisomy 21.The prevalence of trisomy 21 was examined in 57,614 women who had fetal karyotyping at 9-16 weeks of gestation for the sole indication of maternal age of 35 years or more. On the basis of the maternal age distribution and the reported maternal age-related risk for trisomy 21 at birth, the expected number of trisomy 21 cases was calculated for each gestational age subgroup (9-10 weeks, 11-14 weeks and 15-16 weeks). The ratio of the observed to expected number of cases of trisomy 21 was then calculated and regression analysis was applied to derive a smoothened curve. The formula for maternal age- and gestational age-related risk was then applied to a population of 96,127 pregnancies that were examined at 10-14 weeks to calculate the expected number of trisomy 21 pregnancies, and this number was compared to the observed number of 326.In the 57,614 pregnancies there were 538 cases of trisomy 21. The relative prevalences of trisomy 21, compared to a prevalence of 1.0 at 40 weeks, was 10 exp(0.2718 x log(10)(gestation)2 - 1.023 x log10(gestation) + 0.9425). On the basis of the estimated maternal age- and gestational age-related risks, the expected number of trisomy 21 cases at 10-14 weeks of gestation in the 96,127 pregnancies was 329 (95% confidence interval 291-361), which was not significantly different from the observed number of 326 cases (chi2 = 0.02).The risk for trisomy 21 increases with maternal age and decreases with gestation. The prevalence of trisomy 21 at 12 and 16 weeks of gestation is higher than the prevalence at 40 weeks by 30% and 21%, respectively.Can reliable Down's syndrome detection rates be determined from prenatal screening intervention trials?OBJECTIVES - To develop a standardised approach for analysing Down's syndrome screening performance in clinical practice and to apply it to published intervention trials in order to estimate detection and false positive rates more accurately. METHODS - Peer reviewed intervention trials, grouped by specific combination of analytes, were reanalysed. Revised detection rates were calculated for each study, taking into account both the high spontaneous loss during the last half of pregnancy and the possible under ascertainment of Down's syndrome live births not detected by screening. Collective screening performance was estimated, when possible, using a published methodology based on fitting receiver-operator characteristic curves. RESULTS - Sixteen trials were analysed; 11 using three, and five using two, analytes. Collective screening performance for the triple analyte trials was Down's syndrome detection rates of 57, 64, and 69% at amniocentesis referral rates of 3, 5, and 7% respectively. Four of the five studies involving two analytes performed less well, individually, when compared with the overall performance of the three analyte studies. It was not possible to estimate collective performance for the two analyte studies because there were too few. CONCLUSIONS - Accurate Down's syndrome detection rates are difficult to obtain in intervention trials owing to two potential biases, both of which tend to produce overestimates of the true rates. These sources of bias need to be taken into account when analysing and reporting Down's syndrome intervention trials. The methodology presented here offers the opportunity to achieve a more reliable, standardised estimate of both individual and collective intervention trial screening performance.Integrated screening for Down's syndrome based on tests performed during the first and second trimesters.Both first-trimester screening and second-trimester screening for Down's syndrome are effective means of selecting women for chorionic-villus sampling or amniocentesis, but there is uncertainty about which screening method should be used in practice. We propose a new screening method in which measurements obtained during both trimesters are integrated to provide a single estimate of a woman's risk of having a pregnancy affected by Down's syndrome.We used data from published studies of various screening methods employed during the first and second trimesters. The first-trimester screening consisted of measurement of serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A in 77 pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome and 383 unaffected pregnancies and measurements of nuchal translucency obtained by ultrasonography in 326 affected and 95,476 unaffected pregnancies. The second-trimester tests were various combinations of measurements of serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, human chorionic gonadotropin, and inhibin A in 77 affected and 385 unaffected pregnancies.When we used a risk of 1 in 120 or greater as the cutoff to define a positive result on the integrated screening test, the rate of detection of Down's syndrome was 85 percent, with a false positive rate of 0.9 percent. To achieve the same rate of detection, current screening tests would have higher false positive rates (5 to 22 percent). If the integrated test were to replace the triple test (measurements of serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, and human chorionic gonadotropin), currently used with a 5 percent false positive rate, for screening during the second trimester, the detection rate would be higher 85 percent vs. 69 percent), with a reduction of four fifths in the number of invasive diagnostic procedures and consequent losses of normal fetuses.The integrated test detects more cases of Down's syndrome with a much lower false positive rate than the best currently available test.Ethnicity and the need for correction of biochemical and ultrasound markers of chromosomal anomalies in the first trimester: a study of Oriental, Asian and Afro-Caribbean populations.To assess whether there is a need to correct first-trimester biochemical markers (free beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A)) or first-trimester fetal nuchal translucency thickness (NT) in different ethnic groups, when screening for Downs syndrome at 11-14 weeks of gestation.Free beta-hCG, PAPP-A and fetal NT were measured at 11-14 weeks of gestation in a group of women presenting for first-trimester screening in two OSCAR centres. The group comprised 61 219 sets of data from Caucasian women (the reference group); 4835 sets of data from South Asian women; 3450 sets of data from Oriental women and 2727 sets of data from Afro-Caribbean women. The Oriental data set was supplemented with a further 480 cases collected in Hong Kong and the Afro-Caribbean data set was supplemented with 216 cases collected from Kings College. The difference in marker values between the reference group and the other ethnic groups was compared before and after weight correction for the biochemical markers using standard statistical techniques. A correction factor for ethnic origin was applied for all three markers and the screen-positive rate before and after correction was assessed for the various groups.After maternal weight correction, in Afro-Caribbean women, the median PAPP-A was increased by 55% and the free beta-hCG increased by 11%. In south Asian women, the PAPP-A was increased by 8% and the free beta-hCG decreased by 7.5%. In Oriental women, the PAPP-A was increased by 9% and the free beta-hCG by 6%. For delta NT in Afro-Caribbean women, the values were 0.064 mm lower on average than in Caucasian women and for south Asian women 0.045 mm lower. The difference of -0.012 for Oriental women was not significant. Before correcting for ethnic origin, these changes resulted in the screen-positive rates being lower in the Afro-Caribbean group (3.7% vs 5.6%), the south Asian group (4.3% vs 5.6%) and Oriental group (4.9% vs 5.6%). After correction, the screen-positive rates were largely similar in the four groups.Differences in median PAPP-A, free beta-hCG and, to a lesser extent, in NT exist in Afro-Caribbean, South Asian and Oriental women. In populations where the medians and delta NT reference ranges are established in predominantly Caucasian populations, some correction for ethnicity is appropriate and can redress differences in screen-positive rates between these different groups.Maternal serum levels of dimeric inhibin A in pregnancies affected by trisomy 21 in the first trimester.Dimeric inhibin A was measured in maternal serum samples from 45 pregnancies affected by trisomy 21 and 493 samples from unaffected pregnancies at 10-14 weeks of gestation. Inhibin A levels in affected pregnancies were compared with levels of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in the same series. In the trisomy 21 group, the median multiple of the median (MoM) inhibin A was not significantly elevated (1.28 vs 1.00) with only 15.5% being above the 95th centile. In contrast, the median MoM free beta-hCG was significantly increased (2.05 vs 1.00) with 36% above the 95th centile and PAPP-A was significantly reduced (0.49 vs 1.00) with 42% below the 5th centile. Inhibin A levels in the trisomy 21 group were significantly correlated with gestational age such that median levels rose from 1.04 at 11 weeks to 1.30 at 12 weeks and 1.67 at 13 weeks. These findings suggest that first trimester biochemical screening for trisomy 21, which is currently optimised using maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A and fetal nuchal translucency, will not benefit from the inclusion of inhibin A.Sialic acid-deficient invasive trophoblast antigen (sd-ITA): a new urinary variant for gestational Down syndrome screening.Invasive trophoblast antigen (ITA), also known as hyperglycosylated hCG, is a glycosylation variant of hCG produced by invasive cytotrophoblast cells. Publications show that ITA is potentially a sensitive test for Down syndrome screening, reportedly detecting 38 and 80% of cases at a 5% false-positive rate in the first and second trimesters of pregnancy respectively. ITA has six oligosaccharides varying greatly in terminal sialic acid content (0-19 residues), leading to wide-charge heterogeneity. With the objective of developing an improved Down syndrome screening test, we examined the charge, or sialic acid variants, of ITA.Twenty urine samples were collected from the 16th to 18th week of gestation from 10 patients with trisomy 21 fetuses, demonstrated by karyotype analysis, and from 10 patients with normal karyotype pregnancies. Proteins in each sample were separated by preparative isoelectric focusing. Fractions were collected, pooled into the pl ranges of 3.0 to 4.0, 4.1 to 5.0, 5.1 to 6.0 and 6.1 to 7.0 and assayed for ITA.A difference in the distribution of ITA charge variants was demonstrated between cases and controls, most apparent in the less acidic (pl 5.1-7.0) range. The controls and Down syndrome samples contained 26.7 +/- 14% versus 45.6 +/- 20%, respectively, of the less acidic form of ITA (P = 0.02).The ITA in Down syndrome cases is composed of a much higher proportion of less acidic ITA. This could be the major source of elevated levels of ITA in Down syndrome pregnancies. It is postulated that the development of a new assay specifically measuring ITA that is deficient in sialic acid might enhance the utility of the already highly sensitive screening tests for Down syndrome.Maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome in early pregnancy.The possibility of improving the effectiveness of antenatal screening for Down's syndrome by measuring human chorionic gonadotrophin concentrations in maternal serum during the second trimester to select women for diagnostic amniocentesis was examined. The median maternal serum human chorionic gonadotrophin concentration in 77 pregnancies associated with Down's syndrome was twice the median concentration in 385 unaffected pregnancies matched for maternal age, gestational age, and duration of storage of the serum sample. Measuring human chorionic gonadotrophin in maternal serum was an effective screening test, giving a lower false positive rate (3%) at a 30% detection rate than that for maternal age (5%) and the two existing serum screening tests, unconjugated oestriol (7%) and alpha fetoprotein (11%). The most effective screening results were obtained with all four variables combined; at the same 30% detection rate the false positive rate declined to 0.5%. The new screening method would detect over 60% of affected pregnancies, more than double that achievable with the same amniocentesis rate in existing programmes (5%), and could reduce the number of children born with Down's syndrome in the United Kingdom from about 900 a year to about 350 a year.Triple marker (alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, human chorionic gonadotropin) versus alpha-fetoprotein plus free-beta subunit in second-trimester maternal serum screening for fetal Down syndrome: a prospective comparison study.Our purpose was to compare the efficacy of triple-marker screening (alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, human chorionic gonadotropin) with alpha-fetoprotein plus free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin.Free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin was concurrently assayed in 2349 maternal serum samples. Trivariate and bivariate algorithms were used to calculate the risk for fetal Down syndrome by the two protocols. Free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin from 12 cases of fetal Down syndrome previously screened with the triple marker was retrospectively assayed.Mean maternal age of our study was 29.8 years (range 14 to 51 years). The initial screen-positive rate with the triple marker was 8.0% compared with 12.8% for alpha-fetoprotein plus free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin. All three cases of fetal Down syndrome ascertained in our prospective study were detected by the triple marker; in contrast, one of three was detected by alpha-fetoprotein plus free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin. By adding 12 additional cases of fetal Down syndrome, 12 of 15 (80%) were screen positive with triple marker and nine of 15 (60%) were screen positive with alpha-fetoprotein plus free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin.The detection rate of fetal Down syndrome was greater by use of a triple marker screen than when using alpha-fetoprotein plus free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin. Our data do not support the claims of other studies that suggest that alpha-fetoprotein plus free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin is superior to triple markers.Elevated maternal midtrimester serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin levels in vegetarian pregnancies that cause increased false-positive Down syndrome screening results.The aim of this study was to examine whether midtrimester maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and alpha-fetoprotein levels for Down syndrome screening differed in vegetarian pregnancies and omnivore pregnancies and to evaluate whether maternal serum vitamin B(12) concentration affected these maker levels.Ninety-eight vegetarian and 122 omnivore singleton pregnancies were studied. Reference levels of free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and alpha-fetoprotein were based on a population of 6312 singleton euploid pregnancies that had been surveyed previously. Serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and alpha-fetoprotein levels were measured by enzyme immunoassay or radioimmunoassay. Multiples of the median values were calculated to determine whether different diet habits affected serum biomarker levels. Maternal serum vitamin B(12) levels were determined with radioimmunoassay.The free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin multiples of the median values were elevated significantly in the vegetarian pregnancies group (1.28 multiples of the median) compared with that of the reference population (1.00 multiples of the median) (P<.001). A negative association between the serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin multiples of the median values and the concentration of maternal serum vitamin B(12) was observed in the vegetarian pregnancies. No correlation was found between the alpha-fetoprotein multiples of the median values and the maternal serum vitamin B(12) concentration.The current data showed that the midtrimester maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin levels increased in vegetarian pregnancies and led to an elevated false-positive rate in screening for Down syndrome compared with pregnant women with regular diet and resulted in unnecessary invasive procedures. It is necessary to establish vegetarian pregnancy alpha-fetoprotein and beta-human chorionic gonadotropin reference levels to correct increased false-positive screening results.Does a 'notched' nuchal translucency indicate Down syndrome fetuses or other adverse pregnancy outcome?The aim of the present study was to assess the sonographic contour of the increased nuchal translucency (NT) and to correlate this with pregnancy outcome. Fifty sonographic images of fetuses with increased NT [> 95th centile thickness of the normal range for crown-rump length (CRL) between 38 and 84 mm] were retrospectively assessed. In all the cases a complete pregnancy and even infancy follow-up (< 36 months) was available. The NT appearances were subdivided into two forms: a 'notched' or 'uniform' appearance. The images were correlated with karyotype results [trisomy 21 (DS) vs euploid cases] and pregnancy outcome. Complicated outcomes were classified as being either DS fetuses, miscarriage or termination of pregnancy because of structural anomaly. Thus 30/35 (86%) of the euploid fetuses had a 'uniformly' increased NT, whereas 8/13 DS cases (62%) had a 'notched' appearance (Fisher's exact test, p = 0.004). Additionally, 27/29 fetuses (93%) which had an uneventful pregnancy outcome had a 'uniform' increased NT, whereas 12/26 (57%) of the fetuses which had adverse pregnancy outcome had a 'notched' appearance of their NT (Fisher's exact test, p < 0.001). Although it was not possible to correlate the sonographic data with post-evacuation microdissection findings, it is possible that a uniformly shaped, increased NT may be more representative of a developmental delay in a normal fetus. Conversely, a 'notched' nuchal surface may represent abnormal lymphatic or cardiovascular development more commonly seen in DS fetuses.Maternal serum markers in screening for Down syndrome.The addition of two new markers in maternal serum, estriol and HCG, to those already known, namely the level of maternal serum alfa-fetoprotein and maternal age, considerably improves the expected results of a screening strategy for Down syndrome. The detection rate is slightly increased from 53.0% to 57.6%, but, more importantly, the false-positive rate decreases from 9.4% to 7.3%. It is our belief that, at least in women aged less than 35 years, a screening strategy based on a combination of maternal age and biochemical markers should be incorporated into antenatal care. For older women, the results of such a maternal serum test may refine counseling for genetic amniocentesis, as a much more explicit risk calculation can be performed than that based on age alone.Nuchal translucency thresholds in prenatal screening for Down syndrome and trisomy 18.To determine if nuchal translucency (NT) can be used as a first trimester triage marker in prenatal screening for Down syndrome and trisomy 18.Data from first trimester prenatal screening in 77 443 women were stratified by maternal and gestational ages. They were then analyzed to identify NT thresholds above or below which only positive (high-risk) or negative (low-risk) results were reported by a first trimester prenatal screening test combining PAPP-A, free beta-hCG and NT.Combined prenatal screening was always positive for Down syndrome when NT thickness exceeded 4.0 mm. As women aged, this upper NT threshold value changed according to gestational age. In women aged 35 to 37 years, combined prenatal screening was always positive when NT exceeded 2.8 mm, 3.0 mm, and 3.4 mm at 11, 12, and 13 weeks of gestation, respectively. In women over 42 years of age, the upper threshold value for NT was 1.8 mm, 2.4 mm, and 2.7 mm at 11, 12, and 13 weeks of gestation, respectively. In women less than 35 years of age, we identified lower threshold values below which combined prenatal screening for Down syndrome was always negative.In prenatal screening for Down syndrome and trisomy 18, it is possible to identify NT threshold values above which biochemical screening provides no additional benefit. In pregnancies in which NT is above the established upper cut-offs, invasive prenatal screening can be offered without delay.Combined sonographic and biochemical markers for Down syndrome screening.To evaluate the efficacy of fetal nuchal fold thickness and proximal long bone biometric measurements in modifying Down syndrome serum screening risk in a population of women referred for second-trimester sonography.Sonographic biometric measurements and biochemical markers were combined retrospectively for 2533 women with known pregnancy outcomes. Four different screening methods were compared: (1) advanced maternal age; (2) biochemical serum screening markers; (3) modification of serum screening risks on the basis of categorical cutoffs for nuchal fold and femur and humerus length; and (4) a combined approach in which the sonographic measurements were treated as multiples of the medians and entered, together with the serum screening results, into a multivariable algorithm. The efficacy was compared at second-trimester risk cutoffs of 1:270 and 1:100.Down syndrome was present in 30 of the 2533 pregnancies (1 in 84). With the use of the 1:270 cutoff, biochemical screening had 93% sensitivity and a 40% false-positive rate. With application of the categorical method of fixed cutoffs to incorporate fetal biometry, the false-positive rate was reduced to 33% with no loss of sensitivity. The combined model had 83% sensitivity and a 19% false-positive rate. The combined method had the highest positive predictive value (1 in 20). Similar gains in efficacy could be shown with the 1:100 cutoff.For this high-risk group, the multivariate model that combines serum screening and sonography can result in a substantial reduction in the number of amniocenteses. Although the addition of the sonographic biometric measurements resulted in some Down syndrome cases being missed, the net effect was a large improvement in the overall positive predictive value of the screening.Maternal serum AFP levels in the first trimester of pregnancy.Maternal serum alphafetoprotein was assayed in 436 women presenting for termination of pregnancy at 6 to 12 weeks. The normal range for each week is presented. There was a progressive rise of AFP levels from week 7 onwards, but a clear separation from non-pregnant values was only apparent after 8 weeks. The definition of a 'low normal' range for the identification of cases at risk of Down's syndrome will probably only be possible at 11 weeks or later.Application of ductus venosus Doppler velocimetry for the detection of fetal aneuploidy in the first trimester of pregnancy.To test the hypothesis the application of ductus venosus Doppler velocimetry may serve as a screening tool between 10 and 14 weeks' gestation for the detection of fetuses with chromosomal abnormalities.372 consecutive fetuses were studied. Based on prior study, a chromosomal abnormality was suspected when either the nuchal translucency was above the 95th centile, or there was reversed or absent flow in the ductus venosus during atrial contraction. Sensitivity, specificity, and the negative and positive predictive values were calculated.There were 29 chromosomally abnormal fetuses. Of these 29 fetuses, ductus venosus blood flow during atrial contraction was either absent (n = 2) or reversed (n = 25) in 93.1%. In the chromosomally normal fetuses (n = 343), only 6 (1.7%) had abnormal Doppler profiles in the ductus venosus (specificity = 98.3%, positive and negative predictive values = 81.8% and 99.4%, respectively).The Doppler waveform of the ductus venosus was at least equal to NT thickness measurement for the detection of chromosomal abnormalities.First trimester screening for Down syndrome and assisted reproduction: no basis for concern.In pregnancies obtained after assisted reproduction the false-positive rate of second trimester Down syndrome (DS) screening is increased by 1.5-3-fold. This may cause an increase in the number of amniocenteses and the fetal loss rate. The present study for the first time examined whether assisted reproductive technologies affect the results of first trimester screening. The markers PAPP-A, free beta-hCG and the nuchal translucency (NT) thickness were examined at 12-14 weeks' gestation. Screening markers in 47 in vitro fertilisation (IVF), 63 ovulation induction (OI) and 3026 spontaneously conceived singleton pregnancies were compared. The MoM (multiples of the median) value in the IVF pregnancies was 1.02 (95% CI: 0.85-1.22) for PAPP-A, 1.14 (95% CI: 0.95-1.37) for beta-hCG and 0.97 (95% CI: 0.89-1.05) for NT; the MoM value in the OI pregnancies was 0.89 (95% CI: 0.76-1.05) for PAPP-A, 1.08 (95% CI: 0.93-1.25) for beta-hCG and 1.02 (95% CI: 0.95-1.11) for NT. The first trimester marker values in assisted reproductive pregnancies and spontaneously conceived pregnancies were not significantly different. Estimated false-positive rates for a risk cut-off of 1:400 varied from 4.7% in IVF pregnancies to 5.1% in OI pregnancies. Therefore the false-positive rate in Down syndrome screening should be independent of the method of conception.Karyotypes found in the population declared at increased risk of Down syndrome following maternal serum screening.Of the 65 328 pregnancies of South Australian mothers screened by the South Australian Maternal Serum Antenatal Screening (SAMSAS) Programme between 1 January 1991 and 31 December 1997, 3431 (5.25%) were declared at increased risk of fetal Down syndrome. Fetal or neonatal karyotype was determined in 2737/3431 (79.8%) of these pregnancies, including 16 with early fetal loss. Interrogation of the database of the South Australian Neonatal Screening Service showed 643 live-born infants whose phenotype was not subsequently questioned among the 694 pregnancies whose karyotype was not determined. Of the remaining 51/3431 pregnancies, 19 ended in early fetal loss without karyotyping and no newborn screening or other records could be found for 32 cases. The 129 instances of abnormal karyotype found were Down syndrome (84), trisomy 18 (four), trisomy 13 (three), triploidy (two), female sex chromosome aneuploidy (six) and male sex chromosome aneuploidy (five), inherited balanced rearrangements (19), mosaic or de novo balanced abnormalities (four) and unbalanced karyotypes (two). In the pregnancies declared at increased risk of fetal Down syndrome, only the karyotype for Down syndrome occurred with a frequency greater than that expected for the general, pregnant population.Are nuchal translucency, pregnancy associated plasma protein-A or free-beta-human chorionic gonadotropin depending on maternal age? A multicenter study of 8,116 pregnancies.First-trimester screening according to Nicolaides uses maternal age to obtain a common background risk for trisomy 21. The likelihood ratios by nuchal translucency, free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A are not with respect to maternal age. It was the aim of this study to investigate if likelihood ratios should better take care of it.Pearson's correlation and different models of regression analysis had been performed on the results of 8,116 first-trimester screenings. The total number of pregnancies was subdivided into three subgroups of healthy fetuses (n = 8,038); fetuses with Down's syndrome (n = 46) and fetuses with other genetic abnormalities (n = 32). Statistical testing was applied to each of the three groups.Strong independence from maternal age could be found for each of the first-trimester screening measurement parameter, as well for healthy and as for affected fetuses. Neither Pearson's test nor nonlinear regression models could detect a correlation. Accordingly significance of Pearson's test is not given.First-trimester screening would not be improved by considering the maternal age in the calculation of the likelihood ratios. Therefore the currently used algorithm is adequate. According, to the results, it seems to be proper as well to disregard the maternal age in newer test strategies advanced first-trimester screening (AFS) at all.Serum PAPP-A measurements in first-trimester screening for Down syndrome.Serum PAPP-A measurements taken from 254 women in the first trimester are reported. Eleven chromosomal abnormalities were detected. The mean serum PAPP-A levels in cases of Down syndrome were 0.44 MOM at 9 weeks gestation, 0.15 MOM at 10 weeks, and 0.29 MOM at 11 weeks. The PAPP-A level at 10 weeks was below those of pregnancies which aborted spontaneously. At 11 weeks, the pregnancies with Down syndrome recorded the lowest PAPP-A levels at that gestation. On this small sample, offering chorionic villus sampling to women with singleton pregnancies and a PAPP-A level below 0.3 MOM (approximately 6.5 per cent of this at-risk group) would have detected all the Down syndrome fetuses at 10 weeks and 50 per cent at 11 weeks without selecting those cases destined to abort. This suggests that serum PAPP-A should continue to be investigated as a potential first-trimester screening test for Down syndrome.[Prenatal diagnosis of trisomy 21: the Tunisian experience].Down syndrome (Trisomy 21) is the most common fetal chromosomal abnormality in humans. Its clinical signs are now well known. Methods for prenatal screening have advanced substantially in the past two decades.To describe our experience with prenatal diagnosis of Down syndrome, including the indications, methods and results.This retrospective study examined cases over a 4-year period. We adopted a sequential screening strategy for patients followed in our department since the beginning of their pregnancies after informed consent. We proposed first trimester ultrasound that measured nuchal translucency thickness and followed it with maternal serum screening. Some patients underwent screening during the second trimester or third trimester ultrasound. To assess the results, we studied the mothers' epidemiological characteristics and analysed the circumstances of prenatal diagnosis of trisomy 21 (T21).We identified 22 cases of T21 during the study period, for a total prevalence of 0.98 per thousand. The diagnosis was prenatal in 13 cases, mainly due to ultrasound signs. Of the 14 patients seen prenatally, only 8 were followed from early pregnancy. Five had enlarged nuchal translucency (> 95th percentile). Three had positive second trimester serum screening tests. One patient had amniocentesis planned because of her age (table 1). T21 was diagnosed in the second trimester in two cases and in the third trimester in three. The major morphological abnormalities observed were cardiac. We found an atrioventricular canal defect in four cases, and fetal hydrops in two cases (Table 2). The median gestational age at diagnosis of T21 in this study was 21 weeks. The diagnosis was missed in one patient followed throughout pregnancy in our unit. The median gestational age at termination of pregnancy was 22 weeks. Only one patient chose not to terminate the pregnancy. Her fetus, delivered at term, had no major pathologies.The establishment of a screening strategy for trisomy 21 in Tunisia is necessary to reduce handicaps. It should begin by expanding first-trimester ultrasound with nuchal translucency measurement. At the same time, serum marker testing should be offered to all patients. Routine amniocentesis for advanced maternal age should be avoided.Prospective validation of quantitative fluorescent polymerase chain reaction for rapid detection of common aneuploidies.To prospectively validate a quantitative fluorescent polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assay as a method of rapid prenatal aneuploidy detection for chromosomes 13, 18, 21, X, and Y.A commercial quantitative fluorescent PCR kit was validated on 200 known, blinded, prenatal DNA specimens. The kit was then validated prospectively on 1069 amniotic fluid specimens, and the results were compared with the karyotype results and the results of interphase fluorescence in situ hybridization testing, when performed in the course of standard care. Turnaround time was monitored in a subset of the prospective specimens.The analytical sensitivity and specificity of testing in the validation specimens were 98.9% and 100%, respectively. There were no false positives and a single false negative, a mosaic sex chromosome aneuploidy interpreted as normal. In the prospective study, the analytical sensitivity and specificity were 98% and 100%, respectively. No false positives and a single false negative, again a sex chromosome mosaic, were detected. Overall, 72.5% of all chromosomal anomalies and 87.7% of clinically significant chromosome anomalies were detected by quantitative fluorescent PCR. The average and median turnaround times were 30.5 and 25.1 hours, respectively.Quantitative fluorescent PCR is a robust and accurate method of rapid prenatal aneuploidy detection.First-trimester biochemical screening for fetal chromosome abnormalities and neural tube defects.Alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (UE3), intact human chorionic gonadotrophin (intHCG), and the free beta subunit of chorionic gonadotrophin (F beta HCG) were investigated in a series of 21 chromosomally abnormal and 14 open neural tube defect pregnancies ascertained from a series of 14,000 prospectively collected maternal serum samples at 6-14 weeks' gestation. In 16 cases of Down's syndrome, significant reductions were found for AFP (0.65 multiples of the normal median) and UE3 (0.67 MOM). IntHCG levels were unaltered (0.97 MOM) but a significant increase was found for F beta HCG (1.96 MOM). Significant correlations were found for AFP and UE3 in the controls and for intHCG and F beta HCG in both the control and the Down's syndrome pregnancies. In a group of five trisomy 18 pregnancies, median MOMs were for AFP 0.71, for UE3 0.34, for intHCG 0.27, and for F beta HCG 0.15. None of 13 pregnancies with open neural tube defects at 8-13 weeks gestation had elevated maternal serum AFP levels, whereas matched second-trimester samples from the same pregnancies at 16-18 weeks gestation all had significantly elevated AFP levels. Thus, biochemical screening for chromosome abnormalities may be practicable in the first trimester using free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin in combination with AFP and maternal age. However, a separate screening protocol using AFP at 15-18 weeks gestation would still be required for effective detection of neural tube defects.Elevated levels of total (maternal and fetal) beta-globin DNA in maternal blood from first trimester pregnancies with trisomy 21.Elevated levels of circulating fetal DNA have been observed in maternal plasma when a trisomy 21 fetus is confirmed. However, these studies have been limited to pregnancies carrying a male fetus. We sought to quantify total (fetal and maternal) DNA from dried blood spots (DBS) for use as an additional factor in multi-parameter prenatal screening for aneuploidy.Maternal DBS were obtained from the NICHD-sponsored multi-center cohort (BUN) study. Seventeen confirmed trisomy 21 (mean gestational age 12.23 +/- 0.77 weeks) cases were each matched by gestational age to euploid controls (n = 30). DNA was extracted and quantitative PCR was performed to measure four non-chromosome 21 loci, including glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate dehydrogenase (GAPDH) (12p13), beta-globin (11p15.5), beta-actin (7p15-12) and p53 (17p13.1).Beta-globin DNA levels were significantly elevated (P = 0.003) in 13 of 17 trisomy 21 cases (4.08 +/- 1.78 Geq/ml x 10(5)) compared with matched controls (2.35 +/- 1.84 Geq/ml x 10(5)). Following conversion of beta-globin concentrations into multiples of the median (MoM), MoM for trisomy 21 cases was 2.8 compared with 1.0 in euploid cases. No significant differences in levels of circulating GAPDH, beta-actin and p53 sequences were detected.This work demonstrates differential levels of circulating beta-globin DNA in maternal blood of euploid and trisomy 21 cases. Sequence-specific quantification could provide an additional measure to improve non-invasive methods of prenatal screening to detect trisomy 21 using dried blood. Beta-globin in particular is an attractive biomarker that could contribute to enhance multiple serum parameter testing in the first trimester.Nuchal translucency and other first-trimester sonographic markers of chromosomal abnormalities.There is extensive evidence that effective screening for major chromosomal abnormalities can be provided in the first trimester of pregnancy. Prospective studies in a total of 200,868 pregnancies, including 871 fetuses with trisomy 21, have demonstrated that increased nuchal translucency can identify 76.8% of fetuses with trisomy 21, which represents a false-positive rate of 4.2%. When fetal nuchal translucency was combined with maternal serum free-beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A in prospective studies in a total of 44,613 pregnancies, including 215 fetuses with trisomy 21, the detection rate was 87.0% for a false-positive rate of 5.0%. Studies from specialist centers with 15,822 pregnancies, which included 397 fetuses with trisomy 21, have demonstrated that the absence of the nasal bone can identify 69.0% of trisomy 21 fetuses, which represents a false-positive rate of 1.4%. It has been estimated that first-trimester screening by a combination of sonography and maternal serum testing can identify 97% of trisomy 21 fetuses, which represents a false-positive rate of 5%, or that the detection rate can be 91%, which represents a false-positive rate of 0.5%. In addition to increased nuchal translucency, important sonographic markers for chromosomal abnormalities, include fetal growth restriction, tachycardia, abnormal flow in the ductus venosus, megacystis, exomphalos and single umbilical artery. Most pregnant women prefer screening in the first, rather than in the second, trimester. As with all aspects of good clinical practice, those care givers who perform first-trimester screening should be trained appropriately, and their results should be subjected to external quality assurance.First trimester sonographic detection of chromosomal abnormalities in an unselected population.To investigate the role of first trimester sonography in detecting chromosomal abnormalities in an unselected obstetric population.2281 women (mean maternal age 30 years [range 16-47]; mean gestational age 12(+3) weeks [range 11-14]) underwent transabdominal scanning to assess fetal structure and, if anatomical survey was considered to be incomplete (31% of cases), transvaginal sonography was also performed. Measurement of nuchal translucency was included and karyotyping performed as considered appropriate.There were 16 chromosomal abnormalities; 13 (81%) were diagnosed at 11-14 weeks either because of a nuchal translucency greater than or equal to the 99th centile for gestational age (7/16; 44% [95% CI 25-63]) or due to the presence of structural abnormalities (6/16; 38% [95% CI 14.2-61.8]). Seventy-five percent of cases of trisomy 21 were also diagnosed either because of having a nuchal translucency greater than or equal to the 99th centile (5/8; 63%) or due to the presence of a structural abnormality (1/8; 13%).A significant proportion of fetal chromosomal abnormalities can be detected by first trimester sonographic screening to assess fetal structural appearance. The sensitivity of detection can be improved by combining measurement of nuchal translucency with detailed examination of fetal anatomy.Second trimester maternal dimeric inhibin-A in the multiple-marker screening test for Down's syndrome.The aim of this study was to evaluate the additional value of dimeric inhibin-A serum concentration in second trimester multiple-marker screening tests for pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome. We anticipated that second trimester maternal serum dimeric inhibin-A concentrations would be altered in pregnancies complicated by fetal Down's syndrome and that dimeric inhibin-A would perform better than one of the three substances analysed in the multiple-marker screening test currently in use. A total of 1156 serum samples were screened for dimeric inhibin-A in parallel with the routine classic triple test screening programme performed on a random obstetric population. Classic triple test performance was compared with detection rates obtained after substitution of unconjugated oestriol by inhibin-A and with the performance of inhibin-A and alpha-fetoprotein alone. Absolute dimeric inhibin-A maternal serum concentrations of Down's syndrome pregnancies were indeed significantly higher than those of normal pregnancies in our screened population. The performance of dimeric inhibin-A in combination with the multiple-marker screening test, however, is limited because of its strong correlation with intact human chorionic gonadotrophin.Results and views of women in population-wide pregnancy screening for trisomy 21 in east Finland.The serum screening test for trisomy 21 was offered to all pregnant women in East Finland during 1993. The results and the women's views on trisomy screening are reported here. A total of 9,343 (89%) of the pregnant women participated in the screening. A total of 615 women were eligible for amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling; among them 22 pregnancies were affected by Down Syndrome. Fifteen of them were detected by double screening; in 2 missed cases only maternal-serum alpha-fetoprotein had been determined. In all 5 cases missed by double screening the maternal age was less than 30 years. The women's attitudes were studied by means of a questionnaire, which was mailed to 214 women. The response rate to our questionnaire was 74%. A total of 87% of respondents highly or very highly valued the opportunity to participate in the screening. Despite the existing problems caused by late testing, 87% of respondents want to be tested again in their future pregnancies.Abnormal first-trimester ductus venosus blood flow: a risk factor for adverse outcome in fetuses with normal nuchal translucency.First-trimester nuchal translucency thickness (NT) is a potent tool for assessment of fetal risks of aneuploidy and other adverse outcomes. When NT is increased, Doppler assessment of the ductus venosus (DV) enhances the prediction specificity for Down syndrome. This study assessed abnormal Doppler DV waveform as a predictor of adverse outcome when the NT is normal.This was a case-control study of 2,505 consecutive patients undergoing NT screening in our certified first-trimester screening program. First-trimester Doppler assessment of DV was performed and atrial systolic velocity was rated as antegrade (normal) or absent/reversed (DV-RAV; abnormal). Each case with normal NT (< 95(th) percentile) and DV-RAV was matched with two controls with respect to maternal age within 1 year, NT within 0.2 mm, crown-rump length within 3 mm, and closest calculated aneuploidy risk. Outcomes for paired variables were compared using t-test and Chi-square test.Forty-seven (1.9%) patients had normal NT and DV-RAV. After exclusion of three cases with obvious first-trimester anomalies and two with incomplete outcome data, 42 remained for analysis. Adverse outcome included cardiovascular defects (n = 6), fetal growth restriction (n = 3), renal anomaly (n = 2), aneuploidy (n = 3) and multiple defects (n = 3), in a total of 11/42 cases (26.2%). Cardiac abnormalities, renal abnormalities and perinatal death were all significantly more common in the study group (all P < 0.05).Abnormal first-trimester DV Doppler findings appear to predict adverse outcome independently of a normal NT. These patients need detailed mid-trimester assessment of fetal anatomy with formal echocardiography, and subsequent follow-up.[Sonographic features of chromosomal defects at 11(+0) to 13(+6) weeks of gestation].Each chromosomal defect has its own syndromal pattern of detectable abnormalities. The authors describe the sonographic features of trisomy 21 and other major chromosomal defects in the first trimesters of pregnancy. At 11(+0) - 13(+6) weeks, all major chromosomal defects are associated with increased NT thickness. In trisomies 21, 18 and 13 the pattern of increase in NT is similar and the average NT in these defects is about 2.5 mm above the normal median for crown-rump length. In Turner syndrome, the median NT is about 8 mm above the normal median. In addition to increased NT there are sonographic features that are often seen in some affected fetuses at 11(+0) - 13(+6) weeks. In trisomy 21 fetuses have absent nasal bone, short maxilla and abnormal Doppler waveforms in the ductus venosus. In trisomy 18, there is early onset fetal growth restriction, a tendency for bradycardia, exomphalos, absent nasal bone and single umbilical artery. In trisomy 13, there is tachycardia, early onset fetal growth restriction, megacystis, holoprosencephaly and exomphalos. In Turner syndrome, there is tachycardia and early onset fetal growth restriction. In triploidy, there is early onset asymmetrical fetal growth restriction, bradycardia, holoprosencephaly, exomphalos, posterior fossa cyst and molar changes in the placenta.Prospective study of prenatal screening for Down's syndrome with free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin.To assess the value and impact of a screening programme for Down's syndrome that uses the two maternal serum markers: alpha fetoprotein and free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin.All women booked into clinics were screened. Further tests were offered to women with a risk of one in 300 or greater of having an affected baby. Follow up of outcome of all pregnancies.Biochemical screening laboratory serving two health districts.8179 women of all ages with singleton pregnancies screened between 15 and 22 weeks' gestation from 1 April 1991 to 31 March 1992.Detection rate of Down's syndrome, false positive rate, uptake of screening, uptake of amniocentesis in women identified as at increased risk, prevalence of Down's syndrome at birth.Overall 89% (8317/9345) of women underwent screening. The rate of detection of Down's syndrome was 69% (11/16; 95% confidence interval 41 to 89%) with a 5.2% false positive rate (426/179; 4.7 to 5.7%). In women under 30 the detection rate was 50% (four out of eight; 32 to 86%) Uptake of amniocentesis was 89% (389/437), resulting in a reduction of prevalence of Down's syndrome at birth from 1.1 per 1000 in previous years (66/59,696) to 0.4 per 1000 during the screening year (4/9345). Additionally, several other abnormalities were identified.The benefit of a high detection rate with this approach and the additional anomalies identified should encourage others to introduce screening programmes for Down's syndrome that use free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin and alpha fetoprotein.Mid-gestation Down syndrome screening test and pregnancy outcome among unstimulated assisted-conception pregnancies.Alteration of mid-gestation serum markers in assisted-conception pregnancies is believed to be attributable to ovarian superovulation treatment modalities. We compared alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE(3)) in two groups of unstimulated assisted-conception pregnancies, that is, own-oocyte frozen embryos (own-FET) versus oocyte-donated (OD) embryos.Forty-three OD-conceived and 31 own-FET-conceived singleton parturient women (aged 29 +/- 4 years and 31 +/- 4 years respectively, P < 0.05) were followed from embryo transfer throughout pregnancy.The daily pattern of first-trimester serum beta-hCG was similar in both groups. The OD group had only significantly increased AFP concentrations compared to the own-FET group (1.38 vs 0.99 median MoM respectively, P = 0.002). Although there were no chromosomal abnormalities and no fetal or neonatal deaths in either group, 12% OD women and 6.5% own-FET women were found screen-positive. Eight OD women and 11 FET women had an adverse obstetric outcome (P = NS).OD embryos are a unique clinical model for evaluating the uterine compartment and its contribution to mid-gestation serum marker secretion.Age related detection and false positive rates when screening for Down's syndrome in the first trimester using fetal nuchal translucency and maternal serum free betahCG and PAPP-A.To determine how first trimester detection rates for Down's Syndrome vary with maternal age and to calculate the predictive value of an increased risk report at various maternal ages.Mathematical modelling of first trimester screening performance using fetal nuchal translucency and maternal serum free betahCG and pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).From within the Gaussian distributions of each marker in normal pregnancies and those affected by Down's Syndrome a series of 15,000 marker multiple of the medians were obtained for each group. These markers were then used to calculate the risks of Down's Syndrome using maternal ages ranging from 15 to 49 and the background risk of Down's Syndrome at each age. Using a 1 in 300 risk cutoff (at time of sampling) the false positive rate and detection rate was assessed at each year of maternal age. The predictive value of a positive result was calculated using Baye's theorem.False positive rates and detection rates at each year of maternal age between 15 and 49; the predictive value of a positive result for each maternal age between 15 and 49.At 15 years of age the detection rate was 77% at a 1.9% false positive rate, 84% at a 4% false positive rate at age 30, rising to 100% at a 67% false positive rate at age 49. The probability of Down's Syndrome once identified with an increased risk was 1:34 at 15 years, 1:29 at 30 years and 1:6 at 49 years.As with second trimester biochemical screening, the detection rate and false positive rate vary considerably with age. However, detection rates across all ages are significantly higher than with second trimester screening. The risk of a positive screening result being a Down's pregnancy is considerably greater than with second trimester screening with an average probability of 1:29, compared with 1:55 in the second trimester. This information may be useful in counselling women with an increased risk result in first trimester screening.First trimester maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A and pregnancy-specific beta 1-glycoprotein in fetal trisomies.To examine the potential value of maternal serum levels of pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and pregnancy-specific beta 1-glycoprotein (SP1) in the detection of fetal trisomy.Cross-sectional study.The Harris Birthright Research Centre For Fetal Medicine, King's College Hospital Medical School, London, UK and Division of Maternal-Fetal Medicine, Jefferson Medical College, Philadelphia, USA.Maternal serum PAPP-A and SP1 concentrations were measured at 10 to 13 weeks gestation in samples from 42 pregnancies with fetal trisomy (trisomy 21, n = 29; trisomy 18, n = 9; trisomy 13, n = 4) and in samples from 210 matched controls.In controls, both maternal serum PAPP-A and SP1 increased significantly with gestation and in trisomic fetuses levels of both hormones were reduced. However, discriminant analysis demonstrated that SP1 did not contribute significantly in the distinction between trisomic and control pregnancies. Although levels of PAPP-A were reduced throughout the gestational range examined (10 to 13 weeks), especially in cases with fetal trisomy 21, the deviation was more pronounced at 10 to 11 weeks than at 12 to 13 weeks gestation. In 45% of pregnancies with fetal trisomy 21 and 70% of pregnancies with trisomies 18 or 13 maternal serum PAPP-A levels at 10 to 11 weeks gestation were below the 5th centile of the normal range.Maternal serum PAPP-A concentration in the first trimester of pregnancy may prove to be useful in the prediction of risk for fetal trisomies.Differential increases in AFP, hCG, and uE3 in twin pregnancies: impact on attempts to quantify Down syndrome screening calculations.Since the advent of multiple marker screening (MMS) for Down syndrome (DS) risk calculations, limitations for twins have been apparent. Recent attempts have been made to extrapolate mathematically singleton risks to twins. Here we investigate the pattern of levels among AFP, hCG, and uE3 in twins. MMS screening data from 4,443 twin pregnancies were compared to those from 258,885 singletons from 14-21 weeks of gestational age during a 3-year period (1992-1994) in our laboratory. Medians were determined for singletons and twins, and the ratios of twins to singletons were derived. Median AFP levels for twins are approximately double those of singletons, but median increases for hCG and uE3 are less than double. The data were divided further by ethnic groups (white, African American, Asian, and Hispanic), among which there were significant variations in medians, but not in the ratios of twins to singletons. The increased serum levels of different markers in twins are not consistent across analytes, possibly reflecting independent development of different compartments. Such differences mean that a mere mathematical conversion of singleton DS risks would be imbalanced among the analytes and cannot be applied reasonably to twins. Ethnic-specific databases are as important in twins as they are in singletons.Maternal serum levels of placental proteins after in vitro fertilisation and their implications for prenatal screening.To determine whether the serum levels of pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A), pregnancy-specific beta(1)-glycoprotein (SP1), placental lactogen (hPL) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) are different in pregnancies obtained after in vitro fertilisation (IVF) and embryo transfer (ET) in comparison to spontaneous pregnancies. Assessment of the need to establish normal medians for biochemical trisomy screening in IVF pregnancies.The population comprised 96 IVF-ET pregnancies, of which 79 came from fresh gonadotrophin-stimulated cycles and 17 from embryo transfers without gonadotrophin stimulation (natural cycle IVF, frozen embryo transfers), and 156 spontaneous pregnancies. A single blood sample was obtained between 7 + 0 and 16 + 3 weeks. PAPP-A, SP1, hPL and hCG were quantified and the levels compared between gonadotrophin-stimulated IVF, steroid-only- or non-stimulated IVF, and controls with respect to gestational age using non-parametric statistical analysis.PAPP-A and hPL levels were reduced after stimulated IVF in early gestation (before 10 pregnancy weeks); SP1 followed the same trend without reaching statistical significance. hCG tended to be increased after IVF treatment including non-gonadotrophin-stimulation cycles, and also beyond 10 pregnancy weeks.Reduced PAPP-A with increased hCG yields an increased risk in screening for foetal trisomy 21. We confirm recently published observations but do not recommend the establishment of normal medians for IVF pregnancies since the extent of the deviations is varying according to the different stimulation protocols and dosages of gonadotrophins used.Agreement between predicted risk and prevalence of Down syndrome in second-trimester triple-marker screening in Japan.Based on 9350 pregnant Japanese women who were screened by serum triple-marker determination, accuracy of predicted risk for Down syndrome was examined using 24 Down syndrome cases detected either prenatally or postnatally. The correlation is statistically very high (r = 0.98) between the predicted risks and the prevalence of Down syndrome cases. Here we emphasize that this could be accomplished only by an extensive follow-up study, implemented in our prospective intervention programme.First-trimester maternal serum progesterone in aneuploid pregnancies.First-trimester maternal serum screening for Down syndrome (DS) can be improved by the use of additional serum markers. We examined whether progesterone (P), synthesized by placenta, might be a first-trimester maternal serum marker for fetal DS.P was quantified in first-trimester maternal serum from 42 DS, six trisomy 18 and two trisomy 13 pregnancies and 115 controls. Log-regression of P versus gestational age in days was used to convert P concentrations into multiples of the median (MoM).The P concentrations in controls increased with gestational age (p = 9.5 x 10(-7)). The log10MoM P distribution in DS pregnancies was not significantly different from that in controls. However, from day 58-67, the log10MoM P was elevated in DS pregnancies (n = 10) with a mean (SD) of 0.1040 (0.0956), compared to a mean (SD) of - 0.0109 (0.1661) in controls (n = 24) (p = 0.05). Five out of six trisomy 18 and both trisomy 13 pregnancies had a P MoM < 1.P is not a useful marker for DS in first trimester, except perhaps in a narrow gestational age window from day 58 to 67. P is a trisomy 18/13 marker.Serum triple-marker screening in in vitro fertilization and naturally conceived pregnancies.To determine whether results of second-trimester maternal serum triple-marker screening for Down syndrome and open neural tube defects in singleton pregnancies conceived from in vitro fertilization (IVF) differ from those of pregnancies conceived spontaneously.The screen-positive rates and triple-marker levels of patients conceiving singleton pregnancies by IVF were compared to age-adjusted standards.Sixty-nine singleton IVF pregnancies with maternal serum screening were identified. Twenty-one (30.4%) of the 69 IVF singleton pregnancies had a positive screen for Down syndrome compared with a 14.4% expected screen-positive rate for the maternal age distribution in our observed sample (P = .013). The screen-positive rate for open neural tube defects in the measured population was similar to anticipated values based on historic controls (5.8% in IVF patients versus 5.3% in the total population). The median levels of the triple markers were 0.95 multiples of the median (MoM) for alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), 0.90 MoM for unconjugated estriol (E3), and 1.22 MoM for hCG.The increased hCG levels as well as the slightly lower AFP and unconjugated E3 levels may contribute to the higher Down syndrome screen-positive rate in this IVF singleton population. These results may be due to the number of embryos transferred, the maternal hormonal environment of the IVF process, or other factors. Pregnancies conceived by IVF may be twice as likely to have a positive maternal serum screening test. As additional data are collected, corrected standards should be determined.Maternal serum screening for fetal genetic disorders.Maternal serum analyte screening is an integral component of contemporary antenatal care. Based on elevated MSAFP levels, 85% to 90% of NTDs (e.g., anencephaly or spina bifida) can be detected. Using a combination of serum analytes (e.g., MSAFP, hCG, UE3) 55% to 60% of fetal Down's syndrome can be detected. Future strategies for Down's syndrome screening may include the use of new markers such as dimeric inhibin-A and urinary beta-core fragment of hCG, as well as first-trimester screening, particularly with PAPP-A and free beta-hCG.Screening for trisomy 21 in twin pregnancies in the first trimester using free beta-hCG and PAPP-A, combined with fetal nuchal translucency thickness.In the first trimester of pregnancy the biochemical markers free beta-hCG and pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) are used for the prenatal screening of trisomy 21, either alone or in combination with nuchal translucency (NT) thickness. In this study, I have analysed the distribution of these biochemical markers in 159 twin pregnancies and compared this with 3466 singleton pregnancies. On average free beta-hCG values are 2.099 times greater in twins than in singletons and PAPP-A some 1.86 times greater. The width of the analyte distribution in twins is very similar to that in singleton pregnancies. Using statistical modelling techniques I have predicted that at a 5% false positive rate the detection rate in twins discordant for trisomy 21 will be 52% and in twins concordant for trisomy 21 will be 55%, if correction for twin pregnancy is carried out using the 'pseudo risk' approach. The detection rate using biochemical parameters is less than that achievable for twins using NT (75%). However, the combination of NT and maternal serum biochemistry will give detection rates approaching 80%. These rates are some 10% less than in singleton pregnancies, but nevertheless combining NT and biochemistry will allow high rates of detection of affected twins with the benefit of ultrasound and NT being able to specifically locate the affected twin. Twin screening using both modalities should be considered when introducing first trimester screening.The value of screening for Down's syndrome in a socioeconomically deprived area with a high ethnic population.To assess the utility of biochemical antenatal screening for Down's syndrome in a socioeconomically deprived area with a high proportion of Asian women from the Indian Subcontinent.Audit of Down's syndrome biochemical screening service over a four-year period.Teaching hospital and community antenatal clinic in inner city Birmingham.Women booked between October 1992 and December 1996.Blood for screening was collected between 14 and 21 weeks gestation, alpha-fetoprotein and intact human chorionic gonadotrophin were measured in serum and the risk of Down's syndrome was calculated.Uptakes of screening and amniocentesis, screen positive rate, odds of being affected given a positive result, miscarriages associated with amniocentesis offered following a high risk result, detection rate, number of Down's cases prevented and a cost analysis. Outcome measures were compared between Asians and Caucasians.Overall 11,974 women (71%) accepted serum screening. The screen positive rate was 8.3% in Asians and 5.0% in Caucasians. The uptake of amniocentesis in women following a high risk result was 54% overall (35% Asian, 67% Caucasian). Nineteen cases of Down's syndrome were identified, of which 13 occurred in women who opted for biochemical screening. The detection rate of the biochemical screening programme was 85% (11/13). Of these 11 cases, six (none of whom were Asian) elected to have an amniocentesis, of whom four thereafter had a termination.In this study the public health benefits of screening for Down's syndrome in a socioeconomically deprived area with a high Asian population, were small.Performance of first-trimester screening between gestational weeks 7 and 13.Screening for fetal chromosome abnormalities in the first trimester includes analysis of the serological markers pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and free beta human choriogonadotropin (free beta hCG). The blood sample is traditionally taken around week 12 of gestation, but the performance of earlier blood sampling is not well documented.We studied 44,537 singleton pregnancies. Complete first-trimester screening took place between November 2003 and March 2009, and blood samples were taken between 7 weeks + 5 days and 13 weeks + 6 days.Of 120 cases of trisomy 21, 108 were diagnosed in the first-trimester screening (detection rate 90%). When the blood sample was taken before gestational week 10, the detection rate of trisomy 21 was 97% (70 of 72), whereas 80% were detected (38 of 48) after week 10 (chi(2) = 0.0035). For trisomy 18, trisomy 13, and triploidy, 65% (13 of 20) were detected before gestational week 10, and 73% (11 of 15) after (not significant). All 6 cases of triploidy before and after gestational week 10 were detected. The screen positive rate and the maternal age were similar before and after week 10 of gestation.Screening for fetal aneuploidy can be performed with good results with the blood sample taken as early as week 7 of gestation. Blood samples taken before gestational week 10 showed a high detection rate of fetal trisomy 21, with no difference in the detection of fetal trisomy 18, trisomy 13, or triploidy.Alteration in age-specific risks for chromosomal trisomy by maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotropin screening.Maternal serum screening for alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) increases the detection rate of Down's syndrome (DS) pregnancies. To estimate the risk of a DS pregnancy for a particular woman, Wald et al. combine a trivariate function of AFP, hCG, and unconjugated oestriol with age-specific risk. Calculation of independent likelihood ratios (LRs) for AFP and hCG has allowed us to examine the predictive value of each test alone and the combination. AFP and hCG were measured in stored serum samples from 672 normal, 8 trisomy 21 (DS), 9 trisomy 18, and 2 trisomy 13 pregnancies. AFP and hCG multiples of the median (MOM) were calculated for each sample. The LRs for AFP MOM and hCG MOM were calculated and combined with age-specific risk. Of eight DS pregnancies, six had increased risk based on age and AFP. Addition of hCG detected two additional DS pregnancies. Of nine trisomy 18 pregnancies, four (44 per cent) had hCG MOM under 0.25. Three out of nine would have been classified as high risk by AFP, but none by combined AFP and hCG. Amniocentesis would have been recommended in 74 per cent of aneuploid pregnancies if both age and serum screening were used. Abandonment of amniocentesis based on age alone would have excluded two abnormal pregnancies from detection. Screening programmes should note that combined risk figures are specific for DS and do not include other trisomies. Detection of other trisomies requires inclusion of low hCG level as a discriminator and continuation of age-based testing.First trimester maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome: an evaluation of the DPC Immulite 2000 free beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A assays.Recent NICE Guidelines have emphasized the need to have in place by 2007 the capability of offering screening to all women in the first trimester using a combination of maternal age with the ultrasound marker nuchal translucency thickness (NT) and the maternal serum biochemical markers free beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A). Laboratories will therefore need to consider how to introduce the biochemical component of screening. With the recent launch of these assays on the DPC Immulite 2000 platform, it is appropriate and timely to investigate their clinical and analytical performance on a high throughput immunoassay analyser.Within-run and between-day precision was assessed in the normal way. Bias was assessed by comparing samples from normal pregnancies (n=813) and pregnancies with Down's syndrome (n=60) run on both the DPC system and our routine Kryptor system. Gestational day-specific medians for each marker were calculated from the unaffected population. Mathematical modelling was used to predict the clinical performance of the two markers.The within-run coefficient of variation (CV) was around 3.5% and between-day CV was around 6-8% for both assays. Comparison with EQA samples showed a 2% positive bias against the ALTM for free beta-hCG and a 21% positive bias for PAPP-A, which reduced to 11% when compared with the Kryptor method mean. When compared with the Kryptor, the DPC free beta-hCG showed a significant concentration-related negative bias above concentrations of 50 IU/L in both unaffected and affected pregnancy samples. After conversion to MoM in the Down's syndrome group, the DPC free beta-hCG assay showed a MoM-related bias at higher MoM values. For PAPP-A a positive MoM-related bias was also evident. In cases with Down's syndrome, the median free beta-hCG MoM was 1.703 for DPC and 1.698 by the Kryptor, which was not significantly different. For PAPP-A, the median MoM was 0.62 for DPC and 0.47 by the Kryptor, which was significantly (P=0.025) different. This difference, if real, is likely to result in a lower detection of cases with Down's syndrome. Statistical modelling techniques suggest that this would be 58% compared with the expected 67% when combined with maternal age and free beta-hCG. When combined with NT, however, this would be reduced to 85% compared with the 90% expected.While laboratories may find some organizational benefit from running first trimester Down's syndrome screening on such routine high-throughput immunoassay analysers, better clinical performance is likely to be achieved with alternative platforms to the DPC Immulite 2000.Appropriate biochemical parameters in first-trimester screening for Down syndrome.Meta-analysis was used to calculate maternal serum marker distribution parameters for Down syndrome risk estimation in the first trimester. Data from 44 series were combined: relating to pregnancy associated plasma protein (PAPP)-A in 18, free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) in 17, alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) in 26 and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) in 9. All levels were expressed in multiples of the normal median (MOM) for gestational age. Individual PAPP-A levels were available for 439 first and second-trimester Down syndrome pregnancies. The median MOM value increased with gestation: 0.35 at 6-8 weeks (31 cases), 0.40 at 9-11 weeks (197), 0.62 at 12-14 weeks (113) and 0.94 thereafter (98). A cubic regression equation was fitted so it could be estimated for each week of gestation. For the other markers the median value in Down syndrome was estimated from the weighted mean across all first-trimester series: 1.98 MOM for free beta-hCG in 579 cases; 0.79 MOM for AFP in 243 and 0.74 MOM for uE3 in 226. Variance-covariance matrices were calculated directly in unaffected pregnancies and from the difference between affected and unaffected pregnancies in Down syndrome. Based on these parameters we estimate that screening at 9-11 weeks with PAPP-A and free beta-hCG will yield a 64.6 per cent detection rate for a 5 per cent false-positive rate. Adding a third marker will increase detection to 66.6 per cent for AFP and 68.6 per cent for uE3; using all four markers it increases to 70.1 per cent. Routine ultrasound nuchal translucency measurement in addition to serum testing will increase the rates to 86.4 per cent, 87.2 per cent, 87.9 per cent and 88.3 per cent, respectively.SP1 in pregnancies with Down syndrome in the first trimester of pregnancy. International Prenatal Screening Research Group.We conducted a study to determine the value of serum pregnancy-specific beta-1-glycoprotein (Schwangerschafts protein 1, SP1) as an antenatal screening test for Down syndrome in the first trimester. Serum samples collected from women at 8 to 14 weeks of pregnancy, immediately prior to having a chorionic villus sampling procedure on account of advanced maternal age, were retrieved from 96 women with Down syndrome pregnancies (cases) and from 480 women with unaffected pregnancies (controls). Cases and controls were ascertained at 21 obstetric centres in nine countries. Each case was matched with five controls for maternal age (same five-year age groups), duration of storage of the serum sample (same calendar year) and gestational age (usually the same week of pregnancy). The levels of SP1 were lower in pregnancies associated with Down syndrome: the median level was 0.86 multiples of the median level in the controls (95 per cent confidence interval 0.76 to 0.97). This difference, though statistically significant, was not large enough for SP1 to be a useful marker in screening, at least from 10 weeks onwards where most of our data lie.Maternal serum activin A and follistatin levels in pregnancies with Down syndrome.Inhibin A is now an established second-trimester maternal serum marker of Down syndrome. Since activin A has a common beta-subunit to inhibin A we evaluated this substance and its binding protein, follistatin, as potential markers. We studied 30 affected and 199 unaffected pregnancies at 13-16 weeks' gestation. There was a statistically significant increase in activin A level among the cases with 8 (27 per cent) exceeding the 90th centile in the controls, and 6 (20 per cent) above the 95th centile. However, the extent of overlap was too great to be of value in screening. There was a small decrease in follistatin levels among cases but it did not reach statistical significance.Multiple marker screening.Combined measurement of fetal nuchal translucency, maternal serum free beta-hCG, and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A for first-trimester Down's syndrome screening.It has been proposed that first-trimester Down's syndrome screening has a higher detection rate compared to second-trimester biochemical screening. This study investigated the accuracy of Down's syndrome screening during gestational weeks 10 to 13 using the combination of fetal nuchal translucency (NT) measurement with maternal serum concentrations of free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).A total of 1,514 women with singleton pregnancies were enrolled in this study. Fetal NT was measured using the criteria published by the Fetal Medicine Foundation. Maternal serum concentrations of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were determined by microtiter-plate ELISA. Down's syndrome risk was calculated using multivariate Gaussian distribution and Alpha software.Seventeen (1.12%) of the 1514 screened pregnancies had a fetal NT of at least 3 mm, and 41.2% of these had a poor pregnancy outcome, including four fetal aneuploidies. The odds of a fetal aneuploidy when the NT was greater than 2.0 multiples of median (MoM) was 90, when serum PAPP-A concentration was less than 0.45 MoM, it was 8.6, and when serum free beta-hCG concentration was greater than 2.2 MoM, it was 4.7. Using a risk cut-off level of 1 in 400, nine of 10 fetal aneuploidies were identified with a 4.7% false-positive rate, including two with trisomy 21, one with trisomy 18, and three with Turner's syndrome.This study demonstrated that Down's syndrome screening using the combined test in the first trimester had a higher detection rate than that of serum screening in the second trimester. Implementation of NT measurement in the first trimester provides substantial advantages for Down's syndrome detection and early diagnosis of fetal structural abnormalities.Repeat maternal serum testing for Down's syndrome screening using multiple markers with special reference to free alpha and free beta-hCG.To determine the effect of routine repeat testing in serum screening for Down's syndrome, we compared estimates of the detection and false-positive rates. Five serum markers were measured--alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and its two subunits, free alpha and free beta-hCG. First and repeat test marker levels were available from 142 women whose samples had been routinely collected and stored in an antenatal serum bank. Different repeat testing policies were compared for various combinations of the markers. If all women had repeat tests using the four markers AFP, uE3, and free alpha and free beta-hCG, the detection rate for a 5 per cent false-positive rate was 69 per cent compared with 65 per cent if no women were repeated. Policies of repeating selected women gave similar results. The small gain in screening performance with repeat testing performed routinely is not worthwhile. If a woman does happen to have a repeat test, her risk estimate should, however, be based on both results, not just the second.Enhanced twin pregnancy detection within an open neural tube defect and Down syndrome screening protocol using free-beta hCG and AFP.We have applied our multimarker approach of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free-beta human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) for Down syndrome screening to multiple gestations to assess its efficacy for improved detection of twin and triplet pregnancies. This study matched 225 cases of twin pregnancy and 39 cases of triplet pregnancy each with ten singleton pregnancies based on gestational week, race, time to receive sample, time of year of sample, and geographical area. The ratios of the MOM for each group at the tenth, 50th, and 90th percentiles were compared by the Wilcoxon test. Risks for twins were calculated using Bayes' rule, the age-related incidence of twins, and the levels of AFP and free-beta hCG. The tenth, 50th and 90th percentiles of free-beta hCG MOMs in twin and triplet cases were 0.85, 1.99, and 4.51, and 1.38, 2.78, and 4.07, respectively. For AFP, the MOMs at these percentiles were 1.26, 1.91, and 2.99, and 2.02, 2.68, and 5.30, respectively. The twin and triplet distributions for each marker were statistically significantly different from the singleton distributions (P < 0.0001) and from each other (P = 0.0012). At a twin risk cut-off of 1 in 50, 77.4 per cent of all twin gestations can be detected in a second-trimester AFP and free-beta hCG screening protocol with 5.1 per cent of singleton pregnancies falsely identified as at risk for twins. Our dual marker protocol for mid-trimester pregnancy screening combining AFP and free-beta hCG can identify over 77 per cent of twin pregnancies in women less than 35 years of age. This benefit may contribute to an improved outcome of pregnancy by early detection of multiple gestation.A comparison of the impact of screen-positive results obtained from ultrasound and biochemical screening for Down syndrome in the first trimester: a pilot study.To compare the experiences of women who received a screen-positive test result for Down syndrome after nuchal translucency screening or after biochemical screening in the first trimester of pregnancy in the Netherlands.Semi-quantitative questionnaires were sent to 40 women with a screen-positive test result for Down syndrome in the first trimester of pregnancy: 20 had undergone nuchal translucency screening (NT group) and 20 had undergone serum screening (PAPP-A and free beta-hCG) (SS group). In all the cases, chorionic villus sampling (CVS) had not revealed any chromosomal abnormalities.The major reason for undergoing the screening test in both groups of women was to be more reassured about the health of the baby. In the NT group, 5 out of the 20 women stated that they had suddenly been confronted with the NT measurement during the ultrasound examination without even being asked, or had been caught by surprise about the possibility. Together with two other women, they felt that at that stage they had been insufficiently informed about what the test meant. In the SS group, two women also held this opinion. In 10 out of the 20 women in the SS group, the positive-screening result had caused (a great deal of) anxiety. In the NT group, this proportion was as high as 18 out of the 20. Six of the women in the NT group mentioned that 'seeing the baby' had been an important factor in their decision to undergo CVS. Even after a favourable result of CVS, a proportion of the pregnant women were still feeling anxious about the health of their baby (5 women in the SS group and 12 in the NT group). Nevertheless, a large proportion of the women in both groups was pleased that they had undergone the screening test. Only a few of them stated that they would not choose the same screening test again in a future pregnancy.An unfavourable screening result after NT screening appeared to have a greater impact than an unfavourable result after serum screening. This might partly be explained by the ultrasound examination visualising the increased risk during NT screening. An additional important role may have been played by the fact that an abnormal NT screening result implies an increased risk of other disorders besides Down syndrome, which the women should be informed about beforehand. Several factors place special demands on the counselling prior to NT screening.Maternal serum screening for neural tube defects and Down's syndrome.Dose dependency between cigarette consumption and reduced maternal serum PAPP-A levels at 11-13+6 weeks of gestation.To examine whether in smokers there is a significant dose dependency between the number of cigarettes per day and levels of free ss-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) at 11-13(+6) weeks of gestation.This was a retrospective analysis of the maternal serum free ss-hCG and PAPP-A levels in relation to the maternal smoking status in 109 263 chromosomally normal singleton pregnancies that had undergone first-trimester screening for Down syndrome by a combination of fetal nuchal translucency thickness and maternal serum biochemistry.There were 95 287 nonsmokers and 13 976 cigarette smokers. The overall median PAPP-A MoM among cigarette smokers was 0.827, which was 19.6% lower than the value of 1.029 in nonsmokers (p < 0.0001 for log(10) MoM). The respective values for beta-hCG MoM were 1.003 for smokers and 1.035 for nonsmokers (p < 0.0001 for log(10) MoM) which corresponds to a reduction of 3.1%. There was a significant inverse relationship between the number of cigarettes per day and the level of PAPP-A MoM (r = 0.989, p < 0.0001) but not the level of free beta-hCG MoM (r = 0.733; p = 0.098). Using a statistical modeling approach we found that the screen-positive rate when correcting the PAPP-A MoM by an all or nil smoking factor was reduced by only 0.1% (3.75 vs 3.85%) when compared to correcting with a factor related to the smoking dose per day.In first-trimester screening for Down syndrome by maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG the impact of correcting for the dose dependant rather than the all or nil effect of smoking is marginal. However, a dose dependent correction improves the accuracy of the individual patient-specific risk.Normal nuchal thickness in the midtrimester indicates reduced risk of Down syndrome in pregnancies with abnormal triple-screen results.Our purpose was to determine whether nuchal thickness measurement can identify the euploid fetuses in midtrimester pregnancies at increased risk for Down syndrome on the basis of maternal age and serum screening.Nuchal thickness was obtained prospectively in 651 consecutive fetuses at 14 to 21 weeks' gestation and at > or = 1:270 risk for Down syndrome on the basis of unconjugated estriol, alpha-fetoprotein, and human chorionic gonadotropin levels. The risk of Down syndrome with a normal nuchal thickness was determined. A receiver-operator characteristic curve was used to determine a serum-based risk threshold below which the risk for Down syndrome was low. The prevalence of Down syndrome in fetuses with both a normal nuchal thickness and a below-serum-risk threshold was compared with prevalence in either those above threshold risk or with an abnormal nuchal thickness.There were eight cases of trisomy 21 and one case each of 46,XX/47,XXX, 46,XY/47,XY, +7, and 46,XX, 11q-. The sensitivity of an abnormal nuchal thickness (> or = 6 mm) for detecting Down syndrome was four in eight (50%) (95%) confidence interval 15.3% to 84.6%). The risk of Down syndrome was significantly increased with an abnormal compared with a normal nuchal thickness, four in 13 (30.8%) versus four in 638 (0.6%), p < 0.0001. A risk threshold was defined at > or = 1:100 on the basis of the receiver-operator characteristic plot. Of 390 cases with a normal nuchal thickness and a serum risk estimate < 1:100, there were no cases of Down syndrome (0/390 vs 8/253, p = 0.002).Normal nuchal thickness significantly reduces the risk of Down syndrome and may help reduce the number of amniocenteses done for abnormal triple screen results.Maternal urinary beta-core fragment of hCG/creatinine ratios and fetal chromosomal abnormalities in the second trimester of pregnancy.Our aim was to evaluate the potential value of the ratio of the maternal urinary beta-core fragment of human chorionic gonadotropin (beta C-hCG) to creatinine (Cr) in discriminating between normal pregnancies and pregnancies associated with fetal chromosomal abnormalities. We hypothesized that pregnancies with fetal chromosomal abnormalities had abnormal quantities of beta C-hCG in the urine. The aims of the present study were to investigate retrospectively whether maternal urinary ratios of beta C-hCG/Cr are abnormal in women carrying fetuses with chromosome aberrations and to determine normative median values and a reference range for beta C-hCG/Cr between 14 and 19 weeks' gestation. Maternal urinary beta C-hCG and Cr concentrations were measured in 150 healthy women from 14 to 19 weeks and compared with ten cases of fetal chromosomal abnormalities matched for gestational age. The preliminary cut-off points corresponded to 0.29 multiple of the normal median (MOM) and 2.83 MOM, which were equivalent to the tenth and 90th centiles of the normal range. Of ten cases of fetal chromosomal abnormalities, one out of one (100 per cent) case with trisomy 18 and three of four (75 per cent) cases of variant 9 chromosomes had low beta C-hCG/Cr (< or = 0.29 MOM). One of five (20 per cent) cases with Down syndrome had elevated beta C-hCG/Cr (> or = 2.83 MOM). Urinary beta C-hCG/Cr ratios obtained in the second trimester may be useful for improved detection efficiency of Down syndrome, trisomy 18, and inversion of chromosome 9. Second-trimester maternal urinary beta C-hCG/Cr should be investigated further as a potential marker for fetal chromosome anomalies.The influence of gravidity on Down's syndrome screening with free beta hCG.Total human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) levels have been shown in one previous small study to vary with gravidity. In order to establish if maternal serum free beta hCG was similarly affected, approximately 4500 pregnancies of varying gravidity were analysed. The results indicated that there was a 6 per cent higher median MOM in primigravid compared with multigravid women. The impact of such elevation in Down's syndrome screening programmes will be minimal.Maternal weight and ethnic adjustment within a first-trimester Down syndrome and trisomy 18 screening program.To estimate weight and ethnic group correction factors for first-trimester screening markers.Ethnic-specific median MoM free beta hCG and pregnancy associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and delta nuchal translucency values were calculated for cohorts of maternal weight (20 lb each) using data from 51,206 patients undergoing first-trimester screening. False-positive rates for Down syndrome and trisomy 18 were evaluated both prior to and after weight and ethnicity adjustment.Free beta hCG and PAPP-A significantly decreased with increasing maternal weight while nuchal translucency increased by a clinically insignificant amount. For free beta hCG the regression formula indicated that after accounting for maternal weight MoM values were 16% higher for African Americans, 6% higher for Asians and 9% lower for Hispanics compared to Caucasians (p < 0.001, p = 0.001, p < 0.001, respectively) but there was no significant difference for Asian Indians. For PAPP-A, MoM values were 35% higher for African Americans (p < 0.001) but were not significantly different for the other ethnic groups compared to Caucasians. Down syndrome false-positive rates did not vary with maternal weight prior to (p = 0.291) or after weight adjustment of biochemistry (p = 0.054). Trisomy 18 false-positive rates varied significantly with weight both before (OR = 1.455 per 20-pound increase, p < 0.001) and after (OR = 1.066 per 20-pound increase, p = 0.01) weight adjustment of biochemistry; however, the odds ratio was greatly reduced after weight adjustment.The first-trimester screening markers, free beta hCG, PAPP-A and nuchal translucency vary with maternal weight and ethnicity. Adjustment of free beta hCG and PAPP-A is indicated but adjustment of nuchal translucency results may not be necessary.Practical strategies in contingent sequential screening for Down syndrome.To design and assess the performance of protocols for contingent sequential Down syndrome screening that can be implemented in practice.Protocols were designed in which all women received first-trimester measurement of nuchal translucency (NT) together with maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and either free beta- or total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG). Those women with borderline Down syndrome risks received follow-up second-trimester maternal serum involving double, triple, or quadruple serum screening markers: alpha-fetoprotein, free beta-hCG or total hCG, unconjugated estriol and inhibin-A. Specific ranges of risks were used to define the borderline group. Separate protocols were developed for the United Kingdom and the United States to reflect differences in commonly used tests, cut-offs, and the gestational age at testing. Detection rates and false-positive rates were estimated by multivariate Gaussian modelling with Monte Carlo simulation.Proposed protocols based on first-trimester NT, PAPP-A and free beta-hCG or total hCG, followed by selective use of second-trimester quadruple markers can result in a 91% detection rate and 2.1% false-positive rate for the United Kingdom and a detection rate of 89% and false-positive rate of 3.1% for the United States. For both countries, over 60% of affected pregnancies would be detected in the first trimester and less than 20% of women would require a second-trimester Down syndrome risk assessment. Use of alternative cut-offs to define those with borderline risks or different combinations of second-trimester markers also yielded high detection rates and low false-positive rates.With appropriate patient counselling, it should be possible to provide highly effective Down syndrome screening using contingent sequential protocols.Maternal serum screening and routine 18-week ultrasound in the detection of all chromosomal abnormalities.Over a 15-month period, maternal serum screening (alpha fetoprotein, oestriol, chorionic gonadotrophin) and ultrasound were evaluated in the detection of all chromosomal abnormalities. Of the 981 screened, there were 8 chromosomally abnormal pregnancies. Six of these were considered to be at increased risk on serum screening, all of which were detected. Of the remaining 2, one was detected by ultrasound and the other resulted in a liveborn baby with trisomy 21. The positive and negative predictive values for serum screening for all chromosomal abnormalities was 7.8% and 99.9% respectively. The sensitivity and specificity was 87.5% and 91.5% respectively. Serum screening is useful in the detection of many chromosomal abnormalities, not just Down syndrome. The combination of maternal serum screening and ultrasound has a high negative predictive value and is valuable in providing reassurance of no underlying chromosomal abnormality. With a positive predictive value of 7.8% a chromosomal abnormality will be found once in every 13 amniocenteses performed.Temporal changes in maternal serum biochemical markers of trisomy 21 across the first and second trimester of pregnancy.Many maternal serum markers show concentration changes in Down's syndrome pregnancies but the magnitude of the change in median marker levels varies with gestation. To date these changes have not been accurately specified.The trends in marker median levels between 6 and 20 weeks of gestation were examined for alphafetoprotein (AFP), free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (Fbeta-hCG), total human chorionic gonadotrophin (ThCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) by a meta-analysis of data obtained from our collaborative studies and routine screening programmes for Down's syndrome over a 10-year period. Data were available from between 709 and 1082 Down's syndrome pregnancies and from between 14607 and 153909 unaffected pregnancies for each marker. The median multiple of the median (MoM) and mean log10MoM for each marker at each completed week of gestation were estimated and the trend with gestation smoothed using a weighted least squares regression model.The gestational ages at which maximum separation of marker levels occurred, comparing affected and unaffected pregnancies, and the respective regressed median MoMs and mean log10MoMs, were: for AFP at 16 weeks, 0.72 MoM, -0.14288log10MoM; for Fbeta-hCG at 15 weeks, 2-24MoM, 0.35034 log10MoM; for ThCG at 16 weeks, 1.93 MoM, 0.28548 log10MoM, as well as before 8 weeks (<0.65 MoM, -0.18853 log10MoM); and for PAPP-A before 8 weeks, <0.33 MoM, -0.47727 log10MoM.There is significant temporal variation in mean log10MoM values for the screening markers investigated. Screening algorithms, modified to take account of this variation, should allow more accurate gestation-specific risks to be calculated in individual pregnancies.Fetal nasal bone length in euploid and aneuploid fetuses between 11 and 20 weeks' gestation: a prospective study.To develop normative data for nasal bone length between 11 and 20 weeks' gestation and to assess the utility of nasal bone hypoplasia in the detection of fetal aneuploidy in the second trimester.Well-dated, nonanomalous fetuses were examined between 11 and 20.9 weeks' gestation. The nasal bone was assessed and measured, and normative data from 11 to 20 weeks' gestation were determined. The nasal bone lengths in fetuses with confirmed aneuploidy were compared with the normative data.The fetal nasal bone length increased linearly with advancing gestational age. Nomograms including the 10th, 50th, and 90th percentiles were created. Nasal bone hypoplasia was seen in 6 of 6 cases of fetal trisomy in the second trimester.Nasal bone hypoplasia in the early second trimester identifies a cohort of fetuses at high risk for aneuploidy.Maternal serum inhibin-A in pregnancies complicated by insulin dependent diabetes mellitus.We have examined whether insulin dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM) affects maternal serum levels of inhibin-A, a recently described prenatal marker of Down's syndrome, by comparing levels in 169 women with IDDM with levels in 432 nondiabetic pregnant women between 15 and 20 weeks of gestation. There was a small but significant increase in the inhibin-A level in the diabetic women only when levels were corrected for maternal weight: median MoM 1.17 (P < 0.01 vs controls, Student's t test). The underlying mechanism for this elevation in pregnancies complicated by IDDM currently remains obscure.Do racial differences exist in second-trimester maternal hCG levels? A study of 23,369 patients.In Down syndrome screening by maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) determination at 15, 16, 17, and 18 weeks of gestation, we prospectively examined 23,369 sera from white (21,549), North African (970), black African (525), and Asian (325) patients. When expressed as multiples of the median (MOM), no difference was observed between white, North African, and black African patients. However, higher serum hCG concentrations were noted in Asians, for whom we therefore recommend correction of hCG values before calculation of the risk of Down syndrome.First trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein in fetal trisomies.To evaluate the potential value of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein concentration in the detection of fetal trisomy at 10 to 13 weeks gestation and to examine the possible association between maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and fetal nuchal translucency thickness.Cross-sectional study.Harris Birthright Research Centre for Fetal Medicine, King's College Hospital Medical School, London.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein concentration was measured at 10 to 13 weeks gestation in samples from 57 pregnancies with fetal trisomies (trisomy 21 (n = 35), trisomy 18 (n = 16), and trisomy 13 (n = 6)) in 228 matched controls in whom the fetal nuchal translucency was < 3 mm and in 114 chromosomally normal fetuses with translucency > or = 3 mm.In the control group maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein increased significantly with fetal crown-rump length (r = 0.451). In this group, the median maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein was not significantly different from that in the groups with trisomy 21 (median = 0.84 MoM), trisomy 18 (median = 0.86 MoM), or trisomy 13 (median = 0.94 MoM), respectively. Neither in the control group nor in the group with trisomic fetuses was maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein significantly associated with fetal nuchal translucency thickness (r = 0.01 and r = 0.03).Measurement of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein concentration in the first trimester of pregnancy is not likely to be useful in the prediction of fetal trisomies.The effect of fetal gender on second-trimester maternal serum inhibin-A concentration.Second-trimester serum inhibin-A is increasingly used as a fourth marker in addition to the triple test to screen for Down syndrome. We investigated whether fetal gender had an effect on serum inhibin-A concentration. A retrospective analysis was done on 316 normal pregnancies and 48 Down syndrome pregnancies in which maternal serum inhibin-A assays were performed between 15 and 20 weeks of gestation and in which the fetal sex was known. The median inhibin-A MoM (95% CI) for normal pregnancies in the presence of a male fetus was 0.93 (range 0.88-1.03). This was significantly lower than that in the presence of a female fetus (median MoM=1.04). The gender difference was not observed in the Down syndrome pregnancies. The increased inhibin-A concentration would lead to a 2.3-fold higher false-positive rate in the presence of a female fetus (10.6% vs. 4.6%; p<0.05, Chi-square test). Because of the small number of cases studied, the results need to be substantiated by a larger series. If the gender effect is confirmed, adjustment for fetal sex may be necessary when inhibin-A is used as a screening marker.Comparison of triple serum screening and pregnancy outcome in oocyte donation versus IVF pregnancies.The current study compared triple serum screening results and outcomes in 37 oocyte donation (OD) and 46 self oocyte IVF-conceived singletons of similarly aged women (28.8 +/- 4.4 years and 30.7 +/- 4.5 years respectively). Both groups were followed from their embryo transfer and throughout pregnancy. Although the daily pattern of first-trimester serum beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (HCG) was similar in both groups, higher mid-gestation HCG serum concentrations were found, i.e. 1.38 and 1.32 multiples of the median (median MoM) for IVF and OD respectively, in comparison with 0.99 median MoM from the same reference laboratory. Only the OD group had significantly increased alpha fetoprotein (AFP) concentrations (1.45 median MoM) (P = 0.002) compared with the reference laboratory. A total of 11% of the IVF and 13% of the OD women were found to be screen positive. In neither group were chromosomal abnormalities detected and no fetal or neonatal deaths were recorded. Seven (15%) of the OD and seven (19%) of the IVF women had an adverse obstetric outcome. Of those cases, six IVF and four OD women had serum HCG > or = 1.2 MoM and five OD women had AFP >1.2 MoM. Therefore, in those pregnancies the high serum HCG concentrations may alert for adverse obstetric outcome rather than indicating a high risk for Down's syndrome fetuses.Practical issues drawn from the implementation of the integrated test for Down syndrome screening into routine clinical practice.We have evaluated a cohort of women booked for antenatal care at University College London Hospitals. The uptake of screening was 64.4% and was significantly higher (73 versus 46%) in women who booked before 14 weeks. Of the women who booked before 14 weeks, 96.8% opted for the integrated test (IT). Overall, 5.3% failed to attend for the second blood test. The false-positive rate in the women who had the IT was 2.9%. All 11 cases of Down syndrome were detected prenatally. Our study is the first to evaluate implementation of the IT into routine clinical practice.Screening for Down's syndrome: the first two years experience in Bristol.To evaluate the effectiveness of a programme for antenatal screening for Down's syndrome using alpha fetoprotein and total human chorionic gonadotrophin as maternal serum markers.A district general hospital providing a screening service to a local purchasing authority and (under contract) to another purchasing authority in the same region.Patients were counselled and screened between 15 and 20 weeks gestation and Down's risk estimates calculated using the maternal serum marker results as modifiers of the age related risk. Outcome was determined in collaboration with the Regional Cytogenetics Unit.Detection rate for Down's syndrome, false positive rate, uptake of screening, and uptake of amniocentesis.In two years 22816 women were screened (approximately 84% of population); 32 Down's pregnancies were identified, 19 (59.4%) had a reported risk of > or = 1:250 and 20 (62.5%) a reported risk of > or = 1:300. Of those screened before 17 weeks, 16/20 (80%) had a reported risk of > or = 1: 300 compared with 4/12 (33%) of those screened later (P = 0.008); 4.64% of patients screened had reported risks > or = 1: 250 and 5.87% reported risks of > or = 1:300. Amniocentesis uptake was 70% in patients with reported risks of > or = 1:300.Overall the screening programme was effective but screening before 17 weeks was very much more effective than screening later.Prenatal screening for Down's syndrome using inhibin-A as a serum marker.The value of measuring inhibin-A (a beta A dimer) with human chorionic gonadotrophin (total or the sub-units free a-hCG and free beta-hCG separately), alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) was examined to determine the effect on the performance of serum screening for Down's syndrome between 15 and 22 weeks of pregnancy. The study was based on stored serum samples from 77 Down's syndrome singleton pregnancies and 385 unaffected singleton pregnancies, matched for maternal age, gestational age, and duration of storage of the sample, supplemented by data from 970 white women with unaffected pregnancies. Inhibin-A was elevated in the serum of women with Down's syndrome pregnancies with a median of 1.79 multiples of the median (MOM). Using the four serum markers AFP, uE3, total hCG, and inhibin-A, in addition to maternal age, 70 per cent of Down's syndrome pregnancies were detected for a 5 per cent false-positive rate compared with 59 per cent with the conventional triple test (AFP, uE3, and total hCG with maternal age). If the estimate of gestational age were based on an ultrasound scan examination, the detection rate would be 77 per cent [95 per cent confidence interval (CI) 69-85 per cent] using the four serum markers including inhibin-A, compared with 67 per cent with the triple test or 79 per cent (95 per cent CI 71-87 per cent) if marker values were adjusted for maternal weight. If the detection rate were kept at 70 per cent and the gestational age were estimated by an ultrasound scan examination, the four-marker test would reduce the false-positive rate from 6-1 per cent using the triple test to 2-9 per cent. The results were virtually the same if free beta-hCG was used instead of total hCG. The inhibin-A-based four-marker test is the most effective method of prenatal screening for Down's syndrome suitable for routine use. If the extra cost required to carry out the inhibin-A test were less than about [symbol: see text]3 per woman screened, the four-marker test including inhibin-A would be financially cost-effective.Triple marker screening for trisomy 21, trisomy 18 and open neural tube defects in singleton pregnancies of native Japanese pregnant women.To report the results of prenatal triple marker screening on a population of Japanese pregnant women.From April 1994 through March 1999, a total of 32,925 native Japanese women with singleton pregnancies requested a triple marker-screening test. Multiples of the median values for 3 markers and individual risks for each patient were calculated following adjustment for the Japanese weight correction factor. The risk cut-off values used for Down syndrome (T21), open spina bifida (OSB) and trisomy 18 (T18) were 1: 295, 1: 290, and 1: 100, respectively. Follow-up information was collected postpartum and statistically analyzed.Detection rates (DR) of T21 for women less than 35 years, over 35 years and overall were 58, 94, and 83%, respectively. DR of T18 for women less than 35 years, over 35 years and overall were 75, 79, and 79%, respectively. DR of open neural tube defects (ONTD) was 100%.The first cumulative data of an intervention program and prospective follow-up studies in Japan have proven to be similar to other published reports. Individual risk values were calculated for each pregnancy for T21, T18 and ONTD. This screening program is more effective than age-dependent screening for detecting T21, T18 and ONTD pregnancies.Prenatal screening for chromosome abnormalities using maternal serum chorionic gonadotrophin, alpha-fetoprotein, and age.Human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) levels were assayed retrospectively in stored maternal serum samples from 78 chromosomally abnormal pregnancies and 410 controls matched for gestation and maternal age. The median serum hCG concentration in 49 pregnancies with Down's syndrome was significantly elevated, at 2.18 multiples of the normal median. Significantly reduced hCG concentrations were found in a group of four trisomy 18 pregnancies (all less than 0.4 multiples of the median). Eight cases of unbalanced chromosome rearrangements appeared to show some lowering of hCG levels, while there was no significant difference in the levels in the cases of trisomy 13, balanced translocations, and sex chromosome abnormalities. Maternal serum hCG alone is a better indicator of Down's syndrome pregnancies than maternal age or maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), either individually or in combination, and provides a further virtually independent measure of risk. On the basis of our findings, screening for Down's syndrome using hCG and AFP results combined with maternal age risks is predicted to result in a higher detection rate (57 per cent) for a lower false-positive rate (5.0 per cent) than would be attainable by combined AFP and age screening (37 per cent detection at a 6.6 per cent false-positive rate).Combining fetal nuchal fold thickness with second-trimester biochemistry to screen for trisomy 21.To assess second-trimester screening for trisomy 21 by combining ultrasound nuchal fold (NF) measurement with maternal serum biochemistry.NF, maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) were determined concurrently at 14-19 weeks' gestation in a study population comprising 1813 women with singleton pregnancies, including 1257 unselected women undergoing serum screening for trisomy 21 (1999-2002), and 556 high-risk pregnancies prior to amniocentesis (2003-2005), 402 of whom had positive serum screening tests. The results were expressed in multiples of the gestation-specific normal median (MoMs).There were 1799 unaffected singleton pregnancies, and their NF values approximately fitted a log Gaussian distribution over a wide range. There was a weak but statistically significant correlation between log NF and log AFP (r = - 0.069, P < 0.005) and the correlation coefficient between log NF and log free beta-hCG was even smaller and not statistically significant (r = 0.038, P = 0.11). Among the seven trisomy 21 pregnancies, the median NF level was 1.53 MoM (geometric mean 1.75 MoM), a highly statistically significant increase compared with unaffected pregnancies (P < 0.0001, one-tail Wilcoxon Rank Sum Test). In pregnancies referred because of positive serum screening tests (391 unaffected, seven cases of trisomy 21, one of monosomy X and three other chromosomal anomalies) the use of NF to modify the serum screening risk would have reduced the invasive procedures in unaffected pregnancies by 46% without affecting the detection rate of trisomy 21 or other anomalies. Statistical modeling predicted that adding NF to AFP and free beta-hCG would increase detection more than would adding unconjugated estriol as well as inhibin-A, an analyte that is difficult to measure with precision.The addition of NF measurement to second-trimester biochemical markers improves screening performance, and could overcome drawbacks in the implementation of inhibin-A assay in clinical practice.Maternal serum free alpha-human chorionic gonadotrophin levels in twin pregnancies: implications for screening for Down's syndrome.Maternal serum free alpha-human chorionic gonadotrophin (free alpha-hCG) levels were determined in twin and singleton pregnancies at 15-22 weeks of gestation using a set of stored serum samples relating to 200 twin pregnancies and 600 singleton control pregnancies matched for gestational age and duration of storage. Free alpha-hCG values are, on average, 1.66 times greater in twin pregnancies than in singleton pregnancies (95 per cent confidence interval 1.56-1.76). If maternal serum free alpha-hCG is used in screening for Down's syndrome, values in twin pregnancies can be adjusted using this result so that screening can be performed in twin pregnancies as well as in singleton pregnancies.Influence of smoking habits on Down's syndrome risk evaluation at mid-trimester through biochemical screening.Expectant mothers who smoke have higher levels of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and lower levels of unconjugated estriol and total human chorionic gonadotrophin than non-smoking mothers. This significantly affects performance of screening for Down's syndrome. This study includes 22,169 pregnant women: 18,876 non-smokers, 2,660 smoking < or = 10 cigarettes/day, and 633 smoking > 10 cigarettes/day. Mean maternal age (32.6 years), maternal weight (60.5 kg), and gestational age (114.7 days) were similar or only slightly different between the three groups. To verify the effects of smoking on screening, we studied retrospectively 130 sequential Down's syndrome cases (47 from the screening program, 83 from the prenatal diagnosis program). The proportion of smokers in the Down's syndrome and unaffected pregnancies was similar, whilst the false-positive rate and detection rate, based on fetal outcome, differed: false-positive rates were 5.63% in smokers and 9.42% in non-smokers, and detection rate 55.6% in smokers and 83.0% in non-smokers. Since the prevalence of Down's syndrome pregnancies was the same at mid-trimester in smokers and non-smokers and the proportion of smokers was not related to maternal age, we propose an adjustment of the Down's syndrome risk evaluation algorithm according to smoking habits.Maternal serum Down syndrome screening: free beta-protein is a more effective marker than human chorionic gonadotropin.The use of quantitative human chorionic gonadotropin measurement in obstetrics has a long and successful history. Prior studies on the utility of human chorionic gonadotropin in Down syndrome screening have utilized assays that measure the intact human chorionic gonadotropin molecule. This study targeted a distinct marker, the human chorionic gonadotropin free beta-protein, which is present in second-trimester maternal serum at much lower concentrations than is intact human chorionic gonadotropin. Our study of 29 cases of trisomy 21 and 450 control samples shows 80% detection efficiency with maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, the free beta-protein, and maternal age in pregnancies under 17 weeks' gestation. We conclude that the combination of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and the human chorionic gonadotropin free beta-protein will be useful in the prenatal detection of trisomy 21.Free beta human choriogonadotropin in Down's syndrome screening: a multicentre study of its role compared with other biochemical markers.To ascertain the value of maternal serum free beta-human choriogonadotropin subunit measurement in Down's syndrome screening and to compare its effectiveness when screening with a variety of biochemical markers, we have evaluated maternal serum free beta-human choriogonadotropin, total human choriogonadotropin, alpha-fetoprotein and unconjugated oestriol in a large multicentre study of over 2800 unaffected cases and 90 affected cases, the largest collection of Down's cases ever reported. Of all the markers identified to date, free beta-human choriogonadotropin is the marker of choice for use in Down's syndrome screening. When used in early gestation (14-16 weeks) in combination with alpha-fetoprotein and maternal age, it will allow the detection of 77% of Down's cases. A side-by-side comparison with the performance of total human choriogonadotropin shows the superior detection efficiency of free beta-human choriogonadotropin. Unconjugated oestriol adds nothing further to the detection rate compared with the use of alpha-fetoprotein and free beta-human choriogonadotropin alone, and its use results in a 1% increase in false positive rate. We conclude that unconjugated oestriol has no value in Down's screening. The superior detection rate obtained using free beta-human choriogonadotropin is a result of superior detection of Down's cases in women under 30 years old, where the free beta-human choriogonadotropin combination detects 100% more cases than does the total human choriogonadotropin combination.Urine free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin levels between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation in Taiwanese pregnancies.The purpose of this study was to determine the reference range of maternal urine free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta -hCG) concentrations between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation.We measured the concentrations of urine free beta -hCG from 268 healthy singleton Taiwanese pregnancies between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation. Results were corrected for creatinine (Cr) concentration and converted to the multiple of the median (MOM) level for the appropriate gestation. Gestational ages of all cases were determined using ultrasound dating.The median levels of urine free beta -hCG and free beta-hCG/Cr had a downward trend in association with the increasing gestation age. The median, 5th, 10th, 90th and 95th centiles of free beta- hCG/Cr MOM values were 1.02, 0.20, 0.25, 2.32 and 3.38 MOM, respectively. Urine free beta- hCG/Cr MOM values showed a log Gaussian distribution with the mean and standard deviation (SD) distribution of -0.0657 and 0.3792, respectively.To allow for differences in free beta -hCG/Cr median values at various ages of gestation, establishment of the reference range is essential for further development of maternal urine screening for Down syndrome.Racial differences in maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin and unconjugated oestriol levels.We assayed maternal serum samples from 134 black and 268 white women from 16 to 18 weeks of gestation for intact human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated oestriol (uE3). Serum from women with high (> or = 2.5 MOMs) or low (risk for Down syndrome > or = 1/365) maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) levels were excluded. After correcting for maternal weight, we found that median hCG levels were 16 per cent higher in black women but uE3 levels were not significantly different. These results confirm three other studies for hCG and one study for uE3. Corrections are recommended for both maternal serum hCG and AFP before calculating the risk for Down syndrome in black women.Assessment of the fetal nasal bone at 11-14 weeks of gestation by three-dimensional ultrasound.To evaluate the benefit of three-dimensional (3D) ultrasound in the examination of the fetal nasal bone at 11-14 weeks of gestation.We examined the fetal nasal bone in 120 stored volumes acquired transabdominally with a 3D scanner from singleton pregnancies at 11-14 weeks of gestation. The volume acquisition had been performed following conventional ultrasound examination that had demonstrated presence of the fetal nasal bone. The volumes were obtained with two-dimensional (2D) start images in transverse, coronal mid-sagittal, parasagittal and oblique longitudinal sections of the fetal head.In the transverse and coronal sections, a satisfactory image demonstrating presence of the nasal bone was achieved in only three and one, respectively, of the 20 volumes that we obtained. In mid-sagittal sections, the nasal bone was always visible when the angle was within a range of 30-60 degrees, without the need for sectional image analysis. None of the images with an angle >60 degrees or <30 degrees was satisfactory. In the parasagittal sections with the fetal profile at 45 degrees, a good-quality image of the nasal bone was possible in all cases that were examined, irrespective of the distance from the mid-sagittal plane. In the oblique longitudinal sections with the fetal profile at 45 degrees, there were 10 volumes where the 2D start section was at 0-25 degrees from the midline and in all these cases the nasal bone was successfully visualized. In contrast, only 5/20 cases where the 2D start section was at 25-90 degrees from the midline provided a satisfactory image demonstrating the nasal bone. In 5/10 volumes obtained with the fetus facing downwards the nasal bone was visible in both the 2D and 3D images.In a 3D volume the extent to which the nasal bone can be demonstrated to be present in a given reconstructed section is entirely dependent on obtaining a good initial 2D view.[Biochemical and ultrasonic screening of chromosomal aneuploidies in the second trimester of pregnancy].For prenatal screening of chromosomal aneuploidies (primarily the most frequent Down syndrome) maternal serum AFP screening in the second trimester of pregnancy has been supplemented by the determination of hCG in Hajdú-Bihar county. In pregnancies at risk on the basis of biochemical tests, a thorough, aimed ultrasound examination for the detection of minor and major anomalies characteristic for chromosomal abnormalities was carried out. If both biochemical and ultrasound examinations were suggestive of high risk prenatal karyotyping was offered. During a two-years prospective study 14328 pregnancies were screened. Authors could detect 38% of Down-syndrome cases prenatally, 5 cases in pregnant women at age under 35 years and at the same time the number of amniocenteses increased only by 70. It was concluded that 66% of all Down syndrome cases could have been prenatally diagnosed if prenatal chromosome test were performed in all cases at high risk on the basis of screening tests and maternal age.Complete trisomy 21 vs translocation Down syndrome: a comparison of modes of ascertainment.To compare the indications for invasive prenatal testing resulting in the detection of translocation Down syndrome and complete trisomy 21.This case control study was based on a large amniocentesis and chorionic villi samples database (n = 534,795). All specimens with translocation Down syndrome (n = 203) comprised the translocation group and were compared with a maternal age-matched group (4 to 1, n = 812) in which complete trisomy 21 was detected. Women with a normal karyotype were randomly selected (n = 812) and served as controls. Indications for invasive testing were compared among the 3 paired groups using χ(2) analysis.There were no differences in the incidence of abnormal first- and second-trimester screening tests between the translocation Down syndrome and the complete trisomy 21 groups. History of prior aneuploidy was significantly more frequent in the translocation Down syndrome group, as compared with either complete trisomy 21 fetuses or normal controls.Fetuses with translocation Down syndrome present with the same screening abnormalities as fetuses with complete trisomy 21.[Low maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein concentration and Down syndrome].Prenatal diagnosis using the triple test.A screening study performed on 2,803 pregnant women using the "triple test" is reported.Nine hundred and twenty-one had a high prior risk, having > 35 years while, after the screening, only 201 women had a positive test at risk higher than 1:270, and underwent to amniocentesis. The detection rate (DR) for all abnormalities was 91% while for Down's syndrome (DS) it was 87.5% and for neural tube defects 85.5%. Foetal abnormalities were detected in 20 cases (1:10) while 181 were false positive cases (6.5%), of which 151 for DS (5.4%). False negative were observed only in 2 cases within 2,339 at term pregnancies.The authors retain that high DR is related to the exactness of determination of gestation age calculated by scan and to the homogeneity of the examined population.Incorporation of inhibin-A in second-trimester screening for Down syndrome.To evaluate the efficacy of the second-trimester quadruple test (maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, human chorionic gonadotropin, and inhibin-A) in prenatal screening for Down syndrome.All quadruple tests performed on singleton pregnancies over a 32-month period were reviewed. The sensitivity and false-positive rates were compared with the theoretic rates predicted by the screening model when applied to a population of women with the same maternal age distribution.Twenty-three thousand seven hundred four women with unaffected pregnancies and 45 women with Down syndrome-affected pregnancies received the quadruple test. Mean analyte values for both unaffected and affected pregnancies were similar to those expected. The sensitivity of the quadruple test, which was based on ascertainment of all viable affected pregnancies in the screened population, was 85.8%. This sensitivity did not significantly differ from an expected 83.8% (P =.8). The initial false-positive rate, 9.0%, was significantly below that expected (9.9%) (P =.002) and was further reduced to 8.2% after correction for major gestational age errors. The positive predictive value of the quadruple test was one in 51. Women with an affected pregnancy and a positive test result (true positives) generally had very high risks (median 1:22) relative to women with false-positive results (median risk 1:111).The quadruple test meets or exceeds performance expectations and appears to represent an improvement over the widely used triple test.Maternal serum human chorionic gonadotrophin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A, markers for fetal Down syndrome at 8-14 weeks.Maternal serum levels of human chorionic gonadotrophin and its subunits (intact, alpha, and free beta h CG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) were measured in 279 women between 8 and 14 weeks' gestation. This group included 23 pregnancies in which the fetus had Down syndrome (DS), diagnosed either at birth or during the second trimester (n = 17) or from chorionic villus sampling (CVS) (n = 6). Normal medians were determined from the 258 apparently normal pregnancies. The median levels of intact hCG (1.4 MOM) and free beta hCG (2.1 MOM) were significantly raised, whereas the median level of PAPP-A (0.39 MOM) was significantly lower in the DS pregnancies when compared with the control group. Levels of alpha hCG were similar in both the control and the DS pregnancies. Analysis of samples taken prior to 14 weeks' gestation demonstrated that only PAPP-A (0.34 MOM) was significantly altered in DS pregnancies. However, after the exclusion of DS cases diagnosed at CVS, the median intact hCG (1.56 MOM), free beta hCG (2.27 MOM), and alpha hCG (1.8 MOM) were all raised in DS pregnancies. This emphasizes the problem of the interpretation of biochemical markers when DS cases are diagnosed at CVS.Maternal serum invasive trophoblast antigen and first-trimester Down syndrome screening.In the United States, Down syndrome screening is still performed mainly in the second trimester, using 3 or 4 markers. Moving screening into the first trimester has the advantage of earlier diagnosis. Currently, first-trimester screening typically includes maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), the free beta-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin (free beta), and ultrasound measurement of nuchal translucency thickness (NT). The current report describes a case-control study of serum invasive trophoblast antigen (ITA) and its possible inclusion in first-trimester screening for Down syndrome.As part of an earlier observational study, serum samples from 54 Down syndrome and 276 matched unaffected pregnancies were collected between 9 and 15 weeks of gestation. Samples had been aliquoted and stored at -20 degrees C for 8 years. ITA was measured and converted to weight-adjusted multiples of the median (MoM). The distributions of other first-trimester markers are from a single published study.Median ITA MoM in Down syndrome pregnancies increase as gestational age increases (2.02 MoM at 11 and 2.44 MoM at 13 completed weeks). At 75% detection, maternal age in combination with ITA and PAPP-A measurements have an 8.0% false-positive rate, slightly lower than the 8.8% found for the free beta and PAPP-A combination; adding NT measurements reduces false positives for the 2 combinations to 2.0% and 1.8%, respectively.Serum ITA appears to be a useful first-trimester Down syndrome marker that could replace free beta measurements while maintaining performance.Combined serum and ultrasound screening for detection of fetal aneuploidy.Experience gathered over the last decade from high-risk centers provide strong evidence that mid-trimester sonographic markers are sensitive for Down syndrome prediction. More recent data indicate that combining mid trimester sonography with traditional serum markers significantly improves diagnostic accuracy over either group of markers by themselves.Variability of nuchal translucency measurement: a multicenter study in Thailand.To evaluate intra- and inter-observer variations of nuchal translucency (NT) measurements and study the duration of measurements.One hundred and forty-seven singleton pregnant women with 10-14 weeks of gestation who had attended antenatal clinic during January 1st, 2000-August 31st, 2001 were included.Crown-rump length and NT were measured three times for each woman. Then, another examiner who was unaware of the previous results did the other three measurements. The duration of measurements was recorded. Intra-observer and inter-observer variations were analyzed by repeated ANOVA and paired t test, respectively. The correlation of NT measurements within each observer and between paired observers was evaluated by intraclass correlation coefficients (ICC). Kappa statistic was calculated for agreement.Intra-observer variation of all 10 examiners at three institutes was varied from 0.20 +/- 0.27 to 0.33 +/- 0.41 mm. Inter-observer variation at Chiang Mai University was 0.40 +/- 0.37 mm which was the highest value compared with those at Prince of Songkla and Khon Kaen University (p < 0.05). The mean duration of measurements was in range of 8-12 min. The intra-observer repeatability of the first two measurements showed ICCs varying from 0.61 to 0.94. The inter-observer repeatability of paired examiners showed a variation in ICC from 0.28-0.90. The kappa value expressing the intra- and inter-observer repeatability as being >95th or < or = 95th percentile was 0.73 and 0.72, respectively.NT measurement was reproducible for small variation and good agreement. The duration of measurements was acceptable.Accuracy of expected risk of Down syndrome using the second-trimester triple test.[Screening for chromosomal anomalies with maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein].Between July 1, 1986 and January 31, 1988, genetic amniocentesis was performed on 205 patients. The maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and amniotic fluid AFP levels were measured by enzyme immunoassay. Gestational dates were confirmed by sonography, and AFP results were expressed as multiples of the median (MOM). The median of maternal serum AFP from 15 to 17 weeks of gestation was 43.4, 62.6 and 72.5 ng/ml. Three fetuses with chromosomal anomalies were diagnosed; trisomy 21, 4p trisomy, and trisomy 18 (trisomy 18 was in one fetus of a twin pregnancy; the other fetus was normal). Maternal serum AFP levels were, 0.41, 0.49 and 1.30 MOM. Maternal serum AFP less than 0.5 MOM in normal pregnancies was 1/205 (0.5%) and less than 0.6 MOM was 9/205 (4.4%). There was no relationship between maternal serum AFP and amniotic fluid AFP levels. Our results are in agreement with the majority of the results in the literature, showing that maternal serum AFP levels are lower in association with autosomal trisomy fetuses.Effectiveness of combining maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and hCG in a second-trimester screening program for Down syndrome.To evaluate the efficacy of combining hCG and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) with maternal age in a two-analyte maternal serum screening program for Down syndrome.A prospective study involved the screening of 12,170 maternal sera from patients at 14-25 weeks of gestation. The risk for Down syndrome at term was calculated from maternal serum hCG and AFP, and maternal age. For women 36 years of age and younger, a risk of 1:307 or greater was considered screen-positive. For women over 36, a risk greater than that a priori was considered screen-positive. False-positive rates and detection rates were compared with those resulting from a screening protocol using only AFP and age.Seven hundred eighty-two sera were initially screen-positive (6.4%). Subsequent sonography decreased this total to 687 (5.6%), and 467 (3.8%) of these patients accepted amniocentesis. Ten cases of Down syndrome and seven other chromosomal abnormalities were detected. Follow-up investigations revealed eight additional Down syndrome cases that were missed by screening. The identification of 18 Down syndrome cases in 12,170 pregnancies corresponds closely with the prediction of 14.1 Down syndrome births (18.2 second-trimester fetuses) in this population calculated from age-dependent risks. The detection rate for Down syndrome was 56% (ten of 18 expected cases). Only five of 18 (28%) would have been detected by AFP and age alone.These results support the mathematical model that hCG is the major contributor to the increased sensitivity of multi-analyte screening and demonstrate that screening programs can attain substantial improvement in detection of second-trimester Down syndrome by adding hCG to AFP and age.Dual analyte immunoassay in neural tube defect and Down's syndrome screening: results of a multicentre clinical trial.We report a multicentre clinical field trial of a novel dual analyte enzyme immunoassay method for the simultaneous measurement of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta-human choriogonadotropin (hCG) in the same microtitre well. The assay was shown to have good technical performance in the hands of all trial centres, with between assay coefficients of variation better than 10% for both analyte across the whole of the assay ranges. The method compared well with single analyte measuring procedures and produced acceptable performance as judged by external quality assurance criteria. Recovery of added analyte and analyte dilution curves also showed acceptable performance. In clinical evaluation of a large set of neural tube defect cases, good clinical discrimination from unaffected cases was observed using AFP. With over 150 Down's syndrome cases, the combination of AFP and free beta hCG confirmed the high detection rates achievable using this marker combination, with detection rates in excess of 70% in early gestation. We conclude that the combination of clinically superior markers coupled with technologically innovative assay design will lead to more efficient Down's screening programmes.[Ultrasound screening program for chromosomal abnormalities--the first 2000 women].Screening for chromosomal abnormalities identifies the group of women at higher risk for having a fetus with chromosomal abnormalities and the need for fetal karyotyping. In order to provide high quality screening, strict criteria Jbo certification of operators are introduced, issued by the Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF), which enables annual external control of results. The aim of this study was to review the results of five-year prenatal screening for chromosomal abnormalities in Novi Sad, Serbia.Ultrasound screening at 11-15 weeks gestation was performed, assessing fetal morphology, crownr-rump length and nuchal translucency (NT) according to the FMF guidelines. Risk for chromosomal abnormalities included the initial risk, based on maternal age, gestational age and anamnestic data, and corrected risk, which took into account the initial risk and the value of the nuchal translucency. The corrected risk was issued by the computer program issued by the FMF.During the period 1999-2004, 4580 pregnant women were scanned. The risk for chromosomal abnormality was calculated using the FMF program in 2245 cases and the outcome was known in 1406 cases. The majority ojf women were between 25 and 29 years of age (37%), and 12% were older than 35 years. NT was below the median in 43% of cases and above in 57%, 3.7% of cases were above the 95th centile. 89% of women iwere younger than 35, and the risk was reduced in 97% of cases. There were three false negative cases. In 3% of women from this group the risk was increased, out cf which there were five cases of trisomy 21 and two terminations were done due to major anomalies. In the group of women over 35 years, the risk was reduced in 95% of cases and in all of them but two the karyotype was normal. In one of the two cases there was a large omphalocele and the karyotype was trisomy 18, and in the other fetus appeared normal, but after amniocentesis due to maternal anxiety, karyotype was 47, XYY. In 5% of women at higher risk there was one trisomy 21, bilateral multicystic kidneys were fund in one case as well as one hydrocephalus.Combined screening by maternal age and nuchal translucency is superior to screening by maternal age only--(sensitivity 66% vs. 20%, false postive results 3% vs. 15%, area under ROC 0.90 vs. 0.69).Estimates for the sensitivity and false-positive rates for second trimester serum screening for Down syndrome and trisomy 18 with adjustment for cross-identification and double-positive results.Second trimester screening for fetal Down syndrome and trisomy 18 is available through separate protocols that combine the maternal age-specific risk and the analysis of maternal serum markers. We have determined the extent to which additional Down syndrome affected pregnancies may be identified through trisomy 18 screening, and the extent to which additional cases of trisomy 18 may be screen-positive for Down syndrome. The combined false-positive rate, taking into consideration those pregnancies that are screen-positive by both protocols, has also been determined. Sensitivity and false-positive rates were determined by computer simulation of results that incorporated previously published statistical variables into the model. Using second trimester risk cut-offs of 1:270 for Down syndrome and 1:100 for trisomy 18, it was found that few additional cases of Down syndrome are identified through trisomy 18 screening. However, approximately 6-10% of trisomy 18 affected pregnancies will be screen-positive for Down syndrome but screen-negative for trisomy 18. For women aged 40 or more, the false-positive rate for trisomy 18 exceeds 1% and approximately half of these cases will also be screen-positive for Down syndrome. For a population with maternal ages equivalent to that in the United States in 1998, after adjusting for the cross-identification, the sensitivity for three-analyte trisomy 18 screening is 78%. If this testing is performed in conjunction with Down syndrome "triple" screening, the Down syndrome sensitivity is 75% and the combined false-positive rate is 8.5%. If the three-analyte trisomy 18 screening is performed with the Down syndrome "quad" screen, the trisomy 18 sensitivity remains at 78%, the Down syndrome sensitivity is 79%, and combined false-positive rate is 7.5%. Sensitivity and false-positive rates are also provided for other widely used Down syndrome and trisomy 18 risk cut-offs. Sensitivity and false-positive rates that take into consideration cross-identification and double-positives should be helpful for pre-test counseling and the evaluation of serum screening programs.Choice of serum markers in antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.Defining nasal bone hypoplasia in second-trimester Down syndrome screening: does the use of multiples of the median improve screening efficacy?The purpose of this study was to compare the efficacy of the use of nasal bone (NB) multiples of the median (MoM) with the biparietal diameter (BPD)/NB ratio as definitions of NB hypoplasia that is associated with Down syndrome in the second trimester.We conducted a prospective cohort study of women who underwent an anatomic survey between 16 and 22 weeks of gestation. The fetal NB and other markers of fetal aneuploidy were evaluated. MoMs for the NB length at each gestational age category were calculated and adjusted for maternal race. NB hypoplasia was defined either as an absent NB or by a ratio of the BPD/NB >11 or by NB lengths <0.75, 0.5, and 0.25 MoM for the gestational age, respectively. Fetuses or infants with Down syndrome were compared with those without for the presence of NB hypoplasia.Among 3634 women whose condition was evaluated, NB assessment was obtained in 3197 women (88%). There were 23 cases of Down syndrome that were detected. Receiver operating characteristic curve comparison revealed NB MoM <0.75 to be the best definition of NB hypoplasia (area under receiver operating characteristic curve, 0.75). NB <0.75 MoM had a sensitivity and specificity of 49% (95% CI, 26-69) and 92% (95% CI, 91%-93%), respectively, compared with 61% (95% CI, 38%-80%) and 84% (95% CI, 82%-85%), respectively for BPD/NB >11. The difference in the sensitivity of 12% (95% CI, -5-31) with the BPD/NB ratio >11 vs with an NB MoM <0.75 was not significant (P < .25). The difference in the specificity of 8% (95% CI, 7.5-9.5) with the BPD/NB ratio >11 vs an NB MoM <0.75 was significant (P < .0001).In the second trimester of pregnancy, the use of nasal bone length <0.75 MoM for the gestational age was the best definition for Down syndrome detection and resulted in improved specificity.Implications of a first trimester Down syndrome screening program on timing of malformation detection.To determine the impact which introduction of the 11-14 week scan has had on the gestational age at which fetal malformations are detected by ultrasound in an unselected population of pregnant women.Retrospective study.University hospital, Copenhagen, Denmark, covering the period 1 January 2003 to 30 June 2007.All pregnant women who chose a nuchal translucency scan at 11-14 weeks for Down syndrome risk estimate, and a scan at 18-20 weeks to screen for fetal malformations.Review of cases detected ante- and postnatally.Detection rates at 11-14 weeks relative to all malformations in the population.A total of 216 anomalies were detected in 200 fetuses among the 9 324 fetuses included, while 70 anomalies were diagnosed in 59 infants postnatally. The prevalence of fetuses with anomalies was 2.8% (259 of 9 324). After excluding cases of pyelectasis (127), which may be considered physiological and transitory changes, the prevalence of malformed fetuses was 1.4% (132 of 9 324). Of the malformations detected antenatally, 25.8% were detected before week 15 and 59.6% in weeks 16-22. The remaining 14.6% of malformations were discovered after week 22. Among the lethal malformations, 50% were diagnosed before week 15.Although the purpose of the first trimester scan is to screen for Down syndrome and not for malformations, the introduction of the 11-14 week scan has resulted in the detection of approximately 26% of fetal malformations.Integrated screening for Down's syndrome.[Predictive value for fetal outcome of Doppler velocimetry of the ductus venosus between the 11th and the 14th gestation week].to study the value of Doppler velocimetry of the ductus venosus, between the 11th and 14th weeks of pregnancy, associated to the nuchal translucency thickness measurement, in the detection of adverse fetal outcome.a transversal and prospective study in which a total of 1,268 fetuses were studied consecutively. In 56 cases, a cytogenetic study was performed on material obtained from a biopsy of the chorionic villus and, in 1,181 cases, the postnatal phenotype was used as a basis for the result. In addition to the routine ultrasonographic examination, all the fetuses were submitted to measurement of the nuchal translucency thickness and to Doppler velocimetry of the ductus venosus. Aiming at prevalence and accuracy indices, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, probability of false-positive, probability of false-negative, reason of positive probability and reason of negative probability were calculated and analyzed.from the total of 1,268 fetuses, 1,183 cases were selected for analysis. From this number, 1,170 fetuses were normal (98.9%) and 13 fetuses presented adverse outcome at birth (1.1%), including fetal death (trisomy 21 and 22) in two cases; genetic syndrome (Nooman) in one case; two cases of polymalformed fetuses; cardiopathy in three cases; and other structural defects in five cases. The prevalence of the modified ductus venosus (wave A zero/reverse) in the studied population was of 14 cases (1.2%), with a false-positive rate of 0.7%.there is a significant correlation between the alteration of the ductus venosus Doppler velocimetry and the thickness of the nuchal translucency as an ultrasonographic marker for the first trimester of gestation, in the detection of adverse fetal outcome, especially serious malformations. The ductus venosus was able to diminish the false-positive result in comparison to the isolated use of the nuchal translucency thickness, improving considerably the positive predictive value of the test.Maternal serum prostate-specific antigen and Down syndrome in the first and second trimesters of pregnancy. International Prenatal Screening Research Group.It has been suggested that high levels of maternal serum prostate-specific (PSA) may be associated with fetal Down syndrome. We retrieved stored blood samples from 102 singleton Down syndrome pregnancies at 8-14 weeks' gestation and 99 at 15-22 weeks' gestation, together with samples from five unaffected singleton control pregnancies matched for gestational age. PSA was measured using an ultrasensitive assay. Contrary to earlier reports, PSA levels were similar in affected and unaffected pregnancies in both the first and second trimester of pregnancy; 1.1 and 0.9 multiple of the normal median, respectively, in affected pregnancies. There was no indication that PSA would be a useful screening marker.First-trimester sonographic screening for Down syndrome.Screening for Down syndrome is an important part of routine antenatal care. The most common screening method in the United States involves the assessment of a combination of factors: maternal age, multiple second-trimester serum markers, and second-trimester ultrasonography (as a so-called "genetic sonogram"). More recently, however, there has been significant interest in first-trimester methods of screening, including screening for first-trimester serum markers and the sonographic measurement of fetal nuchal translucency. Multiple studies have demonstrated that fetal nuchal translucency has the potential of being a very powerful predictor of fetal aneuploidy. However, for clinicians a large void remains between this knowledge and the practical issues that must be addressed prior to endorsing this form of screening for widespread use. This article provides an objective assessment of the literature describing nuchal translucency, as well as some adjunct first-trimester sonographic techniques, such as ductus venosus flow and nasal bone studies. Additionally, a detailed description of practical problems that might limit the implementation of this form of screening is presented.First-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and chorionic gonadotropin in aneuploid pregnancies.First-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and human chorionic gonadotropin (HCG) levels were measured in samples from 29 women with cytogenetically abnormal pregnancies and 145 women with cytogenetically normal pregnancies matched for gestational age, race, and sample storage time. All patients had a risk of fetal aneuploidy greater than or equal to that of a mother 35 years of age. AFP was significantly lower in samples from pregnancies affected with trisomy 21 (0.67 MoM; p less than 0.05), while HCG values were no different from those of matched controls. Trisomies 13 and 18 could not be distinguished from matched controls by AFP. However, levels of HCG were significantly lower in such pregnancy samples, with median values of 0.65 MoM in trisomy 13 and 0.32 MoM in trisomy 18 (p less than 0.05). Variations in AFP and HCG levels suggest that expressed differences between autosomal aneuploidies include differences in fetal and placental protein production in the first trimester.Estimating the risk of a fetal autosomal trisomy at mid-trimester using maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and age: a retrospective study of 142 pregnancies.Risks appropriate for mid-trimester prenatal screening for autosomal trisomies have been estimated from a combination of maternal age and maternal serum (MS) alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels at 16-20 weeks gestation. Published data on the frequency of Down's syndrome births relative to maternal age were modified to include the additional age-related frequency of trisomy 18 and trisomy 13 cases to provide an overall risk for an autosomal trisomy at mid-trimester. MSAFP results from a retrospective study of 142 affected (114 trisomy 21, 19 trisomy 18, and 9 trisomy 13) and 113,000 unaffected pregnancies were converted to multiples of the appropriate gestational median (MOM). The AFP levels in the autosomal trisomy pregnancies were found to be significantly reduced at 0.72 MOM of the unaffected pregnancies. Risks (likelihood ratios) were derived from the overlapping log Gaussian distributions for affected and unaffected pregnancies and combined with maternal age risks to give the overall odds of an affected pregnancy. A mid-trimester cut-off risk of 1:280 gave an estimated 37 per cent detection rate for autosomal trisomies in the west of Scotland population for a follow-up (false-positive) rate of 6.6 per cent. These figures compare with a 30 per cent detection and 6.7 per cent false-positive rate if age 35 years and over is used as the sole criterion for selection of at-risk pregnancies.Maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome: the effect of routine ultrasound scan determination of gestational age and adjustment for maternal weight.To investigate the effect of using a routine ultrasound estimate of gestational age and maternal weight adjustment on maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) levels in antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.Women with a singleton pregnancy without Down's syndrome were screened using the three serum markers and an estimate of gestational age based on 'dates' (time since first day of the last menstrual period) and one based on an ultrasound scan examination was recorded together with maternal weight.Women attending the Homerton Hospital, Hackney, for their antenatal care between February 1989 and January 1990.2113 women with a singleton pregnancy without Down's syndrome.The use of ultrasound to estimate gestational age (usually based on the biparietal diameter of the fetal skull) led to a significant reduction in the variance of each marker at a given week of pregnancy. The level of each marker was negatively associated with maternal weight, so that adjustment for weight also led to a reduction in variance. These data on gestational age and maternal weight, taken together with published data on pregnancies associated with Down's syndrome, indicate that the routine use of ultrasound to estimate gestational age will increase the detection rate from 58% to 67% while maintaining the false-positive rate at 5%, or reduce the false-positive rate from 5.7% to 3.1% while maintaining the detection rate at 60%. Routine maternal weight adjustment for the serum marker levels was much less useful, increasing the detection rate by about 0.5% for a given false-positive rate, or reducing the false-positive rate about 0.1% for a given detection rate.An ultrasound gestational age estimate available at the time of Down's syndrome screening confers a substantial advantage to screening performance with a further small benefit resulting from maternal weight adjustment, which is worth adopting if it can be done without difficulty or extra cost.Likelihood ratios for fetal trisomy 21 based on nasal bone length in the second trimester: how best to define hypoplasia?To determine the best measure of fetal nasal bone hypoplasia for trisomy 21 risk assessment in the second trimester.This was a prospective, observational study performed at a single institution between February 2003 and December 2005. Fetuses with nasal bone length recorded sonographically between 16 and 20.9 weeks and known karyotype were included. Definitions of nasal bone hypoplasia assessed included: non-visualized nasal bone, nasal bone < 10th percentile, nasal bone < 2.5th percentile, biparietal diameter/nasal bone ratio >or= 10 and >or= 11 and nasal bone multiples of the median (MoM) <or= 0.5, <or= 0.6, and <or= 0.7.A total of 371 chromosomally normal and 11 trisomy 21 fetuses were included. Nasal bone hypoplasia based on MoM was superior to the other measures of hypoplasia for trisomy 21 risk assessment as reflected by a higher positive likelihood ratio. The risk for fetal trisomy 21 was higher with greater degrees of nasal bone hypoplasia.Hypoplasia, as defined by MoM, is the superior approach when incorporating nasal bone evaluation into fetal trisomy 21 risk assessment in the second trimester.The impact of maternal serum screening programs for Down syndrome in southeast Michigan, 1988-2003.Ultrasound screening for chromosomal anomalies in the first trimester of pregnancy.For the last 6 years, sonographic signs for excessive fluid accumulation in the backs of 10- to 12-week-old fetuses have been looked for prior to transabdominal chorionic biopsy. In 1400 pregnancies, subsequent karyotype analyses revealed 28 cases of Down syndrome. In 15 (= 54 per cent), a large fluid cushion over most of the back had been documented at the time of biopsy. Only a few chromosomally normal fetuses with the same peculiarity were observed. The cushion was also present in fetuses with trisomies 18 and 13, and in Turner syndrome. Systematic first-trimester screening for nuchal fluid accumulation seems to be a recommended method for the detection of Down syndrome and other chromosome anomalies in young pregnant women at low risk. It compares favourably with current methods of maternal serum screening performed at 16-18 weeks which require a higher number of invasive procedures.Nasal bone evaluation with ultrasonography: a marker for fetal aneuploidy.Clinical follow-up of high mid-trimester maternal serum intact human chorionic gonadotrophin concentrations in singleton pregnancies.Mid-trimester biochemical screening of 38 143 pregnancies in south-east Scotland revealed 127 cases (0.34 per cent) in which the maternal serum (MS) intact human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) concentration was > or = 4 multiples of the median in singleton pregnancies (MOM). Three were lost to follow-up but in 72 (58 per cent) complications developed or there were associated fetal abnormalities. This percentage was greatest at very high hCG concentrations, 92 per cent with hCG > or = 10 MOM (n = 12) compared with 48 per cent with hCG concentrations of 4-4.99 MOM (n=69). 22 cases had an MS alpha-fetoprotein > or = 2 MOM in addition to an MS hCG > or = 4 MOM, and in only 3 of these was the pregnancy uneventful; 86 per cent were associated with abnormalities or pregnancy complications.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotrophin in pregnancies conceived after intracytoplasmic sperm injection and conventional in-vitro fertilization.Data in the Caucasian population suggest that maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and unconjugated oestriol concentrations are reduced and human chorionic gonadotrophin (HCG) concentrations are elevated in pregnancies conceived after in-vitro fertilization (IVF), leading to a higher than expected Down's syndrome screen-positive rate. There are no previous reports on the serum marker values in pregnancies conceived after intracytoplasmic injection (ICSI). Between 1996 and 1998, we measured maternal serum total HCG and AFP concentrations between 15 and 20 weeks gestation in 42 in-vitro fertilization (IVF) pregnancies and 23 ICSI pregnancies with known normal outcome. The results were compared with that of 2799 naturally occurring singleton pregnancies who were known to have a normal outcome. Median AFP multiple of the median (MOM) in ICSI pregnancies was significantly reduced to 0.76 compared with both that of the controls and that of the IVF pregnancies. For the IVF pregnancies, median HCG MOM was elevated to 1.15, and median AFP MOM was reduced to 0.88 compared with the controls, but these differences were not statistically significant. In both the IVF and ICSI pregnancies the changes might result in a falsely high Down's syndrome risk. In particular, the reduced AFP concentration in ICSI pregnancies was substantial. If this preliminary finding is substantiated by other series, the appropriate adjustment needs to be made to allow for valid interpretation of the screen result and to avoid an unnecessarily high false positive rate.Evaluation of human chorionic gonadotropin beta-subunit mRNA concentrations in maternal serum in aneuploid pregnancies: a feasibility study.The effect of smoking in pregnancy on maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol, human chorionic gonadotrophin, progesterone and dehydroepiandrosterone sulphate levels.Influence of maternal BMI on genetic sonography in the FaSTER trial.We sought to evaluate the influence of maternal body mass index (BMI) on sonographic detection employing data from the FaSTER trial.Unselected singleton pregnancies underwent detailed genetic sonogram to evaluate for structural fetal anomalies and soft markers for aneuploidy. BMI (kg/m(2)) were calculated from reported initial visit values. Sensitivity, specificity, false positive and false negative rates (FPR and FNR), likelihood ratio, detection rates, and a missed diagnosis rate (MDR: FNR + marker recorded as 'missing'/N) were calculated.Eight thousand five hundred and fifty-five patients with complete BMI information had detailed genetic sonography. A lower sensitivity with an elevated FNR and MDR was observed in obese women for multiple aneuploid markers (e.g. > or =2 markers 32% sensitivity with 68% FNR among BMI <25 vs 22% and 78% among BMI >30). Similarly, the detection rate for cardiac anomalies among women at BMI <25 was higher (21.6%) at a significantly lower FPR (78.4%; 95% CI 77.3-79.5%) in comparison to obese women (8.3% with FPR 91.7%; 95% CI 90.1-93.2%). In a logistic regression model, maternal obesity significantly decreased the likelihood of sonographic detection of common anomalies (adjusted OR 0.7; 95% CI 0.6-0.9; p = 0.001).The performance of second trimester genetic sonography is influenced by obesity, with a significantly higher MDR for multiple minor markers and lower likelihood for detecting common anomalies.Second-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotrophin screening for Down's syndrome in Hong Kong.Second-trimester maternal serum screening for fetal Down's syndrome is well established in many Western countries. Its usefulness and acceptability is unknown in the Asian countries. Between June 1994 and December 1996, we offered second-trimester serum AFP and hCG screening to pregnant women in Hong Kong who were less than 35 years old and without other risk factors for chromosome abnormalities. Each woman was assigned a risk of having a Down's syndrome term pregnancy by using a computer software program that took into account her age. weight, AFP and hCG MOMs. All those with a risk of one in 250 or greater were designated screen-positive, subject to the revision of gestation by ultrasound examination. 9,177 women with singleton pregnancies (93 per cent were Chinese) were screened. The uptake of screening was 75 per cent. 281 women (three per cent) were initially classified to be screen-positive. After revision of the gestation by ultrasound examination, 183 women (two per cent) were 'true' screen-positive and 164 (90 per cent) accepted the offer of amniocentesis. Eight of these pregnancies were affected by Down's syndrome and all the women elected pregnancy termination. The odds of being affected, given a positive screening result, were one in 23. Six Down's syndrome pregnancies were missed by screening programme. The detection rate was 57 per cent. The study showed that second-trimester serum screening for fetal Down's syndrome was feasible and accepted in the Hong Kong population.Combining ultrasound and biochemistry in first-trimester screening for Down's syndrome.Data on pregnancies with and without Down's syndrome between 10 and 14 weeks of pregnancy were used to determine the performance of combined ultrasound and biochemical markers in prenatal screening for Down's syndrome. We used three datasets: one published by Pandya et al. (1995) on nuchal translucency measurement in 86 Down's syndrome pregnancies; one published by Wald et al. (1996a) on free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) in 77 affected pregnancies and 385 unaffected pregnancies; and the third from Schuchter et al. on 561 unaffected pregnancies with nuchal translucency measurement. Combining the data from these three datasets showed that screening between 10 and 14 weeks by combining the serum markers with nuchal translucency measurement had a detection rate of 80 per cent for a 5 per cent false-positive rate, better than maternal age with two serum markers (62 per cent for 5 per cent) or maternal age with nuchal translucency measurement (63 per cent for 5 per cent). At this time in pregnancy, it appears that screening using the combined test is better than second-trimester serum screening (76 per cent for 5 per cent), though these estimates do not allow for any association between the markers and spontaneous fetal loss, an issue that needs to be clarified by further research. Meanwhile, these results provide a reasonable working estimate of screening performance using different combinations of these markers.Maternal serum alpha fetoprotein among pregnant females in Alexandria.Maternal serum alpha fetoprotein (MSAFP) was introduced as a screening test for congenital malformations especially neural tube defects (NTDs) two decades ago. However, many factors were known to affect its level. From these are racial differences and maternal weight. The aim of the present work is to illustrate the normal distribution of MSAFP among working pregnant women in Alexandria in gestational age 16-18 weeks, to identify some of its determinants, and to determine the specificity and sensitivity of MSAFP for the detection of congenital anomalies and adverse pregnancy outcome.A sample of 608 pregnant working women who were 16-18 week gestation was recruited for the study from the antenatal clinic affiliated to Gamal Abdel Nasser Health Insurance Hospital in Alexandria. The enrolled women were interviewed using a structured questionnaire and a blood sample was collected from each of them to measure the level of MSAFP. At the expected time of delivery, Gamal Abd el Nasser Health Insurance Hospital was visited to collect data about the outcome of pregnancy of the enrolled women.The median of MSAFP level for deliveries with no congenital anomalies were 25.5, 33.5, and 53.2 IU/ml, at gestational weeks 16, 17 and 18 respectively. The significant variables related positively to MSAFP level included abortion or stillbirth, congenital anomalies in the index pregnancy, gestational age, bleeding during pregnancy, gestational diabetes, twin pregnancy, consanguinity between maternal parents, history of congenital or genetic diseases in maternal family, and caesarian section deliveries. Fatigue score was negatively correlated to MSAFP level. Using MSAFP multiples of median (MOM), 42.9 % of abortions and stillbirths, 57.1 % of twin pregnancies, 31.25 % of preterm deliveries and 27.3 % of low birth weight had levels of 3 MOM or more. One fourth of the congenital anomalies were below 0.5 MOM and 41.7 % were at or above 3 MOM. The sensitivity of MSAFP test for the detection of NTDs (cutoff point 2.5+ MOM) or Down syndrome (cutoff point <0.5 MOM) among the study sample was 100% (CI: 19.8-100%). Specificity for NTDs was 92.7% (CI: 90.3-94.6%), while the specificity for Down syndrome was 89.1% (86.3-91.4%). The sensitivity for adverse pregnancy outcome (cutoff point <0.5 or 2.5+ MOM) was 41.6, and the specificity was 85.8%. In conclusion, the cutoff points of MSAFP of the study sample are different from those for other populations. Different factors affect the level of MSAFP including adverse pregnancy outcomes. It is recommended to introduce antenatal screening for congenital anomalies as a routine screening test during pregnancy using levels adapted from the local population for cutoff point determination.Reevaluating humeral length for the detection of fetal trisomy 21.The purpose of this study was to analyze humeral length (HL) in a normal population and to compare that with HL in a population of fetuses with trisomy 21 to determine the most efficient discriminating parameters for diagnostic accuracy.A nested case-control study comparing HLs from a normal population and a population of fetuses with trisomy 21 was conducted. Humeral length was regressed against gestational age for a consecutive well-dated population of normal singleton gestations presenting to the Washington University School of Medicine prenatal diagnosis units over a 5-year period. A second population of well-dated pregnancies with trisomy 21 diagnosed either prenatally or postnatally was also selected on the basis of the same criteria, except that anomalous fetuses were included. Various discriminating thresholds for a short HL were compared for efficiency in the detection of trisomy 21. These included the following: observed/expected HL (<or= 0.89), biparietal diameter/HL greater than 1.3, 1.4, 1.5, 1.6, 1.7, 1.75, 1.8, and 1.85 SD above the mean for gestation, HL less than 0.8 or less than 0.9 multiple of the median, and HL less than the fifth percentile for gestation.A total of 620 normal pregnancies and 32 with trisomy 21 were extracted from the database. A receiver operating characteristic curve revealed HL less than the fifth percentile as the optimal discriminator for trisomy 21 detection (area under the receiver operating characteristic curve = 0.80). The positive likelihood ratio (LR+) was greatest (25.0) with HL less than the fifth percentile. When HL was considered in isolation without other sonographic markers of trisomy 21, the LR+ was 6.3.Humeral length less than the fifth percentile was the most effective discriminator among the many studied.The use of free beta-hCG in antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.To investigate the value of the measurement of free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) as a serum marker of Down's syndrome in the second trimester of pregnancy.A prospective observational study using stored antenatal serum samples.Serum samples collected from women receiving routine antenatal care in Oxford.Seventy-five singleton pregnancies with fetal Down's syndrome and 367 unaffected singleton pregnancies. Each affected pregnancy was matched with five control pregnancies for maternal age, gestational age, and duration of storage of the serum sample. None of the pregnancies were associated with neural tube defects.Maternal serum free beta-hCG levels. These were compared with total hCG levels in the same pregnancies. The performance of screening using free beta-hCG was compared with that using the principal markers, namely alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), and total hCG together with maternal age.The median free beta-hCG level in the affected pregnancies was 2.22 multiples of the normal median (MoM), significantly higher than in the unaffected pregnancies (95% confidence interval, 1.84-2.68 MoM). The discriminatory performances of free beta-hCG and total hCG, each considered separately, were similar; with a cut-off level of 2.5 MoM the detection rate was 43% and 5.7 of unaffected pregnancies had raised free beta-hCG levels (likelihood ratio of 7.5 (43/5.7)), somewhat better discrimination than the 32% and 4.6% respectively using total hCG (likelihood ratio of 7.0 (32/4.6)). With a higher cut-off level of 3.5 MoM, the rates were 19% and 2.7% respectively (likelihood ratio of 7.0), using free beta-hCG, worse than the 19% and 1.4% using total hCG (likelihood ratio of 13.6). Screening using maternal age, AFP, uE3 and free beta-hCG (instead of total hCG) yielded a detection rate of 62% (instead of 58%) at a screening risk cut-off level corresponding to a 5% false-positive rated).The main advantage in using free beta-hCG instead of total hCG is that there is a small increase in the detection rate (4%) for a given false-positive rate when used with maternal age, AFP and uE3. The main disadvantage is that there is less practical experience with free beta-hCG measurement and insufficient data to screen in certain categories of pregnancy (e.g. twins). The best practical advice is to use total hCG for the present but consider changing to free beta-hCG either (i) after further data are available that will permit the interpretation of screening results in the same way as is currently available with total hCG, or (ii) if its use with another marker confers a worthwhile increase in the detection rate for a given false-positive rate.Influence of maternal age and weight on second-trimester serum alpha-fetoprotein, total and free beta human chorionic gonadotropin levels.The purpose of this study was to assess the relation of maternal age and weight on the maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), total human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) and free beta-hCG levels during the second trimester.We collected 419 serum samples from normal singleton pregnancies to assay serum marker levels of AFP, total hCG and free beta-hCG between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation. Maternal age at the day of delivery and maternal weight at the time of sampling were recorded in all cases. The relationship between maternal weight and multiple of the median (MoM) levels of serum markers was analysed by regression models.There was an inverse trend in median MoM levels of serum markers in relation to maternal weight. No significant association between maternal age and serum marker levels was found.Because of its impact on serum marker levels, weight correction may be mandatory for further refinement in the maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome.Serial first- and second-trimester Down's syndrome screening tests among IVF-versus naturally-conceived singletons.It has been reported that second-trimester serum markers may be affected by assisted reproduction, leading to a higher false-positive rate.A total of 285 naturally and 71 IVF-conceived singletons which underwent a serial disclosure Down's syndrome screening programme were compared. The study protocol included first-trimester combined [nuchal translucency (NT), free beta-HCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A)] testing. The second-trimester triple serum screening included alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), intact HCG and unconjugated estriol (uE3). After excluding aneuploidies, miscarriages, anatomical anomalies and cases with incomplete follow-up, the serum samples of normal cases were assessed and correlated.NT measurement was not significantly changed in either group. However, the IVF group had lower PAPP-A [0.96 versus 1.05 multiples of normal median (MoM)] and higher AFP (1.13 versus 1.07 median MoM). Both groups had similar rates of first-trimester false-positive results (FPR; 7 and 9% respectively), but the IVF group had a significantly higher mid-gestation FPR rate (10 versus 5%; Pearson chi2, P = 0.029). This has contributed to amniocentesis uptake rates of 15 and 13% for the IVF and natural conception pregnancies respectively.The IVF group tended to have a significantly higher second-trimester FPR rate. To counterbalance this phenomenon, integrated first- and second-trimester screening tests or the use of NT alone might be a reasonable option that deserves further investigation.Sonography in the first trimester screening of trisomy 21 and other fetal aneuploidies.Second trimester levels of maternal serum inhibin A, total inhibin, alpha inhibin precursor, and activin in Down's syndrome pregnancy.To determine the levels of various biochemical forms of the placental protein, inhibin (total inhibin, inhibin A, and alpha inhibin precursor) and activin in maternal serum samples from fetal Down's syndrome, and to determine which of these analytes most effectively identifies samples from affected pregnancies.Maternal serum samples were collected from 100 unaffected pregnancies and 20 cases of fetal Down's syndrome during gestational weeks 15-20 for routine triple marker screening, and were stored frozen after clinical assay. Levels of inhibin A, total inhibin, alpha inhibin precursor (pro-alphaC), and activin were compared retrospectively in the Down's syndrome cases and control samples.There was no association of the inhibin or activin levels with gestational age or length of freezer storage, and therefore single median values were determined for the unaffected pregnancies for each analyte. Multiples of the unaffected median (MoM) values were calculated for all cases, showing that inhibin A (1.95 MoM) provided the best discrimination between cases and controls, followed by total inhibin (1.37 MoM). Mann-Whitney U analysis showed significant group differences in inhibin A (P = 0.0001) and total inhibin (P = 0.0005). In contrast, alpha inhibin precursor (0.81 MoM) and activin (1.16 MoM) levels in Down's syndrome cases were not significantly different from those in unaffected patients.Levels of inhibin A and total inhibin, but not alpha inhibin precursor or activin, are significantly raised in maternal serum from cases of fetal Down's syndrome. These data, taken together, indicate that inhibin A levels are specifically raised in Down's syndrome pregnancy. 45% of the inhibin A levels in the Down's syndrome samples were above the 90th centile of unaffected levels, indicating that inhibin A may be as good a marker as human chorionic gonadotrophin, the most informative serum marker currently in use.Pregnancy outcome and prognosis in fetuses with increased first-trimester nuchal translucency.One of the concerns of prenatal diagnosis is to find sensitive markers to screen for chromosome abnormalities, such as serum assays or nuchal translucency (NT). This study reports our experience with NT measurement during the first trimester of pregnancy.The study was performed prospectively on 252 fetuses with either NT > or =3 mm or cystic hygroma.We observed 50 abnormal karyotypes, i.e. 19.8%. The incidence of chromosome abnormalities increased with increasing maternal age and increasing NT thickness. For the 202 fetuses with normal karyotypes, outcome was unfavourable in 32 cases: 23 elective terminations of pregnancy, 8 spontaneous abortions and 1 neonatal death. Outcome was favourable in 141 cases. Twenty-nine pregnancies were lost to follow-up.Measurement of NT at 12 weeks' gestation seems to be a good marker for chromosome abnormalities. When the karyotype is normal, the pregnancy outcome remains correlated with the degree of NT thickness. The finding of NT >3 mm between 10 and 14 weeks' gestation dictates rigorous ultrasound monitoring and caution when predicting pregnancy outcome.Maternal serum screening for neural tube defects and Down syndrome.The variation of risk estimates through pregnancy in second trimester maternal serum screening for Down syndrome.The variation of risk estimates in second trimester maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome has been shown to be considerable in quality control schemes, i.e. UKNEQAS. We studied the biological variation of risk estimates in 16 women through pregnancy. The maternal serum markers alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), unconjugated estriol (uE3) and beta-hCG were determined six times during late first to late second trimester, and the associated likelihood ratios for Down syndrome were calculated. The interpersonal variation of markers, as well as that of the likelihood ratio, was much greater than the intrapersonal variation. The average intrapersonal standard deviation (SD) of the triple test log likelihood ratio was 0.2291, corresponding to a central 95-percentile interval 0.36-2.81 of the likelihood ratio. The interpersonal SD of the log likelihood ratio was 0.5482, corresponding to a central 95-percentile interval 0.08-11.87 of the likelihood ratio. The large difference between the intra- and interpersonal variation makes it unlikely that biological variation through pregnancy is a major contributor to the variation of risk estimates obtained several times in the same pregnancy. Rather, improvements in analytical quality and laboratory management must be expected to result in reduced variation and, in consequence, better performance of screening.Adjustment formulae for maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated oestriol to maternal weight and smoking.Serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) were measured in serum samples of 4131 non-smoking and 1018 smoking women during the second trimester of pregnancy. The levels of all three analytes decreased with increasing body weight. The AFP median was significantly increased in smokers in a dose-response association; hCG decreased by 21 per cent and uE3 decreased by 3 per cent in smokers in a non-dose-related fashion. Regression functions for adjustment of serum levels for weight and smoking should be considered in risk estimation for Down syndrome in order to give a woman's individual risk more precisely.[Serum screening of fetal chromosome abnormality during second pregnancy trimester: results of 26,803 pregnant women in Jiangsu Province].To evaluate the efficiency of the second trimester screening for fetal chromosomal anomaly using maternal serum marker.27,313 pregnant women with the gestational age of 15 - 20 weeks were selected by stratified combined with cluster sampling from 13 counties over Jiangsu province and 5 townships, towns, or subdistricts from 6 randomly selected cities from southern, central, and northern Jiangsu, totally 95 communities, between July 2002 and November 2006. Questionnaire survey was conducted. Body weight was taken. Ultrasonography was used to confirm the gestational age. Peripheral blood samples were collected to detect the maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (f-betaHCG). The risk values of Down syndrome and Edwards syndrome were calculated. The women at high risk of Down syndrome and Edwards syndrome for their fetuses were recommended to receive genetic counseling and amniocentesis. All babies were followed up until six months to four years of age after birth.26,803 of the 27,313 women (98%) were screened. The average was 25.1, and 1.7% of them were over 35. Serum screening showed that 1,244 (5%) were Down syndrome positive and 105 (0.4%) were Edwards syndrome positive. The final pregnant outcomes showed that 20 cases presented chromosomal abnormalities, of which 9 cases suffered from Down syndrome, 5 cases Edwards syndrome, and 6 cases other chromosomal abnormalities. The detection rate of Down syndrome and Edwards syndrome were 56% and 80% respectively.Under good quality control high prenatal detection rate of fetal chromosomal abnormalities can be reached by screening of maternal serum AFP and f-betaHCG during the second pregnancy trimester. Good cost-effectiveness depends on the incidence of targeted birth defects.The influence of smoking on the pregnancy-associated plasma protein A, free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin and nuchal translucency.To analyse the effects of smoking on first trimester parameters used in prenatal screening for Down's Syndrome.A chart study.Primary care centres and maternity clinics of the participating universities' and central hospitals.Three thousand and one hundred fifteen women screened by nuchal translucency measurement and 4436 women screened by maternal serum samples. Only normal singleton pregnancies were included.The mean multiples of median of pregnancy associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A), free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) and nuchal translucency were compared by independent samples t test after logarithmic transformation of the data between smokers and non-smokers.PAPP-A and free beta-hCG concentrations and nuchal translucency measurements.PAPP-A was significantly reduced and nuchal translucency increased if the mother smoked. The smokers were more frequently considered as being at high risk for Down's Syndrome.Correcting PAPP-A median for smokers down by 20% might improve the accuracy of the risk evaluations given to individual women. If the association between increased nuchal translucency and smoking can be confirmed, it poses interesting questions as to the reasons for increased nuchal translucency among normal pregnancies.Evaluation of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and ultrasound examination to screen fetal chromosomal abnormalities.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP), anatomic anomalies and precocious defects of foetal growth were shown as possible "indicators" of foetal chromosomal pathology, in particular Down's syndrome, and thus suggested for prenatal screening of risk patients for this chromosomal abnormalities. The Authors carried out a retrospective study on 1472 patients who underwent amniocentesis for prenatal diagnosis. Between the 15th and the 20th week, a dosage of MSAFP was effected, in order to evaluate if the serum concentration of this substance could predict Down's syndrome. A contemporary study by echographic monitoring was effected on 500 patients from the 1st trimester of pregnancy, in order to detect possible foetal growth retardation precociously and to determine the karyotype in these cases. Results are very interesting and suggest both the dosage of MSAFP and the ecographic monitoring for prenatal screening of trisomy 21, especially in maternal age classes younger than 40 years, where the cost/benefit ratio of screening for maternal age is less favourable.Second-trimester maternal urinary gonadotrophin peptide screening for fetal Down syndrome in Asian women.Maternal urinary gonadotrophin peptide (UGP) was recently found to be elevated in second-trimester Down syndrome pregnancies. There is controversy about its screening efficacy. Data in the Asian population are scanty. We measured the UGP levels in 29 Down syndrome pregnancies and 297 controls and expressed them as a ratio of the urine creatinine concentration. Median UGP MOM was elevated to 3.44 (95 per cent confidence interval 1.99-5.13) in cases, compared with controls. UGP values were widely scattered in cases and controls with extensive overlap such that only 35 per cent of Down syndrome cases were expected to be detected at a 5 per cent false-positive rate. The data of the present study and previous reports show that there is a wide variability of gestation-specific UGP median values. UGP alone does not appear to be an effective screening marker for fetal Down syndrome.Screening for chromosomal abnormalities in an unselected population by fetal nuchal translucency.The aim of this prospective study was to examine the value of nuchal translucency measurement for the detection of fetal aneuploidies in an unselected population of an Austrian National Health Service hospital. A total of 1972 women with singleton pregnancies who attended at 10-13 weeks for the initiation of routine antenatal care at our hospital were examined. Chromosomal abnormalities were found in 11 fetuses, four of then with Down's syndrome. Eight of the 11 chromosomally abnormal fetuses, including two of the four with Down's syndrome, were detected by a nuchal translucency thickness of > or = 2.5 mm. Three of the fetuses with abnormal karyotype had a nuchal translucency thickness of < 2.5 mm. Two of these were fetuses with Down's syndrome, one of which was identified by karyotyping for maternal age, the second one by positive biochemistry testing (triple test). The additional chromosomal abnormality was identified by karyotyping for maternal age. These data suggest that nuchal translucency screening for aneuploidies is efficient even in an unselected population.Racial differences in first trimester nuchal translucency.Second trimester prenatal screening for Down syndrome: the associations between the levels of serum markers in successive pregnancies.To investigate the association of Down syndrome screening results in successive pregnancies, and assess the impacts of including previous screening results in the current risk estimation on screening performance.The study was based on 56,951 women who had triple marker screening in two or more singleton pregnancies in the Ontario Maternal Serum Screening (MSS) program between October 1993 and September 2000. The problem of recurrent false positive results was examined by comparing screening results from different pregnancies in the same individuals. Between-pregnancy associations in the levels of serum markers were estimated using correlation analysis. A published method was used to adjust current risk estimation for previous screening results. The effect of this adjustment was assessed by comparing screening performances prior and subsequent to the adjustment.The observed false positive rate (FPR) in subsequent pregnancies was 2.5 times higher than that expected (26.4% vs 10.7%) among women who screened positive in one previous pregnancy, and 3.9 times higher (47.4% vs 12.1%) among women who screened positive in two previous pregnancies. Adjusting for a previous screening result will significantly reduce the recurrent FPR without compromising detection.Risk estimation for Down syndrome may be adjusted using the screening result from a previous pregnancy.First trimester screening for Down syndrome using free beta hCG, total hCG and PAPP-A: an exploratory study.To investigate the potential utility of first trimester screening for Down syndrome using Free beta-hCG, total hCG and PAPP-A.Using estimates from the literature, a simulation study was undertaken to estimate the performance of tests incorporating, Free beta-hCG, total hCG and PAPP-A at gestations of 8-12 weeks. We used sensitivity analysis to assess the effect of departures from the assumed model.We estimate that detection rates in excess of 75% for a false positive rate (FPR) of 3% can be achieved with first trimester measures of PAPP-A, total hCG and Free beta-hCG at 8 weeks-the addition of total hCG adding 11%. Detection rates of around 90% for a FPR of 3% can be achieved through the inclusion of nuchal translucency (NT) at 12 weeks to these early first trimester biochemical markers. Our analysis indicates that the marginal benefit of adding total hCG diminishes rapidly with gestational age and that there is little benefit from adding total hCG later than 10 weeks of gestation.The performance of first trimester screening using early combinations of total hCG, Free beta-hCG and PAPP-A should be assessed in further studies.First trimester fetal nuchal translucency: problems with screening the general population. 1.To evaluate the feasibility of measuring first trimester nuchal translucency in an unselected population, to assess the relationship with gestation and maternal age and to measure reproducibility.A prospective observational study.University College Hospital, London.One thousand and four women attending for a routine first trimester dating scan between eight and thirteen weeks of gestation. Measurements of nuchal translucency were attempted in 1368 (80.3%) and successful in 1127 (82% of attempts).Nuchal translucency is most easily measured at 11 weeks of gestation. If a cut-off of > or = 3 mm is used, 6% of unselected fetuses between eight and thirteen weeks of gestation are classified as abnormal. Nuchal translucency increases with gestational but not maternal age. Reproducibility is poor: by repeating measurements with a different operator, the same operator using a different still image, or the same operator using the same still image, 18.8%, 17.5% or 12.4% of nuchal translucency measurements, respectively, change their classification as normal or abnormal.If nuchal translucency > or = 3mm were used as an indication for karyotyping, 6% of the normal pregnant population would be screen positive. However, the percentage will vary greatly depending on the gestational age profile of the screened population. The poor reproducibility of nuchal translucency measurement could diminish its usefulness as a screening test for Down's syndrome.Inhibin A and pro-alpha C inhibin in Down syndrome and normal pregnancies.Using two enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays specific for inhibin A and pro-alpha C inhibin, levels of the two proteins were assessed in maternal serum from 43 Down syndrome and 300 chromosomally normal pregnancies at 15-17 weeks' gestation. Compared to the control pregnancies, both inhibin A and pro-alpha C inhibin were significantly elevated in the Down syndrome pregnancies with median levels, expressed as multiples of the normal median, of 1.53 MoM and 1.34 MoM, respectively (P < 0.001 and P = 0.046 compared to controls). Levels of inhibin A and pro-alpha C inhibin were weakly but significantly correlated in both the control and the Down syndrome sera (r = 0.25, P < 0.0001; r = 0.4, P = 0.008, respectively). These data suggest that the mechanism(s) underlying the elevated inhibin levels observed in Down syndrome may affect the regulation of both the inhibin alpha- and beta A-subunits.Fetal gender impact on multiple-marker screening results.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE3) are used in combination with maternal age to calculate the risk for Down syndrome (DS) in pregnancy. Increased levels of hCG and decreased levels of MSAFP and uE3 are consistent with an increased risk for DS. We retrospectively evaluated second-trimester maternal serum marker levels in a large cohort of patients with known normal outcomes and documented fetal gender. These included 15,428 patients who had MSAFP measurements, 11,428 patients with both MSAFP and hCG, and 6,090 patients with all three markers including uE3. MSAFP levels in patients with female fetuses were consistently lower than those with males. Conversely, hCG was higher in pregnancies with females as compared to males. No gender-related difference was noted for uE3. These results would suggest that the computed DS risk for female fetuses is higher than for males, despite the fact that the incidence of DS is similar in both genders. This information could be useful for calculating gender-specific DS risk; however, this would require ultrasonographic determination of fetal sex.The influence of maternal weight on human chorionic gonadotropin in the multiple-marker screening test for fetal Down syndrome.Our purpose was to determine the effect of maternal weight on human chorionic gonadotropin concentration in the multiple-marker screening test for fetal Down syndrome.Two genetics databases were used: database I contained the results of 8297 multiple-marker screening tests and database II contained the results of 1936 multiple-marker screening tests and fetal karyotypes.The overall screen-positive rate in database I was 7.1%; it was 7.5% in patients weighing < 180 pounds and 5.1% in patients weighing > or = 180 pounds (p = 0.001). Weight significantly affected the screen-positive rate only in women > or = 30 years old (p = 0.003 for 30 to 34 years, p = 0.00004 for > or = 35 years). A weight correction formula was derived; when applied to database II it eliminated individual weight-related differences but had no effect on the overall screen-positive rate or Down syndrome detection rate.Human chorionic gonadotropin concentration is affected by maternal weight. A weight correction formula eliminates individual weight-related differences in the screen-positive rate but has no discernible effect on the overall screen-positive or Down syndrome detection rates.Evaluation of a dimeric inhibin-A assay for assessing fetal Down syndrome: establishment, comparison, and monitoring of median concentrations for normal pregnancies.Several studies report the role of dimeric inhibin-A in assessing risk for fetal Down syndrome. The majority, however, use the Serotec inhibin-A assay and not the newer Diagnostic Systems Laboratories inhibin-A enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA).To establish normal gestational age day-specific medians, to compare our results against previous studies pertaining to the inhibin-A ELISA, and to evaluate long-term assay performance.Using the inhibin-A ELISA, 100 specimens were assayed for each completed week of gestation for weeks 15 to 20, 50 specimens for 14 weeks, and 54 specimens for 21 weeks or older. Regressed inhibin-A medians were calculated employing a second-degree polynomial fit of the arithmetic medians. Thereafter, inhibin-A ELISA lot comparisons were performed to evaluate consistency.Regressed values of 182, 174, 175, 184, 201, and 226 pg/mL resulted for weeks 15 to 20, respectively [pg/mL inhibin-A = 4.1528(gestational age)2 - 136.49(gestational age) + 1294.9]. A comparison with 2 other studies shows our values to be lower overall by 15 +/- 11.4% and 16 +/- 2.6%. However, variability between kit lots was as high as 30%.The equation derived provides for the calculation of gestational age day-specific inhibin-A medians for integration into maternal serum screening programs with a subsequent decrease in false-positives expected and observed. Our medians differ considerably from those of other studies, with limited data, using the Diagnostic Systems assay. However, lot changes since the initial analysis have exhibited similar inconsistencies. Therefore, we recommend that others incorporating the assay into their screening programs carefully establish, monitor, and adjust their medians accordingly as a result of potential variations.Maternal serum screening for fetal Down syndrome in IVF pregnancies.To assess the influence of in vitro fertilization (IVF) on maternal serum human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), the maternal serum hCG and AFP values were studied in 67 IVF pregnancies and compared with the results of a control group of 4732 spontaneously conceiving patients. Maternal serum hCG was significantly higher and AFP significantly lower in the IVF group. Possible explanations and implications for prenatal diagnosis in IVF pregnancies are discussed.Age-specific variation in aneuploidy incidence among biochemical screening programs.Our purpose was to compare the observed age-related incidence of Down syndrome in two large screening programs with the commonly quoted incidences used in biochemical screening programs.Data from two large prenatal screening programs were stratified in 5-year age groups. The age-related incidence of Down syndrome was compared with the commonly used incidence as reported by Cuckle.No significant differences were found in age-related incidences of Down syndrome in any age group between the screening groups or among women ages 15 through 29 in any of the three groups. However, for women 30 to 34 and > or = 40 years old, a trend was noted toward a higher incidence in the screening groups. For women ages 35 to 39, the observed incidence was significantly greater in the screening groups compared with the data of Cuckle.Our data suggest an underascertainment in Down syndrome risk built into the Cuckle model, particularly in high-risk patients.Comparison of multiple-marker screening with amniocentesis for the detection of fetal aneuploidy in women > or = 35 years old.Our purpose was to compare the multiple-marker screening test with elective amniocentesis for the detection of fetal Down syndrome and other aneuploidies in women aged > or = 35.Our database included the multiple-marker screening test (maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, unconjugated estriol, and maternal age) and genetic amniocentesis results from 1942 women aged > or = 35. A Down syndrome risk > or = 1:190 was considered screen positive. An algorithm to detect trisomy 18 was also used.The multiple-marker screening test Down syndrome screen-positive rate was 26.1% (507/1942). The Down syndrome detection rate was 75% (33/44); the trisomy 18 detection rate was 75% (3/4). However, the multiple-marker screening test detection rate for all aneuploidies was only 61%. Missed aneuploidies included trisomy 21, sex chromosome abnormalities, trisomy 13, trisomy 22, and trisomy 18.The multiple-marker screening test fails to detect approximately 39% of all fetal aneuploidies in women aged > or = 35. These data should be provided to women considering prenatal diagnosis so that they can make an informed decision regarding the multiple-marker screening test versus amniocentesis for advanced maternal age.Nicked free beta-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin: a potential new marker for Down syndrome screening.Our purpose was to investigate maternal serum levels of nicked free beta-subunit in normal and Down syndrome pregnancies.Serum specimens were obtained from 64 karyotypically normal and 6 Down syndrome pregnancies before amniocentesis. Two immunoenzymometric assays for the beta- subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin were used to determine the level of free beta-subunits with peptide linkage breaks ("nicks") between residues 43 to 48.The mean level of nicked free beta-subunit in Down syndrome was 4.76 multiples of the median, which was significantly elevated compared with normal controls (1.07 multiples of the median, p<0.05). In 5 of 6 cases levels were > or = 2 multiples of the median, with a range of 1.96 to 15.43 multiples of the median, which was 2- to 3-fold higher than the regular free beta-subunit assay (mean level 1.53 multiples of the median, range 0.70 to 3.10 multiples of the median). In one case no nicked free-beta subunits were detectable.Our preliminary data indicate that nicked free beta-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin might be a sensitive marker for Down syndrome screening.First-trimester Down syndrome screening: free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A.Our purpose was to determine the feasibility of a first-trimester Down syndrome screening protocol including free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A.First-trimester maternal blood samples from 22 Down syndrome and 483 control cases were assayed for free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay procedures. False-positive and detection rates were determined on the basis of Down syndrome risks calculated from the levels of biochemical markers and maternal age. Because 11 of the 22 Down syndrome cases were from older pregnancies (> or = 35 years old), rates were recalculated with the United States age distribution of live births to get a more representative estimate of false positives and detection efficiency.The median free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A levels in cases of Down syndrome was 2.09 (95% confidence interval 1.69 to 2.62) and 0.405 multiples of the median (95% confidence interval 0.28 to 0.67), respectively. At a 5.0% false-positive rate, 15 (68.2%) Down syndrome cases were detected. By the use of the age distribution of live births, 63% of cases could be expected to be detected at a 5.0% false-positive rate.First-trimester free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A screening for Down syndrome can achieve detection rates as high as those associated with alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotropin or alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated estriol screening in the second trimester. Prospective studies are needed to further assess first-trimester screening.Nuchal translucency and first-trimester screening.[Maternal serum markers and prenatal screening for trisomy 21].The influence of smoking and parity on serum markers for Down's syndrome screening.To evaluate the impact of smoking and number of previous births on maternal serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein and free beta-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin (free beta-hCG).The study included 3,252 completed unaffected singleton pregnancies that proceeded beyond 37 weeks' gestation and resulted with a birth of healthy child. Smoking status of mothers and data concerning gravidity and parity were collected at the sampling date. Serum markers were measured between 13 and 22 gestational weeks, corrected for maternal weight, and converted to multiples of median (MoM) for unaffected pregnancy of the corresponding gestational age. Median MoM values for both markers were examined in relation to both: smoking habits and number of previous births.Smokers had significantly decreased free beta-hCG MoM values compared to nonsmokers (p < 0.001). The median levels showed a negative relationship with the number of previous births. The significance of a decreasing trend was proved, both in smokers (p < 0.001) and nonsmokers (p < 0.001). The median maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein MoM values did not show any significant dependence, neither with regard to smoking (p = 0.65) nor with regard to parity (p = 0.07).The recommendable adjustment of serum markers to smoking habits, especially concerning the free beta-hCG levels, would be worthwhile. The evidence of the coexisting influence of parity on serum levels of free beta-hCG, both in smokers and nonsmokers, should perhaps be a stimulus for reconsideration of which corrections the screening performance is dependent on.Second-trimester prenatal screening for Down syndrome and the relationship of maternal serum biochemical markers to pregnancy complications with adverse outcome.In a group of 26 524 control pregnancies and a group of 3728 pregnancies affected by one or more of the pregnancy complications of low birthweight, intra-uterine growth restriction (IUGR), preterm delivery and stillbirth, I have compared the relative risk of occurrence of these complications in pregnancies which had a raised maternal serum AFP (>2.0 MoM), raised maternal serum free beta-hCG (>2.0 MoM), low AFP (<0.5 MoM), low free beta-hCG (<0.5 MoM), combined raised AFP and free beta-hCG (>2.0 MoM), and in those with an increased Down syndrome risk (1 in 250 or greater). In the low birthweight group, only an increased AFP and decreased free beta-hCG showed significance with relative risks of 1.6 and 2.1. In the IUGR group, also only an increased AFP and decreased free beta-hCG showed significance with relative risks of 1.6 and 2.3. In the preterm delivery group, raised AFP, reduced free beta-hCG, and combined elevated AFP and free beta-hCG showed significance with relative risks of 3.8, 1.8 and 6.2. In the stillbirth group, raised AFP, reduced free beta-hCG, and combined elevated AFP and free beta-hCG showed significance with relative risks of 4.5, 2,4 and 7.2. An isolated raised free beta-hCG or an increased Down syndrome risk were not associated with an increased relative risk for any of the pregnancy complications investigated. However, apart from the six to seven-fold increased risk when both AFP and free beta-hCG are above 2.0 MoM, suggesting increased risk of preterm delivery or impending fetal death, the clinical utility of such significant differences is probably poor.The influence of fetal sex in screening for Down syndrome in the second trimester using AFP and free beta-hCG.In a study of 30 802 unaffected pregnancies and 90 cases of Down syndrome I have analysed second trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) and grouped the data by fetal sex. In pregnancies with an unaffected female fetus maternal serum AFP was significantly lower (3%) than in the presence of a male fetus, whilst free beta-hCG was significantly raised (7%) in the presence of a female fetus. These differences led to a significantly higher false positive rate in women carrying a female fetus (5.78% versus 4.64%). In pregnancies affected by Down syndrome the median AFP in the presence of a female fetus was not significantly different to that with a male fetus (0. 72 versus 0.73); similarly for free beta-hCG the difference (2.37 versus 2.48) was not statistically significant. Although the detection rate amongst male fetuses was slightly higher than in females (74% versus 66%), this was not statistically significant. Although fetal gender does appear to have a significant effect on maternal serum marker levels, leading to a higher false positive rate in females, in cases of Down syndrome there is no evidence that such marker differences are significant and consequently little evidence for any fetal gender bias in detection rates.Are second-trimester minor sonographic markers for Down syndrome useful in patients who have undergone first-trimester combined screening?We sought to determine efficacy of minor markers for detection of Down syndrome (DS) in a population prescreened with first-trimester combined screening (FTS).FTS was modified using established likelihood ratios to generate a new composite risk (NCR).Of 3845 women, 390 had ≥1 marker. There were 10/3845 cases of DS; 3 were among patients with low-risk FTS (n = 3727). In 55 patients, NCR adjusted the risk from low to high without increasing detection rate. NCR did not modify risk to allow for detection of the 3 DS among patients with low-risk FTS even though 2 of these fetuses had 1 minor marker each. There were 7 DS among patients with high-risk FTS (n = 118). Use of NCR increased positive predictive value from 7/118 (5.1%) to 7/53 (13.2%).Screening for minor markers is useful in patients with high-risk FTS. It is of questionable benefit in patients with low-risk FTS.Cigarette smoking and levels of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, and hCG: impact on Down syndrome screening.To investigate the association between maternal cigarette smoking and serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated estriol (uE3), and hCG and to determine whether it is appropriate to take smoking status into account when screening for fetal Down syndrome.Smoking information was obtained from 23,668 pregnant women at the time of routine screening for fetal Down syndrome. Serum levels of AFP, uE3, and hCG were stratified by smoking status and compared. Individual risks for fetal Down syndrome were analyzed both before and after adjusting the hCG levels for the effect of smoking. The prevalence of Down syndrome in the study population was calculated for both smokers and non-smokers.The average AFP, uE3, and hCG levels in women who smoked cigarettes were 3% greater (95% confidence interval [CI] 2-4%), 3% less (95% CI 2-4%), and 23% less (95% CI 22-24%), respectively, compared with levels in non-smokers. At comparable maternal ages, women who smoked cigarettes were identified as being at high risk for fetal Down syndrome 40% less often than non-smokers (4.0 versus 7.1% at a risk level of 1:250). Adjusting hCG levels for smoking status reduced the overall false-positive rate from 6.4 to 6.1% (using a term risk cutoff level of 1:250). The predicted effect on detection was small (a 0.7% increase). The prevalence of Down syndrome was lower among smokers, but the difference was not statistically significant (odds ratio 0.51, 95% CI 0.15-1.5).Adjusting the serum markers used for Down syndrome screening for the effect of maternal smoking has a small effect on overall screening performance. Given the uncertainty over whether there is a lower birth prevalence among women who smoke cigarettes, such adjustment is not currently justified.Maternal serum CA 125 for aneuploidy detection in early pregnancy.Maternal serum CA 125 levels were determined at 9-11 menstrual weeks for 26 cases of trisomy 13 (n = 4), trisomy 18 (n = 7), trisomy 21 (n = 15), and appropriate controls. There were no statistically significant differences between groups.Relationship between nuchal translucency at 11-14 weeks and nuchal fold at 20-24 weeks of gestation.To examine the relationship between the measurement of nuchal translucency in the first trimester and nuchal fold in the second trimester in normal pregnancy.This was a prospective study of 592 singleton pregnancies. Fetal nuchal translucency was measured at 11-14 weeks of gestation and nuchal fold at 20-24 weeks of gestation. Linear regression models were used to assess the relationship between nuchal translucency and nuchal fold after adjustment for gestational age.There was no significant association between nuchal translucency and nuchal fold thickness.It is possible that measurement of nuchal translucency and nuchal fold may provide an independent contribution in screening for trisomy 21.A novel method for the detection of Down syndrome with the use of four serum markers.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the use of the Lens culinaris agglutinin-reactive alpha-fetoprotein ratio for the detection of fetal Down syndrome in combination with traditional serum markers.We obtained maternal serum from 530 women with unaffected pregnancies and 31 women who were pregnant with a fetus with Down syndrome at 14 to 20 weeks of gestation. Various combinations of Lens culinaris agglutinin-reactive alpha-fetoprotein ratio, alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated estriol were evaluated by score, without regard for the maternal age-related fetal Down syndrome risk.The best combination of serum markers, according to our scoring method, was a combination of all 4 markers. This combination showed a sensitivity of 83.9%, with a 5.1% false-positive rate for Down syndrome. Moreover, in older women, high sensitivity was obtained without increasing the false-positive rate.The screen using all 4 markers showed high sensitivity in all age groups without increasing the false-positive rate.Risk of Down syndrome and any clinically significant chromosome defect in pregnancies with abnormal triple-screen and normal targeted ultrasonographic results.Our purpose was to study prospectively the use of ultrasonographic biometry to refine the risk estimates for both Down syndrome and any clinically significant chromosome defect in women with abnormal biochemical triple-screen results.Ultrasonographic biometry and anatomic survey were performed on study and control cases. Expected values for humerus, femur, combined humerus plus femur lengths, and abdominal circumference were generated on the basis of biparietal diameter obtained from a normal group. Threshold observed/expected values of each measurement for screening for Down syndrome and clinically significant chromosome defects were determined with receiver-operator characteristic curves. By stepwise logistic regression analysis the optimal screening parameters, including nuchal thickness, for detection of Down syndrome and clinically significant chromosome defect were determined. Risk tables for chromosome anomalies were developed on the basis of ultrasonography and triple-screen values.Of 1034 cases at risk for Down syndrome (risk > or = 1/270) or trisomy 18 on the basis of triple-screen results, there were 11 cases of Down syndrome, 1 of trisomy 18, and 17 clinically significant chromosome defects. Abnormal nuchal thickness or observed/expected humerus length < 0.92 was the most sensitive parameter for Down syndrome detection. Abnormal nuchal thickness or observed/expected combined femur and humerus length < 0.90 was the most sensitive for significant chromosome defects. With abnormal biometry or anatomy the Down syndrome risk was 8 of 127 versus 1 of 753 in normals, odds ratio 50.4 (95% confidence interval 6.4 to 90.2), p < 0.00001, and the risk of significant defects was 11 of 90 versus 6 of 830 in normals, odds ratio 19.3 (95% confidence interval 6.4 to 60.5), p < 0.00001. In a pregnancy with a 1 in 270 triple-screen risk for Down syndrome, normal biometric and anatomic results reduce the risk to 1 in 2100.Normal ultrasonographic anatomy and biometry significantly reduces the risk of both Down syndrome and any significant chromosome defects in pregnancies with abnormal triple-screen results.The value of sonography in early pregnancy for the detection of fetal abnormalities in an unselected population.To determine the value of early pregnancy sonography in detecting fetal abnormalities in an unselected obstetric population. DESIGN Prospective cross-sectional study. All women initially underwent transabdominal sonography and when the anatomical survey was considered to be incomplete, transvaginal sonography was also performed (20.1%). Nuchal translucency was measured and karyotyping was performed as appropriate.University Department of Obstetrics and Gynaecology.6634 sequential unselected women (mean maternal age 29.9 years, range 13-50; mean gestational age 12+4 weeks, range 11+0-14+6), carrying 6443 live fetuses participated in this study.Detection rate of fetal anomalies and the associated cost per case detected in early pregnancy.The incidence of anomalous fetuses was 1.4% (92/6443) including 43 chromosomal abnormalities. The detection rate for structural abnormalities was 59.0% (37/63, 95% CI 46.5-72.4) and the specificity was 99.9% in early pregnancy. When the first and second trimester scans were combined, the detection for structural abnormalities was 81.0% (51/63, 95% CI 67.7-89.2). Seventy-eight percent (31/40) of chromosomal abnormalities (excluding three cases of XXY) were diagnosed at 11-14 weeks, either because of a nuchal translucency greater than or equal to the 99th centile for gestational age (43%; 17/40, 95% CI 27.4-60.4), or due to the presence of structural abnormalities (35%; 14/40, 95% CI 21.2-52.8). Sixty-five percent (15/23) of cases of trisomy 21 were also diagnosed either because of having a nuchal translucency greater than or equal to the 99th centile (57.0%; 13/23) or due to the presence of a structural abnormality (9.0%; 2/23). Overall, the detection rate of structurally abnormal fetuses was 59% (37/63) in early pregnancy and 81% in combination with the second trimester scan. The cost per abnormality diagnosed in early pregnancy is estimated to be pound sterling 6258 per structurally abnormal fetus, pound sterling 7470 per chromosomal abnormality and pound sterling 4453 per anomalous fetus.The majority of fetal structural and chromosomal abnormalities can be detected by sonographic screening at 11-14 weeks, but the second trimester scan should not be abandoned.Maternal serum CA125 is not a second trimester marker for Down's syndrome.Stability of intact chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) in serum, liquid whole blood, and dried whole-blood filter-paper spots: impact on screening for Down syndrome by measurement of free beta-hCG subunit.The use of multiple maternal serum biochemical markers in screening for Down syndrome is gaining worldwide acceptance. We sought to study the impact of the potential instability of intact human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) on free beta-hCG subunit, a marker that has recently been used successfully in such screening. We found that, in practice, any changes in free beta-hCG due to the instability of intact hCG do not inhibit the effectiveness of free beta-hCG as a marker for Down syndrome. This was proven by controlled laboratory experiments at various stress temperatures, freeze-thaw studies, and analysis of a large set of screening data with particular reference to time in transit for individual samples. Data from controlled dissociation studies demonstrate that any apparent increase in free beta-hCG due to the instability of intact hCG cannot be attributed simply to the dissociation of intact hCG. Finally, for large-scale mass population screening in areas of the world where transport delays, safety concerns, and high temperatures preclude the shipment of liquid whole blood, dried whole-blood spots in filter paper provide a suitable delivery system with many advantages.Triple-marker prenatal screening program for chromosomal defects.To examine screening performance of California's triple-marker screening program, using data from a statewide registry for chromosomal defects.This study included 752,686 women who received a screening risk and had an expected date of delivery between July 2005 and the end of June 2007. Follow-up diagnostic services for screen-positive women were performed at state-approved centers. Data on diagnostic outcomes from these visits were entered into the California Chromosomal Defect Registry (CCDR). Other CCDR sources include mandatory reporting by all cytogenetic laboratories and hospitals and outcome data forms submitted by prenatal care providers.The observed detection rate for Down syndrome (N=1,217) was 77.4%. It varied significantly by gestational dating method and maternal age. The rates for women aged younger than 35 years and 35 years and older were 62.4% and 94.0%, respectively. The detection rates were 81.3% for ultrasound-dated pregnancies and 67.5% for last menstrual period-dated pregnancies. For Turner syndrome, trisomy 18, triploidy, and trisomy 13, the detection rates were 79.4%, 82.5%, 98.1%, and 36.0%, respectively. The positive rate for Down syndrome was 5.4%. Of women with a Down syndrome fetus who were screen positive, only 49.5% opted for amniocentesis. Of women who obtained results from amniocentesis indicating a Down syndrome fetus, 61.4% had an elective termination, 26.2% had a live birth, 4.5% had a death or miscarriage, and 7.9% had an unknown outcome.The observed performance of this large triple-marker screening program exceeds generally predicted detection rates for Down syndrome. This study methodology will be used to measure the performance of subsequent screening enhancements.III.[Screening by maternal serum markers for Down's syndrome].To investigate the optimal method of screening for Down's syndrome (DS) with maternal serum mankers.Screening by maternal serum markers for Down's syndrome was offered to all 2886 pregnant women in Peking Union Medical Hospital during 1996.11-2001.3. Alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotrophin (free beta-HCG) were used as markers during the first year of pregnancy. Alpha-fetoprotein, free human chorionic gonadotrophin (HCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) were used as mid pregnancy and first-trimester markers in next three years. Amniocentesis and (CVS) were done in those defined as risk cases.The detection rate of Down's syndrome by maternal serum markers was 3.8% (11/2886). The proportion of false positive results in group of triple markers (alpha FP, free beta-HCG, PAPP-A) was 5%.The PAPP-A was a good marker to detect Down's syndrome in early pregnancy and may be used to predict the outcome during mid trimester of pregnancy. The AFP and free beta-HCG can be useful markers to detect Down's syndrome and fetal abnormality. While prenatal diagnostics can be shifted to an early pregnant period.[Antenatal screening of maternal alpha-fetoprotein with dried-blood spot samples on filter paper].Abnormal levels of maternal serum alphafetoprotein (AFP) have been used as a good biochemical marker for the screening of neural tube defects (NTD) and Down syndrome. From January 1988 to June 1989, we conducted a community-based maternal AFP screening program in Nan-Tou County, which is located in the middle of Taiwan. A total of 3,776 pregnant women, which accounted for about 42% of the total number of women pregnant during that period of time in Nan-Tou county, were screened using the filter paper blood collecting technique. Of those screened, 5.1% of them were found to be borderline positive for NTD (2.0 less than MoM less than 2.5). The screening positive rates for NTD (MoM greater than 2.5) and Down syndrome (Down's risk greater than 1/100) were 3.7% and 1.7%, respectively. Except for those lost to follow-up, 3 (2.1%) of the borderline cases were confirmed to have serious pregnancy complications (porencephaly, fetal demise, and imminent miscarriage). Eleven (10.8%) of the abnormal pregnancies, which included 1 case of possible hydrocephalus, 2 cases of anencephalus, and 1 case of triploid, were found in the NTD positive group. Six (18.7%) anomalies (1 Down syndrome, 1 hydatidiform mole, and 4 miscarriages) were detected in the increased Down's risk group. Totally, 20 adverse pregnancies, i.e. 0.5% (20/3,776) of the screened women, were confirmed in this screening program. No false-positive cases were reported, or were found among the 1,777 post-delivery questionnaires completed.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)First-trimester uterine artery Doppler and serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein-a in preeclampsia and chromosomal defects.We examined the potential value of the uterine artery pulsatility index (PI) in pregnancies with fetal aneuploidies and in those that developed preeclampsia (PE) with the aim of distinguishing between these complications in pregnancies with low pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).Uterine artery PI and serum PAPP-A at 11-13 weeks were measured in 165 cases of PE, including 33 that required delivery before 34 weeks (early PE) and 132 with late PE, and in 301 cases with aneuploidies, including 200 with trisomy 21. Each case of aneuploidy and PE was matched with 4 unaffected controls.Serum PAPP-A was lower in early PE (0.58 multiples of the normal median, MoM) and in trisomy 21 (0.54 MoM), trisomy 18 (0.22 MoM) and Turner syndrome (0.51 MoM) - but not in late PE (0.90 MoM) - than in controls (1.01 MoM). Uterine artery PI was higher in early PE (1.52 MoM), late PE (1.20 MoM), trisomy 18 (1.20 MoM) and Turner syndrome (1.29 MoM) - but not in trisomy 21 (1.02 MoM) - than in controls (1.0 MoM).The uterine artery PI at 11-13 weeks may be useful in distinguishing between low PAPP-A due to trisomy 21 and early PE.Measurement of urinary free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin by immunoradiometric assay.An immunoradiometric assay for free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (F beta hCG) is now available. Measurement of serum F beta hCG has been shown to be valuable for the diagnosis of trophoblastic disease and for screening Down's syndrome pregnancies. Urine specimens may be preferable to blood samples since collection of urine specimens usually are less inconvenient to patients than venipuncture. We have evaluated whether the immunoradiometric assay can be applicable to urine samples. The assay was sensitive and precise. When urine samples were diluted 4-fold or more, the diluted samples gave quantitative values, and recovery of beta hCG added to urine samples was satisfactory. Creatinine corrected urinary F beta hCG levels correlated with serum F beta hCG levels. Thus, the immunoradiometric assay was considered to be applicable to urine samples. Serum F beta hCG to hCG ratio has been reported to be important to distinguish among normal pregnancies, hydatidiform mole and choriocarcinoma. However, urinary F beta hCG to hCG ratio did not significantly correlate with serum F beta hCG to hCG ratio. And therefore, the clinical value of urinary F beta hCG to hCG ratio should be further investigated.Serum markers for Down's syndrome in women who have had in vitro fertilisation: implications for antenatal screening.To examine the Down's syndrome screening positive rate among in vitro fertilisation (IVF) pregnancies, we measured second trimester serum marker levels in singleton IVF pregnancies (cases) and in five non-IVF pregnancies (controls) matched to each case for gestational age, age of mother, and duration of storage of the serum sample. There were 151 IVF pregnancies in which alpha fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol (uE3), free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and total hCG were measured, 104 IVF pregnancies in which free alpha-hCG was measured, and 39 IVF pregnancies in which inhibin A was measured. Median uE3 levels were 6% lower (P = 0.003), median free beta-hCG 9% higher (P = 0.024), and median total hCG 14% higher (P = 0.026) in IVF pregnancies compared with controls. The screen positive rate in the IVF pregnancies (28%) was about twice as high as that in controls (17%). High hCG levels may be explained by progesterone remaining high in IVF pregnancies. The low uE3 levels remain unexplained. In Down's syndrome screening in IVF pregnancies hCG and uE3 values should be adjusted to avoid the high screen positive rate.Second trimester prenatal screening for Down's syndrome using alpha-fetoprotein and free beta hCG: a seven year review.To determine the value and impact over a seven year period of a second trimester screening programme for trisomy 21 and trisomy 18, using the two maternal serum markers alpha-fetoprotein and free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin.Retrospective review.A biochemical screening laboratory serving three health districts with three antenatal clinics in both teaching and nonteaching hospitals.67,904 pregnancies in women of all ages screened between 14 and 22 weeks of gestation between 1 April 1991 and 31 March 1998.All women booked into three major antenatal clinics were offered biochemical screening. Women at increased risk of trisomy 21 or trisomy 18 (> or =1 in 250 at term) were offered an invasive diagnostic procedure. Follow up of the outcome of all pregnancies was performed.Detection rate for trisomy 21 and trisomy 18, false positive rates, uptake of screening, uptake of amniocentesis in women identified at increased risk, prevalence of trisomy 21 at birth, detection and false positive rates by maternal age, fetal loss rate after amniocentesis, report turn around time, and identification of other anomalies.Overall, 87% (67,904/78,501) of women underwent screening. The rate of detection of trisomy 21 was 75% (80/107; 95% CI 66 to 83) with a 5.1% false positive rate (3466/67,904; CI 4.9 to 5.3%). In women under 30 years of age the detection rate was 60% (18/30; CI 41 to 77) with a 2.6% false positive rate (956/36,371; CI 2.5 to 2.8). The rate of detection of trisomy 18 was 57% (8/14; CI 29 to 82) with a 0.7% false positive rate (475/67,904; CI 0.64 to 0.76). Uptake of amniocentesis was 83% (2912/3508). Women were 3.3 times more likely to refuse amniocentesis if the risk was close to the cutoff (1 in 250) than if the risk was > or =1 in 50. Fetal loss within 28 days of amniocentesis was 0.9% (25/2912). Prenatal screening identified 84 other anomalies in addition to 41 cases of impending fetal death.Second trimester prenatal screening for trisomy 21 and trisomy 18 using a simple two marker approach incorporating free beta hCG can achieve high detection rates over a long period of time. Health authorities who still have not introduced trisomy 21 screening should be encouraged by what can be achieved and should consider making such screening available to all women. Established second trimester detection rates of 75% for a 5% false positive rate will be the benchmark by which first trimester screening using nuchal translucency, PAPP-A and free beta hCG will be judged.[FISH technique in aneuplodies prenatal diagnosis].Chromosomal disorders are severe and affect 0.9% of the newborns. In these conditions, prenatal diagnosis should be compulsory in every public medical system.Our study is a retrospective analysis of pregnant women investigated by amniocentesis and FISH technique.We analyzed 233 samples collected between 2004 and 2007 at Iaşi "Cuza-Vodă" Obstetrics and Gynecology Hospital. The majority of cases were investigated between 16 and 24 weeks of pregnancy. Thirty-eight abnormal cases (16.30%) were identified: 17 cases with 21 trisomy, 16 cases with 18 trisomy, 3 cases with X monosomy, and 2 cases with 13 trisomy. The main reasons for amniocentesis were: advanced maternal age (12.5% abnormal cases) ultrasound abnormalities (26.15% abnormal cases), and biochemical abnormalities (7.14% abnormal cases).Our data are in agreement with other studies, and support our results.Second-trimester Down's syndrome serum screening: double, triple or quadruple marker testing?The recommendations of the UK National Screening Committee (NSC) are based on the findings of the Serum, Urine and Ultrasound Screening Study (SURUSS). Our study sought to establish if the SURUSS findings, in terms of detection rates (DR) and false-positive rates (FPR) for various second-trimester marker combinations, could be replicated in a local setting.We investigated the effects of adding inhibin-A and unconjugated oestriol to our existing double test protocol. This retrospective study examined 1000 control pregnancies and 128 affected pregnancies.The inhibin-A method was associated with considerable assay drift and very marked within-batch imprecision (intrabatch percent coefficient of variation [CV] = 17%). At a cut-off of 1 in 250, the quadruple test showed a DR of 72%, the triple test 70% and the double test 63%. There were no significant differences between the FPRs for any of the combinations, which were all between 6.6% and 7.0% for a 1 in 250 cut-off.In our view, the current inhibin-A assay is unacceptable as a screening marker due to poor assay performance. We have reviewed the NSC benchmark programme outcomes, and would suggest that the 2005 target of a DR of at least 60% with an FPR of less than 5% is achievable using triple testing in the second trimester in conjunction with universal scan dating. Our results suggest that the April 2007 target of a DR of 75% with an FPR of less than 3% is unachievable using current second-trimester maternal serum screening.First-trimester maternal serum human thyroid-stimulating hormone in chromosomally normal and Down syndrome pregnancies.Maternal serum human thyroid-stimulating hormone (TSH) levels were investigated in chromosomally normal and Down syndrome pregnancies to determine whether TSH can be used as a marker for Down syndrome in the first trimester. Measurements were conducted on stored serum samples collected from 23 Down syndrome pregnancies and 115 unaffected pregnancies before chorionic villus sampling (CVS), between 9 and 11 completed weeks of pregnancy. The samples were matched for gestational age, maternal age, maternal weight and duration of storage of the serum sample. Maternal TSH concentration was slightly decreased in Down syndrome pregnancies, with a median of 0.84 multiples of the median (MoM). Maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) concentration was slightly elevated in Down syndrome pregnancies, with a median of 1.03 MoM. Both differences were not significant applying matched rank analysis (p=0.50 for TSH and p=0.43 for hCG). The association between TSH and hCG in unaffected pregnancies was also measured. The Spearman correlation coefficient between TSH and hCG was -0.21 which was statistically significant (p=0.02, 95% confidence interval -0.38 to -0.03). However, it was concluded that TSH is not a useful marker for distinguishing Down syndrome-affected pregnancies from normal pregnancies in the first trimester.Screening for trisomy 21 in twin pregnancies in the first trimester: does chorionicity impact on maternal serum free beta-hCG or PAPP-A levels?In a study of 180 twin pregnancies I have examined the distribution of maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), in addition to fetal nuchal translucency thickness (NT), in twins classified as monochorionic or dichorionic, based on ultrasound appearance at 10-14 weeks of gestation. In 45 monochorionic and 135 dichorionic twin pregnancies the median MoM free beta-hCG was not significantly different (1.00 vs 1.01), whilst that for PAPP-A was lower (0.89 vs 1.01) but again with no statistical significance. Previous reports of an increased fetal NT in monochorionic twins pregnancies could not be confirmed (1.03 vs 1.00). It is concluded that the existing pseudo risk twin correction algorithm is appropriate for both monochorionic and dichorionic twins in providing accurate first trimester risks for trisomy 21.First trimester maternal serum placenta growth factor (PIGF)concentrations in pregnancies with fetal trisomy 21 or trisomy 18.Placenta growth factor (PIGF), an angiogenic factor belonging to the vascular endothelial growth factor family, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) were measured in maternal serum from 45 pregnancies with trisomy 21, 45 with trisomy 18 and 493 normal controls at 10-13 completed weeks of gestation. In the normal pregnancies maternal serum PIGF levels increased exponentially with gestation. The median multiple of the median (MoM) PIGF concentration in the trisomy 21 group (1.26 MoM) was significantly higher (p<0.0001) than in the control group (1.00 MoM). In the trisomy 18 group the median PIGF was lower (0.889 MoM) but this did not quite reach significance (p=0.064). The corresponding median MoM values for PAPP-A were 1.00 MoM for the controls, 0.49 MoM for trisomy 21 and 0.16 MoM for trisomy 18. The median MoM values for free beta-hCG were 1.00 MoM for the controls, 2.05 MoM for trisomy 21 and 0.38 MoM for trisomy 18. In the control group there was a small but significant correlation of PIGF with free beta-hCG (r=+0.1024) and PAPP-A (r=+0.2288). In the trisomy 18 group there was a significant association between PIGF and free beta-hCG (r=+0.2629) but not with PAPP-A (r=+0.0038). In the trisomy 21 group there was a small but significant association with PAPP-A (r=+0.1028) but not with free beta-hCG (r=+0.0339). The separation of affected and unaffected pregnancies in maternal serum PIGF is small, and therefore it is unlikely that measurement of PIGF would improve screening for these abnormalities provided by the combination of fetal nuchal translucency and maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG.Gradual implementation of first trimester screening in a population with a prior screening strategy: population based cohort study.To evaluate the implementation of first trimester screening in the Czech Republic during 1996-2007 on the number of infants born with numerical chromosomal anomalies, the gestational age at diagnosis and the number of invasive procedures.A population based cohort study.National Registry of Congenital Anomalies, 53 Czech Republic Genetic Departments.About 100,000 pregnancies per year.Primary outcomes were the rates of fetuses and newborns with diagnosed numerical chromosomal anomalies and the gestational age at diagnosis. Secondary outcomes were the rates of chorion villus sampling (CVS) and amniocenteses and the contribution of age groups on the detection rate of trisomy 21.The number of newborns with Down's syndrome decreased from 5.42/10,000 in 1996 to 3.66/10,000 newborns in the 2007. The total incidence of Down's syndrome increased from 13.42 to 20.66/10,000. The detection rate in women <35 years increased from 35.59 in 1996 to 45.08 in 2007; in women >35 years from 23.73 to 38.52. The number of amniocenteses/detected case of Down's syndrome was 124 in 1996 and 123 in 2007. The corresponding number of CVS decreased dramatically from 83 in 1996 to 10 in 2007.Despite the increase of maternal age and the corresponding increase of Down's syndrome, the number of newborns with Down's syndrome decreased. Implementation of the first trimester combined screening leads to a shift towards earlier diagnosis of all major chromosomal abnormalities.Screening for chromosomal defects by fetal nuchal translucency at 11 to 14 weeks.Risk of chromosome abnormalities in the presence of bilateral or unilateral choroid plexus cysts.To evaluate the rate of chromosome abnormalities in cases of uni- and bilateral choroid plexus cysts (CPCs).A total of 10,875 ultrasound (US) examinations were performed in the second trimester, and 435 cases with CPC (4%) were found. After genetic counseling, 45 patients decided not to undergo karyotyping. The authors performed a chromosome analysis in 390 cases of CPCs.The total risk of chromosome abnormalities was 3.59% (n = 14) and risk of trisomies was 2.05% (n = 8). Trisomy 18 was found in 6 cases (1.54%), trisomy 21 in 1 case (0.26%), and trisomy 9 in 1 case (0.26%). The risk of 45,X karyotype was 0.77% (n = 3). One case of 47,XXY karyotype and 2 cases with other chromosome abnormalities were found. In 212 unilateral cases there were 7 with chromosome abnormalities (3.3%). In 178 bilateral cases there were 7 with abnormal karyotypes (3.93%). The CPC was associated with additional fetal US anomalies (with or without polyhydramnios/oligohydramnios) in 112 cases; chromosome abnormalities were detected in 4 cases (3.57%). 66 cases were associated with polyhydramnios/oligohydramnios but not with other fetal US anomalies; 3 cases of abnormal karyotypes were found (4.55%). The CPC was isolated in 212 cases and 7 cases were associated with chromosome disorders (3.3%).US plays an important role in prenatal diagnostics. Further genetic counseling is recommended in cases with CPCs.Risk of abnormal triple screen for Down syndrome is significantly higher in patients with female fetuses.Previous studies have shown that mid-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels are significantly higher and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) levels significantly lower in women with male compared with female fetuses. We have evaluated whether triple-screen criteria are more likely to identify women with female fetuses as at risk for Down syndrome. From the Georgetown University genetics database we obtained the absolute values and corresponding multiples of the median (MoM) for AFP, hCG and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) in singleton gestations for the period database November 1992 July 1996. A Down syndrome risk of 1/270 or greater at mid-trimester was considered as high risk. A total of 977 patients with triple screen and outcome information were identified, including 502 female and 475 male fetuses. Patients with female fetuses were significantly more likely to have lower serum AFP (p=0.003) and a positive triple screen for Down syndrome (72 (14 per cent) versus 45 (9 per cent), p<0.02) than those with male fetuses. The gestational age at triple screen, maternal serum hCG and uE3, race and diabetes were not significantly different between the two groups. Since Down syndrome is less common in female than male fetuses, and the rates of female and male Down syndrome fetuses detected by triple screen and subsequent amniocentesis are not significantly different, the excess of positive mid-trimester maternal serum triple screen in women with female fetuses is likely due to false-positive results.Maternal serum S100 protein in normal and Down syndrome pregnancies.Protein S100 is a low molecular weight (10-12 kD) calcium-binding protein the beta subunit of which is coded for at the 22.2-22.3 region of the long arm of chromosome 21. This region has also been shown to be responsible for the phenotypic expression of Down syndrome. Previous studies demonstrated increased immunoreactivity to protein S100 in brain tissue from adults with Down syndrome. We have previously observed a higher concentration of S100 protein in the fetal blood of trisomy 21 fetuses compared with normal subjects. The aim of this study was therefore to investigate the use of measuring S100 protein concentration in maternal blood for Down syndrome screening. Maternal blood was taken at the time of chorionic villus sampling or cordocentesis (11-38 weeks' gestation) for fetal karyotyping. Protein S100 was measured by a two-site immunoradiometric assay (S-100 IRMA, Sangtec). There was no significant difference in the concentration of maternal S100 protein between normal and trisomy 21 pregnancies (p<0.10). Moreover, there was no significant association between maternal serum S100 protein concentration and gestational age (r(s)=0.27, p=0.07), maternal age (r(s)=-0.17, p=0.7) or maternal weight (r(s)=-0.013, p=0.9). This study shows that measurement of maternal serum S100 protein concentration does not appear to have a value in Down syndrome screening.Comparison of the efficiency of second-trimester nasal bone hypoplasia and increased nuchal fold in Down syndrome screening.The purpose of this study was to compare the efficiency of second-trimester nasal bone hypoplasia (NB) and increased nuchal fold (NF) in Down syndrome screening.This was a prospective multicenter cohort study of women who underwent an anatomic survey between 16 and 22 weeks of gestation. The fetal NB and other markers of fetal aneuploidy that included NF were evaluated. NB was defined either as an absent NB or length of <0.75 multiples of the median for the gestational age. Two definitions of increased NF (>5 mm and >6 mm) were evaluated. Fetuses or infants with Down syndrome were compared with those fetuses without for the presence of NB and increased NF.Among 4373 pregnancies that were evaluated over a 5-year period, there were 50 pregnancies with Down syndrome. NB evaluation was obtained in 3936 of 4373 pregnancies (90%); NF was evaluated in all of the fetuses. Absent NB was seen in 14/49 cases (29%), and NF of >6 mm was seen in 6 of 50 cases (12%) with Down syndrome.Nasal bone and nuchal fold are efficient markers for Down syndrome. Absent nasal bone was a better predictor of Down syndrome, compared with nuchal fold, and should be a standard marker when a second-trimester genetic sonogram is performed.Prediction of patient-specific risk for fetal loss using maternal characteristics and first- and second-trimester maternal serum Down syndrome markers.To develop and evaluate a method of estimating patient-specific risk for fetal loss by combining maternal characteristics with serum markers.Data were obtained on 36,014 women from the FaSTER trial. Separate likelihood ratios were estimated for significant maternal characteristics and serum markers. Patient-specific risk was calculated by multiplying the incidence of fetal loss by the likelihood ratios for each maternal characteristic and for different serum marker combinations.Three hundred eighteen women had fetal loss < 24 weeks (early) and 103 > 24 weeks (late). Clinical characteristics evaluated included maternal age, body mass index, race, parity, threatened abortion, previous preterm delivery, and previous early loss. Serum markers studied as possible predictors of early loss included first-trimester pregnancy-associated plasma protein A and second-trimester alpha-fetoprotein, and unconjugated estriol. A risk assessment for early loss based on all of these factors yielded a 46% detection rate, for a fixed 10% false-positive rate, 39% for 5% and 28% for 1%. The only significant marker for late loss was inhibin A. The detection rate was 27% for a fixed 10% false-positive rate and only increased slightly when clinical characteristics were added to the model.Patient-specific risk assessment for early fetal loss using serum markers, with or without maternal characteristics, has a moderately high detection. Patient-specific risk assessment for late fetal loss has low detection rates.Improved performance in a prenatal screening programme for Down's syndrome incorporating serum-free hCG subunit analyses.A prenatal screening programme for Down's syndrome potentially detecting 76 per cent of affected pregnancies in the South Australian general population at an amniocentesis rate of 3.9 per cent was designed following analysis of mid-trimester serum samples from 57 women who carried an affected fetus. This equates to one affected pregnancy being detected for 41 chromosomal analyses performed. For the experimental series, 75.4 per cent of affected pregnancies were detected, while 4.1 per cent of control specimens produced estimated risk odds consistent with further action. A maternal risk odds of birth of a Down's syndrome fetus of 1:420 was taken as the decision value, which is the prevalence of Down's syndrome births to 35-year-old mothers in South Australia. This screening performance was achieved by investigating combinations of serum analytes not previously reported and by refining the calculation of maternal risk odds to include selective weighting of indicator analytes. Combination of the measurements of free alpha-subunits and beta-subunits of chorionic gonadotrophin, alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol, and placental lactogen was found to be most effective in indicating Down's syndrome fetuses. In all combinations of analytes tested, replacing the measurements of free alpha-subunits and free beta-subunits of chorionic gonadotrophin with the measurement of intact chorionic gonadotropin produced a less effective screen.Nasal bone measurement during the 1st trimester: is it useful?The aim of this study was to present our preliminary data about nasal bone measurements at 11-14 weeks of pregnancy. This study was conducted in our prenatal unit between 2000 and 2003. A total of 642 pregnant women (single pregnancies) were enrolled into the study. During the first trimester of pregnancy, crown-rump length, nuchal translucency thickness, and fetal nasal bone length measurements and ductus venosus Doppler images were evaluated. The distribution of absent or small nasal bones in both normal fetuses and in those having some pathological conditions was compared by statistical analysis. p < 0.05 was considered significant. Nasal bone evaluation was successful in 600 of 642 (93.4%) ultrasound examinations. The linear regression line showed a significant positive slope with increasing crown-rump length (r=0.54, p < 0.001). Absent or small nasal bones were more common in abnormal than in normal fetuses (p=0.007). It is clear that the fetal nasal bone is becoming a powerful tool in prenatal screening for aneuploidy. Larger studies to be performed in a low-risk population are needed to assess whether the measurement of the nasal bone length provides additional benefits beyond the assessment of the presence or absence of the nasal bone.Dimeric inhibin A as a marker for Down's syndrome in early pregnancy.In screening for Down's syndrome in the second trimester of pregnancy, the concentrations of alpha-fetoprotein, the beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin, and intact human chorionic gonadotropin in material serum are widely used markers. We investigated a new marker, dimeric inhibin A, and compared its predictive value with that of the established markers.Serum samples were obtained at 7 to 18 weeks of gestation from 58 women whose fetuses were known to be affected by Down's syndrome, 32 whose fetuses were affected by trisomy 18, and 438 whose fetuses were normal, and the samples were analyzed for each marker. Individual serum concentrations of each marker were converted to multiples of the median value at the appropriate length of gestation in the women with normal pregnancies, and rates of detection of Down's syndrome by screening for inhibin A in various combinations with the other markers were estimated by multivariate analysis.In the women with fetuses affected by Down's syndrome, the serum inhibin A concentrations were 2.06 times the median value in the women with normal pregnancies (P < 0.001). This compared with 2.00 times the median for the beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin, 1.82 times the median for intact human chorionic gonadotropin, and 0.72 for alpha-fetoprotein. The serum concentrations of inhibin A in the women with fetuses affected by Down's syndrome did not appear to be significantly elevated above normal until the end of the first trimester and were not significantly different from normal in the women with fetuses affected by trisomy 18 (P = 0.17). The rate of detection of Down's syndrome was 53 percent and the false positive rate was 5 percent when alpha-fetoprotein, the beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin, the maternal age were used together as predictors. The detection rate increased to 75 percent when inhibin A was added (P = 0.002).In the second trimester of pregnancy, measuring inhibin A in maternal serum, in combination with measurements of alpha-fetoprotein and beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin, significantly improved the rate of detection of Down's syndrome.Influence of ethnic origin on nuchal translucency screening for Down's syndrome.To determine the influence of ethnic origin on access to and equity of nuchal translucency screening for Down's syndrome in a multiethnic population.An observational study in a district general hospital with a large multiethnic population.1944 women attending at a hospital antenatal clinic.First-trimester fetal nuchal translucency measurements at 10-14 weeks in women from different ethnic groups.The racial origin of the screened population was not significantly different from that of the population attending for initial antenatal examination. Multiple regression analysis showed a small but significant difference in nuchal translucency measurement between fetuses of different ethnic origin.Nuchal translucency screening can be effectively and equitably delivered to a multiethnic population. Although there are significant differences in nuchal translucency measurement between ethnic groups, these differences are too small to require correction when nuchal translucency is used to screen for Down's syndrome.[Birth defects in the Czech Republic--the prenatal diagnostic].An analysis of the efficiency of prenatal diagnostic of selected birth defects in the Czech Republic and its dynamics in past 30 years according to birth defect type and prenatal diagnostic methods.Retrospective epidemiological analysis of selected birth defects, prenatal diagnostics efficiency.Data from the National Birth Defect Register (Institute for Health Information and Statistics) in the Czech Republic in the 1975 - 2005 period were used along with data on prenatally diagnosed and terminated pregnancies from the same period. Mean prenatal diagnostic efficiency values of selected types of defects were analyzed in 5-year periods and minimal/maximal values were assessed.During 1975 - 2005 period, totally 3,935,209 children were born, out of which 83,970 were with a birth defect. Mean incidence was 213.38 per 10,000 live births (with the highest value of 414.58 in 2003). In 1985 - 2005, 7,398 cases of prenatally detected birth defects (resulting in pregnancy terminations) were registered, which made (in relative numbers) a span from 4.9 defects per 10,000 live births in 1985 to 65.2 per 10,000 live births in the year 2005. During this period, an important increase of diagnostics of prenatally detectable defects occurred.The study gives results of relative efficiency of prenatal diagnostics of particular birth defects. The highest efficiency was in anencephaly and encephalocele (100%), the other defects showed the following numbers: spina bifida 81%, congenital hydrocephalus 67%, omfalocele 67%, gastroschisis 92%, cystic kidney 59%, renal agenesis 50%, diaphragmatic hernia 35% and Down syndrome 74%.The influence of different sample collection types on the levels of markers used for Down's syndrome screening as measured by the Kryptor Immunosassay system.In a rapid point-of-care screening programme for chromosomal anomalies, analysis of biochemical markers in maternal blood can now be accomplished in a rapid time frame (less than 20 min). The need to leave whole blood samples some 10 min for coagulation and a further 5 min for centrifugation adds additional processing time.The possibilities for reducing this processing time were investigated using various anticoagulated blood collection systems and the Kryptor analytical platform. Plasma levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and free human chronic gonadotrophin beta-subunit (beta-hCG) were compared with those in maternal serum.From the mean results from ten patients it was shown that use of heparin plasma resulted in a statistically significant reduction in levels of PAPP-A and that EDTA plasma reduced the levels of PAPP-A dramatically. For AFP, levels in citrated plasma and EDTA plasma were also significantly reduced, whereas levels of free beta-hCG were not affected.Use of alternative sample types for PAPP-A is not possible. The sample of choice for first trimester screening using the Kryptor platform is maternal serum.[First trimester diagnosis of chromosomal defects].Fetal nuchal translucency thickness at the 11(+0) - 13(+6) weeks scan has been combined with maternal age to provide an effective method of screening for trisomy 21; for an invasive testing rate of 5%, about 75% of trisomic pregnancies can be identified. When maternal serum free B-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A at 11(+0) - 13(+6) weeks are also taken into account, the detection rate of chromosomal defects is about 85-90%. In 60-70% of fetuses with trisomy 21 the nasal bone is not visible at the 11(+0) - 13(+6) weeks scan and examination of the nasal bone can increase the detection rate of screening by the first trimester scan and serum biochemistry to more than 95%.[Prenatal diagnostics of chromosomal aberrations Czech Republic: 1994-2007].An analysis of prenatal diagnostics efficiency of selected types of chromosomal aberrations in the Czech Republic in 2007. Update of 1994-2007 data according to particular selected diagnoses.Retrospective epidemiological analysis of pre- and postnatal chromosomal aberrations diagnostics and its efficiency.Data on pre- and postnatally diagnosed birth defects in the Czech Republic during 1994-2007 were used. Data on prenatally diagnosed birth defects (and for terminated pregnancies) were collected from particular departments of prenatal diagnostics, medical genetics and ultrasound diagnostics in the Czech Republic, data on birth defects in births from the National Birth Defects Register (Institute for Health Information and Statistics). Total numbers over the period under the study, mean incidences of selected types of chromosomal aberrations and mean prenatal diagnostics efficiencies were analyzed. Following chromosomal aberrations were studied: Down, Edwards, Patau, Turner and Klinefelter syndromes and syndromes 47,XXX and 47,XYY.A relative proportion of Down, Edwards and Patau syndromes as well as other autosomal and gonosomal aberration is presented in figures. Recently, trisomies 13, 18 and 21 present around 70% of all chromosomal aberrations in selectively aborted fetuses, in other pregnancies, "other chromosomal aberrations" category (mostly balanced reciprocal translocations and inversions) present more than 2/3 of all diagnoses. During the period under the study, following total numbers, mean relative incidences (per 10,000 live births, in brackets) and mean prenatal diagnostics efficiency (in %) were found in following chromosomal syndromes: Down syndrome 2,244 (16.58) and 63.37%, Edwards syndrome 521 (3.85) and 79.93%, Patau syndrome 201 (1.49) and 68.87%, Turner syndrome 380 (2.81) and 79.89%, 47,XXX syndrome 61 (0.45) and 59.74%, Klinefelter syndrome 163 (1.20) and 73.65% and 47,XYY syndrome 22 (0.16) and 54.76%.The study gives updated results of incidences analysis of both pre- and postnatally diagnosed chromosomal birth defects in the Czech Republic during the 1994-2007 period. Incidences found in our study correspond (in case of trisomies 13, 18 and 21) with those published widely in literature as well as with those found in large-scale international studies (ICBDSR, EUROCAT). In case of gonosomal aberrations, incidences found in this study are lower that those published, most probably due to a later registration (over 15 years of age of the child) of these diagnoses.Urinary analysis for Down's syndrome: is the measurement of urinary beta-core the future of biochemical screening for Down's syndrome.Most Down's Screening protocols have concentrated on the analysis of oncofetal antigen levels present in serum. Urine has largely been ignored, but mass screening based on a urine text has several logistical advantages. We have examined the levels of urinary beta-core as a marker of Down's syndrome. (beta-core is a major immunoreactive degradation product of hCG and in particular its beta-subunit). Elevated maternal serum hCG is the single most effective biochemical marker of Down's syndrome and levels are more than doubled. Measurement of elevated free beta-subunit has been shown to be a superior discriminator than measurement of intact or total-hCG. This was shown by an increase in comparative serum levels from 2.04 to 2.41 multiples of the control population medium (MoM). The median MoM value of beta-core for Down's cases in studies has varied between 4.38 and 6.28. The proportion of true Down's cases having a beta-core value greater than the 95th centile of the controls varied from 61 to 93%. This is far superior to any single serum marker. If other complimentary urinary markers can be found urinary screening could replace serum screening not only because of the logistical advantages but increased sensitivity.Prenatal screening for Down syndrome: should first trimester ultrasound replace maternal serum screening?Comparison of different strategies in prenatal screening for Down's syndrome: cost effectiveness analysis of computer simulation.To assess and compare the cost effectiveness of three different strategies for prenatal screening for Down's syndrome (integrated test, sequential screening, and contingent screenings) and to determine the most useful cut-off values for risk.Computer simulations to study integrated, sequential, and contingent screening strategies with various cut-offs leading to 19 potential screening algorithms.The computer simulation was populated with data from the Serum Urine and Ultrasound Screening Study (SURUSS), real unit costs for healthcare interventions, and a population of 110 948 pregnancies from the province of Québec for the year 2001.Cost effectiveness ratios, incremental cost effectiveness ratios, and screening options' outcomes.The contingent screening strategy dominated all other screening options: it had the best cost effectiveness ratio ($C26,833 per case of Down's syndrome) with fewer procedure related euploid miscarriages and unnecessary terminations (respectively, 6 and 16 per 100,000 pregnancies). It also outperformed serum screening at the second trimester. In terms of the incremental cost effectiveness ratio, contingent screening was still dominant: compared with screening based on maternal age alone, the savings were $C30,963 per additional birth with Down's syndrome averted. Contingent screening was the only screening strategy that offered early reassurance to the majority of women (77.81%) in first trimester and minimised costs by limiting retesting during the second trimester (21.05%). For the contingent and sequential screening strategies, the choice of cut-off value for risk in the first trimester test significantly affected the cost effectiveness ratios (respectively, from $C26,833 to $C37,260 and from $C35,215 to $C45,314 per case of Down's syndrome), the number of procedure related euploid miscarriages (from 6 to 46 and from 6 to 45 per 100,000 pregnancies), and the number of unnecessary terminations (from 16 to 26 and from 16 to 25 per 100,000 pregnancies).Contingent screening, with a first trimester cut-off value for high risk of 1 in 9, is the preferred option for prenatal screening of women for pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome.Combining maternal age and serum alpha-fetoprotein to predict the risk of Down syndrome.Twenty-eight cases of Down syndrome with maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) measured at second trimester were added to 137 previously reported cases. Seventy-eight percent of affected pregnancies had levels at or below the median AFP value, compared with 50% of unaffected pregnancies. Maternal age at delivery and serum AFP levels by multiples of the median were used to construct a table to determine the risk of Down syndrome. This was compared with the risk for a 35-year-old woman (one in 365). Similar risks were estimated for a 21-year-old with AFP below 0.4 multiples of the median, a 23-year-old below 0.5, a 26-year-old below 0.6, and a 29-year-old below 0.7 multiples of the median. This study provides guidelines for counseling pregnant women who have low serum AFP levels.Maternal serum marker medians in Aboriginal Canadian women.The study evaluates the differences between Aboriginal and Caucasian women in the levels of maternal serum markers used in second-trimester Down syndrome screening (alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, and total human chorionic gonadotrophin).A case-control study compared the levels of serum markers in 401 Aboriginal women and 1565 matched controls selected from 7717 Caucasian women. The cases and controls were screened in a single centre and matched for maternal age, parity, and sample date. Women with multiple pregnancies and pregnancies associated with Down syndrome, open neural tube defects, trisomy 18, and insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus as well as women without weight recorded were excluded from the study.No differences in the levels of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and total human chorionic gonadotrophin were observed between the two groups. Maternal serum unconjugated estriol was 12% higher in Aboriginal women.Since Aboriginal women make up only a small proportion of women screened, correcting the level of uE3 for this group will have little effect on the overall screening performance. However, if these results are confirmed by further study, individual centres may consider making this correction, so optimal screening performance can be achieved in Aboriginal women.Maternal serum levels of total activin-A in first-trimester trisomy 21 pregnancies.Maternal serum total activin-A concentration was measured in 45 pregnancies affected by trisomy 21 and 493 control unaffected pregnancies at 10-14 weeks of gestation. In the trisomy 21 pregnancies total activin-A concentration was significantly higher (1.36 MoM of the unaffected pregnancies) and in 16% of cases the level was above the 95th centile of normal. The log10 SD for the control group and the trisomy 21 group were 0.17 and 0.22, respectively. The median pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) in this trisomy 21 series was 0.49 and for free beta-hCG was 2.05. In the trisomy group there were significant positive associations between total activin-A and PAPP-A (0.6071) and free beta-hCG (0.4255). The low median difference and the high overlap in values between trisomic and unaffected pregnancies make total activin-A of little practical use in first-trimester screening for trisomy 21.Medically assisted reproduction and second-trimester maternal serum marker screening for Down syndrome.To evaluate the effect of in vitro fertilization (IVF) and intracytoplasmic sperm injection (ICSI) on total hCG, free ss-hCG, AFP and unconjugated estriol (uE3) used as markers for second-trimester Down syndrome maternal serum screening.Second-trimester maternal sera from 1515 singleton pregnancies (970 by IVF, 545 by ICSI) were compared with control sera (21 014 cases). Free ss-hCG, total hCG, AFP and uE3 were compared between the control group and the medically assisted reproduction groups. The percentages of at-risk patients (>/=1/250) were also compared.No differences in values of the maternal serum markers were observed between the medically assisted and control groups. When maternal age was taken into account, the screen-positive rate for Down syndrome screening did not differ between the two groups.Patients undergoing assisted reproduction techniques can be counseled for maternal serum Down syndrome screening with the same efficacy as patients with naturally conceived pregnancies.Prenatal detection of trisomy 21 by second-trimester ultrasound examination and maternal age in a non-selected population of 49 314 births in Norway.To assess the contribution of the second-trimester routine ultrasound examination and maternal age (>or= 38 years) to the prenatal detection of trisomy 21 in a large non-selected population in which no other screening methods were carried out.A prospective follow-up study was carried out in a non-selected Norwegian population from 1987 to 2004, including a total of 49 314 births. Data from all cases of trisomy 21, detected prenatally by karyotyping following amniocentesis performed for abnormal ultrasound findings or because of maternal age >or= 38 years, or postnatally after delivery, were registered. The study period was divided into three 6-year periods.Eighty-eight cases of trisomy 21 were registered. The prenatal detection rate was 43% (38/88). No significant change in the detection rate was observed over the 18 years. Fourteen percent (12/88) of cases were detected as a result of advanced maternal age and 30% (26/88) by prenatal ultrasound examination. Of all women with a trisomy 21 fetus, 72% (63/88) were under 38 years of age. The percentage of women >or= 38 years opting for karyotyping during the three time periods decreased significantly from 51% to 50% and 36%, respectively. The termination rate of trisomy 21 fetuses was 84%, with no significant change over time.Our data can be considered as a reference standard for population screening for trisomy 21 based solely on maternal age and second-trimester ultrasound imaging. The prenatal detection rate of trisomy 21 cases was poor and remained unchanged throughout the 18-year study period. If improvement in detection rates is desired, additional programs are necessary.Advanced maternal age as a sole indication for genetic amniocentesis; risk-benefit analysis based on a large database reflecting the current common practice.Recent advances in prenatal screening, including first and second trimester genetic screening as well as targeted sonography, have significantly improved the detection of trisomy 21. Therefore, several investigators have questioned the validity of recommending genetic amniocentesis to all women who are 35 years or older at delivery. Thus, we sought to investigate the risks and benefits associated with performing genetic amniocentesis in women whose sole indication for testing was advanced maternal age (AMA).A retrospective review of a Genzyme Genetics amniocentesis database (January 2006-December 2006) was performed. All specimens obtained from women of AMA as the sole indication were eligible for analysis. The amniocentesis-related potential fetal loss was calculated based on the traditional fetal loss rate of 1/200 as well as the recently published loss rate of 1/1600 procedures. Risk-benefit analysis was performed by comparing the number of trisomy 21 fetuses identified within the AMA group to the potential number of amniocentesis-related fetal losses within this group.A total of 87,241 amniocentesis specimens were processed during the study period. AMA was the sole indication for genetic amniocentesis in 43,303 cases which formed the study group. In 399 (0.92%) of these cases, a trisomy 21 was identified. Assuming an amniocentesis related fetal loss rates of 1/200 or 1/1600; 217 or 27 fetal losses would have been expected, respectively.Our analysis suggests that the benefit of genetic amniocentesis for the sole indication of AMA far outweighs the potential amniocentesis-related fetal loss rate, regardless of the actual rate one considers.Evaluation of second trimester maternal serum screening for Down's Syndrome using the Spiegelhalter-Knill-Jones (S-KJ) approach.Risk estimation for Down's syndrome in antenatal serum screening with maternal age and multiple serum biomarkers is usually complicated and computationally intensive. We have developed a simple scoring system using the Spiegelhalter-Knill-Jones approach, which was based on Bayesian theorem and the logistic regression model.A prospective data set with 3842 singleton pregnancies including 6 affected pregnancies served as "trained data". Maternal age, maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotrophin levels of each pregnant woman were adopted as the predictors to establish the scoring model using the S-KJ approach. Model validation was undertaken using a receiver operating characteristics (ROC) curve with another 3050 singleton pregnancies including 4 affected pregnancies ("validated data").For the trained data the sensitivity and specificity of the scoring system at cut-off value of 1:250 was 66.7% and 92.6%, respectively. For the validated data the sensitivity and specificity at the same cut-off point was 75% and 92.2%, respectively. The area under the ROC curve of the trained and validated data was 76.96% (95% CI: 51.80-100%), and 94.07% (95% CI: 84.47-100%), respectively.The S-KJ scoring system has been demonstrated to be a simple, and efficient method for the risk estimation of Down's syndrome. This system can be applied to other antenatal serum screening systems.First trimester screening with free beta-hCG, PAPP-A and nuchal translucency in pregnancies conceived with assisted reproduction.To evaluate the effect of in vitro fertilization (IVF) and intracytoplasmic sperm injection (ICSI) on free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG), pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and nuchal translucency (NT).First trimester maternal dried whole blood specimens from 74 singleton pregnancies (32 by IVF and 42 by ICSI) and 30 twin pregnancies (16 by IVF and 14 by ICSI) in which conception was achieved with assisted reproduction techniques were matched with five controls resulting in 370 singleton controls and 150 twin controls. NT was measured using the Fetal Medicine Foundation protocol. Free beta-hCG, PAPP-A and NT levels were compared between the IVF and control groups and between the ICSI and control groups using the Mann-Whitney U test.In singleton pregnancies, the only significant difference was a 21% (95% CI: -35%--7%) reduction in PAPP-A in IVF cases. In twin pregnancies, the only significant difference was a 12% (95% CI: -34%--3%) reduction in NT in IVF cases. In singleton pregnancies, the false-positive rate for Down syndrome screening was 1.4% and 1.9% greater for the IVF and ICSI groups, respectively, compared to controls for a general screening population.Patients undergoing assisted reproduction techniques should be counseled about the possibility of increased false-positive rates. Larger studies are needed to confirm this observation and to develop appropriate adjustment factors to reduce false-positive rates.Down syndrome screening in Singapore--the effectiveness of a second trimester serum screening policy modelled on 29,360 pregnancies in KK Women's and Children's Hospital.To assess the effectiveness of a proposed second trimester Down syndrome serum screening policy in Singapore.Auditing the effectiveness of an age-only policy and comparing it against a serum screening policy modelled on the same maternal population of KK Women's and Children's Hospital in 1994 and 1995.KK Women's and Children's Hospital's (KKH) maternal age distribution is similar to the national age distribution of mothers. Sixteen percent (16.7%) of mothers in KKH, in 1994 and 1995, were 35 years or older at delivery. Based on our hospital birth defect registry, 66% (35/53) of Down Syndrome pregnancies occurred in mothers who were 35 years or older at delivery and 43% (23/53) in the oldest 6.5% of mothers (38 years or older at delivery). Using various models on KKH's population structure to estimate the expected number of Down Syndrome livebirths expected, 52%-55% and 34%-36% of Down Syndrome livebirths were expected to occur in the oldest 16.7% and 6.5% of mothers respectively. These simulated figures are much lower than the figures from the data and needs further study, assuming that the Western Down Syndrome risk model to be applicable to our population. The overall uptake of amniocentesis irrespective of gestational age at booking was 28%. In mothers who were 35 years or older at delivery and booked before 22 weeks gestation, the uptake rate of amniocentesis was 49%. There was a substantial difference in the uptake rate when the counselling was done by trained counsellers compared to those who were not.We would expect that for a fixed amniocentesis rate of 6.5% and 16.7%, serum screening would be able to detect 71% and 85% respectively of the Down syndrome pregnancies. This is more efficient than figures published from Western populations as our patients are older.Comparison of the new PRC software with the established algorithm of the FMF UK for the detection of trisomy 21 and 18/13.The aim of this study was to compare the newly developed Prenatal Risk Calculation (PRC) software and the established Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF) UK algorithm for their detection and false-positive rates in prenatal screening of trisomy 21 or 18/13.Nuchal translucency was measured by FMF-certified sonographers in 39,004 pregnancies. Risks for trisomy 21 and 18/13 were calculated together with serum PAPPA and free beta-hCG in all cases. Overall, 109 cases of trisomy 21 and 39 cases of trisomy 18 or 13 occurred. The detection rates were calculated for all 109 trisomy 21 cases using both PRC and ASTRAIA, software based on the official algorithm of the FMF UK. The false-positive rate was calculated on the basis of all 39,004 cases for ASTRAIA and on the basis of 3,620 additional cases for PRC. The comparison of the algorithms was performed by the calculation of receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) curves.The detection rates for trisomy 21 for a 5% false-positive rate were 91% (99/109) for PRC and 90% (98/109) for ASTRAIA. The difference was not significant. ROC curve analysis showed an area under the curve (AUC) of 0.976 for PRC and 0.975 for ASTRAIA (p = 0.80). At a cutoff of 1:300, PRC showed a slightly (nonsignificantly) higher, but nonsignificant false-positive rate (3.8% for ASTRAIA, version since 2005, 5.1% for PRC) associated with a slightly (nonsignificantly) higher, but nonsignificant detection rate of 91% (PRC) versus 88% (ASTRAIA). The false-positive rate of the biochemical risk (without NT) in PRC was significantly higher (17.7%) than with the FMF UK algorithm (9.0%) at a common risk cutoff of 1:300. A reason for the higher false-positive rates in PRC may be the missing correction for maternal weight, smoking status, and ethnicity. The detection rates for trisomy 18/13 at a risk cutoff of 1:150 were 79% for PRC and 77% for ASTRAIA. False-positive rates for trisomy 18/13 at a cutoff of 1:150 were 1.5% for PRC and 0.6% for ASTRAIA (differences were nonsignificant).For a 5% false-positive rate, the new PRC software detects as many trisomy 21 and trisomy 18/13 cases as the established algorithms of the FMF UK. In order to reduce the false-positive rate for the biochemical risk, the algorithm of the PRC software should be redesigned to include the maternal weight, smoking status of the mother, and the ethnicity.Ultrasonographic measurement of fetal nasal bone length in the second trimester in Korean population.To establish the reference range of fetal nasal bone length (NBL) in the second trimester in the Korean population and to determine its clinical value in screening for trisomy 21.A total of 3019 consecutive fetuses at 16-28 weeks of gestation underwent ultrasonographic measurement of NBL at Asan Medical Center from October 2003 to August 2005.Fetal profile was successfully examined in 95.6% (2885/3019) of the fetuses. NBL increased linearly with advanced gestation (R(2) = 0.4337, p < 0.001). During this period, 23 fetuses with chromosomal abnormalities (including nine with trisomy 21, two with trisomy 18, and three with Turner syndrome) were detected. In trisomy 21, hypoplastic nasal bone (<2.5th percentile) was seen in 3/9 fetuses, and the NBL of one fetus was between the 2.5th and 5th percentile. Hypoplastic nasal bone was seen in 3.1% (89/2833) of fetuses with normal chromosomal or postnatal examination findings.We present the normal range of NBL in the second trimester in the Korean population and also their linear relationship with gestational age (GA). The NBL appears to be shorter in Korean fetuses than Caucasian and Chinese fetuses. This indicates that the normal range would vary between races and that a relative percentile is a more reliable screening criterion than an absolute value.Insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus and prenatal screening results: current experience from a regional screening programme.From around 91,000 women having routine prenatal screening for Down's syndrome and neural tube defects between July 1992 and October 1995, 261 women were identified as having insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM). Alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) levels were reduced in these women, with median levels of 0.89 and 0.91 multiples of the median (MOM), respectively. The IDDM patients had a median weight which was 6 kg heavier than that of non-IDDM women. After correction for maternal weight, the AFP and hCG levels in the IDDM patients were 0.98 and 0.92 MOM, respectively. In routine practice, using results which were not weight-corrected, the IDDM women were neither over- nor under-represented in the high-risk group for Down's syndrome, but showed a tendency to be under-represented in the high-risk group for neural tube defects.How imprecise may the measurement of fetal nuchal translucency be without worsening first-trimester screening?First-trimester screening (FTS) has a trisomy 21 detection rate of about 90%. Despite profound training, the practically reached measurement quality of nuchal translucency (NT) is probably not optimal. This study investigated the impact of measurement errors on FTS.The data on 10,116 combined FTSs were obtained in a multicenter study. Risk assessment was performed by the JOY software following the Nicolaides risk calculation principles. To investigate the impact of measurement errors, the NT values were artificially altered and the adjusted risks were recalculated. Test performance parameters were obtained and compared with the correct measurements.In this study 85 fetuses were genetically affected. The screening was wrongly inconspicuous in 12 cases and in 479 cases the FTS offered false-positive results. An assumed NT error of +/-0.1 mm already causes a highly significant change in the false-positive rate. A difference of -0.2 mm leads to a visible change in false negatives.This study demonstrates that even the smallest deviations will significantly affect the false-negative rate. The detection of really diseased fetuses is influenced at a -0.2-mm measurement error. Therefore the NT measurement has to be as precise as possible.Acceptability of serum screening as an alternative to cytogenetic diagnosis of down syndrome among women 35 years or older in Hong Kong.The addition of second trimester serum markers to maternal age increases the efficacy of screening for Down syndrome by maternal age alone. Among women aged 35 years or older, serum screening makes a large proportion of amniocentesis unnecessary. However, there are ethical and medicolegal concerns about serum screening in 'old' women, largely because some of the pregnancies affected by Down syndrome and other chromosomal abnormalities may not be detected. We investigated the acceptability of serum screening in women aged 35 years or older when it was offered as an alternative to prenatal cytogenetic diagnosis after detailed counselling. Women referred for prenatal diagnosis of Down syndrome because of advanced maternal age were given the options of cytogenetic diagnosis by chorionic villus sampling (CVS) or amniocentesis. As an alternative, they could choose to undergo second trimester serum human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) screening first before deciding on whether to undergo amniocentesis. Between January 1997 and October 1999, 3419 subjects were recruited. 1807 women (52. 9%) chose to undergo serum screening, 1516 women (44.3%) chose to have amniocentesis and 96 women chose to have CVS (2.8%). The proportion of women who chose serum screening rose steadily from 38. 8% in the year of 1997 to 63.4% in 1999. Significantly fewer Chinese women chose serum screening than non-Chinese. The decision as to whether to undergo an invasive diagnostic procedure or to be content with the relatively safer but less accurate screening test varies, being affected by the women's background and culture.The influence of ethnic origin on first trimester biochemical markers of chromosomal abnormalities.In a first trimester study of 5422 Caucasian women, 752 Afro-Caribbean women and 170 Asian women we have shown that the median maternal serum marker MoMs for free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were 19% and 48% higher in Afro-Caribbean women and 19% higher and 35% higher in Asian women, compared to Caucasian women. Correcting for maternal weight made very little difference to the effect in Afro-Caribbeans (21% and 57% higher after weight correction) but reduced the effect in Asians (4% and 17% higher after weight correction ). It is estimated that correcting for maternal weight and ethnicity overall would increase the detection rate by a modest 1.4%. However, the effect on an individual's risk could result in as much as a two-fold increase in the patient specific risk for trisomy 21. The impact of ethnic origin seems to be greater than that observed with second trimester biochemical markers and larger studies are required in order to develop robust algorithms for correcting for ethnic origin in the first trimester.Sensitivity and specificity of screening for Down syndrome with alpha-fetoprotein, hCG, unconjugated estriol, and maternal age.The sensitivity and specificity of maternal serum screening for Down syndrome with different biochemical markers were evaluated. Detection rates with different combinations of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP), hCG, and unconjugated estriol (uE3) were established by retrieving and analyzing 54 serum specimens from women with confirmed Down syndrome pregnancies, compared with 657 specimens from women with normal outcomes. With a risk cutoff of 1:270 at the second trimester, the detection rate with MSAFP, hCG, and uE3 was two to three times higher than with MSAFP alone. With all three markers, the detection rate for Down syndrome increased from 50 to 77% as maternal age increased, and was 60% in a representative screened population. If uE3 was omitted, the detection rate decreased from 60 to 48%. One thousand women were screened prospectively, either with MSAFP or with all three markers prospectively, either with MSAFP or with all three markers and 4.1% with MSAFP. With the three markers, the positive predictive value for Down syndrome was 2.2% overall and as high as 5.9% in older women. Therefore, the addition of hCG and uE3 to the maternal serum screen increases the positive predictive value by 50-300%, depending on maternal age. These results confirm the efficacy of screening for Down syndrome using maternal age and three serum markers.Sequential triage in the first trimester may enhance advanced ultrasound scanning in population screening for trisomy 21.To design a trisomy 21 screening protocol for sequential triage in the first trimester, and to evaluate whether it reduces the need for advanced ultrasound scanning to such an extent that this could be dealt with by a limited number of well-trained sonographers only.Screening results of 31 trisomy 21 affected pregnancies and 16 096 unaffected pregnancies from the first trimester screening program of Algemeen Medisch Laboratorium in Antwerp, Belgium, were used to define high-risk, intermediate-risk and low-risk groups. A serum screening result (age, pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG)) of >or=1 : 30 and/or a nuchal translucency thickness (NT) measurement of >or= 3.5 mm were classified as high risk. A serum screening result of < 1 : 1000 together with an NT of < 3.5 mm were classified as low risk. Other results were considered intermediate risk, for which further advanced ultrasound screening would be indicated. This protocol was then evaluated prospectively in another population of 13 493 first-trimester pregnancies.Of the total population, 1.9% was identified as being high risk (14 trisomy 21 pregnancies and 222 unaffected pregnancies; prevalence, 1 : 17), 59.6% was identified as being low risk (three trisomy 21 pregnancies and 9615 unaffected pregnancies; prevalence, 1 : 3206) and 38.4% was identified as being intermediate risk (10 trisomy 21 pregnancies and 6190 unaffected pregnancies; prevalence, 1 : 620). A similar distribution was found in the prospective arm of the study. There was no reduction of overall screening performance compared with our current first-trimester combined screening program. The number of intermediate-risk pregnancies was sufficiently low as to enable advanced ultrasound scanning by well-trained sonographers only.In population screening for fetal trisomy 21, sequential triage in the first trimester can be achieved using very simple methods. Pregnancies at high or at low risk can be identified easily and the number of pregnancies at intermediate risk can be reduced sufficiently to enable advanced ultrasound scanning by well-trained sonographers only. A prospective study is needed to evaluate the performance of this approach and to compare its results with current combined or integrated screening algorithms.[Prenatal genetic screening: biochemical markers of the first and second quarter].Correlations between first and second trimester markers for Down's syndrome screening.Optimal crown-rump length for measuring the nuchal translucency.To determine the optimal crown-rump length (CRL) for obtaining nuchal translucency (NT) measurements.Women undergoing NT measurements by NT-certified sonographers within a combined screening program over an 18-month period were included in the study if they had a living fetus with a CRL of 45-84 mm. NT measurement success and screen-positive rates, transvaginal sonography (TVUS) use, and reasons for failed NT measurements were compared in 3 groups by CRL corresponding to 11-0/7 to 11-6/7 weeks (45-54 mm), 12-0/7 to 12-6/7 weeks (55-66 mm), and 13-0/7 to 13-6/7 weeks (67-84 mm).Eight hundred thirty-seven women aged 34.9 +/- 4.9 years underwent 1 to 3 NT measurements at a mean CRL of 59.8 +/- 25.0 mm. NT measurements were more successful at 11 and 12 weeks (81.8% and 84.4%) than at 13 weeks (66.9%) (p < 0.001). Screen-positive and TVUS rates, and reasons for failed NT measurements did not vary by CRL.NT measurements are most successful at CRL 45-66 mm corresponding to sonographically determined gestational ages of 11-0/7 to 12-6/7 weeks.Rapid testing versus karyotyping in Down's syndrome screening: cost-effectiveness and detection of clinically significant chromosome abnormalities.In all, 80% of antenatal karyotypes are generated by Down's syndrome screening programmes (DSSP). After a positive screening, women are offered prenatal foetus karyotyping, the gold standard. Reliable molecular methods for rapid aneuploidy diagnosis (RAD: fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) and quantitative fluorescence PCR (QF-PCR)) can detect common aneuploidies, and are faster and less expensive than karyotyping.In the UK, RAD is recommended as a standalone approach in DSSP, whereas the US guidelines recommend that RAD be followed up by karyotyping. A cost-effectiveness (CE) analysis of RAD in various DSSP is lacking. There is a debate over the significance of chromosome abnormalities (CA) detected with karyotyping but not using RAD. Our objectives were to compare the CE of RAD versus karyotyping, to evaluate the clinically significant missed CA and to determine the impact of detecting the missed CA. We performed computer simulations to compare six screening options followed by FISH, PCR or karyotyping using a population of 110948 pregnancies. Among the safer screening strategies, the most cost-effective strategy was contingent screening with QF-PCR (CE ratio of $24084 per Down's syndrome (DS) detected). Using karyotyping, the CE ratio increased to $27898. QF-PCR missed only six clinically significant CA of which only one was expected to confer a high risk of an abnormal outcome. The incremental CE ratio (ICER) to find the CA missed by RAD was $66608 per CA. These costs are much higher than those involved for detecting DS cases. As the DSSP are mainly designed for DS detection, it may be relevant to question the additional costs of karyotyping.[Efficiency of measuring nasal bone as an ultrasound marker of Down syndrome in 11th to 13th+6 week of pregnancy].The aim of this study is to evaluate the significance of nasal bone as a marker for trisomy 21 in the group of women that underwent invasive procedures in our center at 11 to 14 weeks' gestation.The data of 181 women who had undergone the invasive procedures were evaluated for the presence or absence of nasal bone retrospectively and were correlated with fetal karyotype.A successful view of the fetal profile was obtained in 135 fetuses. The nasal bone was absent in 5 of 8 fetuses with trisomy 21 and in 3 of 4 fetuses with trisomy 18. In the group of chromosomally normal fetuses the nasal bone was absent in 4 of the 123 cases. The false positive rate of our screening program dropped from 4.5% to 2.5% after the introduction of the nasal bone evaluation into our risk calculation model for trisomy 21.Nasal bone evaluation improved the detection of trisomy 21 in the first trimester in our screening program and reduced the need for invasive procedures in our department. Absence of the nasal bone showed a sensitivity of 63% for a 5% false positive rate for trisomy 21 in our study. It is rarely observed in chromosomally normal fetuses (2.5%). An appropriate training is mandatory in order to achieve acceptable results.Maternal serum screening for fetal Down syndrome in women less than 35 years of age using alpha-fetoprotein, hCG, and unconjugated estriol: a prospective 2-year study.To evaluate prospectively maternal serum screening with alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), hCG, and unconjugated estriol (uE3) as a screen for fetal Down syndrome.Women less than 35 years of age were offered screening between 15-20 weeks' gestation. Screening results calculated by an algorithm to be equal to or greater than 1:274 (the risk of a 35-year-old for fetal Down syndrome at the second trimester) were considered positive. If gestational age was confirmed by ultrasonography, genetic counseling and amniocentesis were offered.In the first 2 years of our program, 9530 women were screened, of which 686 (7.2%) were found to be screen-positive. Ultrasonographic examination explained the abnormal values in 379 (4.0%). The remaining 307 (3.2%) received genetic counseling and 214 (2.2%) elected amniocentesis or CVS. Four cases of fetal Down syndrome and one de novo chromosomal marker were detected. In three additional cases of fetal Down syndrome, triple-analyte screening failed to identify the pregnancies to be at increased risk. None of the seven cases of fetal Down syndrome would have been detected through screening with maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) and age alone.Measurement of MSAFP, hCG, and uE3 in women less than 35 years old is an effective screening test for fetal Down syndrome, with a sensitivity of 57% in our study and an amniocentesis rate (false-positive rate) of 3.2%.Second-trimester genetic sonogram for detection of fetal chromosomal abnormalities in a community-based antenatal testing unit.To evaluate the efficacy of the second-trimester genetic sonogram for the detection of Down syndrome and other chromosomal abnormalities in a community-based antenatal testing unit.This was a retrospective study using data from two community hospital antenatal ultrasound units. Six hundred and sixty fetal ultrasound examinations in both at-risk (n = 581) and low-risk (n = 79) pregnancies were performed from 15 + 0 to 22 + 6 weeks' gestation and all cases were verified for outcome data. The sonographic detection of a major congenital anomaly or a sonographic marker (increased nuchal skinfold, short humerus, short femur, echogenic bowel, pyelectasis, echogenic intracardiac focus, absence or hypoplasia of fifth mid phalanx or choroid plexus cyst) was recorded. The entire group of 660 ultrasound examinations as well as subgroups with and without non-ultrasound risk factors for a fetal chromosomal abnormality were analyzed to determine the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values and positive likelihood ratio for the detection of Down syndrome and other fetal chromosomal abnormalities.There were 32 (4.85%) chromosomal abnormalities in our study population. Twelve (3.75%) of these were Down syndrome, of which eight (66.6%) had a positive ultrasound examination in the second trimester. Six of seven (85.7%) of the trisomy 18 fetuses, 2/2 of the trisomy 13 fetuses and 2/3 of the non-mosaic 45,X fetuses had positive sonograms. The overall detection rate for chromosomal abnormalities was 20/32 (sensitivity, 62.5%; specificity, 80.7%; negative predictive value, 97.7%; positive predictive value, 14.2%; positive likelihood ratio, 3.24). Major structural defects and sonographic markers, excluding hypoplastic fifth digit and choroid plexus cyst, occurred significantly more frequently in Down syndrome cases compared with normal ones.In a community-based antenatal testing unit we have demonstrated a detection rate for fetal Down syndrome with the second-trimester genetic sonogram that is comparable to the range of sensitivities reported by larger centers involving primarily high-risk patients. However, only 12 of the 32 fetal chromosomal abnormalities that we encountered were Down syndrome.Elevated second-trimester maternal serum hCG in patients undergoing haemodialysis.Prenatal Down syndrome screening with maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) has become common. High levels of maternal serum hCG and low levels of AFP have been associated with an increased risk of fetal Down syndrome. In this paper, we report five pregnancies in patients undergoing long-term haemodialysis, all of whom had false-positive second-trimester Down syndrome screening results. All of our five patients had extremely high levels of maternal serum hCG, but normal AFP values for their gestational age, and all had serious complications during pregnancy.First-trimester placental volume as a marker for chromosomal anomalies: preliminary results from an unselected population.To compare first-trimester placental volume in chromosomally abnormal and normal pregnancies.Placental volumes were routinely recorded at the time of nuchal translucency thickness measurement at 10-13 weeks of gestation. This was done using customized three-dimensional ultrasound equipment and measurements were then converted to the placental quotient (placental volume/fetal crown-rump length). The possible difference in placental quotient between chromosomally normal and abnormal pregnancies was examined.A total of 2863 pregnancies was evaluated, including 17 with major chromosomal defects (nine cases of trisomy 21, four of trisomy 18, two of trisomy 13, and one each of Turner syndrome and 48,XXY + 21). The median placental quotient in the chromosomally abnormal group (0.67) was significantly lower than that in the normal fetuses (0.98). In nine of the 17 affected pregnancies the quotient was below the 10th centile of the normal range.Assessment of placental volume may prove to be useful in first-trimester risk assessment for chromosomal anomalies.Serum free beta-HCG and alpha-fetoprotein levels in IVF, ICSI and frozen embryo transfer pregnancies in maternal mid-trimester serum screening for Down's syndrome.The aim of this study was to compare the maternal mid-trimester free beta-HCG and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels in pregnancies conceived by assisted reproduction technology and spontaneous pregnancies in Down's syndrome screening. The influence of the number of embryos transferred and the amount of gonadotrophins used on the marker levels was also evaluated.The study population consisted of 58 IVF, 32 ICSI and 26 frozen embryo transfer (FET) singleton pregnancies. The levels of beta-HCG and AFP were compared with the control group of 6548 singleton spontaneous pregnancies.The false positive rate (FPR) in the Down's syndrome screening was 19% overall in assisted reproductive technology pregnancies, being highest (30.8%) in the FET group. The free beta-HCG multiples of the median (MoM) values were statistically significantly elevated only in the FET group (1.33 MoM; P = 0.012). A positive correlation between the number of embryos transferred and the marker levels was observed in the IVF group. No correlation was found between the amount of gonadotrophin medication used and the marker levels.The present data confirm that the overall FPR in the serum screening for Down's syndrome in assisted reproduction pregnancies is high, resulting in unnecessary invasive procedures.Using population-based data to predict the impact of introducing noninvasive prenatal diagnosis for Down syndrome.To compare the number and types of chromosome abnormalities prenatally diagnosed and the number of invasive procedures between current prenatal testing pathways and a pathway where noninvasive prenatal diagnosis for Down syndrome replaces Down syndrome screening tests.Numbers and types of chromosome abnormalities for each referral category were extracted from prenatal diagnostic testing reports routinely collected in Victoria, Australia, in 2006 and 2007. These data were then applied to the proposed implementation strategy.If noninvasive prenatal diagnosis for Down syndrome had replaced Down syndrome screening tests in 2006 and 2007, in Victoria, there would have been 25 (7%) additional Down syndrome diagnosed, 6896 (84%) fewer invasive procedures, and 231 (56%) non-Down syndrome chromosome abnormalities no longer detected. These include trisomy 13, trisomy 18, sex chromosome abnormalities, balanced and unbalanced rearrangements, polyploidy, and mosaic results.The potential loss of information about chromosome abnormalities other than Down syndrome with noninvasive prenatal diagnosis compared with full karyotyping with traditional prenatal diagnosis should be considered when planning for the implementation of new technologies.Urinary beta-core hCG: screening for aneuploidies in early pregnancy (11-14 weeks' gestation).Initial studies at 17-22 weeks' gestation evaluating urinary beta-core human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) as a marker for Down's syndrome had suggested that it may have more potential than its serum counterpart. This study measured maternal urinary beta-core-hCG and creatinine at 11-14 weeks' gestation in a series of 26 aneuploidies (nine trisomy 21, five trisomy 18, four 45,X0, and eight others). The normal range for beta-core-hCG and beta-core-hCG/ creatinine was derived from 198 normal singleton pregnancies. Trisomy 18 cases (n = 5) had low maternal urinary beta-core-hCG creatinine levels (median 0.35 MOM, range 0.08-0.82 MOM). Whereas the other aneuploidies had no particular pattern; in particular, the trisomy 21 cases (n = 9) (median 1.16 MOM, range 0.3-4.74 MOM) did not differ significantly from 1 MOM. The findings imply that maternal urinary beta-core-hCG is not as discriminating for Down's syndrome between 11 and 14 weeks as later on in pregnancy.Nuchal translucency screening: how do women actually utilize the results?To examine how women use the nuchal translucency (NT) risk adjustment in decision-making for invasive prenatal diagnosis.Retrospective cohort study of 1083 consecutive NT screening exams. A screen-positive test was defined as a risk > or = 1/300. Primary outcome was what proportion of screen-positive or screen-negative women chose to undergo chorionic villus sampling or amniocentesis.Of the women tested, 79% (858/1083) were > or = 35-years-old and 88% (756/858) of these women had a decrease in age-related risk after NT. Of the screen-negative women, 31% (238/756) > or = 35 years of age chose to have invasive testing as compared to only 11.2% (25/223) of those < 35 years of age (p < 0.001). Of the screen-positive women, 71% (72/102) > or = 35 years of age and 100% (2/2) < 35 years of age chose to obtain invasive testing (p = 0.368).First-trimester NT screening for Down syndrome (DS) enables a significant number of women over age 35 to lower the risk for DS several fold and avoid the risks of invasive testing. However, despite significant reductions in age-specific mid-trimester DS risks, a relatively high proportion of women > or = 35 years of age still opted for invasive testing.Free fetal DNA in maternal circulation: a potential prognostic marker for chromosomal abnormalities?Previous studies on the association of fetal cell-free (cf)DNA levels in maternal circulation have produced conflicting results but the sample sizes were small and based on archived material. We aimed to quantify the levels of fetal and total cfDNA on prospectively collected samples, to understand their correlation with other variables and to clarify their diagnostic value.DNA from pre-CVS maternal plasma was extracted from 264 controls, 72 trisomy 21, 24 trisomy 18, 12 trisomy 13, 16 Turner's syndrome and 8 triploidy first-trimester pregnancies and quantified using real-time PCR. beta-globin was used to determine total cfDNA levels and DYS14 and SRY assays to determine fetal cfDNA levels.Fetal cfDNA levels (DYS14) showed correlation with crown rump length (CRL) (p = 0.004), BMI (p = 0.01) and storage time (p = 0.007) while there was an inverse correlation of total cfDNA levels with nuchal translucency (NT) (p = 0.001). No significant difference was observed between the levels of fetal cfDNA in controls and aneuploidy cases.Quantification of fetal and total cfDNA in maternal circulation showed inverse correlation between NT and total cfDNA levels. Our results also suggest that fetal cfDNA is not an ideal prognostic marker for chromosomal abnormalities in first-trimester pregnancies.Fetuses with cystic hygroma. A retrospective study.The aim of this study is to analyse several theories of pathogenesis of cystic hygroma, its correlation with chromosomal abnormalities and the indicators of poor or good prognosis.Screening for fetal Down syndrome with maternal serum hCG and oestriol: a prospective study.We report the preliminary results of a prospective study aimed at evaluating the effectiveness of Down syndrome (DS) screening using second-trimester measurement of maternal serum human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) together with maternal age. Reference values for hCG, uE3, and the hCG/uE3 ratio in normal pregnancies were established from more than 3000 normal gestations and found to follow a log-normal statistical distribution. Risk evaluation was made using reference values for affected pregnancies from retrospective studies. Screening of 10,000 women under 38 years resulted in 412 amniocenteses and the prenatal diagnosis of six cases of DS, whereas four cases remained undetected until term. In a parallel study, diagnostic amniocentesis was performed in women over 38 years and in women with a previous affected child, and an evaluation of the risk of fetal DS based on serum hCG and uE3 levels was made in all cases. Fourteen cases of DS were detected. Median values for hCG and uE3 in the 24 affected pregnancies were close to the 90th and tenth centiles of the normal reference values, respectively, and thus are in good agreement with the values reported by others in retrospective studies.Serum markers for Down's syndrome in relation to number of previous births and maternal age.We conducted a study to investigate the effect of parity on the following six serum markers used in screening for Down's syndrome, after adjusting them for ethnic group and maternal weight: alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), free alpha-hCG, free beta-hCG, and dimeric inhibin A. We aimed to estimate the effect of adjusting for any differences found on the screening performance. AFP, uE3, and hCG concentrations were available from 16,666 women with singleton pregnancies without Down's syndrome or neural tube defects and without insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus, who were screened between 15 and 22 weeks' gestational age. Stored serum samples were available on a subset of 1347 women and these were used to measure free alpha-hCG, free beta-hCG, and inhibin A. Serum concentrations were expressed as multiples of the median (MOM) for women of the same gestational age, weight, and ethnic group. Of the six markers, only hCG levels were affected by parity; hCG levels decreased by 3.1 per cent per previous birth (95 per cent confidence interval 2.2-4.0 per cent); there was no significant relationship between the number of previous abortions and hCG level after adjustment for the number of previous births. The effect of previous births on hCG was not due to maternal age. Only AFP was affected by maternal age, but the effect was small; levels increased by 4.4 per cent per 10 years of age (3.2-5.7 per cent). It is not worthwhile adjusting serum markers for parity or for maternal age in prenatal screening for Down's syndrome because their effect on the performance of screening is negligible.Effect of allowing for ethnic group in prenatal screening for Down's syndrome.We conducted a study to investigate ethnic group differences in levels of serum markers used in screening for Down's syndrome [serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), free alpha- and free beta-hCG, and dimeric inhibin-A], to estimate the extent to which maternal weight differences between ethnic groups explain these differences, and to estimate the effect of adjusting for ethnic group and maternal weight on screening performance. Serum measurements were taken from women who were screened prenatally for Down's syndrome. AFP, uE3, and hCG concentrations were available from 9462 white, 4215 black, and 4392 South Asian women with singleton pregnancies without Down's syndrome or neural tube defects between 15 and 22 weeks' gestational age. Frozen serum samples were available from a subset of 922 white, 449 black, and 135 South Asian women and were used for measurement of free alpha-hCG, free beta-hCG, and inhibin. Values were expressed as multiples of the median (MOM) for women of the same gestational age. There were statistically significant differences in the serum marker levels between ethnic groups that were not explained by differences in maternal weight. The main differences were found in black women compared with white women; black women had serum AFP levels 22 per cent higher (95 per cent confidence interval 20-24 per cent), total hCG levels 19 per cent higher (16-22 per cent), and free beta-hCG levels 12 per cent (3-21 per cent) higher. The other differences were less than 10 per cent. Adjusting for ethnic group only had a small estimated effect on screening performance: a maximum of about 0.5 per cent extra detection at a 5 per cent false-positive rate. At a fixed risk cut-off level, the false-positive rate will not be materially different between different ethnic groups. Adjusting serum markers for ethnic groups improves Down's syndrome screening performance to a very small extent. It is worthwhile because of its established value in AFP screening for open neural tube defects.[Non invasive prenatal diagnosis of trisomy 21: dream or reality?].Should the first-trimester aneuploidy screen be maternal age adjusted? Screening by absolute risk versus risk adjusted to maternal age.To compare the absolute risk (AR) screening approach to the current approach of risk adjusted to maternal age in patients undergoing first-trimester screening (FTS).Three-stage retrospective analysis of 3073 pregnancies that had FTS during 2006-2007. (1) Distribution analysis of AR as defined by (final FTS risk)/(risk by age). (2) Analysis of the screen-positive group by the AR method. (3) Analysis of the screen-positive advanced maternal age (AMA) patients.(1) AR > 1 was found in 151 (4.9%) patients, and AR > 1.2, 2 and 3 was found in 4, 3.1 and 2%, respectively. (2) 145 (4.7%) of the 3073 patients screened positive. Twelve were diagnosed with chromosomal abnormalities and 3 with major anomalies. All had AR > 1.2. Of the 145 (55.8%) screen positives, 81 had AR > 1.2. AR was significantly higher in the chromosomally abnormal as compared to normal gestations (t-test, p < 0.01). (3)Of the 145 screen positives, 103 were AMA. Only 39 (28%) had an AR > 1.2.The AR screening approach, using AR > 1.2 as a cut-off, captured all abnormal pregnancies diagnosed by the current screening method. This method offers lower false positive (FP) rates to AMA women and has the potential for higher detection rates in younger women.Do race-specific definitions of short long bones improve the detection of down syndrome on second-trimester genetic sonograms?The purpose of this study was to determine whether the use of race-specific definitions of short femur and humerus lengths improves Down syndrome detection.This was a retrospective cohort study over 16 years. For each self-reported maternal race (white, African American, Hispanic, and Asian), we evaluated the efficiency of Down syndrome detection using published race-specific formulas compared with a standard formula for short femur and humerus lengths (observed versus expected lengths < or =0.91 and < or =0.89, respectively). The sensitivity, specificity, and 95% confidence intervals for each parameter were compared. Screening performance was compared by areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves.Of 58,710 women, 209 (0.3%) had a diagnosis of a fetus with Down syndrome. Although the race-based formula increased sensitivity in each population, the increase was statistically significant only in the white population, whereas a decrease in specificity was statistically significant in all 4 populations, as denoted by nonoverlapping confidence intervals. The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve for the model using the race-specific definition of short femur length was 0.67 versus 0.65 compared with the standard definition, and for humerus length it was 0.70 versus 0.71.The use of race-based formulas for the determination of short femur and humerus lengths did not significantly improve the detection rates for Down syndrome.Maternal serum anti-Mullerian hormone level is not superior to chronological age in predicting Down syndrome pregnancies.To compare the difference in maternal serum anti-Mullerian hormone (AMH) level between Down syndrome pregnancies and unaffected pregnancies, and to evaluate its performance as a screening marker for Down syndrome pregnancy.A total of 145 pregnancies affected by foetal Down syndrome and 290 unaffected controls matched with maternal age and gestational age were selected, and their archived first or second trimester serum retrieved for AMH assay.There was no significant difference in maternal serum AMH level between pregnancies affected and unaffected by foetal Down syndrome. Our first trimester serum samples had higher AMH concentration compared to second trimester samples.Maternal serum AMH level, as a marker of ovarian age, is not superior to chronological age in predicting Down syndrome pregnancies. Despite the cross-sectional nature of our study, the variation of maternal serum AMH concentration with gestational age warrants further investigation.The "Consecutive Combined Test"--using double test from week 8 + 0 and nuchal translucency scan, for first trimester screening for Down syndrome.To test the performance of the "Consecutive Combined Test", applied on a high-risk population. The classic "Combined Test" (Double test (DT) and Nuchal Translucency (NT) measurement on the same day at app. week 12) gives detection rates (DR) for Down syndrome (DS) of 80-90% for false positive rates (FPR) of 5%. In affected pregnancies, however, the low PAPP-A level is more pronounced, the earlier in pregnancy. Thus, we hypothesized that the Double Test could be taken as early as from week 8 + 0, without compromising the excellent performance of the Combined Test. This "Consecutive Combined Test" allows for a centralised laboratory function.Inclusion criteria were maternal age > 35 years (80%) or a family history (20%). Double test was taken at a median gestational age (GA) = 10 weeks. NT was measured at GA = 11 + 0 - 13 + 6. A combined risk estimate of > 1:400 at birth was used as cut-off.881 had the full test. Screen positive = 34. CVS with aneuploidy = 11 (6 trisomy-21, 5 others). FPR = 3.2%. Positive Predictive Value (PPV) = 17.6% for T-21.The "Consecutive Combined Test" applied on a high-risk population seems to be highly efficient with a remarkably high PPV.Screening for Down's syndrome using serum alpha fetoprotein: a retrospective study indicating caution.A report was made on the outcome of a four year retrospective study in 27 064 pregnancies, of the clinical efficiency, sensitivity, and specificity of a screening programme for Down's syndrome based on reported strategies related to the measurement of maternal serum alpha fetoprotein. This study identified 27 pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome with a median multiple of the median maternal serum alpha fetoprotein concentration of 0.82. This figure is considerably higher than that obtained from previous reports on this subject. With an age related multiple of the median maternal serum alpha fetoprotein strategy, 30.8% of Down's affected pregnancies were identified as well as 11.6% of unaffected pregnancies. Perhaps a United Kingdom collaborative study should begin to investigate the reasons for such wide population variance in the reports for the median multiple of the median for Down's affected pregnancies. Until such studies are carried out, screening for Down's syndrome based on low maternal serum alpha fetoprotein concentration is premature.Refinements in managing maternal weight adjustment for interpreting prenatal screening results.This study examines the relationship between maternal weight and serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol, and human chorionic gonadotropin in a population of 47,585 women being provided with prenatal screening for Down's syndrome and open neural tube defects. The study population contains sufficient numbers of women at the extremes of weight to allow the determination that a reciprocal-linear equation more accurately describes the weight relationship for two of the three analytes than the currently used log-linear equations. The reciprocal-linear equations, while more appropriate, provide only a minimal advantage over the log-linear equations. A more important finding is that published weight equations may not be optimal for some screening programmes, due to differences in the mean weight of the populations being tested. Screening programmes are encouraged to calculate their own weight correction formulae, based on data from their own population, and to monitor the mean maternal weight to detect when modifications in the weight correction formulae might be indicated.Down's syndrome screening marker levels following assisted reproduction.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) levels were examined in 1632 women who had ovulation induction and 327 who had in vitro fertilization. There was a highly statistically significant increase in hCG and reduction in uE3 among those with ovulation induction. The median levels were respectively 1.09 and 0.92 multiples of the normal gestation-specific median (MOM) based on a total of 34582 women. Ovulation induction appeared to have no material effect on the median AFP level but this masked a significant increase when treatment was with Clomiphene (1.05 MOM) and a significant decrease when Pergonal was used (0.93 MOM). There was a highly statistically significant reduction in uE3 among women having in vitro fertilization with a median level of 0.92 MOM. Those fertilized with a donor egg (21) had significantly higher AFP and uE3 levels than when their own egg was used. Our results were confounded by differences in gravidity, but formally allowing for this factor did not materially change the findings. None of the observed effects is great enough to warrant routine adjustment of marker levels to allow for them. Moreover, women with positive Down's syndrome screening results can be reassured that this is unlikely to be due to them having had assisted reproduction.Second-trimester dimeric inhibin-A in Down's syndrome screening.Initial studies of immunoreactive inhibin using a commercial assay have shown levels to be increased in three second-trimester series of maternal samples from Down's syndrome-affected pregnancies. This assay detected non-specifically all forms of circulating inhibin, dimeric and free alpha subunits, whether fully or partially processed. More recently, a new specific assay for dimeric inhibin-A has shown elevated results in both a first-trimester and a second-trimester series of cases. In order to assess the value of dimeric inhibin-A as a potential marker in the second trimester, we have analysed 157 Down's syndrome cases and used 367 unaffected cases across the gestational range 14-20 weeks to establish control medians and population parameters. In our series, the median MOM in Down's cases was 1.77, significantly higher than in the controls. At a 5 per cent false-positive rate, dimeric inhibin-A alone identified 37 per cent of cases. When used in conjunction with maternal age and other marker combinations, mathematical modelling showed detection rates rising from 48 per cent (inhibin-A plus age) to 61 per cent (inhibin-A, free beta hCG, age) and 68 per cent (inhibin-A, AFP, free beta hCG, age). Our data suggest that dimeric inhibin-A may have greater potential earlier in gestation when median levels at 14-16 weeks are 1.92 compared with 1.46 at 17-23 weeks. Dimeric inhibin-A may be a valuable addition to screening protocols, particularly in early gestations.Combining inhibin A with existing second-trimester markers in maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome.To assess the value of inhibin A as an additional second-trimester maternal serum marker of Down's syndrome we studied 56 affected and 280 unaffected pregnancies matched for gestational age. The median level in the cases was 1.62 multiples of the gestation-specific median (MOM) in the controls, with 95 per cent confidence limits of 1.34-1.96. The distribution of inhibin levels in affected and unaffected pregnancies was approximately log Gaussian, with means about 1 standard deviation apart. This degree of separation was similar to that for human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), free beta-hCG, and unconjugated oestriol (uE3), but about double that of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) measured in the same samples. Inhibin was largely uncorrelated with AFP and uE3, whereas the log correlation coefficient with hCG was 0.29 (P = 0.19) for Down's syndrome and 0.41 (P < 0.0001) for unaffected pregnancies; with free beta-hCG, it was 0.18 (P = 0.38) and 0.38 (P < 0.0001), respectively. On the basis of these results and other published studies, we estimate that measuring inhibin A in addition to AFP and hCG or free beta-hCG (with or without uE3) will increase the detection rate for a fixed 5 per cent false-positive rate by about 7 per cent.[Advanced maternal age as an indication for invasive prenatal diagnostics?].To investigate the effectivity of the first trimester screening (FTS), age and other factors as an indication for invasive testing.A retrospective analysis of indications for invasive procedures and their effectivity in the group of women who underwent screening in the first trimester of pregnancy in our center. Women were offered the combined screening program by ultrasound and biochemical markers. Women with risk more than 1 : 300 for chromosome 21, 18 or 13 trisomies, or those over the age of 35 as this is still and indication for invasive tests in the Czech Republic were offered genetic counseling and invasive testing. Chorionic villous sampling (CVS) or amniocentesis (AMC) was than performed.Of the 1700 women who underwent FTS, 291 were over 35 in which only 24 had a risk higher than 1 : 300. Detection rate of trisomy 21, 18 and 13 were 100%, (16 cases) for a false positive rate of 4.6%. In the whole screened population 79 had a risk more than 1 : 300. The total number of invasive tests was 150. Amniocentesis was performed in 88 cases, only 27 were done on the basis of screening with 3 aneuploidy detected. 36 amniocenteses were done for age and 25 for other indications-- all had normal karyotype. The CVS was performed in 62, 52 on the basis of screening with 13 aneuploidy detected. In the other ten cases 5 for age and 5 for family history the karyotype was normal.Altogether 79 invasive procedures based on screening detected all 16 aneuploidies. Remaining 71 invasive tests (n = 41) for age and (n = 30) for other indications had a complete normal karyotype.Double-positive maternal serum screening results for down syndrome and open neural tube defects: An indicator for fetal structural or chromosomal abnormalities and adverse obstetric outcomes.The study was designed to evaluate whether double positive maternal serum screening results for Down syndrome and open neural tube defects indicate an increased risk of adverse perinatal outcome.A retrospective case-control study was conducted. In a cohort of 170,394 women who underwent maternal serum triple screening in Ontario, Canada, between October 1995 and September 1998, 189 women received positive screening results for both Down syndrome and neural tube defects. Each case was matched to 5 control subjects who had negative screening results for test center, maternal age, and specimen date. The risks for adverse perinatal outcomes were compared.Women with double-positive screening results had significantly higher risks of having fetuses with structural abnormalities (odds ratio, 14.5) and chromosomal anomalies (odds ratio, 36.3). They also had higher risks of having preeclampsia (odds ratio, 6.7), small-for-gestational age (odds ratio, 9.7), preterm delivery (odds ratio, 5.9), miscarriage, and intrauterine fetal death (odds ratio, 11.8).Double-positive maternal serum screening results are associated with fetal structural and chromosomal abnormalities and/or adverse pregnancy outcomes. Close fetal and maternal surveillance are indicated when such pregnancies are identified.Combined use of genetic sonography and maternal serum triple-marker screening: an effective method for increasing the detection of trisomy 21 in women younger than 35 years.The current standard of practice is to screen women younger than 35 years for trisomy 21 with maternal triple-marker screening, followed by amniocentesis in high-risk (1:10-1:190) patients. Non-high-risk patients are not offered further diagnostic testing. This study was conducted to determine whether genetic sonography of fetuses considered to be at moderate risk (1:190-1:1000) after maternal triple-marker screening increases the detection for trisomy 21, is cost-effective, and reduces the number of amniocenteses required to detect a single fetus with trisomy 21.After triple-marker screening, mathematical modeling was used to classify 500,000 theoretical fetuses as high, moderate, or low risk (>1:1001-1:10,000) for trisomy 21. The sensitivity for genetic sonography varied between 60% and 90%, and false-positive rates varied between 5% and 25%. Two programs (I and II) were compared with the control program. The control program included patients with high-risk fetuses (1:10-1:190) who had amniocentesis. Program I consisted of patients in the moderate-risk group (1:191-1:1000) who had genetic sonography followed by amniocentesis only when an abnormal sonographic finding was present. Program II used an approach in which genetic sonography was done for both high- and moderate-risk fetuses, and amniocentesis was performed only when an abnormal sonographic finding was present.When added to the control program, genetic sonography significantly increased the detection rate of Down syndrome (range, 68.1%-77.8% versus 49%), reduced the cost of detection, and resulted in a ratio of fetuses with Down syndrome detected to normal fetuses lost because of amniocentesis of greater than 1 (range, 2.1-4.2). Compared with the control program, program II significantly increased the detection of fetuses with trisomy 21 (range, 56%-72%) when the sensitivity of genetic sonography was >70%, reduced the cost of detection, and had ratios of trisomy 21 detection to normal fetuses lost because of amniocentesis of between 2.38 and 17.88.Women younger than 35 years and classified as having moderate risk after triple-marker screening could undergo genetic sonography under 1 of 2 approaches, either of which would result in an increased detection rate of trisomy 21 and be cost-effective without increasing the loss rate of normal fetuses after genetic amniocentesis.[Rapid diagnosis of fetal chromosomal abnormalities by fluorescence in situ hybridization].In the course of the Down-screening protocol there are possibilities today for rapid diagnosis of aneuploidies among high-risk pregnancies identified by non-invasive screening tests, however, the diagnostic value of these molecular genetic tests are debated.In this prospective study, data about the reliability of one of the rapid tests, namely; interphase fluorescence in situ hybridization (int-FISH) was to be gathered by the authors.For the period between May 2002 and September 2006 all of the 1279 fetal sample were examined both with int-FISH and full karyotyping.Extra or absent signal was detected in 47 cases (3.7%) (trisomy 21 in 32, various other numerical abnormalities in 15 cases). All of these numerical aberrations were confirmed by metaphase analysis without false positivity or negativity. In 19 cases the finding of int-FISH was negative, however, full karyotyping disclosed abnormalities (in 12 of these 19 cases, the abnormality was balanced). Only 4 of the 1279 fetuses (0.3%) (3 small extra marker chromosomes, 1 de novo unbalanced translocation) were to be found, who would have been born with phenotypical abnormalities without metaphase analysis (2 of them had suspect ultrasound signs).Although more analysis are needed, based on the results of this study it is to be concluded that rapid molecular genetic methods like int-FISH might be accepted as a diagnostic tests of fetal aneuploidy, if its use were restricted to high risk pregnancies identified by advanced maternal age and non-invasive maternal screening only. However, full karyotyping is needed in cases with familial translocation and abnormal 2nd trimester ultrasound signs.Fetuses with Down syndrome have an enlarged anterior fontanelle in the second trimester of pregnancy.Neonates with Down syndrome are known to have an enlarged anterior fontanelle. The aim of this study was to assess whether fetuses diagnosed with Down syndrome in the second trimester have larger anterior fontanelles in comparison with normal euploid fetuses.The study population included 13 fetuses with trisomy 21 and 26 normal euploid fetuses analyzed between the 19(th) and the 23(rd) weeks of gestation. The anterior fontanelle was assessed by three-dimensional ultrasound, with the midsagittal plane of the fetal head being the reference view for acquisition of the volume. Anteroposterior and laterolateral diameters, perimeter and area of the fontanelle were then measured offline; the diameters were normalized for biparietal diameter and the perimeter and area were normalized for head circumference. Non-parametric statistical analysis was used to compare the mean values of all variables in the two groups of fetuses. Intra- and interobserver variability were also assessed.All variables except the fontanelle laterolateral diameter were significantly greater in Down syndrome fetuses than in controls, with anterior fontanelle perimeter/head circumference and fontanelle area/head circumference ratios showing the highest sensitivity for the detection of Down syndrome. Using a cut-off of 2.1 for the fontanelle area/head circumference ratio, the sensitivity and specificity for the detection of Down syndrome were 77% and 96%, respectively.During the mid-trimester the dimensions of the anterior fontanelle are significantly increased in fetuses with Down syndrome in comparison with normal euploid fetuses. This finding may be of help in the detection of trisomy 21 at the time of the anomaly scan.First-trimester fetal nuchal translucency thickness and risk for trisomies.To define the relation between fetal nuchal translucency thickness at 10-13 weeks' gestation and the risk for fetal trisomies and pregnancy outcome.Five hundred sixty fetuses with nuchal translucency thickness of 3-9 mm at 10-13 weeks' gestation were karyotyped. The ratio of the observed number of fetal trisomies to that expected on the basis of maternal age was calculated.The incidence of trisomies 21, 18, or 13 was 18% (102 of 560 cases) and was significantly associated with both maternal age (r = 0.97) and fetal nuchal translucency thickness (r = 0.75). In 383 fetuses with nuchal translucency of 3 mm, the observed number of fetal trisomies was 23, in contrast to the frequency of 6.0 expected on the basis of maternal age. In 177 fetuses with nuchal translucency of 4 mm or more, 79 cases were observed, compared with 2.7 expected on the basis of maternal age. In fetuses with nuchal translucency of 4 mm or more and normal karyotype, there was a high association with other defects and the prognosis was often poor, whereas the translucency resolved for those with 3 mm and the pregnancy outcome was usually normal.At 10-13 weeks' gestation, fetal nuchal translucency of 3 mm is associated with a fourfold increase, and translucency of greater than 3 mm with a 29-fold increase, in the maternal age-related risk for trisomies 21, 18, and 13. Fetal nuchal translucency of 4 mm or more is associated with poor pregnancy outcome even when the fetal karyotype is normal.Effect of maternal smoking on prenatal screening for Down syndrome and trisomy 18 in the first trimester of pregnancy.To assess the impact of maternal smoking on first-trimester prenatal screening results for Down syndrome and trisomy 18.Data on maternal smoking status, maternal age, gestational dating, levels of free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) in maternal blood and fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness were analyzed from a cohort of 53 114 women. Statistical analyses were carried out for crude and adjusted comparisons between smoking and nonsmoking groups.In women who smoked during the first trimester of pregnancy, PAPP-A and free beta-hCG levels from dried blood were significantly decreased (p < 0.001) and fetal NT thickness was significantly increased (p < 0.001). For an overall risk assessment combining maternal age and biochemical and ultrasound markers, no significant changes for Down syndrome were found with smoking, but significant increases in average risk as well as in positive rates were found for trisomy 18 (p < 0.001). A potential association between maternal smoking and trisomy 18 remains to be clarified.Adjustment for smoking is recommended in first-trimester prenatal screening for trisomy 18 and probably not warranted for Down syndrome because of the cancelling effects of decreased free beta-hCG and increased NT. Further research is required to demonstrate a biological association between maternal smoking and trisomy 18.Specificity of fetal tricuspid regurgitation in prediction of Down syndrome in Thai fetuses at 17-23 weeks of gestation.To assess the specificity of tricuspid regurgitation (TR) in prediction of Down syndrome in Thai fetuses at 17-23 weeks' gestation and to determine the prevalence of TR among normal chromosome fetuses in a high-risk population.A prospective study was performed in 395 high-risk pregnant women who underwent amniocentesis or cordocentesis for fetal karyotyping at 17-23 weeks. The presence or absence of TR was determined by pulsed wave Doppler at the time of prenatal diagnosis. TR was diagnosed when the regurgitation flow was observed for at least half of systole or > or = 70 milliseconds with maximum velocity of > or = 100 cm/sec. The diagnostic values of TR for detection of Down syndrome were calculated.The prevalence of TR was 3.8% (14/370) in normal chromosome fetuses and 40% (2/5) in Down syndrome fetuses. Fetuses with TR had a higher chance to be Down syndrome (11.1%) than those without TR (0.8%) (95% CI of the difference, 0.09-32.9, p = 0.036). Specificity, sensitivity, NPV and PPV of TR in prediction of Down syndrome were 95.9%, 40%, 99.2% and 11.1%, respectively. Among normal chromosome fetuses with TR, 14.3% (2/14) had congenital cardiac abnormalities.TR is not only a high specificity secondary ultrasound marker at 17-23 weeks to identify fetuses with Down syndrome in high-risk pregnant women but also associates with the risk of cardiac defects in normal chromosome fetuses.First trimester Down's syndrome screening marker values and cigarette smoking: new data and a meta-analysis on free beta human chorionic gonadotophin, pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A and nuchal translucency.To examine the effect of smoking on three first trimester screening markers for Down's syndrome that constitute the Combined test, namely nuchal translucency (NT), pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and free beta human chorionic gonadotophin (free beta-hCG) and to use the results to determine which of these markers need to be adjusted for smoking and by how much.The difference in the median multiple of the median (MoM) values in smokers compared to non-smokers was determined for NT, PAPP-A and free beta-hCG in 12,517 unaffected pregnancies that had routine first trimester Combined test screening. These results were then included in a meta-analysis of published studies and the effect of adjusting for smoking on screening performance of the Combined test was estimated.The results using the routine screening data were similar to the summary estimates from the meta-analysis of all studies. The results from the meta-analysis were; median MoM in smokers compared to non-smokers: 1.06 NT (95% confidence interval 1.03 to 1.10), 0.81 PAPP-A (0.80 to 0.83) and 0.94 free beta-hCG (0.89 to 0.99). The effect of adjusting for smoking on the Combined test is small, with an estimated less than half percentage point increase in the detection rate (the proportion of affected pregnancies with a positive result) for a 3% false-positive rate (the proportion of unaffected pregnancies with a positive result) and less than 0.2 percentage point decrease in the false-positive rate for an 85% detection rate.Adjusting first trimester screening markers for smoking has a minimal favourable effect on screening performance, but it is simple to implement and this paper provides the adjustment factors needed if a decision is made to make such an adjustment.2nd-trimester maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin and alpha-fetoprotein levels in male and female fetuses with Down syndrome.Several studies have shown that the 2nd-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) level is significantly lower and that the maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) level is significantly higher in the presence of a female fetus. This may potentially affect Down syndrome (DS) screening such that a higher false-positive rate may occur in women carrying a female fetus, whereas a lower detection rate may result in those carrying males. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the gender impact on marker levels in DS pregnancies and its effect on DS screening.The study included 62 DS pregnancies with a single fetus of known gender (31 male and 31 female). Only pregnancies with chromosomal analysis showing trisomy 21 were included. The maternal serum levels of hCG, AFP, and unconjugated estriol were measured at 16-20 weeks of pregnancy. These levels were expressed as gestational-age-corrected multiples of the median.No statistically significant differences were noted in maternal serum levels of hCG or AFP in DS pregnancies between women carrying a female and those carrying a male DS fetus. No statistically significant differences in 'screen-negative' rates were noted among male and female fetuses.In normal pregnancies, the maternal serum hCG level is higher, and the AFP level is lower in the presence of a female fetus. However, this gender-related difference is not apparent in DS pregnancies. Therefore, the gender-related differences in serum marker levels would not result in a lower detection rate of DS in male fetuses.Combined first trimester screening for trisomy 21: lack of agreement between risk calculation methods.To call attention to differences in first trimester risk estimates for trisomy 21, as calculated by two different software packages.A total of ninety-four pregnant women who had a first trimester risk assessment for trisomy 21 that was based on maternal age, biochemical analysis and a nuchal translucency (NT) measurement. Two commonly used software packages were used for the estimation of individual risks (i.e. Wallac-Perkin-Elmer software and Fetal Medicine Foundation software).Risk estimates derived from each software programme were strikingly different. In each case the discrepancy in reported magnitude of risk resulted from disparities between the two calculation methods for the assessment of the individual risk for trisomy 21. The disparities in risk estimates can be explained by significant differences in reported likelihood ratios for biochemical analyses (P = 0.01), NT measurements (P < 0.0001) and both screening parameters combined P = 0.003).It is illustrated that the lack of agreement between these risk calculation methods could give rise to major counselling problems. In order to avoid confusion, there is a need for estimating individual risks of trisomy 21 in a standardized way. It is proposed to select a set of parameters that have a proven track record as judged by detection and false positive rates and then use that set exclusively, while simultaneously monitoring its performance.Medians for second-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated estriol; differences between races or ethnic groups.Second-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE3) are routinely measured in screening fetuses at high risk for Down syndrome or open neural tube defects (ONTD). For test interpretation, individual patient values of these three analytes are related to population-derived median values. We evaluated data from >21000 pregnancies to determine the extent of race-specific differences in median concentrations. For samples at most gestational ages, median AFP, hCG, and uE3 values for white, black, Hispanic, and other patients were all significantly different. Differences remained significant even when data were corrected for patient weights. For each analyte, the extent of the variation was not the same at different gestational ages. Differences in median values across race/ethnicity groups appear to have only a small impact in Down syndrome screening but it may be appropriate to use alternative sets of AFP medians or adjustment factors to AFP medians for some Asian populations receiving ONTD screening.First-trimester urine free beta hCG, beta core, and total oestriol in pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome: implications for first-trimester screening with nuchal translucency and serum free beta hCG.We have examined maternal urine concentrations of beta core, free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and total oestriol in 373 control pregnancies and 43 pregnancies affected by aneuploidy (including 22 cases of Down's syndrome) in an attempt to see if any of the analytes have a value in Down's syndrome screening between the tenth and 14th week of pregnancy. We have compared the performance of these analytes against nuchal translucency measurement combined with maternal serum free beta hCG at the same period of pregnancy. Our results show that levels of urine free beta hCG and beta core are increased in Down's syndrome with average multiple of the median levels of 1.81 and 2.91, respectively. Urine total oestriol was reduced (0.83) whilst maternal serum free beta hCG was increased (1.72). In trisomy 18 the levels of all analytes were reduced, although serum free beta hCG was the most discriminating. The spread of results in the control and the Down's group for urine beta core was more than three times than that for serum free beta hCG and with urine free beta hCG it was two times wider. In combination with maternal age, urine total oestriol had a 32 per cent detection rate at a fixed 5 per cent false-positive rate; urine beta core 34 per cent, urine free beta hCG 36 per cent, maternal serum free beta hCG 44 per cent, and nuchal translucency 82 per cent. In combination with nuchal translucency, urine total oestriol added an extra 1 per cent detection, urine beta core an extra 2 per cent, urine free beta hCG an extra 3 per cent, and serum free beta hCG an extra 5 per cent. It is unlikely that any of the urine markers will be of value in first-trimester screening. Optimal first-trimester screening programmes will rely for the foreseeable future on nuchal translucency, serum free beta hCG, and possibly pregnancy-associated plasma protein A.A first trimester trisomy 13/trisomy 18 risk algorithm combining fetal nuchal translucency thickness, maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A.This study examines 45 cases of trisomy 13 and 59 cases of trisomy 18 and reports an algorithm to identify pregnancies with a fetus affected by trisomy 13 or 18 by a combination of maternal age fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness, and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 11-14 weeks of gestation. In this mixed trisomy group the median MoM NT was increased at 2.819, whilst the median MoMs for free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were reduced at 0.375 and 0.201 respectively. We predict that with the use of the combined trisomy 13 and 18 algorithm and a risk cut-off of 1 in 150 will for a 0.3% false positive rate allow 95% of these chromosomal defects to be identified at 11-14 weeks. Such algorithms will enhance existing first trimester screening algorithms for trisomy 21.First- and second-trimester evaluation of risk for Down syndrome.To investigate the differences in costs and outcomes of Down syndrome screening using data from the First and Second Trimester Evaluation of Risk (FASTER) Trial.Seven possible screening options for Down syndrome were compared: 1) Triple Screen-maternal serum alpha fetoprotein, estriol, and hCG; 2) Quad-maternal serum alpha fetoprotein, estriol, hCG, and Inhibin A; 3) Combined First-nuchal translucency, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A), free beta-hCG; 4) Integrated-nuchal translucency, PAPP-A, plus Quad; 5) Serum Integrated-PAPP-A, plus Quad; 6) Stepwise Sequential-Combined First plus Quad with results given after each test; and 7) Contingent Sequential-Combined First and only those with risk between 1:30 and 1:1,500 have Quad screen. The detection rates for each option were used given a 5% false-positive rate except for Contingent Sequential with a 4.3% false-positive rate. Outcomes included societal costs of each screening regimen (screening tests, amniocentesis, management of complications, and cost of care of Down syndrome live births), Down syndrome fetuses identified and born, the associated quality-adjusted life years, and the incremental cost-utility ratio.Based on the screening results derived from the 38,033 women evaluated in the FASTER trial, the Contingent Sequential screen dominated (lower costs with better outcomes) all other screens. For example, the Contingent Sequential cost 32.3 million dollars whereas the other screens ranged from 32.8 to 37.5 million dollars. The Sequential strategy led to the identification of the most Down syndrome fetuses of all of the screens, but at a higher cost per Down syndrome case diagnosed ($719,675 compared with $690,427) as compared with the Contingent Sequential. Because of the lower overall false-positive rate leading to fewer procedure-related miscarriages, the Contingent Sequential resulted in the highest quality-adjusted life years as well. The Contingent Sequential remained the most cost-effective option throughout sensitivity analysis of inputs, including amniocentesis rate after positive screen, rate of therapeutic abortion after Down syndrome diagnosis, and rate of procedure-related miscarriages.Analysis of this actual data from the FASTER Trial demonstrates that the Contingent Sequential test is the most cost-effective. This information can help shape future policy regarding Down syndrome screening.Integrated first- and second-trimester Down syndrome screening test among unaffected IVF pregnancies.The aim of the current study was to assess the profile of markers that constitute the integrated test and to measure its false-positive rates (FPR) among a preselected group of unaffected IVF pregnancies. These results were compared with the reference laboratory values that reflect the general obstetric population, which underwent the same investigative protocol.Ninety-nine unaffected singletons from IVF-pregnant women and 1781 controls, all evaluated by the same laboratory, underwent a nondisclosure integrated Down syndrome screening test. This test comprised first-trimester nuchal translucency (NT) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) assessment, followed by a midgestation quadruple test. Only upon completion of the integrated screening test, the parturient women were informed of its results.The mean maternal age of the study and the control group was 32.2 +/- 4 and 30.4 +/- 4 years respectively (t-test <0.005). The marker levels were expressed as multiples of the gestation-specific normal medians. The IVF group had lower PAPP-A (0.78 vs 1.03, t-test P < 0.05) and higher NT (1.14 vs 1.01, t-test P < 0.05) values, respectively. All the other markers were similar for both groups. On the basis of the integrated test, a higher rate of IVF pregnancies were defined as being screen-positive (6.1% vs 3.7%), although the values did not reach a level of statistical significance.Since NT alone yielded the same FPR as the integrated test, the option of various sonographic screening combinations in this group warrants further investigation.Maternal serum superoxide dismutase (SOD): a possible marker for screening Down syndrome affected pregnancies.Superoxide dismutase (SOD: EC1.15.1.1) has been shown to increase in Down syndrome (DS) subjects and in amniotic fluid from DS affected pregnancies. In order to verify a possible increase of maternal serum SOD in DS affected pregnancies and its possible contribution in prenatal screening, the serum enzyme activity was retrospectively measured in samples from normal and DS affected pregnancies. Alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), unconjugated oestriol (uE3) and serum SOD were measured in serum samples collected from 80 normal and 9 DS affected second-trimester pregnancies. The maternal serum SOD activity in the DS group (3. 12+/-0.73 U/ml) was significantly higher (p<0.001) than in the control one (2.20+/-0.7 U/ml). The addition of SOD appeared to be capable of improving the sensitivity of the conventional multi-parametric test (AFP, uE3 and hCG) even if the small number of subjects did not allow the achievement of statistical significance.The influence of smoking on maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta hCG levels in the first trimester of pregnancy.In an analysis of 3111 singleton pregnancies routinely screened in the first trimester with nuchal translucency, free beta hCG and pregnancy associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) smoking has been found to occur in 20.8 per cent of pregnant women. When the individual marker levels were assessed in smokers and non-smokers, levels of PAPP-A were reduced in smokers by some 15 per cent. Despite free beta hCG levels being reduced by 10-14 per cent in the second trimester of smoking women, in the first trimester period this is not evident. Simulation studies would suggest that in smokers the detection of trisomy 21 using free beta hCG, PAPP-A and maternal age will be reduced by some 5 to 6 per cent compared with that of the general population.First-trimester maternal serum immunoreactive inhibin in chromosomally normal and abnormal pregnancies. Dutch Working Party on Prenatal Diagnosis.To investigate the maternal serum immunoreactive inhibin level in chromosomally normal and abnormal pregnancies in the first trimester.This was a retrospective study under the auspices of the Dutch Working Party on Prenatal Diagnosis. Maternal serum samples were taken before prenatal diagnosis. Forty-eight maternal serum samples from chromosomally abnormal pregnancies, including 23 with Down syndrome, were available for analysis; 284 samples from chromosomally normal pregnancies were used to establish reference ranges.The median value of maternal serum immunoreactive inhibin in the 23 Down syndrome pregnancies was 1.3 multiples of the normal median (95% confidence interval 0.8-2.1). No significant difference was found between the distributions of the inhibin concentrations in the normal and the Down syndrome pregnancies or in the normal and the other chromosomally abnormal pregnancies.In contrast to the second trimester of pregnancy, the level of maternal serum immunoreactive inhibin in the first trimester is not related to fetal chromosomal abnormalities and therefore is not useful as a biochemical screening index.[Fetal nuchal translucency thickness and risk for chromosomal defects].In normal pregnancy fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness increases with gestation, in trisomy 21 and other major chromosomal defects fetal NT is increased. The risk for trisomies can be derived by multiplying the a priori maternal age and gestation related risk by a likelihood ratio, which depends on the degree of deviation in fetal NT measurement from the normal median for that crown-rump length. In a pregnant population with a mean maternal age of 28 years, using the risk cut-off of 1 in 300 to define the screen positive group would detect about 80% of trisomy 21 fetuses for a false positive rate of 5%. It was estimated that, for a 5.4% false positive rate, 90% of trisomy 21 fetuses could be detected. Prospective studies have demonstrated that such results are achievable by screening with fetal NT and maternal serum free b-hCG and PAPP-A in the first-trimester. It is therefore essential that, in screening, attention is paid to the provision of high quality sonographic and biochemical services for early diagnosis of chromosomal defects.Contingent triple-screening for Down syndrome in the second trimester: a feasibility study in Mainland Chinese population.To explore the efficacy of contingent triple-screening for Down syndrome (DS), that is, performing triple-screening in pregnant women with DS risks between 1/270 and 1/1000 at routine double-screening, in a Mainland Chinese population.Maternal serum concentrations of alpha fetoprotein (AFP), free-beta human chorionic gonadotropin (free beta-hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE3) were measured by time-resolved fluoroimmunoassay in 24 double-screening false-negative (DSFN) and 322 double-screening true-negative (DSTN) pregnancies with DS risks between 1/270 and 1/1000 at routine double-screening performed at 15-20 weeks' gestation. DS risk of each pregnancy was calculated by computer software. The detection rate (DR), false-positive rate (FPR), and costs of contingent triple-screening were calculated and compared with routine double-screening methods.Six of 24 DSFN and 3 of 322 DSTN were contingent triple-screening positive. Compared with routine double-screening, DR of contingent triple-screening increased by 10% (from 50% to 60%) without a significant increase of FPR (p > 0.05). When compared with routine triple-screening, uE3 costs in contingent triple-screening were reduced by more than 84.3%.Second-trimester maternal serum contingent triple-screening could be effective and suitable for prenatal care in Mainland China. Governments and Health Agencies of other developing countries may also find this strategy cost-effective.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and fetal autosomal trisomies.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein values in 61 patients with fetal autosomal trisomies diagnosed at 6581 genetic amniocenteses were significantly lower than those in an equal number of matched control subjects. The genetic risk of fetal autosomal trisomies for women less than age 35 offered amniocentesis with maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein values less than 0.5 multiples of the median is in the same range as that currently accepted for advanced maternal age. Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening for autosomal trisomies (mainly Down syndrome) is feasible.First-trimester nuchal translucency and maternal serum biochemical screening for Down's syndrome: a happy union?Maternal smoking: age distribution, levels of alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotrophin, and effect on detection of Down syndrome pregnancies in second-trimester screening.To study the levels of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) in the second trimester in smokers and non-smokers with unaffected and Down syndrome pregnancies; to examine the rate of smoking in different maternal age groups in a population having routine prenatal screening; and to assess the effect of smoking on the detection rates for Down syndrome and corresponding false-positive rates, both overall and in different maternal age groups.Information on maternal smoking status, maternal age and serum marker levels was collected from case note searches and the screening programme database on 2272 unaffected singleton pregnancies, 36 unaffected twin pregnancies and 103 singleton Down syndrome pregnancies.In unaffected pregnancies the smokers had a median age 3.3 years less than the non-smokers, while in the Down syndrome cases the corresponding age difference was 2.0 years. Median analyte levels in multiples of the median (MoM) in the unaffected singleton pregnancies were, for non-smokers: AFP=0.97, hCG=1.04; and for smokers, AFP=1.04, hCG=0.80. In the Down syndrome pregnancies the medians were, for non-smokers: AFP=0.69, hCG=2.49; and for smokers, AFP=0.70, hCG=1.53. Correction for smoking status gave median MoMs of 1.0 for both AFP and hCG in the unaffected pregnancies in both smokers and non-smokers. In the Down syndrome cases the corrected medians were, for non-smokers: AFP=0.67, hCG=2.29; and for smokers, AFP=0.73, hCG=1.99. Before correction for maternal smoking the overall detection rate for Down syndrome was 66.7% with a false-positive rate of 6.2%. After correction the detection rate was 67.7% with a false-positive rate of 4.9%. Between the smoking and non-smoking groups there was a significant difference in the detection rate (37.5% versus 76.0%) and the false-positive rate (1.8% versus 8.1%), which disappeared after correction for smoking status (detection rate 62.5% versus 69.3%, false-positive rate 3.9% versus 5.4%). No evidence of a lower incidence of Down syndrome in smokers was found.While correcting AFP and hCG results for maternal smoking status will have little impact on the overall detection rate for Down syndrome, it may reduce the false-positive rate and will improve the accuracy of the risks given to individual women.Accuracy of Down syndrome risks produced in a first-trimester screening programme incorporating fetal nuchal translucency thickness and maternal serum biochemistry.Over the past three years approximately 12 000 women have been screened in the first trimester through our OSCAR programme, which utilizes fetal NT and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A. During this time 30 cases of Down syndrome were identified either prenatally or postnatally. Using an established procedure the accuracy of predicted risk for Down syndrome was assessed in a population of 30 cases of Down syndrome and 11 758 unaffected pregnancies. The correlation between predicted risk and prevalence of Down syndrome was very high (r=0.9995). It is concluded that risks produced by the Fetal Medicine Foundation combined risk algorithm agree very closely with Down syndrome prevalence and can be used with confidence when counselling women of their risk.Multiple marker screening in multifetal gestations: failure to predict adverse pregnancy outcomes.The objective of the study was to assess whether the association known in singleton pregnancies of high maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) or human chorionic gonadotropin (HCG) with adverse outcomes applies also to multifetal gestations. Maternal serum AFP and HCG were evaluated in 207 multifetal pregnancies. High values were defined as a maternal serum AFP of > 4.5 and a HCG of > 4.0 multiples of the median (MoM), with appropriate adjustments. Results were correlated with premature delivery, stillbirths, or pregnancy termination for fetal anomalies. There were 10 stillbirths, 7 terminations of pregnancy for fetal anomalies, and 66 premature deliveries in the study group. Maternal serum AFP was somewhat higher in abnormal pregnancies than in those with normal outcome (3.4 vs. 2.5 MoM, respectively, NS). A high AFP level was found in 6% of pregnancies with adverse outcomes and in 4% of uncomplicated gestations (NS). High HCG values, also observed in 5% of cases, were all associated with normal outcome. Multiple marker screening suggested an increased risk for aneuploidy in 9% of patients, all of whom were euploid on amniocentesis karyotypes. Maternal serum screening in multiple gestations is confounded by the differing contributions of fetuses, and abnormal results cannot reliably predict adverse pregnancy outcomes.Ear length in trisomy 21 fetuses at 11-14 weeks of gestation.To determine the value of measuring fetal ear length at 11-14 weeks of gestation in screening for chromosomal defects.The fetal ear length was measured in 450 fetuses immediately before chorionic villus sampling for karyotyping at 11-14 weeks of gestation.The median gestational age was 12 (range, 11-14) weeks. The fetal ear was successfully examined in all cases. The fetal karyotype was normal in 409 cases and abnormal in 41, including 32 cases of trisomy 21. In the chromosomally normal group the fetal ear length increased significantly with crown-rump length from a mean of 3.7 mm at 45 mm to 6.9 mm at 84 mm. In the trisomy 21 fetuses the median ear length was significantly below the normal mean for crown-rump length by 0.45 mm (P = 0.013) but it was below the 5(th) centile of the normal range in only two (6.3%) of the cases. There was no significant association between the delta score of ear length and delta nuchal translucency in either the chromosomally normal (r = - 0.015, P = 0.753) or the trisomy 21 fetuses (r = - 0.014, P = 0.94).At 11-14 weeks of gestation the ear length in trisomy 21 fetuses is significantly reduced but the degree of deviation from normal is too small for this measurement to be useful in screening for trisomy 21.Three-dimensional ultrasound measurement of the placental volume in early pregnancy: method and correlation with biochemical placenta parameters.Placental size has been an interesting topic of research for many years. The main aim of this study was to investigate the feasibility of measuring the placental volume at the end of the first trimester using three-dimensional (3D) ultrasound and to correlate these volumes to known placental functional indices and to factors affecting the placenta. Women with singleton pregnancies at the end of the first trimester were included into this study. The volume data of the placentae were correlated to the crown-rump length (CRL), placenta-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A), free beta-human chroangiogonadotropin (f-beta-hCG) and other factors that may affect the placental size or function. A total of 1462 pregnancies could be evaluated. Comparison between CRL and placental volume proved a significant correlation (r=0.43, P< 0.001). Due to the observed proportional growth of CRL and placental volume, a quotient (placental volume/CRL) was calculated for each case. There were no differences between placenta/CRL-quotients in relation to gravidity, parity or smoking. Correlations could be established between the placental volume and PAPP-A and f-beta-hCG (PAPP-A: r=0.28, P< 0.001, f-beta-hCG: r=0.10, P< 0.001). The measurement of the placenta in the first trimester can be performed in a high percentage of cases. The placenta/CRL quotient represents a simple method to compare placentae from different gestational days. The correlation between placental volume and maternal serum screening parameters might provide a chance to refine first trimester Down's syndrome serum screening. Future studies will be needed to evaluate the possible clinical use of first trimester placental volume measurements.[Proposed normal values for alpha fetoprotein in maternal serum for the detection of neural tube closure defects and Down syndrome. Preliminary study].To establish a normal range of alpha fetoprotein in maternal serum (AFP sm) in the population at the "20 de Noviembre" Hospital in Mexico City, there were studied 46 patients with a normal pregnancy confirmed with ultrasonography between 16 to 18 week of gestation. The 97 determinations of AFPsm were made by radioimmunoanalysis. The multiples of the median (MoM) were 2.16 al 16th weeks, 2.33 a 17th week 2.43 al 18th week of pregnancy. Now the methods to determine abnormalities in the product and the genetics studies are proposed only to the patients considered high risk (older than 35 years old, previous malformed son or family history of those abnormalities). AFPsm and the establishment of normal range allow us to amplify the study to every pregnant woman and to determine those malformations in the pregnant women of low risk which represents about 90-95% of DCTN and about 80% of SD.Maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome on population basis.The favorable attitude among the public towards prenatal diagnostics in Finland allowed us to start a trial on population basis when screening for Down's syndrome by maternal serum markers and age was introduced.Screening by maternal serum markers for Down's syndrome was offered to all 17,200 pregnant women in the Helsinki area during the study period of 2.5 years. Screening due to advanced maternal age, 37 years or more, was continued as previously, and 1133 pregnant mothers used this option. Alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotrophin, and during the first year also unconjugated estriol were used as markers.The uptake of serum screening was 84%. The proportion of false positive results i.e. risk for Down's syndrome, 1:350 or more at term, was initially 5.7%. After ultrasound scan 4.1% of the mothers remained 'screen positive'. The amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling uptake was 98.4%. Ten out of eighteen cases of Down's syndrome were detected by maternal serum screening, sensitivity 56%, 95% CI 31-79%. Other chromosomal abnormalities were found in three cases, and there were four cases of mosaicisms confined to the placenta. These were trisomies 16, 7 and 2, and tetraploidy. Elevated serum alpha-fetoprotein was found initially in 0.7% of the cases. One case of congenital nephrosis of the Finnish type and ten other, mainly structural, abnormalities were detected by high AFP.The screening was well received by the mothers. The detection rate of 56% is in the same range as in previous studies. Ultrasound scan before the test would effectively lower the false positive rate caused by incorrect timing.Role of first-trimester sonography in the diagnosis of aneuploidy and structural fetal anomalies.We sought to determine the sensitivity of the first-trimester scan in the early diagnosis of aneuploidy and structural fetal anomalies in an unselected low-risk population.This was a retrospective chart review of all patients having first-trimester scans between 2002 and 2009. At our center, a survey of fetal anatomy is performed at the time of nuchal translucency assessment at 11 weeks to 13 weeks 6 days. A second-trimester scan is done at 20 to 23 weeks and a third-trimester scan at 32 to 35 weeks. Isolated sonographic findings of choroid plexus cysts and echogenic intracardiac foci were excluded. Lethal anomalies and those requiring immediate surgical intervention at birth were considered major structural anomalies. All scans were performed by a single sonologist certified by the Fetal Medicine Foundation. All neonates were examined at birth by a pediatrician.Our study included 1370 fetuses. Six cases of aneuploidy (0.4%) were detected. The first-trimester scan detected 5 of 6 cases of aneuploidy (83%), confirmed by karyotype. There were 36 cases of structural fetal anomalies (2.6%); 20 (1.5%) were major anomalies. The first-trimester scan detected 16 of 36 (44%); 20 (56%) were identified by second- or third-trimester scans. The first-trimester scan detection rate for major structural anomalies was 14 of 20 (70%). The 5 that were missed by the first-trimester scan were detected by a second-trimester scan.Our study emphasizes the importance of the first-trimester scan in the early detection of aneuploidy and structural fetal anomalies. In this small unselected low-risk population, the first-trimester scan detected 83% of aneuploidies and 70% of major structural anomalies. Our results are comparable to previously published studies from other centers and further exemplify the invaluable role of the first-trimester scan in the early detection of aneuploidy and structural anomalies in an unselected low-risk population.Antenatal maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome: results of a demonstration project.To assess the implementation of antenatal screening for Down's syndrome in practice, using individual risk estimates based on maternal age and the three serum markers: alpha fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol, and human chorionic gonadotrophin.Demonstration project of Down's syndrome screening; women with a risk estimate at term of 1 in 250 or greater were classified as "screen positive" and offered diagnostic amniocentesis.Hospital and community antenatal clinics in four health districts in London.12,603 women of all ages with singleton pregnancies seen between February 1989 and the end of May 1991, with follow up of the outcome of pregnancy completed to the end of 1991.Uptake of screening, detection rate for Down's syndrome, false positive rate, odds of being affected given a positive result, and uptake of amniocentesis in women with positive screening results, together with the costs of the screening programme.The uptake of screening was 74%. The detection rate was 48% (12/25), and the false positive rate was 4.1%, consistent with results expected from previous work based on observational studies. There was a loss of detection due to the selective use of ultrasound scans among women with positive screening results. One affected pregnancy occurred among 205 reclassified as negative; this illustrated the danger of false negatives occurring in this group and lends weight to the view that if an ultrasound estimate of gestational age is used it should be carried out routinely on all women rather than selectively among those with positive results. The estimated cost of avoiding the birth of a baby with Down's syndrome was about 38,000 pounds, substantially less than the lifetime costs of care.Antenatal maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome is effective in practice and can be readily integrated into routine antenatal care. It is cost effective and performs better than selection for amniocentesis on the basis of maternal age alone.Extent of correlation between first and second trimester markers for Down's syndrome screening.Improved prenatal aneuploidy screening using the novel advanced first-trimester screening algorithm: a multicenter study of 10,017 pregnancies.: It has been postulated that the maternal age component should be completely excluded from first-trimester screening (FTS) for fetal aneuploidies. In this study, we tested a new algorithm known as advanced first-trimester screening (AFS), which disregards maternal age.: In a multicenter study, FTS findings were retrieved from 10,017 pregnancies. FTS risk assessment was performed using the Nicolaides method, and the AFS score was calculated. The results of both methods were compared.: Within this population, 81 fetuses had an abnormal karyotype. The sensitivity of the 2 algorithms was 86.4%. When the AFS method was used, the positive predictive value rose from 9.6% (FTS) to 12.4% (AFS). Using AFS, the test positive rate could be decreased by 161 cases (-22.2%) (p < 0.0001), due to a reduction of false positive cases. As a result, the false positive rate of AFS was 24.5% lower than that of FTS, while the same number of aneuploidies was detected.: AFS can markedly reduce the rate of false positive test results. If these results are confirmed by larger multicenter studies, the new AFS will represent a great improvement in fetal aneuploidy screening. (c) 2008 Wiley Periodicals, Inc. J Clin Ultrasound, 2008.Advanced first trimester screening (AFS): an improved test strategy for the individual risk assessment of fetal aneuploidies and malformations.First trimester risk assessment for fetal aneuploidies is computed on the base of a general background risk, which is depending on the maternal age. Thereby, the adjusted risk tends to rise with increasing age. Obversely, more unsuspicious fetal parameters [measurement of the nuchal translucency (NT) and biochemical parameters, free beta human chorionic gonadotropine (fbetaB-Hcg) and pregnancy associated plasma protein A (Papp-A)] have to be observed to result in an unsuspicious test at higher age. It was the aim of this study to investigate the potential value of a novel risk assessment algorithm explicitly disregarding the maternal age.This was an ultrasound cohort study of 1,463 singleton pregnancies at 11-14 weeks of gestation undergoing a first trimester screening for fetal aneuploidies by measuring the (NT), Papp-A and fbeta-hCG. In each case, the pregnancy outcome was obtained. Regarding either the detection of genetic affections or the combined detection of genetic or somatic anomalies, the test performance parameters (sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values) were calculated and compared with each other. For risk calculation the standard Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF)-Software and an alternative software with a similar algorithm (JOY-Software) were utilized. Compared to this, the risk assessment had been modified by implementing a novel calculation algorithm (advanced first trimester screening algorithm, AFS) purposely disregarding the maternal age and again, the test performance parameters had been computed and were compared with the first ones.At the mere genetic analysis, all four test-strategies revealed to have identical sensitivity and negative predictive values. Compared to the standard FMF-Software, the JOY-Software showed a reduced false positive rate. In addition, in both softwares, the false positive rate is highly significant-reduced by implementing the AFS-algorithm. At combined genetic and somatic analysis, analogous results on different counts could be found.In the effort to create an algorithm characterising somatic and fetal conditions of the fetus most properly, the inclusion of maternal age is not a helpful value and excluding the age from risk calculation leads to a high significant reduction of the false positive rate. Further, a comparable marked increase of both, specificity and positive predictive values, can be achieved for the FMF- and JOY-Software on the background of the generally more favourable JOY test performance.[First trimester ultrasound screening of chromosomal abnormalities].A retrocervical subcutaneous collection of fluid at 11-14 weeks of gestation, can be visualized by ultrasound as nuchal translucency (NT).To examine the distribution of fetal nuchal translucency in low risk population, to determine the detection rate of chromosomal abnormalities in the population of interest based on maternal age and NT measurement.Screening for chromosomal defects, advocated by The Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF), was performed in 1341 pregnancies in the period January 2000-April 2004. Initial risk for chromosomal defects (based on maternal and gestational age) and corrected risk, after the NT measurement, were calculated. Complete data were collected from 1048 patients.Out of 1048 pregnancies followed, 8 cases of Down's syndrome were observed, 7 were detected antenatally and 6 out of 7 were detected due to screening that combines maternal age and NT measurement. According to our results, sensitivity of the screening for aneuploidies based on maternal age alone was 12.5% and false positive rate 13.1%, showing that screening based on NT measurement is of great importance. Screening by a combination of maternal age and NT, and selecting a screening-positive group for invasive testing enabled detection of 75% of fetuses with trisomy 21.In screening for chromosomal abnormalities, an approach which combines maternal age and NT is effective and increases the detection rate compared to the use of any single test.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening: low and high values for detection of genetic abnormalities.In initiating a maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening program, we pursued not only elevated values for the detection of neural tube defects but also low values to detect trisomic fetuses. We detected neural tube defects (0.2%) as expected but were surprised by the efficacy with which low serum alpha-fetoprotein values identified aneuploid fetuses. In 1421 pregnant women, 132 (9.3%) showed maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein values less than 0.4 multiple of the median. After repeat sampling, 57 women still had low values. These 57 women and six others who were too anxious for repeat sampling underwent level I ultrasound examination with the following results: gestational age overestimated by 2 weeks (n = 8), fetal death (n = 1), and no explanation (n = 54). Of the 54, 49 underwent amniocentesis with detection of three aneuploid fetuses: trisomy 18 (n = 2) and trisomy 21 (n = 1); maternal ages were 27, 29, and 31 years, respectively. Autosomal aneuploidy did not occur in other women screened. We conclude that low maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein values could efficiently detect aneuploid fetuses, perhaps with greater sensitivity than previously predicted.Higher median levels of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in the first trimester of pregnancy in a Chinese ethnic group. Implication for first trimester combined screening for Down's syndrome in the Chinese population.To study the effect of ethnic Chinese on the medians of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in the first trimester of pregnancy.The data of 943 women undergoing first trimester combined screening for fetal Down syndrome were analysed to derive the Chinese-specific medians. The calculated risk of Down syndrome based on these Chinese-specific medians was compared with that based on the original algorithm of the Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF).The maternal serum levels of multiples of median of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were significantly higher among the Chinese than among the Caucasians. The weight-adjusted gestation-specific medians were developed. Without adjustment for ethnicity, the original FMF algorithm underestimated the risk of Down syndrome by a median of 1%. Adjustment by ethnicity increased the false-positive rate by 10% (from 5.3 to 5.9%).Ethnic Chinese have a significantly higher maternal serum level of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in the first trimester, which could not be explained by differences in maternal weight. Adjustment for ethnicity may be necessary for these biochemical markers in a first trimester screening program.[Combined screening for Down syndrome in Marseille multidisciplinary prenatal centers].Combined screening for trisomy 21 (CS) is established since January 2010 in multidisciplinary centers for prenatal screening in Marseille. Our work investigates its implementation. To date, the false positive rate is 3.5% and the coverage of the SC after six months is 5.7% in our low-risk population.Screening for trisomy 21 with maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency and maternal serum biochemistry at 11-14 weeks: a regional experience from Germany.To examine the efficacy of first trimester screening for trisomy 21 using a combination of maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency (NT), maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (free beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) in a regional setting [maternity unit of the Women's University Hospital, Hannover Medical School (study center); two regional private centers for prenatal diagnosis and human genetics; laboratory for prenatal diagnosis and human genetics].Fetal NT, crown-rump length, maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were measured at 11-14 weeks of gestation. Risk calculation was carried out using the FMF computer algorithm. The patients were informed and counseled about possible invasive test options if the risk was 1 in 300 or greater. Fetal outcome was obtained by questionnaires given to the patients or sent to their gynecologists. The detection and false-positive rates for the different screening strategies were calculated.Pregnancy outcome was obtained in 2,497 cases, of which 2,196 cases had completed first trimester screening with NT and maternal serum biochemistry and 301 additional cases had NT measurement only. The median age was 32.5 years. In our population 11 affected fetuses were found. The estimated risk for trisomy 21 was 1 in 300 or greater in 64, 82, 88 and 88% of affected fetuses using maternal age alone, in combination with nuchal translucency, with maternal serum biochemical markers or with both NT and biochemical markers for a false-positive rate of 28.2, 5.1, 15.3 and 4.0%.First trimester screening using maternal age, NT, free beta-hCG and PAPP-A is highly effective for the detection of trisomy 21 and is associated with a sensitivity of about 90% for 5% false-positive patients.Maternal serum screening in cases of mosaic and translocation Down syndrome.To determine if the second-trimester maternal serum markers (MSM) screening for Down syndrome (DS) is efficient in DS mosaicism or structural rearrangement cases.DS mosaic or translocation cases were reviewed from databases of routine MSM DS screening. The control group consisted of 977 trisomy 21 cases included in a series of 854 902 patients (routine screening). DS risk was calculated by combination of maternal age and MSM [alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and human choriogonadotrophin (hCG) or free beta-hCG and/or uE3] expressed in multiples of median (MoM). Mosaic DS cases were divided into three groups, < 10%, 10-49%, and >or= 50% trisomy 21 cells. Translocation DS cases were divided into three groups, isochromosome, Robertsonian, or reciprocal translocation. Detection rate (DR) and MoMs were evaluated in each group.As many as 76 cases of nonstandard trisomy 21 were collected. For mosaic DS cases (n = 43) DR was 69.8% (not significantly different from the 70.8% of control group). When mosaicism was less than 10%, the DR dropped to 25%. For translocation DS cases (n = 33) DR was 75.7% (not significantly different from control group) whatever the types of translocation.In the nonstandard DS cases, second-trimester MSMs gave the same detection rate as for standard trisomy 21, except the cases with low-level mosaicism (<10%).Lens culinaris agglutinin-reactive alpha-fetoprotein, an alternative variant to alpha-fetoprotein in prenatal screening for Down's syndrome.Three serum tests, alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotrophin and unconjugated oestriol, are now widely used for screening for Down's syndrome. Lens culinaris agglutinin-reactive alpha-fetoprotein (AFP-L3) is a variant of alpha-fetoprotein with alpha1-->6 fucose appended to the reducing terminal N-acetylglucosamine. It is the most prominent AFP detected in the serum of patients with hepatocellular carcinoma.We investigated microheterogeneities of the carbohydrate chain on AFP in fetal liver tissues, amniotic fluids and maternal sera obtained from pregnancies with Down's syndrome using lectin affinity electrophoresis with four lectins. The percentages of AFP-L3 in maternal sera from 22 Down's syndrome and 227 unaffected pregnancies were determined.Unlike the case with AFP concentration, the percentage of AFP-L3 in maternal serum and amniotic fluid was similar, and apparently not influenced by membrane permeability. Knowing the percentage of AFP-L3 in maternal serum was effective for discriminating between Down's syndrome-affected pregnancies and unaffected pregnancies. The percentage of AFP-L3 in maternal serum identified 55% of Down's syndrome cases with a 5% false-positive rate.AFP-L3 should be an effective replacement for AFP in prenatal Down's syndrome screening.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and fetal trisomy-21 in women 35 years and older: implications for alpha-fetoprotein screening programs.A retrospective study of 3,411 women who underwent midtrimester amniocentesis for fetal chromosome analysis between June 1979 and August 1984 was performed to evaluate an association between low maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) concentrations and Down syndrome (DS) pregnancies. A total of 71 pregnancies was found with abnormal fetal chromosomes; of these, 26 cases were trisomy-21 and 10 cases were trisomy-18. The maternal serum AFP in women with DS fetuses was relatively lower than levels in women with fetuses that had normal chromosomes. In addition, the AFP concentrations in amniotic fluid were decreased in cases involving DS fetuses. We have estimated the risks for DS pregnancy at all maternal ages and most serum AFP concentrations. Using these calculations, genetic counselors will be able to provide more accurate risk estimates for trisomy-21 following maternal serum AFP testing.Prenatal maternal dried blood screening with alpha-fetoprotein and free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin for open neural tube defect and Down syndrome.Our purpose was to evaluate second-trimester prenatal screening for open neural tube defects and Down syndrome by use of dried blood specimen collection and transport.A prospective study of 7497 dried blood specimens from patients <35 years old was performed. Specimens were assayed for maternal blood alpha-fetoprotein and free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin. Patient-specific risks for both disorders were calculated and used to determine whether further evaluation was indicated. The study included an evaluation of the median and SD of analyte multiple of the median levels.The initial positive rate for open neural tube defect was 4.4% adjusted to 2.7% after ultrasonographic revision and collection of a second sample. The initial positive rate for Down syndrome was 3.6% adjusted to 2.8% after ultrasonographic revision. All seven cases of open neural tube defect were detected within the increased risk group. Six of 8 (75%) cases of Down syndrome were detected. The median alpha-fetoprotein multiple of the median was 3.5 in open neural tube defect cases and 0.6 in Down syndrome cases. The median free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin multiple of the median was 2.4 in Down syndrome cases. The SD (log e) of alpha- fetoprotein and free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin in 5868 unaffected white patients was 0.4022 and 0.5635, respectively.Second-trimester dried blood screening for open neural tube defects and Down syndrome can achieve screening efficiency comparable to serum-based protocols with distinct advantages over the conventional method of blood collection.Screening for Down's syndrome: experience in an inner city health district.To review the experience of Down's syndrome screening in an inner city health district.In this retrospective study the names of the women were obtained from the Regional Cytogenetic Laboratory and District Down's Syndrome Register. Antenatal notes of the mothers were studied. Maternal age during the affected pregnancy, screening test performed if any, gestational age at booking and at screening, screening test results, and pregnancy outcome were reviewed.An inner city health district.Down's syndrome cases diagnosed prenatally and postnatally.None.Antenatal diagnosis of Down's syndrome was made in 15/45 women (33.3%); Edwards' syndrome was diagnosed antenatally in 2/5 women. Screening was not performed in eight women (17.8%) whose infants were affected by Down's Syndrome; it was also not performed in one woman whose baby was affected by Edwards' syndrome due to late presentation to the antenatal clinic or loss of the blood sample. Nineteen women (42.2%) with a Down's syndrome pregnancy and two women with a Edwards' syndrome pregnancy had had a negative screening test. Three women had had a positive screening test but declined amniocentesis. Among those who had a screening test, the overall detection rate of screening was 48.6% (18/37) for Down's syndrome and 50% (2/4) for Edwards' syndrome. The detection rates in different ethnic groups did not show significant difference. Four women chose not to have termination following diagnosis of Down's syndrome, giving a total reduction rate of 21%.Screening programmes for Down's syndrome have not yet resulted in a substantial reduction in the number of affected babies. In addition to trials at developing screening programmes with better detection rates, efforts should be made to improve the provision of the screening service and the quality of antenatal care in general with emphasis on early presentation and optimal understanding of the implications of the tests.Maternal serum inhibin-A in pregnancies with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus: implications for screening for Down's syndrome.A nested case-control study using stored serum samples collected as part of a prospective study of the outcome of pregnancy was performed to investigate concentrations of (dimeric) inhibin-A in maternal serum between 15 and 22 weeks of pregnancy in 126 pregnancies among 92 women with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM). Each IDDM pregnancy was matched with two control singleton pregnancies for gestational age (same completed week) and duration of sample storage (same calendar quarter). The median inhibin-A level in the IDDM pregnancies was 0.88 multiples of the median (MOM) for pregnancies without IDDM at the same gestational age (P = 0.05) (95 per cent confidence interval 0.78-1.00) or 0.91 MOM after adjustment for maternal weight. These results enable inhibin-A values to be adjusted so that prenatal screening for Down's syndrome can be performed using this marker in IDDM pregnancies as well as in non-diabetic pregnancies.[Evaluation of plasmatic A protein as only marker during first trimester of pregnancy].One of main targets of prenatal diagnosis is Down's syndrome. Biochemical and sonographic markers together are efficient. The use of a single marker has not shown the same efficiency, although it has not been sufficient evaluated.To shown results of PAPP-A as a single marker in first pregnancy trimester.Prospective, cross-sectional and random study, which evaluated 400 women with biochemical marker PAPP-A in the first pregnancy trimester.PAPP-A detected a true positive case (0.3%), 28 false positive cases (7.0%) and 371 true negative cases (92.8%), there were no false negative cases. Between 9 to 11 weeks, rate of false positives fluctuated between 5.5 and 6.7%, in 12th week it was 1.2% and in 13th week 18.2%. PAPP-A has 95.1% of specificity (weeks 9 to 12) and 82.2% of maternal age.A 5% of false positive rate is acceptable for prenatal diagnosis markers. It has been reported that PAPP-A is less discriminatory at 10 weeks of gestation. In this study the rate fluctuated between 6 and 7% (weeks 9 to 11), which increased at 13th week. Markers with low false positive rate stimulate the use of prenatal screening.The use of combined markers: biochemical (free fraction of beta-hGC, PAPP-A) and sonographic, are most recommendable in the first trimester of the pregnancy because of them low rate of false positives. PAPP-A can be used as a single marker between 9 to 11 weeks; false positive cases must be studied with combined markers.Phenotypic characteristics of absent and hypoplastic nasal bones in fetuses with Down syndrome: description by 3-dimensional ultrasonography and clinical significance.To determine the frequency and clinical significance of bilateral and unilateral hypoplastic nasal bones for the detection of Down syndrome by 3-dimensional ultrasonography.Thirty-seven volumes of the fetal skull from fetuses with Down syndrome and 37 from fetuses without abnormalities were analyzed by 1 investigator blinded to fetal karyotype. The maximum intensity projection algorithm was used to reconstruct nasal bones. Ossification patterns were identified in anteroposterior and profile views. Sensitivity, false-positive rates (FPRs), and likelihood ratios (LRs) for detection of Down syndrome were calculated.After exclusions (coronal acquisition [n = 11], hand in front of the face [n = 4], poor imaging [n = 2], incomplete follow-up [n = 2], and anomalies detected after delivery [n = 2]), 53 volumes were analyzed (26 fetuses with Down syndrome and 27 without abnormalities; median gestational age, 21 6/7 weeks [interquartile range, 19 6/7-25 2/7 weeks]). Rendered profile views revealed absent nasal bones in 18.9% (10 of 53) of the fetuses, and, among these, 90% (9 of 10) had Down syndrome (sensitivity, 34.6% [9 of 26]; FPR, 3.7% [1 of 27]; LR, 9.3 [95% confidence interval (CI), 1.3-68.7]). Three ossification patterns were identified in anteroposterior views: (1) normally developed, (2) delayed ossification, and (3) absent nasal bones. Sensitivity, FPR, and LR of absent nasal bones for detecting Down syndrome were 34.6% (9 of 26), 3.7% (1 of 27), and 9.0 (95% CI, 1.3-68.7), respectively. Sensitivity, FPR, and LR of delayed ossification for detecting Down syndrome were 42.3% (11 of 26), 22% (6 of 27), and 1.83 (95% CI, 0.8-4.4).Absence of nasal bones is associated with the highest risk of Down syndrome. Delayed ossification is associated with a lower risk of Down syndrome than absent nasal bones. These ossification patterns may be indistinguishable on 2-dimensional ultrasonography.Is rapid aneuploidy screening used alone acceptable in prenatal diagnosis? An evaluation of the possible role of ultrasound examination.The objectives of this study were to use a factual basis to: (1) determine the number, nature, and probable phenotypic consequences of karyotype anomalies that would probably be missed (structural anomalies, uncommon aneuploidies and mosaic aneuploidies) by rapid aneuploidy screening (RAS), and (2) appraise whether RAS can replace traditional karyotyping when amniocenteses are performed for increased risk of Down's syndrome by maternal serum screening or advanced maternal age in the absence of ultrasound abnormality.This retrospective cohort study analysed the indications, results and outcomes of 5,713 consecutive amniocenteses over a 5-year period at a single prenatal diagnosis centre in Paris.Advanced maternal age and increased Down's risk with maternal serum marker were the most common indications. Chromosome abnormalities were detected in 3.64% of the pregnancies tested, and unexpected structural anomalies in 0.63% (n = 36). Translocations were more likely to be reciprocal, balanced and of parental origin. There were 6 mosaic gonosomal aneuploidies. Overall, 4 mosaic autosomal aneuploidies and 36 structural aberrations would not have been recognised by RAS alone. Of the 4 mosaic autosomal aneuploidies, all were terminated, one had major malformations and the others had discrete signs that a good quality ultrasound examination would probably not detect. Of the 36 structural aberrations, 24 would be undetected by ultrasound scan, from which 6 would be associated with a significant risk of an abnormal phenotype outcome.In conclusion, our data do not provide evidence that RAS can replace the traditional karyotype. It is probably impossible to arrive in a universal conclusion of which approach (karyotype or RAS) is definitely better than the other. Each prenatal centre could have its own approach depending on the local data analysis, including quality control of ultrasounds.Maternal weight correction of maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG MoM when screening for trisomy 21 in the first trimester of pregnancy.To assess the suitability of either the log-linear or reciprocal-linear regression procedure for maternal weight correction of biochemical marker MoMs in the first trimester.Data from two prospective first-trimester OSCAR screening programmes including 32,010 women with first-trimester maternal serum-free beta-hCG and PAPP-A measured by the Kryptor analyser was analysed by regression analysis to provide parameters for the log-linear and reciprocal-linear MoM correction procedures. Assessment was made by goodness of fit to the data. The impact on detection rate and false-positive rate of the different correction procedures was assessed using statistical modelling with biochemical markers alone.Both log-linear and reciprocal-linear correction were shown to fit the data well. For free beta-hCG, the log-linear procedure was marginally superior to the reciprocal-linear procedure (r2=0.986 v 0.980), whilst for PAPP-A the reciprocal-linear procedure was marginally better (r2=0.991 v 0.985). Log-linear correction reduced the variance for both markers more than did the reciprocal-linear procedure. For free beta-hCG, the sd was reduced from 0.2675 to 0.2605 and for PAPP-A, it was reduced from 0.2545 to 0.2336. Correcting for maternal weight was shown to reduce the population false-positive rate from 7.0 to 6.5%, whilst maintaining the same detection rate at a risk cut-off of 1 in a 100. At individual levels, a two-fold variation in risk was demonstrated depending upon the individual's weight.To provide accurate individual patient-specific risks for trisomy 21, maternal weight must be taken into account and should be a mandatory data item for screening programmes. Maternal weight correction in the first trimester using free beta-hCG and PAPP-A can be best achieved using the log-linear procedure.Maternal serum screening for trisomy 21 in women with a false positive result in last pregnancy.Maternal serum screening for Down syndrome is a common practice in the United Kingdom. A number of factors have been shown to influence the chance of a false positive test result. Analysis of routinely collated information stored on an electronic database in a district general hospital has shown that women with a previous false positive maternal screen are at much greater chance of having a false positive result in their next pregnancy. Overall, there was a fivefold increased risk attributed to biological variation in their serum concentrations of alpha-feto protein (AFP) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG). The potential effect of this was to increase the chance of such women having an unnecessary amniocentesis. Women should be advised of this effect in subsequent pregnancies. Ideally a correction factor should be applied which would reduce the false positive rate without affecting adversely the sensitivity of the test.Maternal serum unconjugated oestriol as an antenatal screening test for Down's syndrome.The median maternal serum unconjugated oestriol level between 13 and 27 weeks gestation in 77 pregnancies associated with Down's syndrome was lower than the median level in 385 unaffected control pregnancies matched for maternal age, gestational age, and duration of serum sample storage (P less than 0.001). The median level for the affected pregnancies was 73% of that in the controls. Low unconjugated oestriol levels can be used to detect fetal Down's syndrome; at cut-off levels selected to detect at least 35% of affected pregnancies, unconjugated serum oestriol was a better screening test than either maternal age or serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP). The use of all three variables in combination to select women with a 1:250 or greater risk of a Down's syndrome term pregnancy would yield a 45% detection rate with a false-positive rate of 5.2%. The same detection rate using maternal age alone or using age and serum AFP in combination would yield higher false-positive rates, 15% and 9.8% respectively. The addition of unconjugated oestriol to a Down's syndrome screening programme would therefore be more efficient than the use of age and AFP alone; for a given detection rate fewer women would need an amniocentesis or, for a given percentage of women having an amniocentesis, more pregnancies with Down's syndrome would be detected.Absent nasal bone in the prenatal detection of fetuses with trisomy 21 in a high-risk population.To estimate the usefulness of absent nasal bone by ultrasound in the prenatal detection of second-trimester fetuses with trisomy 21.This was a matched case-control study of sonograms from January 1, 1997 to April 30, 2002. Genetic sonograms and facial profile pictures of all fetuses that were subsequently proven to have trisomy 21 were reviewed (study group). A control group was identified during the same study period by using a 4-to-1 ratio matching for gestational age at the time of the ultrasound examination. The sensitivity and specificity of absent fetal nasal bone for trisomy 21 were determined, and overlap with other ultrasound aneuploidy markers was assessed.Forty fetuses were identified with trisomy 21; in 29 (72.5%) a facial profile had been obtained. Of the 160 controls, 102 (64%) had facial profiles documented. Of the 29 fetuses with trisomy 21 with facial profile available, 12 had absent nasal bone (sensitivity 41%). None of the 102 control fetuses with facial profiles available had absent nasal bone (specificity 100%). The sensitivity of genetic ultrasound was increased from 83% (24 of 29) to 90% (26 of 29) by adding absent nasal bone to the other ultrasound aneuploidy markers.In the second trimester of pregnancy, absent nasal bone has a sensitivity of 41% and a specificity of 100% in detecting fetal trisomy 21. Absent fetal nasal bone may be added to the list of ultrasound aneuploidy markers evaluated during a genetic sonogram.Maternal serum unconjugated oestriol and human chorionic gonadotrophin levels in pregnancies with insulin-dependent diabetes: implications for screening for Down's syndrome.To investigate maternal serum unconjugated oestriol (uE3) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) levels in pregnant women with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus and to consider the implications of the results for antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.Descriptive study using stored antenatal serum samples.Stored serum samples collected from women receiving routine antenatal care in Oxford.126 singleton pregnancies in 92 women with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus and for each pregnancy, two pregnancies without diabetes matched for gestational age and duration of storage of the serum sample. None of the pregnancies was associated with fetal neural tube defect or Down's syndrome.Maternal serum uE3 and hCG levels at 15-22 weeks gestation. Alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels were also measured for comparison.The median uE3 level in the diabetic pregnancies was 0.92 multiples of the median (MoM) for pregnancies without diabetes at the same gestational age (P less than 0.05); and the hCG level was 0.95 MoM (P = 0.48). The median AFP level was also reduced to 0.77 MoM (P less than 0.001).The reduction in uE3 and AFP levels in insulin-dependent diabetic pregnancies is sufficiently great to be taken into account in maternal serum screening programmes for Down's syndrome. Dividing the uE3 and AFP levels in such pregnancies by the corresponding median for insulin-dependent diabetic pregnancies will yield a similar false-positive rate in pregnancies with and without insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.First-trimester Down's syndrome screening by fetal nuchal translucency measurement in Taiwan.Fetal nuchal translucency (NT) measurement is now widely used in many Western countries as a screening tool for Down's syndrome during the first trimester. However, at present there is no data on its use in Taiwan. The purpose of the present study was to evaluate the efficacy of NT measurement in first-trimester Down's syndrome screening in Taiwan.We conducted a prospective study from October 1997 to May 1999. Sonographic measurement of fetal NT was performed in 1,249 fetuses at 9-14 weeks of gestation. Transabdominal ultrasound scanning was performed to obtain a sagittal section of the fetus for measuring the crown-rump length (CRL) and the maximum thickness of the subcutaneous translucency between the skin and the soft tissue overlying the cervical spine. Two different cut-off points were used for screening: a fixed cut-off point of at least 2.5 mm and a CRL-related cut-off point. In the latter method, fetuses with an NT measurement in the 95th percentile were considered at high risk for Down's syndrome.Three fetuses had Down's syndrome, with NT measurements of 2.1 mm, 2.7 mm, and 4.0 mm. The false positive rates for the fixed cut-off point and CRL-related cut-off point were 6.3% and 4.6%, respectively. Both methods had a sensitivity of 66.7%. However, the screening program using the CRL-related cut-off point had two advantages: a higher specificity (95.5% vs 93.8%) and a more reasonable distribution pattern for screening.This study showed that NT measurement is a potential screening tool for Down's syndrome during the first trimester in Taiwan. Using CRL-related cut-off points for screening is more reasonable than using a fixed cut-off point.Maternal serum placental growth hormone and insulinlike growth factor binding proteins 1 and 3 in pregnancies affected by fetal aneuploidy and other abnormalities: implications for prenatal diagnosis of trisomy 21.In the present study, we determined circulating serum levels of human placental growth hormone (hPGH) and insulinlike growth factor binding proteins 1 and 3 (IGFBP-1 and IGFBP-3) using two-site radioimmunoassays during the gestational midtrimester of pregnancies affected by chromosomal disorders with the aim of identifying potential marker substances that might have a significant discriminative and predictive value for prenatal diagnosis of fetal chromosomal aberrations and of organ malformations such as neural-tube defect. Our results show that the maternal serum levels of hPGH were significantly elevated in pregnancies affected by chromosomal anomalies or organ malformations as compared with controls. The distribution of IGFBP-1 concentrations for all experimental groups except trisomy 21 were closely similar to the normal population. IGFBP-3 decreased slightly in pregnancies affected by Down syndrome. These findings suggest that hPGH may be useful as an additional marker in prenatal screening for Down syndrome.Maternal serum screening for birth defects: results of a Connecticut regional program.Second trimester maternal serum screening provides a method to identify pregnancies at high risk for fetal Down's syndrome, trisomy 18, open neural tube defects, and a variety of other chromosomal and nonchromosomal fetal anomalies. Results are presented for a regional program to identify high-risk pregnancies using alpha feto-protein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE3) analyses (triple marker testing). A total of 27,140 women received screening. Using a midtrimester Down's syndrome risk of 1:270 to define the high-risk group, 5.26% of women of all ages were screen-positive for Down's syndrome resulting in the eventual detection of approximately 72% of the affected fetuses. The detection rate for patients under 35 at estimated date of delivery was 61% and for women 35, or older, the detection rate was 100%. A separate protocol to screen for trisomy 18 identified 0.2% of pregnancies, with 38% of the trisomy 18 cases present in this group. Over 3% of women screen-positive for Down's syndrome or trisomy 18 had a serious fetal chromosome anomaly. In addition, 2.89% of women had an elevated AFP (greater or equal to 2.0 multiples of median). This component of the screening resulted in the identification of 86% of the neural tube defects, 75% of the ventral wall defects, and also some of the other various fetal anomalies present in the screened population. Since both laboratory and clinical data are combined to generate patient-specific risks, there is a need for quality control elements that go beyond that normally required for a clinical laboratory alone. We stress the need for comprehensive follow-up programs to evaluate screening programs and maintain high quality.First trimester Down Syndrome screening by nuchal translucency in a Thai population.Measurement of fetal nuchal translucency thickness by three-dimensional ultrasound.To investigate the feasibility and repeatability of nuchal translucency thickness measurement using three-dimensional ultrasound.Forty consecutive women with uncomplicated singleton pregnancies attending for Down syndrome screening at 11-14 weeks' gestation were included in this prospective crossover trial. Nuchal translucency thickness was measured using both two-dimensional and three-dimensional ultrasound. In each case two three-dimensional volumes were recorded and then examined by using the technique of planar reformatted sections. The initial plane of the first volume always contained a clear image of the nuchal region ('sagittal volume'), whilst the initial plane of the second volume was selected randomly regardless of fetal position ('random volume'). The repeatability of nuchal translucency measurement was examined by constructing a scatter diagram of the difference between the measurements plotted against the mean of two readings.Nuchal translucency measurements could be repeated in 38/40 (95%) sagittal volumes and 24/40 (60%) random volumes. The mean difference between two-dimensional measurements and those obtained by reslicing of sagittal three-dimensional volumes was -0.097 mm (95% limits of agreement from -0.481 to 0.675) and 0.225 mm (95% limits of agreement from -0.369 to 0.819) when random volumes were examined.Reslicing of stored three-dimensional volumes can be used to replicate nuchal translucency measurements only when nuchal skin can also be clearly seen on two-dimensional ultrasound.Combining 'nasal bone length assessment as MoM' with other markers for trisomy 21 screening: could it be more effective?Placental growth hormone in Down's syndrome screening.A number of serum markers have been proposed to improve the sensitivity (and specificity) of the triple test, which, until now, has been the gold standard in second-trimester serum screening for Down's syndrome. Among them, human placental growth hormone (hPGH) has been proposed because of its significantly elevated serum levels in pregnancies affected by chromosomal aneuploidies. Our experience, on maternal serum stored from 32 Down's syndrome-affected pregnancies, confirms a slight but significant increase in hPGH levels compared with controls. These data summarized to that of the previous screening could give a calculated detection rate of 71.9%, better than that of the standard triple test alone (65.6%).Screening for fetal anomalies by ultrasound at 14 and 21 weeks.A prospective study of screening for fetal abnormalities and chromosomal defects was carried out by ultrasound examination at 13-15 weeks of gestation and 20-22 weeks; the first scan was performed transvaginally and the second transabdominally. During a 4-year period (1991-95), 3490 unselected consecutive pregnancies with a total of 3514 fetuses were examined. There were 21 chromosomally abnormal fetuses, including ten with trisomy 21, and, in 19 (90.5%), fetal defects were detected at the first and/or second ultrasound examination. The most effective marker for chromosomal defects was increased nuchal translucency thickness (> or = 4 mm) at the 13-15-week scan, which was present in seven of the ten fetuses with trisomy 21 and in six of the 11 with other chromosomal abnormalities.Screening for Down syndrome at 14 weeks of pregnancy.To investigate whether statistical parameters used in Down syndrome screening between 15 and 22 weeks of pregnancy can be used at 14 weeks, we assayed alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), free alpha-hCG, free beta-hCG, and inhibin-A in 16 pregnancies with Down syndrome in the 14th week of pregnancy and expressed values in multiples of the normal median. The median and standard deviation values for these 16 pregnancies were not materially different from those published for 15-22 weeks. It is reasonable, therefore, to offer Down syndrome screening using these markers starting at 14 completed weeks of pregnancy instead of 15 weeks. It needs to be recognized, however, that serum AFP measurement for neural tube defect screening is less effective at this time than between 16 and 18 weeks of pregnancy.The distribution of nuchal translucency at 10-13 weeks of pregnancy.There is a need for a simple method of expressing nuchal translucency measurement in early pregnancy that will allow for gestational age and be useful in screening for Down's syndrome. To achieve this objective, we conducted a prospective study of 561 women with singleton pregnancies that were not affected by Down's syndrome at 10-13 weeks of gestation. Nuchal translucency measurements and crown rump length measurements were determined. Nuchal translucency measurement increased by about 17 per cent per week. Expressing the result as a multiple of the median (MOM) nuchal translucency for a given crown rump length allowed for this increase with gestational age and yielded a distribution of values that was approximately Gaussian. About 96 per cent of values lay between 0.5 and 2.0 MOM. The variance and therefore the false-positive rate of nuchal translucency were significantly reduced by recording several measurements and using the average: for example, the false-positive rate reduced from 8.3 per cent to 5.0 per cent if the average of six measurements were used instead of one--a potential 40 per cent reduction in the false-positive rate if the test were used in screening. Estimating the distribution of nuchal translucency in MOM values will assist in specifying the statistical parameters to be used in prenatal screening for Down's syndrome and the use of repeated nuchal translucency measurements is expected to have a useful effect on reducing the screening false-positive rate at a given MOM cut-off level.California's experience with low MS-AFP results.The California AFP Screening Program was developed to offer pregnant women the opportunity to have their pregnancies screened for open neural tube defects (NTD). Because it is unwise to withhold potentially important clinical information about low MS-AFP results from the screened women and their physicians, follow-up diagnostic evaluations and counseling were offered to women with low MS-AFP results in addition to those with high results or positive family histories of NTD. Between April 7, 1986 and September 30, 1987, over 275,000 women voluntarily participated in the screening program. During the first year of the program 3,939 women were seen for follow-up evaluations due to low MS-AFP results. These evaluations occurred at state-approved AFP follow-up centers where ultrasonographic dating led to reinterpretation of 35% of the results. Of the remaining 2,552 (65%), 1,940 women (76%) had an amniocentesis. Sixteen Down syndrome fetuses were detected for a yield of 1/121 amniocenteses. Additional chromosome abnormalities included trisomies 18 and 13, Ullrich-Turner syndrome, (45,X), Klinefelter syndrome (47,XXY) and triploidy. The total yield of significant chromosome abnormalities was 1/78 amniocenteses.Ultrasound detection of fetal aneuploidy in patients with elevated maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein.Increasing confidence in the ability of high-resolution ultrasound to detect neural tube and ventral wall defects has enabled us to offer a revised risk estimate to the patient with an elevated maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) level, such that amniocentesis may not be necessary. Recent authors have suggested that a reduced emphasis on follow-up amniocentesis fails to consider an increased risk for chromosomal anomalies in pregnancies with an elevated MSAFP, and that amniocentesis should still be performed. We reviewed our ultrasound findings from patients who underwent amniocentesis for evaluation of an elevated MSAFP and who had a karyotype prepared from the amniotic fluid sample. Four abnormal karyotypes were detected among 313 amniocenteses, and three of these were correctly predicted based on an abnormal ultrasound. The risk of an unexpected fetal aneuploidy after a normal consultative ultrasound in our series was one in 310. This is comparable to the risk of detecting abnormal chromosomes in the fetus of a 32-year-old woman, an age at which amniocentesis is not routinely offered.Maternal serum ADAM12 levels in Down and Edwards' syndrome pregnancies at 9-12 weeks' gestation.Maternal serum ADAM12 is reduced, on average, in early first-trimester Down and Edwards' syndrome pregnancies but the extent of reduction declines with gestation. Here we study levels at 9-12 weeks when the marker might be used concurrently with other established markers.Samples from 16 Down and 2 Edwards' syndrome cases were retrieved from storage and tested together with 313 unaffected singleton pregnancies using a semi-automated time-resolved immuno-fluorometric assay. Results were expressed in multiples of the gestation-specific median (MoM) based on regression.The median in Down syndrome was 0.94 MoM with a 10th-90th centile range of 0.22-1.63 MoM compared with 1.00 and 0.33-2.24 MoM in unaffected controls (P = 0.21, one-side Wilcoxon Rank Sum Test). The two Edwards' syndrome cases had values 0.31 and 2.17 MoM.ADAM12 cannot be used concurrently with other markers in the late first trimester. However, it does have the potential to be used earlier in pregnancy either concurrently with other early markers or in a sequential or contingent protocol. More data will be required to reliably predict the performance of either approach.Repeat testing in antenatal screening for Down syndrome using dimeric inhibin-A in combination with other maternal serum markers.The effect on screening performance of collecting a second fresh blood sample in antenatal screening for Down syndrome has been previously reported for the commonly used double and triple tests. Recently, dimeric inhibin-A has been used with the triple test (together constituting the quadruple test) in several centres and here we assess the effect of repeat testing using inhibin-A. Routine repeat testing using the quadruple test did not yield a material increase in performance compared with having no repeat testing. For a 5% false-positive rate the increase in detection rate was only about 3-5 percentage points; a modest increase which is probably not worthwhile in the light of the extra cost and delay.Screening for Down's syndrome using an iso-risk curve based on maternal age and serum alpha-fetoprotein level.On the basis of the significantly different distributions of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels in 86 pregnancies associated with fetal Down's syndrome and in 2018 unaffected pregnancies, an iso-risk curve for Down's syndrome was constructed. An iso-risk curve shows, for women of all ages, which combinations of maternal age and level of maternal serum AFP result in the same risk of carrying a fetus with Down's syndrome. A 1:400 risk of Down's syndrome, corresponding to the risk of a 35-year-old woman, was chosen as the lowest risk indicating referral for amniocentesis. If all women, irrespective of their age, are offered amniocentesis, when their risk of carrying a Down's syndrome fetus is 1:400 or higher, 53% of the affected fetuses can be detected as compared with 28% of the affected fetuses diagnosed at present in women above 35 years of age.Maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in fetal sex chromosome defects in the first trimester.We have studied maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A, and fetal nuchal translucency (NT) in a series of 46 cases of fetal Turner's syndrome, 13 cases of other sex chromosomal anomalies and compared these with 947 control pregnancies in the first trimester. In cases of Turner's syndrome (45,X) the median fetal NT was significantly higher than in controls (4.76 MoM), the median PAPP-A was significantly lower (0.49 MoM), whilst the free beta-hCG was not significantly different (1.11 MoM). For NT, 93% (43/46) of cases were equal to or greater than the 95th centile of controls, for PAPP-A 35% (16/46) of cases were less than or equal to the 5th centile of controls and for free beta-hCG 15% (7/46) of cases were equal to or greater than the 95th centile of controls. For other sex chromosomal anomalies (47XXX, XXY, XYY) the median NT was increased (2.07 MoM) whilst PAPP-A was not significantly decreased (0.88 MoM) and free beta-hCG was not significantly different (1.07 MoM) from controls. Using a previously derived multivariate risk algorithm for trisomy 21, incorporating NT, PAPP-A, free beta-hCG and maternal age, 96% of the Turner's cases and 62% of the other sex chromosomal anomalies would have been identified.Improved antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.Fetal nasal bone length and Down syndrome during the second trimester in a Chinese population.The purpose of the present study was to build a database of reference ranges of fetal nasal bone length (NBL) in a Chinese population. The accuracy rate of detecting Down syndrome was also analyzed using fetal NBL as a marker.The control group of fetuses included 342 normal singleton pregnancies with no chromosomal or congenital anomalies. The present study was a cross-section study and the control group was used to construct percentile values of NBL from 13 to 29 gestational weeks of age. Two-dimensional ultrasonography was used for the nasal bone studies. Measurements of NBL were collected and each fetus contributed a single value to the reference sample. During the study period, 14 fetuses with Down syndrome were examined. Measurement of fetal NBL was made during amniocentesis, with gestational age ranging from 13 to 19 weeks.From 342 normal fetuses with gestational age ranging from 13 to 29 weeks, reference ranges of NBL were constructed. The reference ranges were constructed from the 100(1 - p)% reference range: Y +/- Zp x square root sigma 2, where Y = 25 - exp(3.58 - 0.044 x t + 0.0006 x t2), with Y being the fitted mean of regression model and t being gestational age (weeks). Using fetal NBL, the regression model was Pr(Down syndrome) = exp(W)/ [1 + exp(W)], where W = 0.62-4.80 x NBL (multiples of the median) in predicting Down syndrome. Fetal NBL was found to have a sensitivity and specificity of 0.78 and 0.78, respectively, in predicting Down syndrome in the second trimester of pregnancy.Fetal NBL measurement can provide a simple and useful algorithm to predict Down syndrome during the second trimester of pregnancy.Alpha-fetoprotein: an enhanced-sensitivity assay for neural tube defect and Down syndrome evaluation.[Clinical uses of maternal serum markers in the prenatal diagnosis].Genetic sonography after first-trimester Down syndrome screening.Approximately 90% of Down syndrome cases are detected during first-trimester screening. We aimed to determine the potential effectiveness of second-trimester genetic sonography as a sequential screen for Down syndrome.In this simulation study, published statistical parameters for first-trimester free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin, pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A and nuchal translucency thickness, and second-trimester ultrasound markers (nuchal fold, hyperechoic bowel, short humerus, short femur, echogenic intracardiac focus, pyelectasis and major abnormality) were used to model the effectiveness of second-trimester genetic sonography combined with first-trimester screening.First-trimester combined screening alone resulted in a detection rate of 88.5% with a 4.2% false-positive rate. A follow-up genetic ultrasound examination in which only one sonographic marker was found and previous results were not taken into account would detect an additional 8% of Down syndrome cases for an additional false-positive rate of 13.2%. Using individual marker likelihood ratios to modify the first-trimester risk for screen-negative patients, genetic sonography detected an additional 6.1% of Down syndrome cases for an additional 1.2% false-positive rate, giving a total detection rate of 94.6% and a total false-positive rate of 5.4%. In a contingent protocol, in which genetic sonography would be performed only for patients with a first-trimester risk of between 1/300 and 1/2500, the detection rate was 4.8% and the false-positive rate was 0.7%, giving a total detection rate of 93.3% and a total false-positive rate of 4.9%.Second-trimester genetic sonography, if used properly, can be an effective sequential screen following first-trimester Down syndrome screening. Further studies on the role of the genetic sonogram as a follow-up to first-trimester combined screening are warranted.Does the combination of fronto-maxillary facial angle and nasal bone evaluation improve the detection of Down syndrome in the second trimester?To determine if the combination of fronto-maxillary facial (FMF) angle and nasal bone (NB) evaluation improves the detection of Down syndrome (DS) in the second trimester.We compared the FMF angle measurements in euploid and DS fetuses seen between 2005 and 2008. The FMF angles were measured from stored two-dimensional (2-D) images by investigators blinded to the DS status of the fetus. All NB measurements were obtained prospectively. Receiver operator characteristic curve plot was used to determine the optimal definition for abnormal FMF angle. The detection and false positive rates and likelihood ratios positive and negative for the DS markers and their combinations were compared.Of 22 fetuses with DS seen between 16 and 22 weeks over the study period, NB and FMF angle evaluation was available for 21. These were compared with a control group of 201 fetuses seen at similar gestational age ranges without DS. NB alone identified 10/21 (47.6%) of Down syndrome while FMF angle identified 2/21 (9.5%). The combination of FMF angle and NB identified only one additional case of Down syndrome.While FMF angle and NB are independent markers for DS, their combination resulted in a minimal but nonsignificant improvement in DS detection.Midtrimester maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin levels: normal reference values for Taiwanese women.The purpose of this study was to establish normative median values for maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) during the second trimester of pregnant Taiwanese women.We collected the data of midtrimester serum free beta-hCG concentration levels from 15,132 normal Taiwanese singleton pregnancies between 14 and 22 weeks' gestation. The maternal age on the day of delivery and maternal weight at the time of sampling were recorded in all cases. The relationship between gestational days and multiple of the median (MoM) levels of serum markers was analyzed using nonlinear regression methods.The median values of free beta-hCG in pregnant Taiwanese women were higher than those of pregnant white women. The log10 standard deviation distribution of free beta-hCG MoM values in the study population was 0.275 with a log10 mean of 0.0097. There were 1.81% of pregnancies with free beta-hCG levels less than 0.3 MoM and 11.33% with levels less than 0.5 MoM; 12.91% had serum levels greater than 2.0 MoM and 5.29% had serum levels greater than 3.0 MoM.Because of differences in race and methodology, any laboratory intended to provide determination of free beta-hCG for Down syndrome screening should establish its own normal reference values.Expanded maternal serum alpha fetoprotein screening.Integrated serum screening for Down syndrome in primary obstetric practice.Integrated serum screening for Down syndrome is potentially more effective than current second-trimester screening. We report results of an intervention trial of integrated serum screening that involved 229 primary prenatal care practitioners throughout Maine.Women provided a first-trimester serum (for PAPP-A) followed by a second-trimester serum (for AFP, uE3, hCG, and DIA). These five marker measurements were used to calculate a Down syndrome risk in the second trimester. Screen-positive women (risk > or = 1:100) were managed according to standard practice.During 24 months' enrollment, 11 159 women provided a first-trimester sample (61% of women receiving screening services). Nine thousand seven hundred twenty-three women also provided a second-trimester sample; 8773 women satisfied gestational age criteria for testing in both trimesters. Integrated serum screening detected 14 of 16 Down syndrome cases (87%) and 79% after adjustment for trimester-of-ascertainment bias. The initial false-positive rate was 3.2% and was 2.7% when restricted to ultrasound-dated pregnancies. Performance was better than any combination of second-trimester markers. Implementation challenges included initial samples being collected too early and sample matching.Integrated serum screening for Down syndrome was successfully implemented in primary care settings; screening performance was consistent with predictions. It provides an accessible and acceptable alternative to screening protocols that require nuchal translucency measurements.The impact of correcting for smoking status when screening for chromosomal anomalies using maternal serum biochemistry and fetal nuchal translucency thickness in the first trimester of pregnancy.To evaluate the influence of cigarette smoking status on maternal serum free beta-hCG, PAPP-A and fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness at 11 to 14 weeks of gestation in a large cohort of women screened prospectively for chromosomal anomalies.Information on maternal cigarette smoking status, maternal age, maternal serum biochemical marker levels and fetal NT were collected from the prenatal screening computer records in two OSCAR screening centres. Data was available from 32,730 unaffected pregnancies and from 124 with Down syndrome. Statistical analysis of the marker levels in the smoking and non-smoking group were carried out. The impact on false-positive rate of correcting for smoking status was assessed from a modelling exercise.Prevalence of smoking was significantly affected by maternal age with an overall incidence of 11.5%, which varied from 35% in women under 20 to 7% in women over 35. In the unaffected population, the median free beta-hCG MoM was significantly lower in the smoking group (0.97 vs 1.00) as was that for PAPP-A (0.84 vs 1.02). The standard deviation of the log(10) MoM free beta-hCG was lower in the smoking group and that for PAPP-A was higher in the smoking group. The difference in median marker levels did not seem to be related to the number of cigarettes smoked per day. In the group with Down syndrome, the median MoM free beta-hCG was not significantly different in the smokers (1.69 vs 1.86) as was that for PAPP-A (0.53 vs 0.57). Fetal delta NT was not significantly different in the unaffected smokers (0.11 vs 0.0 mm) or in those with Down syndrome (1.96 vs 2.25 mm). In the smoking group, when screening using maternal serum biochemistry and age alone, the false-positive rate was 6.17%, compared to 4.67% in an age-matched group of non-smokers. Correcting for smoking status by dividing the measured MoM by the median found in the smoking group resulted in the false-positive rate falling to 4.40%. When screening using NT, maternal serum biochemistry and age, the false-positive rate in smokers was 4.48%, which reduced to 3.46% after correction-in line with the 3.76% in the non-smoking group. The impact on detection rate was too small to be accurately measured.The impact of smoking on first-trimester biochemical marker levels does not seem to be dose related. Whilst correcting first-trimester biochemical markers for maternal smoking status has little impact at the population level for detection rates, a considerable reduction in false-positive rate can be achieved, reducing the level to that seen in non-smokers. However, the effect on the individual patient-specific risk can be substantial and could certainly make a difference to the patient's decision on whether to have an invasive test.Umbilical cord diameter at 11-14 weeks of gestation: relationship to nuchal translucency, ductus venous blood flow and chromosomal defects.To compare the umbilical cord diameter (UCD) in euploid and aneuploid fetuses at 11-14 weeks of gestation.In 299 fetuses at 11-14 weeks of gestation the UCD, the nuchal translucency and the a-wave of the ductus venosus were measured. Reference ranges for the UCD according to the gestational age and to the crown-rump-length (CRL) were obtained by measuring the UCD by outer-to-outer border of 244 singleton pregnancies with normal karyotype. The fetal karyotype was established by chorionic villus sampling, amniocentesis or in case of suspected chromosomal abnormalities in the newborn. Linear regression was used to determine the significance of the association between the UCD and CRL or gestational age.Two hundred and ninety-nine fetuses were examined. The median fetal CRL was 64.5 mm (range 45-84) and the median gestational age was 13 (range 11-14) weeks. In the chromosomally normal group the UCD significantly increased with the CRL (r=0.620; p<0.001) and the gestational age (r=0.555; p<0.001). The regression equation for the mean UCD (y) according to the gestational days (x) was: y=-0.604+0.051*x. The regression equation for the mean UCD (y) according to the CRL (x) was: y=1.962+0.029*x. There were no significant differences in the mean UCD in fetuses without and with chromosomal abnormalities. The proportion of fetuses with an UCD above the 95th centile for CRL was higher in aneuploid compared to euploid fetuses (5/14 vs. 13/285, p<0.005). In 5/14 (35.7%) fetuses with chromosomal defects the NT and the UCD were above the 95th centile, whereas none of the fetuses with normal karyotype showed this combination. The proportion of fetuses with increased UCD and abnormal DV blood flow was increased in the cases with chromosomal abnormalities (33.3 vs. 1.8%, p<0.005).Umbilical cord diameter at 11-14 weeks increases with fetal CRL. Fetuses with chromosomal abnormalities are more likely to have an UCD above the 95th centile. Therefore, sonographic evaluation of the umbilical cord during first trimester ultrasound might be of additional value in the assessment of fetuses at risk for aneuploidies.Maternal serum human chorionic gonadotrophin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A in twin pregnancies in the first trimester.To determine the levels of free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) in twin pregnancies in the first trimester.Serum samples were obtained from 67 pregnant women with twin pregnancies and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A concentrations were compared with those of 4279 singleton controls between the 8th and 13th weeks of gestation.The geometric means of chromosomally normal twin pregnancies were 1.85 MoM for free beta-hCG and 2.36 MoM for PAPP-A. There were no cases affected by Down syndrome in either group.Twin pregnancies secrete more PAPP-A than expected on the basis of singleton controls whereas free beta-hCG production is not increased. The results of the present study can be used to establish normal reference values when introducing first trimester Down syndrome screening in prenatal care.Validation of QF-PCR in a Korean population.Quantitative fluorescence polymerase chain reaction (QF-PCR) is a rapid and reliable method for screening common aneuploidies, but it is not an accustomed way of testing in Korea. Our objectives were to investigate QF-PCR as a means for prenatal aneuploidy screening and to evaluate the short tandem repeat (STR) markers in a Korean population.Three formats of QF-PCR assays that utilize an Elucigene kit (Tepnel Diagnostics), which contains 7 primer pairs located on chromosome 21, 16 primers on chromosomes 21, 18, and 13, or 26 primers on chromosomes 21, 18, 13, X, and Y were performed.Eight hundred of prenatal samples were screened and the results were compared to that of the results obtained with conventional cytogenetics. The 31 of 33 (93%) autosomal and sex chromosome aneuploidies were detected excluding one case of maternal cell contamination and one case of mosaicism respectively; there were no false positives. Interestingly, submicroscopic duplication of the D13S634 marker was observed in 1.6% of cases.For prenatal aneuploidy screening, QF-PCR was proved to be efficient and reliable. However, considering the high frequency of triallelic patterns of one STR marker that has not been found in other populations, careful evaluation is recommended in each STR marker when it is applied to different populations.Use of ethnic-specific medians for Hispanic patients reduces ethnic disparities in multiple marker screening.To estimate whether midtrimester maternal serum analyte concentrations differ between Caucasian and Hispanic women and whether using ethnic-specific medians affects quad screen performance.Caucasian and Hispanic patients with singletons who underwent maternal serum screening in our laboratory were identified. Alfa-fetoprotein (AFP), estriol, human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and inhibin-A medians were derived separately for Caucasians, Hispanics, and for the composite group. Using composite medians, intergroup mean multiples of the medians (MoMs) for each analyte were compared. Using ethnic-specific medians, new MoMs were calculated and utilized in a risk estimation algorithm.A total of 5478 Caucasian and 2246 Hispanic pregnancies were evaluated. Intergroup MoMs were significantly different for all analytes. AFP, hCG, and inhibin-A were lower in Hispanics, while estriol was higher (P < 0.0001). Using composite medians, the screen-positive rate (SPR) for trisomy 21 was 5.39% in Caucasians and 3.29% in Hispanics. Ethnic-specific medians reduced this disparity: 4.76% in Caucasians and 4.05% in Hispanics. The SPR for neural tube defects with composite medians was 1.44% for Caucasians and 0.89% for Hispanics; with ethnic-specific medians, the SPR was 1.42% for Caucasians and 1.07% for Hispanics.Serum analyte concentrations differ between Caucasian and Hispanic gravidas. Use of ethnic-specific medians reduces the disparity in SPR for trisomy 21 and neural tube defects.A six year study of the antenatal detection of fetal abnormality in six Scottish health boards.To assess the sensitivity of prenatal diagnosis by ultrasound and biochemical methods, to evaluate the reasons for non-detection and to make appropriate recommendations.Six year observational study, during which biochemical screening for trisomy 21 was introduced and there was an increase in routine ultrasound scanning at 18-22 weeks.Six health boards in Scotland.264,481 pregnancies, of which 862 were terminated because of fetal abnormality, and 2123 delivered with prenatally detectable major fetal abnormalities.The prenatal detection of trisomies 13, 18 and 21, and 12 major structural abnormalities, which the average ultrasonographer with average skills using average equipment would be expected to detect.Serum biochemical screening improved detection of trisomy 21 from 33% to 57%. The detection rate for the major abnormalities was 62% (815/1320) and 73% (598/818) when the trisomies were excluded. 18-22 weeks scanning yielded a 92% detection rate. Of the 505 undetected cases, 15% declined prenatal screening, 46% were unscreened because they were ineligible for testing, unbooked, booked too late or scanned too early for a diagnosis to be made, 2% had findings suspicious of a chromosomal abnormality but testing was not undertaken and 37% had a negative scan at a gestation when the abnormality was potentially detectable.A policy of first trimester scanning followed by serum alpha-fetoprotein screening and additional scanning as clinically indicated is effective in detecting major structural abnormalities, but scanning at 18-22 weeks and serum biochemical screening for trisomy 21 improved the detection rates. Supervised training and adequate equipment are essential. Present prenatal diagnostic tests will not detect all abnormalities and patients must be made aware of this.MULTISCAN--a Scandinavian multicenter second trimester obstetric ultrasound and serum screening study.To study the detection rates of second trimester ultrasound screening for neural tube defects (NTD), abdominal wall defects (AWD) and Down's syndrome (DS) in low risk populations at tertiary centers, and to compare the ultrasound screening detection rates with those that were obtainable by biochemical serum screening (double test: alpha-fetoprotein/human chorion gonadotrophin/age test).Prospective multicenter study with a three year inclusion period: 1/1/1989-31/12/1991.27,844 low-risk women at 18-34 years of age who had a second trimester ultrasound screening examination. Of these, 10,264 also had a serum test.An ultrasound malformation scan and a serum test were carried out at 17-19 weeks of gestation. Risk calculations regarding DS were based on alpha-fetoprotein, human chorion gonadotrophin and maternal age; performed retrospectively for the first two years.In total 73 cases were identified in the study population: NTD (n=34), AWD (n=7) and DS (n=32). The detection rates, (%, with 95% confidence interval) for ultrasound screening were: NTD: 79.4 (62.1-91.3); AWD: 85.7 (42.1-99.6); DS: 6.3 (0.8-20.8). In the subgroup of women who had both tests, the detection rates for ultrasound screening vs double test were: NTD: 62.5 (24.5-91.5) vs 75.0 (34.9-96.8); AWD: 66.7 (9.4-99.2) vs 100 (29.2-100.0); DS: 7.7 (0.2-36.0) vs 46.2 (19.2-74.9). The false positive rates (%) for ultrasound screening vs double test were: NTD: 0.01/3.3; AWD: 0.01/3.3; DS: 0.1/4.0.Second trimester ultrasound screening in a low risk population gave a low detection rate for fetal DS (6.3%) and an acceptable detection rate for NTD (79.4%) and AWD (85.7%). In the subgroup of women who had both tests, serum screening performed better than ultrasound as applied in the present study, especially regarding DS.The role of midtrimester targeted fetal organ screening combined with the "triple test" and maternal age in the diagnosis of trisomy 21: a retrospective study.Our purpose was to evaluate the role of fetal ultrasonography in prenatal detection of trisomy 21.A retrospective study was performed on all cases of trisomy 21 diagnosed prenatally or postnatally between January 1990 and December 1993 in the Jerusalem metropolitan area. Our program of prenatal detection of trisomy 21 is a three-tiered, chronologically progressive screening that includes maternal age, biochemical serum markers, and targeted fetal organ survey. Sixty-seven thousand ninety-two babies were born during the study period; 17,084 maternal biochemistry analyses (triple test) were performed; and 6315 fetuses were karyotyped.One hundred eight cases of trisomy 21 were diagnosed prenatally and postnatally. The overall rate of detection of trisomy 21 was 92.2% when our recommendations were followed. Among those cases diagnosed prenatally, 66.6% of trisomy 21 cases had been referred for fetal karyotyping because of maternal age > or = 35 years, 18.5% because of abnormal triple test results, and 11.1% because of fetal ultrasonographic findings associated with trisomy 21. Among women < 35 years old, 80% of trisomy 21 cases were detected prenatally. Of these, 50% had been referred for karyotyping because of triple test results and 30% because of abnormal ultrasonographic findings.Midtrimester ultrasonographic targeted fetal organ screening plays a critical role in prenatal diagnosis of trisomy 21 among women under the age of 35 years.Screening for Down syndrome using first-trimester ultrasound and second-trimester maternal serum markers in a low-risk population: a prospective longitudinal study.To compare nuchal translucency and second-trimester maternal serum measurements as alternative methods of antenatal screening for Down syndrome in a low-risk population and to evaluate the consequence of combining the results in the estimation of risk.In a consecutive series of 4130 women aged less than 38 years with a singleton pregnancy, we examined both the detection rate of Down syndrome by nuchal translucency measurement at 10-14 weeks and maternal serum screening by human chorionic gonadotrophin and alpha-fetoprotein at 14-18 weeks. Women with a nuchal translucency measurement of > or = 3 mm and women with a maternal serum screening-derived risk > or = 1/250 were recommended to have amniocentesis. A second-trimester detailed ultrasound scan was also performed in all women. The outcome of all pregnancies was recorded prospectively and the detection rate and false-positive rate of different screening strategies were retrospectively analyzed.Out of the 4130 pregnancies that were followed (mean maternal age, 30.1 years), 12 cases of Down syndrome were observed (0.28%), all detected prenatally. Seven of 12 cases had a nuchal translucency measurement of > or = 3 mm (58%), and six out of 10 cases with available maternal serum screening had a calculated risk of > or = 1/250 (60%). Four of the five Down syndrome cases with a nuchal translucency measurement of < 3 mm were detected by subsequent maternal serum screening. At a threshold giving 5% of positive tests, the sensitivity of nuchal translucency, maternal serum screening and combined risk screening were 75%, 60% and 90%, respectively.In screening for Down syndrome, an approach which combines the results from first-trimester nuchal translucency and second-trimester biochemistry is effective and increases the detection rate compared to the use of any single test. However, this strategy is likely to raise the false-positive rate and the interpretation of maternal serum screening-derived risk should be combined with the first-trimester nuchal translucency measurement.Nuchal translucency as a screening test for chromosomal abnormalities in a routine first trimester ultrasound examination.To evaluate the implementation of nuchal translucency measurement as an additional examination within the first trimester routine ultrasound in an unselected population of women.A prospective study in which all pregnant women during 1994, referred for the first trimester routine ultrasound scan, were asked to participate. Of a total of 1852 women with a viable pregnancy, results from 1444 women were evaluated. When a nuchal translucency of 4 mm or more was found, the woman was offered both a genetic amniocentesis in gestational week 13-15 and an additional ultrasound examination in gestational week 18-19.Six fetuses had a nuchal translucency of 4 mm or more and none of these had any chromosomal abnormality. Neither had any of the fetuses in the study, karyotyped for other reasons, any chromosomal defect and nor was there any child born with aneuploidy in the study population. No strong relation between major malformations e.g. abnormalities of the heart and increased nuchal translucency was found. The fetus with the largest nuchal translucency (=6 mm) was born healthy.The efficacy of nuchal translucency measurement needs further evaluation before it can be introduced as a screening method in an unselected pregnant population.Humerus length measurement in Down syndrome screening.To compare the predictive values of different humeral shortness assessment methods in Down syndrome screening.674 high-risk singleton pregnancies with a valid last menstrual period (LMP) date were studied. Nomogram and formulas were derived from a subset of the studied group. Sensitivities of fifth percentile and cut-off values of 0.9 for observed-to-expected (obs/exp) humerus length (HL) ratio according to biparietal diameter (BPD) and gestational age (GA) were compared.Sensitivities were 20%, 46.7% and 60% for the 5th percentile, a cut-off value of 0.9 for obs/exp HL by BPD and a cut-off value of 0.9 for obs/exp HL by GA, respectively.Using gestational age instead of BPD when calculating expected humeral length may increase the predictive role of humeral shortness in Down syndrome screening of pregnant women with valid and correct LMP.[Three-dimensional scatter plot analysis to estimate the risk of foetal aneuloidy].First trimester screening (FTS) according to Nicolaides is now a worldwide established method for prenatal aneuloidy screening. An improvement was achieved by the "Advanced First Trimester Screening" (AFS). It was the aim of the current study to set up scatter plots from nuchal translucency (NT), Papp-A and fbeta-hCG, to derive likelihood ratios therefrom and to apply them to a test collective. We wanted to examine whether or nor the test performance of FTS could further be improved.In a multicentre study 10 136 singleton pregnancies were recruited. Risk assessment for the presence of aneuploidies was performed by the Pia Fetal Database (PIA). In addition, all data were recalculated by the AFS module of the online platform www.firsttrimester.net . In a third step, a newly developed algorithm was utilised, in which the foetal parameters DeltaNT, Papp-A and fbeta-hCG were put into a three-dimensional scatter plot. The surrounding volume was segmentally divided and for each space the relation of the healthy to the affected foetuses found therein was determined. Furthermore, for all participiants of this study, the likelihood ratios were examinied at the segment according to the currently measured values. This method is designated as AFS-3D.Within the observed fetuses, 86 cases with aneuploidy were detected. By appropriate choice of the cut-off the sensitivities were found to be 83 % (PIA and AFS) and 82 % (AFS-3D), respectively, and do not differ significantly from each other. The specificity could be improved from 94 % (PIA) to 96 % (AFS) and was further advanced to 98 % by the AFS-3D method. At the same time the false positive rate was lowered from 654 (PIA) to 397 (AFS) and 228 (AFS-3D) cases, respectively.By means of the new AFS-3D method the same count of diseased fetuses was detected compared with prior screening tests. Simultaneously, expectant mothers were spared from unnecessary invasive diagnostics in 65 % of the cases. The choice of an altered cut-off or other volume shapes are feasible and should be examined in further studies.The influence of fetal sex in screening for trisomy 21 by fetal nuchal translucency, maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 10-14 weeks of gestation.In a study of 2923 normal pregnancies and 203 pregnancies affected by trisomy 21 we have shown a significant difference in the median MoM of the markers: fetal nuchal translucency, maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in the presence of a female fetus compared with a male fetus. For maternal serum free beta-hCG levels are higher by 15% if the fetus is chromosomally normal and by 11% if the fetus has trisomy 21. For maternal serum PAPP-A the levels in chromosomally normal fetuses are 10% higher in the presence of a female fetus and 13% higher if the fetus has trisomy 21. In contrast, fetal nuchal translucency is 3-4% lower in both chromosomally normal and trisomy 21 female fetuses. The consequence of such changes when screening for trisomy 21 will be a reduction in the detection rate in female fetuses by a factor of 1-2%. Correction of risk algorithms for fetal sex, however, is probably not feasible, since ultrasound detection of fetal sex is only 70-90% accurate in the 10-14 week period.A non-invasive test for prenatal diagnosis based on fetal DNA present in maternal blood: a preliminary study.Use of free fetal DNA to diagnose fetal chromosomal abnormalities has been hindered by the inability to distinguish fetal DNA from maternal DNA. Our aim was to establish whether single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs) can be used to distinguish fetal DNA from maternal DNA-and to determine the number of fetal chromosomes-in maternal blood samples.Formaldehyde-treated blood samples from 60 pregnant women and the stated biological fathers were analysed. Maternal plasma fractions were quantified at multiple SNPs, and the ratio of the unique fetal allele signal to the combined maternal and fetal allele signal calculated. The mean ratios of SNPs on chromosomes 13 and 21 were compared to test for potential fetal chromosomal abnormalities.The mean proportion of free fetal DNA was 34.0% (median 32.5%, range 17.0-93.8). We identified three samples with significant differences in the fetal DNA ratios for chromosome 13 and chromosome 21, indicative of trisomy 21; the remaining 57 samples were deemed to be normal. Amniocentesis or newborn reports from the clinical sites confirmed that the copy number of fetal chromosomes 13 and 21 was established correctly for 58 of the 60 samples, identifying 56 of the 57 normal samples, and two of the three trisomy 21 samples. Of the incorrectly identified samples, one was a false negative and one was a false positive. The sensitivity and positive predictive value were both 66.7% (95% CI 12.5-98.2) and the specificity and negative predictive values were both 98.2% (89.4-99.9).The copy number of chromosomes of interest can be directly established from maternal plasma. Such a non-invasive prenatal test could provide a useful complement to currently used screening tests.Diagnosis and significance of cystic hygroma in the first trimester.Thirty cases of cervical cystic hygroma were diagnosed in the first trimester of pregnancy. Karyotype analysis was available in 29 (97 per cent). Fifteen (52 per cent) had a chromosomal abnormality. The ultrasound appearance was described as posterior cervical, lateral cervical, or cervical hygroma with hydrops. Of the 14 euploid embryos, six were electively aborted, two are undelivered, and six have been delivered as phenotypically normal infants. In cases in which the chromosomes were normal and the pregnancy continued, all lesions resolved by 18 weeks.[Trisomy 21, after a half century].Comparison of first trimester, second trimester and integrated Down's syndrome screening results in unaffected pregnancies.Our aim was to compare the results of first trimester combined test, second trimester triple test, and integrated test in the same pregnant population. We retrospectively studied 927 women, all giving birth to an unaffected baby except for two cases of Down's syndrome. The women underwent a nuchal translucency ultrasound measurement and a blood sampling for pregnancy-associated plasma protein A and free beta-hCG subunit (free total chorionic gonadotropin subunit) assay in the first trimester of pregnancy. A second trimester biochemical screening (alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol and total hCG) was performed later. The correlations between each pair of markers and between each marker level and maternal age were calculated. No marker showed significant correlation with any other or with maternal age, with the obvious exception of free beta-hCG subunit and total hCG. The false-positive rate (cut-off level: 1 in 350 at term) was 1.5% for the first trimester test, 3.6% for the second trimester test and 0.54% for the integrated test. In 10/14 pregnancies, the increased risk in the first trimester was not confirmed neither in the second trimester nor by the integrated test. In 29/33 women with an increased risk in the second trimester, the first trimester and the integrated test results were discordant. The absence of correlation among different marker levels suggests that the information supplied by the first and second trimester tests is different. Integrating first and second trimester markers in a single test could pose the ethical problem of withholding first trimester results and thus denying the possible advantages of an earlier pregnancy termination.Nuchal index: a gestational age independent ultrasound marker for the detection of Down syndrome.To determine if the ultrasound marker Nuchal Index (NIx) is gestational age independent, and to determine its specificity and sensitivity for Down syndrome (DS) identification.Prospective cohort. A prospective database of fetal biometry and soft markers of aneuploidy was searched for fetuses with the following criteria: confirmed gestational age, at least two measurements of nuchal thickness and biparietal diameter, no major detectable fetal anomalies, and either normal karyotype or normal postnatal exam. Nuchal Index (NIx) was defined as 100x (mean nuchal thickness [mm])/(mean Biparietal Diameter [mm]). This cohort was divided into two groups according to the last digit of their hospital unit number. Initial analysis was carried out in the first group (analysis group), with the second group (normal) used to test the results. A prospective cohort of pre- and postnatally diagnosed DS fetuses with at least two measurements of nuchal thickness and biparietal diameter constituted the abnormal study group (abnormal) and was used to determine the sensitivity of the index. P value <0.05 was considered significant.Eight hundred and seventy-five fetuses constituted the control group with 455 in the analysis group and 420 in the normal group. In the analysis group, Pearson coefficient and ANOVA confirm that NIx was independent of gestational age between 14 + 0 and 22 + 6 weeks of gestation. For the analysis group, mean NIx was 7.72, (SD = 2.05) and a threshold value of 11.0 yielded a specificity of 94%. Fifty-two DS fetuses made up the abnormal group. Mean NIx in this group was 17.9 (SD = 13.9), which was highly significant (P < 0.00001) compared to the analysis group. Using an NIx threshold of 11.0, sensitivity for any DS was 61.5% (32/52) and specificity (normal group) was 96% (402/420) (False positive rate = 4%). If DS fetuses with effusions, hydrops, cystic hygromas or central nervous system (CNS) defects are excluded, the sensitivity for an NIx of 11.0 was 50.0% (20/40).Nuchal Index (NIx) can be assumed to be constant between 14 + 0 and 22 + 6. Using a threshold of 11.0, the sensitivity for any Down syndrome (DS) fetus was 62% (32/52) with a specificity of 96% (False positive rate = 4%). Even when obvious fetal conditions that can cause an increase in NIx are excluded, the sensitivity remains acceptable at 50%. NIx appears to be a useful, gestational age independent ultrasound marker for Down syndrome.Nasal bone hypoplasia: is it a common finding amongst chromosomally normal fetuses of southern Chinese women?To assess the incidence of nasal hypoplasia among fetuses of southern Chinese women.This prospective observational study was conducted at Princess Margaret Hospital, Hong Kong. All pregnant women referred for chromosomal studies before 14 weeks were assessed. The crown-rump length, nuchal translucency thickness, and nasal bone were assessed between 11 and 14 weeks.A total of 143 women were recruited. In 119 fetuses, facial profiles were successfully obtained and the presence or absence of nasal bones was assessed. One hundred and fourteen fetuses had normal karyotypes. The rate of absence nasal bone when assessed between 11-14 weeks was 0.88% in the fetuses with a normal karyotype. During the same period, 2 out of 3 fetuses with Down syndrome had absence of nasal bones. A nasal bone was visualized in one fetus with Edward syndrome and the other with Turner syndrome (45 X).The incidence of nasal hypoplasia is not increased among fetuses of southern Chinese women. Assessment of ossification of the nasal bone can be used to supplement first-trimester screening in Chinese women.Second-trimester prenatal screening markers for Down syndrome in women with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.Published studies have shown that some serum markers used in screening for Down syndrome tend to be lower among women with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM). On this basis, many screening programmes adjust the marker levels to take account of this difference. Recent studies suggested that the marker levels were not different, and so adjustment may no longer be needed, possibly because of better diabetic control. Data from a prenatal screening programme for Down syndrome were examined to see whether the median values of second-trimester screening markers were still reduced in pregnant women with IDDM. A total of 366 women with IDDM singleton pregnancies without Down syndrome were identified from the screening programme at Barts from 1989 to 2002. After allowing for maternal weight, the median multiples of the median (MoM) for IDDM-unaffected singleton pregnancies were as follows: 0.88 (95% confidence interval 0.84-0.93) for alphafetoprotein (AFP), 0.95 (0.91-0.99) for unconjugated oestriol (uE3), 0.90 (0.80-1.01) for total human chorionic gonadotrophin (total hCG), 0.98 (0.88-1.08) for free beta-hCG, and 0.99 (0.89-1.10) for inhibin-A. The median levels for AFP and uE3 were statistically significantly lower in pregnant women with IDDM. The other markers were not significantly different in women with and without IDDM. There remains a case for adjusting AFP and uE3 levels in women with IDDM in prenatal screening programmes for Down syndrome.Measurement of nuchal translucency as a single strategy in trisomy 21 screening: should we use any other marker?To evaluate the role of nuchal translucency thickness as a single marker in screening for trisomy 21 at 10-16 weeks' gestation.From December 1996 to October 2001, nuchal translucency was measured in 11,281 consecutive early second trimester fetuses referred to our unit for prenatal care and delivery. Scans were performed by eight experienced ultrasonographers, under strict methodological criteria.Chromosomal abnormalities were found in 118 cases (52 trisomy 21). Using nuchal translucency greater than the 95th centile as a cut-off, the overall detection rate was 71.2% with a specificity of 95.4%, and a positive predictive value of 14%. In the trisomy 21 selected group, detection rate, specificity, and positive predictive value for nuchal translucency were 92.3%, 95.4%, and 8.5%, respectively. The detection rate of trisomy 21 reached 100% when nuchal translucency was measured between 10 and 14 weeks' gestation, maintaining the same specificity.Early second trimester nuchal translucency measurement can achieve prenatal detection rates of trisomy 21 greater than 95% with a 5% false-positive rate. With a detection rate so high, the benefits of using additional markers may be less than previously considered. Although maternal age, other sonographic or Doppler markers, and maternal serum biochemistry might play a role in prenatal strategies to detect fetal chromosomal abnormalities, the high detection rate of trisomy 21 fetuses using nuchal translucency as a single parameter suggests that early nuchal translucency measurement between 10 and 14 weeks' gestation can be a simple screening strategy for this condition.Nuchal translucency in the first trimester.All fetuses reported as having nuchal (nape of the neck) thickening or translucency detected by a first trimester ultrasound at 2 centres were reviewed to determine the incidence of aneuploidy. Twenty nine pregnancies were registered, amongst which 12 (41%) had an abnormal karyotype, the most common aneuploidy being trisomy 21 (5 fetuses). The likelihood of aneuploidy increased with increasing thickness of the translucency. Where the karyotype was found to be normal, there was complete resolution of this ultrasound appearance by the second trimester in 15 of the 16 ongoing pregnancies: 9 have delivered normal neonates and 6 pregnancies are continuing. The other fetus developed evidence of a skeletal dysplasia by the second trimester.The advantages of using triple-marker screening for chromosomal abnormalities.Our purpose was to assess the utility of triple-marker serum screening for chromosomal abnormalities.Our laboratory received 10,605 samples that were between 15 and 22 weeks' gestation for maternal serum screening of chromosomal abnormalities. Triple-marker maternal serum screening consisted of alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated estriol in conjunction with maternal age. Women > or = 35 years old were first offered amniocentesis. If they refused amniocentesis, they were offered the screening test. A second-trimester risk for trisomy 21 > or = 1:270 was considered screen positive. Patients were screen positive for trisomy 18 if all three markers were low: alpha-fetoprotein < or = 0.75 multiples of the median, unconjugated estriol < or = 0.60 multiples of the median, and human chorionic gonadotropin < or = 0.55 multiples of the median.The initial screen-positive rate was 8.3% (880 women); amniocentesis was offered to 766 (7.2%). Twelve of 16 ascertained cases of trisomy 21 (75%), two of three cases of trisomy 18 (67%), five cases of 45,X karyotype, and one case each of 45,X/46,XX, 47,XXY, 47,XYY, 46,XX,ins(2)(q21p13p15)mat, and 69,XXX karyotypes were identified in the screen-positive patients. All four known cases of trisomy 21 in the 886 women > or = 35 years old who were screened were detected, with a 21% false-positive rate. Omitting unconjugated estriol from our screening program would have resulted in detecting nine of 16 trisomy 21 and six of 12 other chromosomal abnormalities. The false-positive rate would have remained the same.In our sample cohort addition of unconjugated estriol to the screening program resulted in an increased detection rate of chromosomal abnormalities with no change in the false-positive rate. Considering the advancement in screening for chromosomal abnormalities, maternal age alone as an indication for amniocentesis should be reevaluated.Fetal facial sonographic markers for second trimester Down syndrome screening in a Thai population.To assess the efficacy of using facial sonographic markers for screening fetuses in the second trimester for Down syndrome (DS) in a high-risk Thai population.Frontomaxillary facial angle (FMF) and nasal bone length (NBL) were measured prospectively in pregnant women at high-risk for DS who were undergoing genetic amniocentesis from November 2008 to October 2009. The receiver operator characteristic (ROC) curves were constructed to assess the screening efficacy of FMF angle and NBL.A total of 460 pregnant women were recruited, and a mid-sagittal facial profile was obtained for 403 fetuses. There were 386 fetuses with normal chromosomes, 10 fetuses with DS, 1 fetus with trisomy 13, and 1 fetus with trisomy 18. The remaining 5 fetuses had balanced translocation (n = 2), deletion (n = 1), and mosaic Turner (n = 2). Two different combinations of FMF angle and biparietal diameter to nasal bone length (BPD:NBL) ratio for DS screening in the second trimester achieved 50% and 90% detection rates and 4.4% and 14.0% false positive rates, respectively.The combination of FMF angle and BPD:NBL ratio has a high sensitivity and specificity for screening for DS in the second trimester in a high-risk Thai population.First trimester Down Syndrome screening by nuchal translucency in a Thai population.Pregnancy outcomes with increased nuchal translucency after routine Down syndrome screening.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the outcomes of pregnancies with nuchal translucency greater or equal to 3 mm for routine first trimester screening in unselected populations.A total of 2980 pregnant women for first trimester ultrasonography were routinely offered crown-rump length (CRL) and nuchal translucency (NT) for screening for Down syndrome between 11 and 14 weeks' gestation. A complete follow-up was obtained in all cases by a review of medical records.Using a cut-off value of 3 mm, the prevalence of increased fetal NT was 0.7% (n=22). Among the 22 cases, there were five (22.7%) chromosomal abnormalities. Of the 17 chromosomally normal pregnancies, four resulted in fetal demise (spontaneous abortion, intrauterine death or termination of pregnancy due to fetal abnormalities). The remaining 13 pregnancies resulted in live births, including one gestational hypertension and one preterm delivery, respectively. The total incidence of an adverse outcome in the group of increased fetal NT was 45.5%.In a routine population with first-trimester ultrasonography, fetal NT measuring greater than or equal to 3 mm was associated with a poor pregnancy outcome with not only chromosomal abnormalities and congenital cardiac diseases, but also poor maternal and fetal health or adverse pregnancy outcomes. In addition, this study also demonstrated the necessity for fetal assessment and follow-up in cases where the fetal NT is increased in the first trimester.Fetal facial sonographic markers for second trimester Down syndrome screening in a Thai population.To assess the efficacy of using facial sonographic markers for screening fetuses in the second trimester for Down syndrome (DS) in a high-risk Thai population.Frontomaxillary facial angle (FMF) and nasal bone length (NBL) were measured prospectively in pregnant women at high-risk for DS who were undergoing genetic amniocentesis from November 2008 to October 2009. The receiver operator characteristic (ROC) curves were constructed to assess the screening efficacy of FMF angle and NBL.A total of 460 pregnant women were recruited, and a mid-sagittal facial profile was obtained for 403 fetuses. There were 386 fetuses with normal chromosomes, 10 fetuses with DS, 1 fetus with trisomy 13, and 1 fetus with trisomy 18. The remaining 5 fetuses had balanced translocation (n = 2), deletion (n = 1), and mosaic Turner (n = 2). Two different combinations of FMF angle and biparietal diameter to nasal bone length (BPD:NBL) ratio for DS screening in the second trimester achieved 50% and 90% detection rates and 4.4% and 14.0% false positive rates, respectively.The combination of FMF angle and BPD:NBL ratio has a high sensitivity and specificity for screening for DS in the second trimester in a high-risk Thai population.Is there any effect of fetal gender on the markers of first trimester Down's syndrome screening?At present, the most effective trisomy 21-screening method is the estimate of risk combining maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency, beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated PAPP-A.The aim of this study was to investigate the possible effect of fetal gender in first trimester Down's syndrome screening markers.Retrospective study.Prenatal Diagnosis Centre in a tertiary hospital in Lagos.Of a total of 350 pregnancies in which fetal nuchal translucency and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were performed were included in this study. These markers were investigated to see if they differed on the basis of fetal gender.PAPP-A levels were higher in female fetuses although the difference was not statistically significant. Nuchal translucency was 0.099 mm more in male fetuses.The results suggest that first trimester markers differ on gender but are of no clinical significance, confirming the result of other authors.Implications of a first trimester Down syndrome screening program on timing of malformation detection.To determine the impact which introduction of the 11-14 week scan has had on the gestational age at which fetal malformations are detected by ultrasound in an unselected population of pregnant women.Retrospective study.University hospital, Copenhagen, Denmark, covering the period 1 January 2003 to 30 June 2007.All pregnant women who chose a nuchal translucency scan at 11-14 weeks for Down syndrome risk estimate, and a scan at 18-20 weeks to screen for fetal malformations.Review of cases detected ante- and postnatally.Detection rates at 11-14 weeks relative to all malformations in the population.A total of 216 anomalies were detected in 200 fetuses among the 9 324 fetuses included, while 70 anomalies were diagnosed in 59 infants postnatally. The prevalence of fetuses with anomalies was 2.8% (259 of 9 324). After excluding cases of pyelectasis (127), which may be considered physiological and transitory changes, the prevalence of malformed fetuses was 1.4% (132 of 9 324). Of the malformations detected antenatally, 25.8% were detected before week 15 and 59.6% in weeks 16-22. The remaining 14.6% of malformations were discovered after week 22. Among the lethal malformations, 50% were diagnosed before week 15.Although the purpose of the first trimester scan is to screen for Down syndrome and not for malformations, the introduction of the 11-14 week scan has resulted in the detection of approximately 26% of fetal malformations.Impact of smoking on maternal serum markers and prenatal screening in the first and second trimesters.To examine the effects of smoking on first and second trimester screening markers and to determine the overall impact of these effects on Down syndrome and trisomy 18 risks in first trimester combined, second trimester quadruple and integrated tests.Examination of screening records at Women and Infants Hospital during 2006-2008. First trimester pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and nuchal translucency and second trimester alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated estriol (uE3), hCG and inhibin A (inhA) multiple of the median (MoM) values were extracted from the database along with risk results, smoking status and relevant demographic information.Smoking led to significantly reduced median levels of first trimester PAPP-A (0.89 MoM) and hCG (0.80 MoM), reduced second trimester uE3 (0.96 MoM) and hCG (0.84 MoM), and increased AFP (1.03 MoM) and inhA (1.39 MoM). After accounting for the differences in age between groups, smokers had higher Down syndrome screen positive rates for the second trimester quadruple test, but not for first trimester combined or integrated tests. Screen positive rates for trisomy 18 were markedly increased in smokers relative to age-matched non-smokers when using first trimester combined or integrated tests.Smoking leads to increased screen positive rates, especially for trisomy 18 using combined or integrated tests.The genetic sonogram: comparing the use of likelihood ratios versus logistic regression coefficients for Down syndrome screening.The purpose of this study was to compare the screening efficiency for Down syndrome using likelihood ratios versus logistic regression coefficients.We conducted a retrospective study of women at increased risk for Down syndrome referred for a second-trimester genetic sonogram. Likelihood ratios were calculated by multiplying the risk ratio from maternal serum screening by the likelihood ratios of sonographic markers. Logistic regression coefficients were calculated using a formula derived from β coefficients generated from a multivariable logistic regression model. The screening efficiency of both methods was tested in an independent population of patients. The McNemar test was used to compare the predictive ability of the two methods.In the validation population, the use of likelihood ratios had an area under the receiver operator characteristic curve of 0.90 for Down syndrome detection, whereas the use of logistic regression coefficients had an area under the curve of 0.86. Adopting a risk cutoff point of 1/270, the sensitivity of likelihood ratios was 77.4% (95% confidence interval [CI], 58.9%-90.4%) with a false-positive rate of 17.9% (95% CI, 15.0%-21.1%), whereas the sensitivity of logistic regression coefficients was 93.5% (95% CI, 78.6%-99.2%) with a false-positive rate of 34.6% (95% CI, 30.9%-38.4%). There was significant difference in screening efficiency for Down syndrome detection between the two methods (exact McNemar χ(2), P < .001 ).With a slight reduction in the Down syndrome detection rate, the use of the likelihood ratio approach was associated with a significantly lower false-positive rate compared with the logistic regression approach.Use of ethnic-specific medians for Hispanic patients reduces ethnic disparities in multiple marker screening.To estimate whether midtrimester maternal serum analyte concentrations differ between Caucasian and Hispanic women and whether using ethnic-specific medians affects quad screen performance.Caucasian and Hispanic patients with singletons who underwent maternal serum screening in our laboratory were identified. Alfa-fetoprotein (AFP), estriol, human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and inhibin-A medians were derived separately for Caucasians, Hispanics, and for the composite group. Using composite medians, intergroup mean multiples of the medians (MoMs) for each analyte were compared. Using ethnic-specific medians, new MoMs were calculated and utilized in a risk estimation algorithm.A total of 5478 Caucasian and 2246 Hispanic pregnancies were evaluated. Intergroup MoMs were significantly different for all analytes. AFP, hCG, and inhibin-A were lower in Hispanics, while estriol was higher (P < 0.0001). Using composite medians, the screen-positive rate (SPR) for trisomy 21 was 5.39% in Caucasians and 3.29% in Hispanics. Ethnic-specific medians reduced this disparity: 4.76% in Caucasians and 4.05% in Hispanics. The SPR for neural tube defects with composite medians was 1.44% for Caucasians and 0.89% for Hispanics; with ethnic-specific medians, the SPR was 1.42% for Caucasians and 1.07% for Hispanics.Serum analyte concentrations differ between Caucasian and Hispanic gravidas. Use of ethnic-specific medians reduces the disparity in SPR for trisomy 21 and neural tube defects.Prospective validation of quantitative fluorescent polymerase chain reaction for rapid detection of common aneuploidies.To prospectively validate a quantitative fluorescent polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assay as a method of rapid prenatal aneuploidy detection for chromosomes 13, 18, 21, X, and Y.A commercial quantitative fluorescent PCR kit was validated on 200 known, blinded, prenatal DNA specimens. The kit was then validated prospectively on 1069 amniotic fluid specimens, and the results were compared with the karyotype results and the results of interphase fluorescence in situ hybridization testing, when performed in the course of standard care. Turnaround time was monitored in a subset of the prospective specimens.The analytical sensitivity and specificity of testing in the validation specimens were 98.9% and 100%, respectively. There were no false positives and a single false negative, a mosaic sex chromosome aneuploidy interpreted as normal. In the prospective study, the analytical sensitivity and specificity were 98% and 100%, respectively. No false positives and a single false negative, again a sex chromosome mosaic, were detected. Overall, 72.5% of all chromosomal anomalies and 87.7% of clinically significant chromosome anomalies were detected by quantitative fluorescent PCR. The average and median turnaround times were 30.5 and 25.1 hours, respectively.Quantitative fluorescent PCR is a robust and accurate method of rapid prenatal aneuploidy detection.Non-invasive prenatal assessment of trisomy 21 by multiplexed maternal plasma DNA sequencing: large scale validity study.To validate the clinical efficacy and practical feasibility of massively parallel maternal plasma DNA sequencing to screen for fetal trisomy 21 among high risk pregnancies clinically indicated for amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling.Diagnostic accuracy validated against full karyotyping, using prospectively collected or archived maternal plasma samples.Prenatal diagnostic units in Hong Kong, United Kingdom, and the Netherlands.753 pregnant women at high risk for fetal trisomy 21 who underwent definitive diagnosis by full karyotyping, of whom 86 had a fetus with trisomy 21. Intervention Multiplexed massively parallel sequencing of DNA molecules in maternal plasma according to two protocols with different levels of sample throughput: 2-plex and 8-plex sequencing.Proportion of DNA molecules that originated from chromosome 21. A trisomy 21 fetus was diagnosed when the z score for the proportion of chromosome 21 DNA molecules was >3. Diagnostic sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were calculated for trisomy 21 detection.Results were available from 753 pregnancies with the 8-plex sequencing protocol and from 314 pregnancies with the 2-plex protocol. The performance of the 2-plex protocol was superior to that of the 8-plex protocol. With the 2-plex protocol, trisomy 21 fetuses were detected at 100% sensitivity and 97.9% specificity, which resulted in a positive predictive value of 96.6% and negative predictive value of 100%. The 8-plex protocol detected 79.1% of the trisomy 21 fetuses and 98.9% specificity, giving a positive predictive value of 91.9% and negative predictive value of 96.9%.Multiplexed maternal plasma DNA sequencing analysis could be used to rule out fetal trisomy 21 among high risk pregnancies. If referrals for amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling were based on the sequencing test results, about 98% of the invasive diagnostic procedures could be avoided.Cost-effectiveness and accuracy of prenatal Down syndrome screening strategies: should the combined test continue to be widely used?We analyzed the cost-effectiveness (CE) and performances of commonly used prenatal Down syndrome (DS) screening strategies.We performed computer simulations to compare 8 screening options by applying empirical data from Serum, Urine, and Ultrasound Screening Study trials on the population of 110,948 pregnancies. Screening strategies outcomes, CE ratios, and incremental CE ratios were measured.The most CE DS screening strategy was the contingent screening method (CE ratio of Can$26,833 per DS case). Its incremental CE ratio compared to the second-most CE strategy (serum integrated screening) was Can$3815 per DS birth detected. Among the procedures respecting guidelines, our results identified the combined test as the screening strategy with the highest CE ratio (Can$47,358) and the highest number of procedure-related euploid miscarriages (n = 71).In regard to CE, contingent screening is the best choice. The combined test, which is the most popular screening strategy, shows many limitations.Rapid testing versus karyotyping in Down's syndrome screening: cost-effectiveness and detection of clinically significant chromosome abnormalities.In all, 80% of antenatal karyotypes are generated by Down's syndrome screening programmes (DSSP). After a positive screening, women are offered prenatal foetus karyotyping, the gold standard. Reliable molecular methods for rapid aneuploidy diagnosis (RAD: fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) and quantitative fluorescence PCR (QF-PCR)) can detect common aneuploidies, and are faster and less expensive than karyotyping.In the UK, RAD is recommended as a standalone approach in DSSP, whereas the US guidelines recommend that RAD be followed up by karyotyping. A cost-effectiveness (CE) analysis of RAD in various DSSP is lacking. There is a debate over the significance of chromosome abnormalities (CA) detected with karyotyping but not using RAD. Our objectives were to compare the CE of RAD versus karyotyping, to evaluate the clinically significant missed CA and to determine the impact of detecting the missed CA. We performed computer simulations to compare six screening options followed by FISH, PCR or karyotyping using a population of 110948 pregnancies. Among the safer screening strategies, the most cost-effective strategy was contingent screening with QF-PCR (CE ratio of $24084 per Down's syndrome (DS) detected). Using karyotyping, the CE ratio increased to $27898. QF-PCR missed only six clinically significant CA of which only one was expected to confer a high risk of an abnormal outcome. The incremental CE ratio (ICER) to find the CA missed by RAD was $66608 per CA. These costs are much higher than those involved for detecting DS cases. As the DSSP are mainly designed for DS detection, it may be relevant to question the additional costs of karyotyping.[Combined screening for Down syndrome in Marseille multidisciplinary prenatal centers].Combined screening for trisomy 21 (CS) is established since January 2010 in multidisciplinary centers for prenatal screening in Marseille. Our work investigates its implementation. To date, the false positive rate is 3.5% and the coverage of the SC after six months is 5.7% in our low-risk population.Role of first-trimester sonography in the diagnosis of aneuploidy and structural fetal anomalies.We sought to determine the sensitivity of the first-trimester scan in the early diagnosis of aneuploidy and structural fetal anomalies in an unselected low-risk population.This was a retrospective chart review of all patients having first-trimester scans between 2002 and 2009. At our center, a survey of fetal anatomy is performed at the time of nuchal translucency assessment at 11 weeks to 13 weeks 6 days. A second-trimester scan is done at 20 to 23 weeks and a third-trimester scan at 32 to 35 weeks. Isolated sonographic findings of choroid plexus cysts and echogenic intracardiac foci were excluded. Lethal anomalies and those requiring immediate surgical intervention at birth were considered major structural anomalies. All scans were performed by a single sonologist certified by the Fetal Medicine Foundation. All neonates were examined at birth by a pediatrician.Our study included 1370 fetuses. Six cases of aneuploidy (0.4%) were detected. The first-trimester scan detected 5 of 6 cases of aneuploidy (83%), confirmed by karyotype. There were 36 cases of structural fetal anomalies (2.6%); 20 (1.5%) were major anomalies. The first-trimester scan detected 16 of 36 (44%); 20 (56%) were identified by second- or third-trimester scans. The first-trimester scan detection rate for major structural anomalies was 14 of 20 (70%). The 5 that were missed by the first-trimester scan were detected by a second-trimester scan.Our study emphasizes the importance of the first-trimester scan in the early detection of aneuploidy and structural fetal anomalies. In this small unselected low-risk population, the first-trimester scan detected 83% of aneuploidies and 70% of major structural anomalies. Our results are comparable to previously published studies from other centers and further exemplify the invaluable role of the first-trimester scan in the early detection of aneuploidy and structural anomalies in an unselected low-risk population.FlashFISH: "same day" prenatal diagnosis of common chromosomal aneuploidies.Fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) and quantitative fluorescence (QF)-PCR are rapid molecular methods that test for common chromosomal aneuploidies in prenatal diagnosis. While cytogenetic analysis requires approximately 7-14 days before fetal karyotypes are available, these molecular methods release results of sex chromosome aneuploidies, Down syndrome, Edward's syndrome, and Patau's syndrome within 24-48 h of fetal sampling, alleviating parental anxiety. However, specific diagnosis or exclusion of aneuploidy should be available within the same day of amniocentesis. We developed "FlashFISH," a low cost FISH method that allows accurate results to be reported within 2 h of fetal sampling. Here, we report our experience of using FlashFISH in prenatal diagnosis, and we illustrate in detail the protocols used for the purpose in our laboratory.The effect of fetal gender in predicting Down syndrome using long bone ultrasonographic measurements.To determine if fetal gender affects the screening efficiency of short femur and humerus lengths in the prediction of trisomy 21.Retrospective cohort study of 62 111 patients presenting for ultrasound from 1990 to 2006. Short humerus and femur lengths were defined using (1) biparietal diameter (BPD) to femur/humerus length (FL/HL) ratios > 1.5 standard deviations above the mean, (2) the observed to expected (O/E) ratio of femur length ≤ 0.91 or humerus length ≤ 0.89, and (3) femur and humerus lengths < 5th percentile. The sensitivity, specificity, and likelihood ratios were calculated for the association of short FL/HL and trisomy 21 stratified by gender.Both BPD/long bone ratios as well as O/E ratios demonstrated a statistically significant higher specificity for the detection of trisomy 21 in female fetuses. This difference was most clinically significant when using the O/E ratio, which yielded a specificity of 82.6% in males and 90.6% in females for short femur, and 69.7% in males and 77.9% in females for short humerus, when these markers were evaluated as isolated findings.Gender-specific differences in the effectiveness of both short femur and humerus lengths for the prediction of trisomy 21 may exist, but their presence and magnitude are largely dependent on the formula used.Complete trisomy 21 vs translocation Down syndrome: a comparison of modes of ascertainment.To compare the indications for invasive prenatal testing resulting in the detection of translocation Down syndrome and complete trisomy 21.This case control study was based on a large amniocentesis and chorionic villi samples database (n = 534,795). All specimens with translocation Down syndrome (n = 203) comprised the translocation group and were compared with a maternal age-matched group (4 to 1, n = 812) in which complete trisomy 21 was detected. Women with a normal karyotype were randomly selected (n = 812) and served as controls. Indications for invasive testing were compared among the 3 paired groups using χ(2) analysis.There were no differences in the incidence of abnormal first- and second-trimester screening tests between the translocation Down syndrome and the complete trisomy 21 groups. History of prior aneuploidy was significantly more frequent in the translocation Down syndrome group, as compared with either complete trisomy 21 fetuses or normal controls.Fetuses with translocation Down syndrome present with the same screening abnormalities as fetuses with complete trisomy 21.Are second-trimester minor sonographic markers for Down syndrome useful in patients who have undergone first-trimester combined screening?We sought to determine efficacy of minor markers for detection of Down syndrome (DS) in a population prescreened with first-trimester combined screening (FTS).FTS was modified using established likelihood ratios to generate a new composite risk (NCR).Of 3845 women, 390 had ≥1 marker. There were 10/3845 cases of DS; 3 were among patients with low-risk FTS (n = 3727). In 55 patients, NCR adjusted the risk from low to high without increasing detection rate. NCR did not modify risk to allow for detection of the 3 DS among patients with low-risk FTS even though 2 of these fetuses had 1 minor marker each. There were 7 DS among patients with high-risk FTS (n = 118). Use of NCR increased positive predictive value from 7/118 (5.1%) to 7/53 (13.2%).Screening for minor markers is useful in patients with high-risk FTS. It is of questionable benefit in patients with low-risk FTS.Simultaneous detection of trisomies 13, 18, and 21 with multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification-based real-time PCR.Trisomies 13, 18, and 21 account for the majority of chromosomal aneuploidies detected in prenatal diagnosis. Diagnosis of these trisomies relies mainly on karyotype analysis. Several molecular methods have been developed for trisomy detection, but performance or throughput limitations of these methods currently constrain their use in routine testing.We developed multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification-based real-time PCR (MLPA/rtPCR) to simultaneously detect these 3 trisomy conditions with a single reaction. We applied the method to DNA isolated from 144 blinded clinical samples that included 32 cases of trisomy 21, 11 cases of trisomy 18, 1 case of trisomy 13, and 100 unaffected control samples; results were compared with karyotype analysis.As judged by the results of the karyotype analysis, MLPA/rtPCR correctly detected all 44 cases of trisomy in the analysis of the blinded clinical samples. The method was able to detect a change in chromosome dosage as low as 1.2-fold.This novel PCR-based technology simultaneously identified 3 types of trisomy in a single reaction and accurately detected trisomy with mosaicism, while reducing assay times and costs compared with conventional methods. The MLPA/rtPCR approach may have applicability in noninvasive prenatal diagnosis with maternal blood samples.Gradual implementation of first trimester screening in a population with a prior screening strategy: population based cohort study.To evaluate the implementation of first trimester screening in the Czech Republic during 1996-2007 on the number of infants born with numerical chromosomal anomalies, the gestational age at diagnosis and the number of invasive procedures.A population based cohort study.National Registry of Congenital Anomalies, 53 Czech Republic Genetic Departments.About 100,000 pregnancies per year.Primary outcomes were the rates of fetuses and newborns with diagnosed numerical chromosomal anomalies and the gestational age at diagnosis. Secondary outcomes were the rates of chorion villus sampling (CVS) and amniocenteses and the contribution of age groups on the detection rate of trisomy 21.The number of newborns with Down's syndrome decreased from 5.42/10,000 in 1996 to 3.66/10,000 newborns in the 2007. The total incidence of Down's syndrome increased from 13.42 to 20.66/10,000. The detection rate in women <35 years increased from 35.59 in 1996 to 45.08 in 2007; in women >35 years from 23.73 to 38.52. The number of amniocenteses/detected case of Down's syndrome was 124 in 1996 and 123 in 2007. The corresponding number of CVS decreased dramatically from 83 in 1996 to 10 in 2007.Despite the increase of maternal age and the corresponding increase of Down's syndrome, the number of newborns with Down's syndrome decreased. Implementation of the first trimester combined screening leads to a shift towards earlier diagnosis of all major chromosomal abnormalities.First- and second-trimester ADAM12s in Down syndrome screening.QF-PCR as a stand-alone test for prenatal samples: the first 2 years' experience in the London region.To analyse the results of the first 2 years of a QF-PCR stand-alone testing strategy for the prenatal diagnosis of aneuploidy in the London region and to determine the advantages and disadvantages of this policy.A review of the results of 9737 prenatal samples received for exclusion of chromosome abnormalities. All samples were subjected to QF-PCR testing for common aneuploidies but only samples fulfilling specific criteria subsequently had a full karyotype analysis.Of the 9737 samples received, 10.3% had a chromosome abnormality detected by QF-PCR testing. Of the 7284 samples received with no indication for karyotype analysis, 25 (0.3%) received a normal QF-PCR result but subsequently had an abnormal karyotype detected either prenatally as a privately funded test or postnatally. Of these samples, without subsequent abnormal ultrasound findings, five had a chromosome abnormality associated with a poor prognosis, representing 0.069% of samples referred for Down syndrome testing.While back-up karyotyping is required for some samples, using QF-PCR as a stand-alone prenatal test for pregnancies without ultrasound abnormalities reduces costs, provides rapid delivery of results, and avoids ambiguous and uncertain karyotype results, reducing parental anxiety.Second and first trimester estimation of risk for Down syndrome: implementation and performance in the SAFER study.Document patient choices and screening performance (false positive and detection rates) when three improved Down syndrome screening protocols were introduced coincidentally.Second-trimester 'triple marker' screening was expanded by adding second-trimester dimeric inhibin-A (four-marker), with or without first-trimester pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (five-marker). Nuchal translucency (NT) measurements were included when available from accredited sonographers (six-marker). For assigning risk, two sets of marker distribution parameters were evaluated.Over 3.5 years, 8571 women enrolled (median age 30.6 years). Uptake of the four-, five- and six-marker protocols was 18%, 46% and 36%, respectively. Of those selecting an integrated test (five or six markers), 9.7% did not provide the second trimester serum sample. False positive rates decreased with added markers (5.2%, 5.1% and 2.5%, respectively) and varied between the two parameter sets, while detection remained high. Overall, 21 of 23 cases were detected (91%, 95% CI 73-98%) at a 4.2% false positive rate (95% CI 3.3-5.1%).Integrated screening protocols were chosen 4.6 times more often than four-marker screening (82% vs. 18% uptake). Overall detection was higher and false positives lower, consistent with recent guidelines. Important performance factors include gestational dating method, risk cut-off, and the parameter set used to assign risk.[Analysis of Down syndrome screening by maternal serum detection in mid-pregnancy].To study the clinical value of screening chromosomal diseases and abnormal pregnancy by maternal serum examination in mid-pregnancy.Maternal serum AFP and F-beta hCG were detected in the mid-pregnancy (16-20 weeks) using commercially available detection kits, and the risk of Down syndrome was calculated taking into account of such factors as the maternal age, gestational age, and body weight. Those at high risk underwent amino fluid or cordocentesis for fetal karyotpying. The pregnant women were divided into >or=35 years and <35 years groups, and high and low risk for Down syndrome groups for test results and pregnancy outcome analysis.Of the 6000 pregnant women undergoing antenatal screening, 552 were identified to be at high risk of Down syndrome (9.2%) with one missing case of detection, and 463 of the high-risk cases underwent amino fluid or cordocentesis examination. Twenty-seven cases were found to have abnormal chromosomes, and abortion was suggested in 14 cases but not in the other 13 cases where other chromosomal abnormalities such as polymorphic mutations were found. The screening positive rate in >or=35 years and <35 years group was 95.5% and 8.2% (P<0.0001), with fetal chromosomal abnormality rate of 4.5% and 2.9%, respectively (P>0.5). The rate of abnormal pregnant outcomes for high and low risk groups was 5.6% and 0.05% (P<0.0001), with pregnancy complication rate of 11.8% and 3.7% (P<0.0001) and fetal chromosomal polymorphic mutation rate of 2.8% and 1.1% (P>0.5), respectively.Maternal serum AFP and F-beta hCG levels in second trimester have important values in predicting fetal chromosomal diseases, and their detection may help reduce the birth defect rate and prevent abnormal pregnancy outcomes and complications.First trimester maternal serum placental growth factor in trisomy 21 pregnancies.To examine placental growth factor (PlGF) levels in first trimester maternal serum in trisomy 21 pregnancies and to investigate the potential value of PlGF in a first trimester screening test.First trimester maternal serum from 70 trisomy 21 cases and 375 euploid controls were retrospectively analyzed for PlGF using a DELFIA Xpress immunoassay platform. Results were expressed as multiples of medians (MoM) for comparison.PlGF levels were significantly decreased in pregnancies with trisomy 21, 0.76 MoM versus 0.98 MoM in controls. Inclusion of PlGF into the first trimester combined test [maternal age, pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), free-beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) and nuchal translucency] would increase the detection rate by 0.5% at a 5% false positive rate.PlGF at 11 weeks to 13 weeks 6 days has the potential to be included as a marker for the detection of pregnancies with trisomy 21.Using population-based data to predict the impact of introducing noninvasive prenatal diagnosis for Down syndrome.To compare the number and types of chromosome abnormalities prenatally diagnosed and the number of invasive procedures between current prenatal testing pathways and a pathway where noninvasive prenatal diagnosis for Down syndrome replaces Down syndrome screening tests.Numbers and types of chromosome abnormalities for each referral category were extracted from prenatal diagnostic testing reports routinely collected in Victoria, Australia, in 2006 and 2007. These data were then applied to the proposed implementation strategy.If noninvasive prenatal diagnosis for Down syndrome had replaced Down syndrome screening tests in 2006 and 2007, in Victoria, there would have been 25 (7%) additional Down syndrome diagnosed, 6896 (84%) fewer invasive procedures, and 231 (56%) non-Down syndrome chromosome abnormalities no longer detected. These include trisomy 13, trisomy 18, sex chromosome abnormalities, balanced and unbalanced rearrangements, polyploidy, and mosaic results.The potential loss of information about chromosome abnormalities other than Down syndrome with noninvasive prenatal diagnosis compared with full karyotyping with traditional prenatal diagnosis should be considered when planning for the implementation of new technologies.Maternal serum anti-Mullerian hormone level is not superior to chronological age in predicting Down syndrome pregnancies.To compare the difference in maternal serum anti-Mullerian hormone (AMH) level between Down syndrome pregnancies and unaffected pregnancies, and to evaluate its performance as a screening marker for Down syndrome pregnancy.A total of 145 pregnancies affected by foetal Down syndrome and 290 unaffected controls matched with maternal age and gestational age were selected, and their archived first or second trimester serum retrieved for AMH assay.There was no significant difference in maternal serum AMH level between pregnancies affected and unaffected by foetal Down syndrome. Our first trimester serum samples had higher AMH concentration compared to second trimester samples.Maternal serum AMH level, as a marker of ovarian age, is not superior to chronological age in predicting Down syndrome pregnancies. Despite the cross-sectional nature of our study, the variation of maternal serum AMH concentration with gestational age warrants further investigation.Do race-specific definitions of short long bones improve the detection of down syndrome on second-trimester genetic sonograms?The purpose of this study was to determine whether the use of race-specific definitions of short femur and humerus lengths improves Down syndrome detection.This was a retrospective cohort study over 16 years. For each self-reported maternal race (white, African American, Hispanic, and Asian), we evaluated the efficiency of Down syndrome detection using published race-specific formulas compared with a standard formula for short femur and humerus lengths (observed versus expected lengths < or =0.91 and < or =0.89, respectively). The sensitivity, specificity, and 95% confidence intervals for each parameter were compared. Screening performance was compared by areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves.Of 58,710 women, 209 (0.3%) had a diagnosis of a fetus with Down syndrome. Although the race-based formula increased sensitivity in each population, the increase was statistically significant only in the white population, whereas a decrease in specificity was statistically significant in all 4 populations, as denoted by nonoverlapping confidence intervals. The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve for the model using the race-specific definition of short femur length was 0.67 versus 0.65 compared with the standard definition, and for humerus length it was 0.70 versus 0.71.The use of race-based formulas for the determination of short femur and humerus lengths did not significantly improve the detection rates for Down syndrome.Comparison of multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification and karyotyping in prenatal diagnosis.To estimate whether multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification (MLPA), a molecular technique used for detecting the most common chromosomal aneuploidies, is comparable with karyotyping for the detection of aneuploidies of chromosomes X, Y, 13, 18, and 21 in routine clinical practice and to estimate the costs differences of both techniques.In this prospective, nationwide cohort study, we consecutively included 4,585 women who had an amniocentesis because of their age (36 years or older), increased risk after prenatal screening, or maternal anxiety. Amniotic fluid samples were tested independently with both MLPA and karyotyping. The primary outcome was diagnostic accuracy of MLPA to detect aneuploidies of chromosomes X, Y, 13, 18, and 21. Secondary outcome measures were turnaround time for test results and costs. A sample size was calculated using a critical noninferiority margin of 0.002; therefore, at least 4,497 paired test results were needed (one-sided alpha 0.05, power 0.90).Diagnostic accuracy of MLPA was 1.0 (95% confidence interval [CI] 0.99-1.0), sensitivity was 100% (95% CI 0.96-1.0) and specificity was 100% (95% CI 0.999-1.0). Diagnostic accuracy of MLPA was statistically similar (noninferior) to that of karyotyping (P<.001). In 75 cases, MLPA failed (1.6%); karyotyping failed once (0.02%). Compared with karyotyping, MLPA shortened the waiting time by 14.5 days (P<.001, 95% CI 14.3-14.6) and cost less (-47, P<.001).In routine clinical practice, diagnostic accuracy of MLPA for detection of trisomies X, Y, 13, 18, and 21 is comparable with that of karyotyping, and it reduces waiting time at lower costs.II.Maternal plasma levels of follistatin-related gene protein in the first trimester of pregnancies with Down syndrome.To determine maternal plasma levels of follistatin-related gene protein (FLRG) in the first trimester of pregnancy and assess its potential role as a marker for prenatal screening of Down syndrome.Maternal plasma levels of FLRG were determined in 100 pregnant women with normal fetuses in their first trimester of pregnancy (i.e. 11th to 15th weeks). These results were compared with 20 cases with Down syndrome fetuses, taking into consideration clinical and demographic variables, such as maternal age, maternal weight, gestational age, smoking status and ethnicity.Maternal plasma median of FLRG in the normal population was 1.41 ng/mL with 95% confidence interval (CI) of 1.37-1.70 and interquartile range (IQR) of 0.88, during the 11th to 15th weeks of pregnancy. Maternal age and weight were the only variables significantly related to FLRG levels (p = 0.030 and 0.020, respectively). Only maternal and gestational ages were related to Down syndrome (p = 0.039 and 0.006, respectively). Maternal plasma levels of FLRG were not significantly different in the presence of Down syndrome fetuses compared to normal population (p = 0.63).FLRG can be successfully detected in maternal plasma in the first trimester of pregnancy. However, its levels are not significantly altered in the presence of Down syndrome fetuses.ADAM 12 may be used to reduce the false positive rate of first trimester combined screening for Down syndrome.ADAM12 has been shown to be an efficient maternal serum marker for Down syndrome (DS) in the first trimester; but recent studies, using a second generation assay, have not confirmed these findings. We examined the efficiency of a second generation assay for ADAM12.ADAM12 concentrations were determined in 28 first trimester DS and 503 control pregnancies using a novel Research Delfia ADAM12 kit. Log10MoM distributions of ADAM12 and correlations with other markers were established. Population performance of screening was estimated by Monte Carlo simulation.ADAM12 was significantly reduced in the first trimester in DS pregnancies with a log10MoM of -0.1621 (equivalent to 0.68 MoM) (p < 0.001). The reduction decreased with advancing gestational age. ADAM12 used with PAPP-A + hCG beta + NT (CUB screening) increased the detection rate (DR) from 86% to 89% for a false positive rate (FPR) of 5%. When used for a fixed DR of 90%, the addition of ADAM12 resulted in a 25% reduction of the FPR.ADAM12 is a moderately effective DS marker. It is not a cost-effective addition to CUB screening, but may be used to reduce the FPR in selected high-risk cases.Contingent triple-screening for Down syndrome in the second trimester: a feasibility study in Mainland Chinese population.To explore the efficacy of contingent triple-screening for Down syndrome (DS), that is, performing triple-screening in pregnant women with DS risks between 1/270 and 1/1000 at routine double-screening, in a Mainland Chinese population.Maternal serum concentrations of alpha fetoprotein (AFP), free-beta human chorionic gonadotropin (free beta-hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE3) were measured by time-resolved fluoroimmunoassay in 24 double-screening false-negative (DSFN) and 322 double-screening true-negative (DSTN) pregnancies with DS risks between 1/270 and 1/1000 at routine double-screening performed at 15-20 weeks' gestation. DS risk of each pregnancy was calculated by computer software. The detection rate (DR), false-positive rate (FPR), and costs of contingent triple-screening were calculated and compared with routine double-screening methods.Six of 24 DSFN and 3 of 322 DSTN were contingent triple-screening positive. Compared with routine double-screening, DR of contingent triple-screening increased by 10% (from 50% to 60%) without a significant increase of FPR (p > 0.05). When compared with routine triple-screening, uE3 costs in contingent triple-screening were reduced by more than 84.3%.Second-trimester maternal serum contingent triple-screening could be effective and suitable for prenatal care in Mainland China. Governments and Health Agencies of other developing countries may also find this strategy cost-effective.Influence of maternal BMI on genetic sonography in the FaSTER trial.We sought to evaluate the influence of maternal body mass index (BMI) on sonographic detection employing data from the FaSTER trial.Unselected singleton pregnancies underwent detailed genetic sonogram to evaluate for structural fetal anomalies and soft markers for aneuploidy. BMI (kg/m(2)) were calculated from reported initial visit values. Sensitivity, specificity, false positive and false negative rates (FPR and FNR), likelihood ratio, detection rates, and a missed diagnosis rate (MDR: FNR + marker recorded as 'missing'/N) were calculated.Eight thousand five hundred and fifty-five patients with complete BMI information had detailed genetic sonography. A lower sensitivity with an elevated FNR and MDR was observed in obese women for multiple aneuploid markers (e.g. > or =2 markers 32% sensitivity with 68% FNR among BMI <25 vs 22% and 78% among BMI >30). Similarly, the detection rate for cardiac anomalies among women at BMI <25 was higher (21.6%) at a significantly lower FPR (78.4%; 95% CI 77.3-79.5%) in comparison to obese women (8.3% with FPR 91.7%; 95% CI 90.1-93.2%). In a logistic regression model, maternal obesity significantly decreased the likelihood of sonographic detection of common anomalies (adjusted OR 0.7; 95% CI 0.6-0.9; p = 0.001).The performance of second trimester genetic sonography is influenced by obesity, with a significantly higher MDR for multiple minor markers and lower likelihood for detecting common anomalies.[Noninvasive prenatal test in the first trimester of pregnancy (NT and estimation of beta-hCG and PAPP-A) in the diagnosis of fetal abnormalities in Polish population--comparison of the biochemistry own normal ranges and literature reported data].Estimation of Polish population standards of the concentrations of pregnancy-associated plasma protein--A (PAPP-A) and free beta--human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-HCG) in the maternal blood between 10.0 and 13.6 week of pregnancy and comparison of the biochemistry own normal ranges and literature reported data. Estimation the sensitivity of the fetal nuchal translucency measurement, biochemical concentrations of PAPP-A and free beta-HCG in detection of the fetal chromosomal abnormalities.582 women in the age 14 to 46 years old with singleton pregnancies were included to the study The screening was performed between 10.0 and 13.6 week of gestation. The fetal nuchal translucency serum concentrations of PAPP-A and free beta-HCG were measured. The specific risk was calculated using the Fetal Medicine Foundation software (FTS) by accredited sonographers.Standards for serum concentrations of PAPP-A and free beta-HCG in normal pregnancies were determined. The measurement sensitivity of the fetal nuchal translucency in detection of the fetal chromosomal abnormalities was 80% and sensitivity of serum concentrations of PAPP-A and free beta-HCG was 40% and 80%.There is no significant differences between estimated biochemistry standards (PAPP-A and free beta-HCG) for Polish population and literature reported data. Observed differences in measurements of fetal NT, serum concentrations of PAPP-A and free beta-HCG in a control group and the group with the aneuploidies confirmed usefulness of these methods for the first trimester prenatal screening.Measurement of nuchal translucency and the prenatal diagnosis of Down syndrome.To estimate the sensitivity of nuchal-translucency measurement and compare it with that of second-trimester serum screening using population-based data and to evaluate the effect of nuchal-translucency measurement on the gestational age at prenatal diagnosis of Down syndrome and pregnancy termination.We used The Paris Registry of Congenital Malformation data on 594 cases of Down syndrome (live births, fetal deaths, and pregnancy terminations) from 2001-2006. Analyses were done separately for women younger than 38 years and women aged 38 years or older. Analyses included binomial regression and fractional polynomials to model time trends in gestational age at diagnosis and at pregnancy termination.Ninety percent of the fetuses had undergone nuchal-translucency measurement as compared with only 22% that underwent second-trimester serum screening. This was principally because half of the pregnant women were given a diagnosis of Down syndrome during the first trimester after an abnormal result of nuchal-translucency measurement. Second-trimester serum screening had a higher sensitivity than did nuchal-translucency measurement (72% compared with 56%). The increasing use of nuchal-translucency measurement led to an increase in early diagnosis of Down syndrome in women younger than 38 years of age; diagnosis before 15 weeks of gestation increased from 21.7% in 2001 to 51.6% in 2006 (P=.016). Pregnancy termination before 15 weeks also increased from 18.8% in 2001 to 47.5% in 2006 (P=.02).The main effect of the increased use of nuchal-translucency measurement was a substantial increase in the early detection of Down syndrome, principally in younger women. This is an important advantage because several studies have shown that women prefer early diagnosis of Down syndrome.III.[Share with women. Prenatal tests for Down syndrome].Placental growth hormone and growth hormone binding protein are first trimester maternal serum markers of Down syndrome.Placental growth hormone (PGH) is synthesised by the placenta, and its function is modulated by growth hormone binding protein (GHBP). The potential of PGH and GHBP as maternal serum screening markers for Down syndrome (DS) was examined.Maternal serum concentrations of PGH and GHBP were determined by ELISA in 74 DS and 261 control pregnancies in gestational week 8(+0) to 13(+4). Log(10) MoM distributions of the markers were established. The performance of DS screening was estimated by Monte Carlo simulation.PGH log(10) MoM (SD) was decreased (p < 0.001) to -0.201 (0.373) and GHBP log(10) MoM to -0.116 (0.265) (p = 0.04), in DS pregnancies (n = 34) in week 8(+0) to 10(+0). In week 10(+1) to 13(+4), neither PGH (p = 0.16) nor GHBP (p = 0.13) was reduced in DS pregnancies. The detection rate (DR) for PGH in screening for DS in week 8(+0) to 10(+0) was 39% for a false positive rate (FPR) of 5%; increasing to 72% in combination with PAPP-A + hCGbeta. PGH + GHBP in combination with PAPP-A + hCGbeta + nuchal translucency (NT) (CUB test) had a DR of 91% compared with 80% for the CUB test.PGH and GHBP are early first trimester maternal serum markers for DS [Correction made here after initial online publication].First-trimester Down syndrome screening in women younger than 35 years old and cost-effectiveness analysis in Taiwan population.Outcome of the first-trimester Down syndrome screening in younger population was less reported before. We present the outcome of this screening in Taiwanese women younger than 35 years old. We also test whether or not the first-trimester Down syndrome screening of women <35 years of age and women >35 years old routinely receiving amniocentesis is cost-effective compared with all pregnant women screened with this test in the setting of increased maternal age.From 1999 to 2007, the first-trimester Down syndrome screening including nuchal thickness, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A and free beta-hCG are provided to 10 811 singleton women <35 years of age with the cut-off of 1/270. A cost-effectiveness analysis of young women receiving this screening and older women undergo amniocentesis versus all women undergo this screening was performed in Taiwan population from 1987 to 2006, in which advanced age pregnancies increased from 2.8% to 11.6% of total pregnancies.Detection rates of trisomy 21, trisomy 18, Turner syndrome and other chromosome anormalies in women <35 years of age are 87.5% (14/16), 50% (2/4), 80% (8/10) and 63% (12/19), respectively, with a false-positive rate of 5.5% (590/10 811). As advanced age pregnancies reached 11.6%, the average cost per one case averted for all women screened ranged from $77 204 to $98 421, while the cost ranged from $99 647 to $116 433 for only women <35 years of age receiving this screening.In an aging population, the first-trimester Down syndrome screening should be implemented for all pregnant women when it is available.Reevaluating humeral length for the detection of fetal trisomy 21.The purpose of this study was to analyze humeral length (HL) in a normal population and to compare that with HL in a population of fetuses with trisomy 21 to determine the most efficient discriminating parameters for diagnostic accuracy.A nested case-control study comparing HLs from a normal population and a population of fetuses with trisomy 21 was conducted. Humeral length was regressed against gestational age for a consecutive well-dated population of normal singleton gestations presenting to the Washington University School of Medicine prenatal diagnosis units over a 5-year period. A second population of well-dated pregnancies with trisomy 21 diagnosed either prenatally or postnatally was also selected on the basis of the same criteria, except that anomalous fetuses were included. Various discriminating thresholds for a short HL were compared for efficiency in the detection of trisomy 21. These included the following: observed/expected HL (<or= 0.89), biparietal diameter/HL greater than 1.3, 1.4, 1.5, 1.6, 1.7, 1.75, 1.8, and 1.85 SD above the mean for gestation, HL less than 0.8 or less than 0.9 multiple of the median, and HL less than the fifth percentile for gestation.A total of 620 normal pregnancies and 32 with trisomy 21 were extracted from the database. A receiver operating characteristic curve revealed HL less than the fifth percentile as the optimal discriminator for trisomy 21 detection (area under the receiver operating characteristic curve = 0.80). The positive likelihood ratio (LR+) was greatest (25.0) with HL less than the fifth percentile. When HL was considered in isolation without other sonographic markers of trisomy 21, the LR+ was 6.3.Humeral length less than the fifth percentile was the most effective discriminator among the many studied.First-trimester uterine artery Doppler and serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein-a in preeclampsia and chromosomal defects.We examined the potential value of the uterine artery pulsatility index (PI) in pregnancies with fetal aneuploidies and in those that developed preeclampsia (PE) with the aim of distinguishing between these complications in pregnancies with low pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).Uterine artery PI and serum PAPP-A at 11-13 weeks were measured in 165 cases of PE, including 33 that required delivery before 34 weeks (early PE) and 132 with late PE, and in 301 cases with aneuploidies, including 200 with trisomy 21. Each case of aneuploidy and PE was matched with 4 unaffected controls.Serum PAPP-A was lower in early PE (0.58 multiples of the normal median, MoM) and in trisomy 21 (0.54 MoM), trisomy 18 (0.22 MoM) and Turner syndrome (0.51 MoM) - but not in late PE (0.90 MoM) - than in controls (1.01 MoM). Uterine artery PI was higher in early PE (1.52 MoM), late PE (1.20 MoM), trisomy 18 (1.20 MoM) and Turner syndrome (1.29 MoM) - but not in trisomy 21 (1.02 MoM) - than in controls (1.0 MoM).The uterine artery PI at 11-13 weeks may be useful in distinguishing between low PAPP-A due to trisomy 21 and early PE.Specificity of fetal tricuspid regurgitation in prediction of Down syndrome in Thai fetuses at 17-23 weeks of gestation.To assess the specificity of tricuspid regurgitation (TR) in prediction of Down syndrome in Thai fetuses at 17-23 weeks' gestation and to determine the prevalence of TR among normal chromosome fetuses in a high-risk population.A prospective study was performed in 395 high-risk pregnant women who underwent amniocentesis or cordocentesis for fetal karyotyping at 17-23 weeks. The presence or absence of TR was determined by pulsed wave Doppler at the time of prenatal diagnosis. TR was diagnosed when the regurgitation flow was observed for at least half of systole or > or = 70 milliseconds with maximum velocity of > or = 100 cm/sec. The diagnostic values of TR for detection of Down syndrome were calculated.The prevalence of TR was 3.8% (14/370) in normal chromosome fetuses and 40% (2/5) in Down syndrome fetuses. Fetuses with TR had a higher chance to be Down syndrome (11.1%) than those without TR (0.8%) (95% CI of the difference, 0.09-32.9, p = 0.036). Specificity, sensitivity, NPV and PPV of TR in prediction of Down syndrome were 95.9%, 40%, 99.2% and 11.1%, respectively. Among normal chromosome fetuses with TR, 14.3% (2/14) had congenital cardiac abnormalities.TR is not only a high specificity secondary ultrasound marker at 17-23 weeks to identify fetuses with Down syndrome in high-risk pregnant women but also associates with the risk of cardiac defects in normal chromosome fetuses.[Screening for trisomy 21 in France].Does the combination of fronto-maxillary facial angle and nasal bone evaluation improve the detection of Down syndrome in the second trimester?To determine if the combination of fronto-maxillary facial (FMF) angle and nasal bone (NB) evaluation improves the detection of Down syndrome (DS) in the second trimester.We compared the FMF angle measurements in euploid and DS fetuses seen between 2005 and 2008. The FMF angles were measured from stored two-dimensional (2-D) images by investigators blinded to the DS status of the fetus. All NB measurements were obtained prospectively. Receiver operator characteristic curve plot was used to determine the optimal definition for abnormal FMF angle. The detection and false positive rates and likelihood ratios positive and negative for the DS markers and their combinations were compared.Of 22 fetuses with DS seen between 16 and 22 weeks over the study period, NB and FMF angle evaluation was available for 21. These were compared with a control group of 201 fetuses seen at similar gestational age ranges without DS. NB alone identified 10/21 (47.6%) of Down syndrome while FMF angle identified 2/21 (9.5%). The combination of FMF angle and NB identified only one additional case of Down syndrome.While FMF angle and NB are independent markers for DS, their combination resulted in a minimal but nonsignificant improvement in DS detection.Triple-marker prenatal screening program for chromosomal defects.To examine screening performance of California's triple-marker screening program, using data from a statewide registry for chromosomal defects.This study included 752,686 women who received a screening risk and had an expected date of delivery between July 2005 and the end of June 2007. Follow-up diagnostic services for screen-positive women were performed at state-approved centers. Data on diagnostic outcomes from these visits were entered into the California Chromosomal Defect Registry (CCDR). Other CCDR sources include mandatory reporting by all cytogenetic laboratories and hospitals and outcome data forms submitted by prenatal care providers.The observed detection rate for Down syndrome (N=1,217) was 77.4%. It varied significantly by gestational dating method and maternal age. The rates for women aged younger than 35 years and 35 years and older were 62.4% and 94.0%, respectively. The detection rates were 81.3% for ultrasound-dated pregnancies and 67.5% for last menstrual period-dated pregnancies. For Turner syndrome, trisomy 18, triploidy, and trisomy 13, the detection rates were 79.4%, 82.5%, 98.1%, and 36.0%, respectively. The positive rate for Down syndrome was 5.4%. Of women with a Down syndrome fetus who were screen positive, only 49.5% opted for amniocentesis. Of women who obtained results from amniocentesis indicating a Down syndrome fetus, 61.4% had an elective termination, 26.2% had a live birth, 4.5% had a death or miscarriage, and 7.9% had an unknown outcome.The observed performance of this large triple-marker screening program exceeds generally predicted detection rates for Down syndrome. This study methodology will be used to measure the performance of subsequent screening enhancements.III.Performance of first-trimester screening between gestational weeks 7 and 13.Screening for fetal chromosome abnormalities in the first trimester includes analysis of the serological markers pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and free beta human choriogonadotropin (free beta hCG). The blood sample is traditionally taken around week 12 of gestation, but the performance of earlier blood sampling is not well documented.We studied 44,537 singleton pregnancies. Complete first-trimester screening took place between November 2003 and March 2009, and blood samples were taken between 7 weeks + 5 days and 13 weeks + 6 days.Of 120 cases of trisomy 21, 108 were diagnosed in the first-trimester screening (detection rate 90%). When the blood sample was taken before gestational week 10, the detection rate of trisomy 21 was 97% (70 of 72), whereas 80% were detected (38 of 48) after week 10 (chi(2) = 0.0035). For trisomy 18, trisomy 13, and triploidy, 65% (13 of 20) were detected before gestational week 10, and 73% (11 of 15) after (not significant). All 6 cases of triploidy before and after gestational week 10 were detected. The screen positive rate and the maternal age were similar before and after week 10 of gestation.Screening for fetal aneuploidy can be performed with good results with the blood sample taken as early as week 7 of gestation. Blood samples taken before gestational week 10 showed a high detection rate of fetal trisomy 21, with no difference in the detection of fetal trisomy 18, trisomy 13, or triploidy.Prospective validation of first-trimester combined screening for trisomy 21.To examine the performance of the new algorithm in screening for trisomy 21 by a combination of maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency (NT) and maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).This was a prospective screening study for trisomy 21 in singleton pregnancies at 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks of gestation using an algorithm combining maternal age, fetal NT thickness based on the mixture model for the assessment of NT, and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A based on a multiple regression model for the assessment of serum biochemistry. The NT measurements were performed by 60 operators who had obtained The Fetal Medicine Foundation certificate of competence in the 11-13-week scan.The study population consisted of 19 614 pregnancies with a normal karyotype or delivery of a phenotypically normal baby (euploid group) and 122 cases of trisomy 21. In the euploid fetuses the NT was above the previously defined 50(th), 95(th) and 99(th) centiles in 10 033 (51.2%), 618 (3.2%) and 123 (0.6%) cases and the respective values for trisomy 21 were 117 (95.9%), 94 (77.0%) and 57 (46.7%). The median fetal NT was within 0.1 mm of the expected in 47 (78.3%) of the 60 sonographers and within 0.2 mm in all. In the euploid fetuses the median free beta-hCG was 1.0 (range, 0.1-29.4) multiples of the median (MoM) and the median PAPP-A was 1.0 (range, 0.2-3.3) MoM. The median MoM values were 1.0 or close to 1.0 MoM for each subgroup of pregnancy characteristics, including gestations of 11, 12 and 13 weeks, maternal weight of < 60 kg, 60-80 kg and > 80 kg, different ethnic origins, cigarette smokers and non-smokers, natural conception and in vitro fertilization. For a false-positive rate of 3%, the detection rate of trisomy 21 in screening by maternal age and fetal NT was 81% (95% CI, 73-89%), by maternal age and maternal serum biochemistry it was 63% (95% CI, 56-72%) and by combined screening based on maternal age, fetal NT and maternal serum biochemistry it was 90% (95% CI, 84-96%).This study has validated the new risk algorithm and demonstrated that in combined screening for trisomy 21 based on maternal age, fetal NT and free beta-hCG and PAPP-A the detection rate is about 90% for a 3% false-positive rate.Is rapid aneuploidy screening used alone acceptable in prenatal diagnosis? An evaluation of the possible role of ultrasound examination.The objectives of this study were to use a factual basis to: (1) determine the number, nature, and probable phenotypic consequences of karyotype anomalies that would probably be missed (structural anomalies, uncommon aneuploidies and mosaic aneuploidies) by rapid aneuploidy screening (RAS), and (2) appraise whether RAS can replace traditional karyotyping when amniocenteses are performed for increased risk of Down's syndrome by maternal serum screening or advanced maternal age in the absence of ultrasound abnormality.This retrospective cohort study analysed the indications, results and outcomes of 5,713 consecutive amniocenteses over a 5-year period at a single prenatal diagnosis centre in Paris.Advanced maternal age and increased Down's risk with maternal serum marker were the most common indications. Chromosome abnormalities were detected in 3.64% of the pregnancies tested, and unexpected structural anomalies in 0.63% (n = 36). Translocations were more likely to be reciprocal, balanced and of parental origin. There were 6 mosaic gonosomal aneuploidies. Overall, 4 mosaic autosomal aneuploidies and 36 structural aberrations would not have been recognised by RAS alone. Of the 4 mosaic autosomal aneuploidies, all were terminated, one had major malformations and the others had discrete signs that a good quality ultrasound examination would probably not detect. Of the 36 structural aberrations, 24 would be undetected by ultrasound scan, from which 6 would be associated with a significant risk of an abnormal phenotype outcome.In conclusion, our data do not provide evidence that RAS can replace the traditional karyotype. It is probably impossible to arrive in a universal conclusion of which approach (karyotype or RAS) is definitely better than the other. Each prenatal centre could have its own approach depending on the local data analysis, including quality control of ultrasounds.First-trimester fetal nasal bone length in an ethnic Chinese population.To determine reference ranges of fetal nasal bone length (NBL) in a Chinese population and to assess the value of NBL measurement in screening for chromosomal defects in the first trimester.In this prospective study the fetal profile was examined and the fetal NBL and crown-rump length (CRL) were measured in Chinese women presenting with singleton pregnancies for first-trimester screening for aneuploidy between January 2004 and June 2007. Screening was performed on the basis of nuchal translucency (NT) measurement and maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A levels.NBL was measured in 7543 fetuses, of which 7517 were euploid. The best fit equation for median NBL in euploid fetuses in relation to CRL was: NBL (mm) = 0.4593 + (0.0186 x CRL(mm)). The NBL for gestational age (GA, in days) was given by the equation NBL(mm) = 0.2392 + (0.0027 x GA). There was no correlation between log(10)(NBL multiples of the median (MoM)) and log(10)(NT MoM) in unaffected pregnancies (r = - 0.009; P = 0.43). Only two of the 11 cases with trisomy 21 had an NBL outside the 5(th) or 95(th) centiles of the reference range for euploid fetuses.Reference ranges for NBL in a Chinese population suitable for screening for aneuploidy between 11 and 13 + 6 weeks' gestation have been derived. The NBL in Chinese fetuses is similar to that of other ethnic groups. However, unlike the determination of presence vs. absence of the nasal bone, NBL measurement is unlikely to further improve screening for aneuploidy.Nuchal translucency thresholds in prenatal screening for Down syndrome and trisomy 18.To determine if nuchal translucency (NT) can be used as a first trimester triage marker in prenatal screening for Down syndrome and trisomy 18.Data from first trimester prenatal screening in 77 443 women were stratified by maternal and gestational ages. They were then analyzed to identify NT thresholds above or below which only positive (high-risk) or negative (low-risk) results were reported by a first trimester prenatal screening test combining PAPP-A, free beta-hCG and NT.Combined prenatal screening was always positive for Down syndrome when NT thickness exceeded 4.0 mm. As women aged, this upper NT threshold value changed according to gestational age. In women aged 35 to 37 years, combined prenatal screening was always positive when NT exceeded 2.8 mm, 3.0 mm, and 3.4 mm at 11, 12, and 13 weeks of gestation, respectively. In women over 42 years of age, the upper threshold value for NT was 1.8 mm, 2.4 mm, and 2.7 mm at 11, 12, and 13 weeks of gestation, respectively. In women less than 35 years of age, we identified lower threshold values below which combined prenatal screening for Down syndrome was always negative.In prenatal screening for Down syndrome and trisomy 18, it is possible to identify NT threshold values above which biochemical screening provides no additional benefit. In pregnancies in which NT is above the established upper cut-offs, invasive prenatal screening can be offered without delay.[Prenatal diagnostics of chromosomal aberrations Czech Republic: 1994-2007].An analysis of prenatal diagnostics efficiency of selected types of chromosomal aberrations in the Czech Republic in 2007. Update of 1994-2007 data according to particular selected diagnoses.Retrospective epidemiological analysis of pre- and postnatal chromosomal aberrations diagnostics and its efficiency.Data on pre- and postnatally diagnosed birth defects in the Czech Republic during 1994-2007 were used. Data on prenatally diagnosed birth defects (and for terminated pregnancies) were collected from particular departments of prenatal diagnostics, medical genetics and ultrasound diagnostics in the Czech Republic, data on birth defects in births from the National Birth Defects Register (Institute for Health Information and Statistics). Total numbers over the period under the study, mean incidences of selected types of chromosomal aberrations and mean prenatal diagnostics efficiencies were analyzed. Following chromosomal aberrations were studied: Down, Edwards, Patau, Turner and Klinefelter syndromes and syndromes 47,XXX and 47,XYY.A relative proportion of Down, Edwards and Patau syndromes as well as other autosomal and gonosomal aberration is presented in figures. Recently, trisomies 13, 18 and 21 present around 70% of all chromosomal aberrations in selectively aborted fetuses, in other pregnancies, "other chromosomal aberrations" category (mostly balanced reciprocal translocations and inversions) present more than 2/3 of all diagnoses. During the period under the study, following total numbers, mean relative incidences (per 10,000 live births, in brackets) and mean prenatal diagnostics efficiency (in %) were found in following chromosomal syndromes: Down syndrome 2,244 (16.58) and 63.37%, Edwards syndrome 521 (3.85) and 79.93%, Patau syndrome 201 (1.49) and 68.87%, Turner syndrome 380 (2.81) and 79.89%, 47,XXX syndrome 61 (0.45) and 59.74%, Klinefelter syndrome 163 (1.20) and 73.65% and 47,XYY syndrome 22 (0.16) and 54.76%.The study gives updated results of incidences analysis of both pre- and postnatally diagnosed chromosomal birth defects in the Czech Republic during the 1994-2007 period. Incidences found in our study correspond (in case of trisomies 13, 18 and 21) with those published widely in literature as well as with those found in large-scale international studies (ICBDSR, EUROCAT). In case of gonosomal aberrations, incidences found in this study are lower that those published, most probably due to a later registration (over 15 years of age of the child) of these diagnoses.[Prenatal genetic screening: biochemical markers of the first and second quarter].Examination of a first-trimester Down syndrome screening concept on a mix of 11,107 high- and low-risk patients at a private center for prenatal medicine in Germany.To assess the performance of a combined first-trimester screening concept for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 applied to a low- and high-risk patient sample in a specialized private center for prenatal medicine.The quality of different first-trimester screening algorithms (risk calculation based on maternal age and nuchal translucency alone, maternal age and serum parameters (free beta-hCG and PAPP-A) alone and a combination of both) was evaluated in a study population of low- and high-risk cases for fetal aneuploidies. All measurements were performed between the 11th+0 and 13th+6 weeks of gestation during the study period from November 2000 to December 2006, in accordance with the guidelines of the Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF), London.Of 11,107 women included in the study, we had a complete follow-up on 10,668. The difference between the detection rate was insignificant for both the low-risk and the high-risk groups. In the overall study population, 52 of 59 cases of trisomy 21 were detected when a pre-defined cut-off of 1:300 was applied (detection rate (DR) 88.1%; 95% confidence interval (CI): 79.8-96.4 and false-positive rate (FPR) 4.9%; 95% CI: 4.5-5.3). For trisomies 13 and 18 with a pre-defined cut-off of 1:150, 26 of 32 cases were detected (DR 81.3%; 95% CI: 67.8-94.8 and FPR 0.7%; 95% CI: 0.5-0.9). The highest sensitivity was between 11+0 and 11+6 weeks of gestation with all cases of trisomy 21 detected with a FPR 5.1%; 95% CI: 3.7-6.5.In our study population of different risk categories, the detection rate using the combined risk calculation based on maternal age, fetal NT, maternal PAPP-A and free beta-hCG levels was superior to the application of either parameter alone.Comparison of modes of ascertainment for mosaic vs complete trisomy 21.We sought to compare the indications for amniocentesis leading to the detection of either mosaicism of trisomy 21 (mosaic-T21) or complete trisomy 21 (T21).A retrospective review of a large amniocentesis database (n = 494,163) was conducted. All specimens with mosaic-T21 (n = 124) were compared with a maternal age-matched group of T21 fetuses (n = 496). Samples with normal karyotypes were matched for maternal age and served as normal controls (n = 496). The chi(2) testing was used for statistical analysis.The presence of an abnormal first-trimester screen, abnormal sonographic findings, and specifically the single sonographic abnormalities of either a cystic hygroma or a cardiac anomaly were significantly less common in the mosaic-T21 as compared with the T21 group. There were no such differences between the mosaic-T21 and the normal control group.Fetuses with mosaic-T21, similar to those with normal karyotype, do not present with the same abnormal screening tests as fetuses with T21.Maternal serum ADAM12 (A disintegrin and metalloprotease) in chromosomally abnormal pregnancy at 11-13 weeks.The objective of this study was to investigate the potential value of ADAM12 (A disintegrin and metalloprotease) in first-trimester screening for trisomy 21 and other major chromosomal abnormalities.The concentration of ADAM12 was measured at 11-13 weeks in cases of trisomy 21 (n = 49), trisomy 18 (n = 28), trisomy 13 (n = 20), Turner syndrome (n = 29), triploidy (n = 10), and euploid pregnancies (n = 272). The levels of ADAM12, expressed as multiples of median (MoM), were compared in cases and controls and were assessed for association with free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A).The median ADAM12 value in trisomy 21 (0.961 MoM) was not significantly different from the euploid fetuses (1.013 MoM), but in trisomy 18 (0.697 MoM), trisomy 13 (0.577 MoM), triploidy (0.426 MoM), and Turner syndrome (0.747 MoM), the levels were significantly lower. In both the euploid and aneuploid pregnancies, there was a significant association between ADAM12 and free beta-hCG and PAPP-A.Maternal serum ADAM12 concentration at 11-13 weeks of gestation is unlikely to be useful in first-trimester screening for chromosomal abnormalities because in trisomy 21 the levels are not significantly different from normal, and in the other chromosomal defects, there is a significant association between ADAM12 and the traditional biochemical markers of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A.Maternal serum placental growth factor at 11-13 weeks in chromosomally abnormal pregnancies.To investigate the potential value of maternal serum placental growth factor (PlGF) in first-trimester screening for trisomy 21 and other major chromosomal abnormalities.The maternal serum concentration of PlGF at 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks was measured in 609 euploid and 175 chromosomally abnormal pregnancies, including 90 with trisomy 21, 28 with trisomy 18, 19 with trisomy 13, 28 with Turner syndrome and 10 with triploidy. The levels of PlGF were compared in cases and controls, and were assessed for association with free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).Logistic regression analysis demonstrated in the euploid group that significant independent contributions for log PlGF were provided by fetal crown-rump length, maternal weight, cigarette smoking and ethnic origin; after correction for these variables the median multiple of the median (MoM) PlGF was 0.991. Significantly lower values were observed in pregnancies with trisomy 21 (0.707 MoM), trisomy 18 (0.483 MoM), trisomy 13 (0.404 MoM), triploidy (0.531 MoM) and Turner syndrome (0.534 MoM). Significant contributions in the prediction of trisomy 21 were provided by maternal age, serum PlGF, PAPP-A and free beta-hCG, and the detection rates of screening with the combination of these variables were 70% and 80% at respective false-positive rates of 3% and 5%.Maternal serum PlGF concentration at 11-13 weeks of gestation is potentially useful in first-trimester screening for trisomy 21 and other major chromosomal abnormalities.[Trisomy 21, after a half century].Should the first-trimester aneuploidy screen be maternal age adjusted? Screening by absolute risk versus risk adjusted to maternal age.To compare the absolute risk (AR) screening approach to the current approach of risk adjusted to maternal age in patients undergoing first-trimester screening (FTS).Three-stage retrospective analysis of 3073 pregnancies that had FTS during 2006-2007. (1) Distribution analysis of AR as defined by (final FTS risk)/(risk by age). (2) Analysis of the screen-positive group by the AR method. (3) Analysis of the screen-positive advanced maternal age (AMA) patients.(1) AR > 1 was found in 151 (4.9%) patients, and AR > 1.2, 2 and 3 was found in 4, 3.1 and 2%, respectively. (2) 145 (4.7%) of the 3073 patients screened positive. Twelve were diagnosed with chromosomal abnormalities and 3 with major anomalies. All had AR > 1.2. Of the 145 (55.8%) screen positives, 81 had AR > 1.2. AR was significantly higher in the chromosomally abnormal as compared to normal gestations (t-test, p < 0.01). (3)Of the 145 screen positives, 103 were AMA. Only 39 (28%) had an AR > 1.2.The AR screening approach, using AR > 1.2 as a cut-off, captured all abnormal pregnancies diagnosed by the current screening method. This method offers lower false positive (FP) rates to AMA women and has the potential for higher detection rates in younger women.Fetal nasal bone in screening for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 and Turner syndrome at 11-13 weeks of gestation.To investigate the performance of first-trimester screening for aneuploidies by including assessment of the fetal nasal bone in the combined test of maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness, fetal heart rate (FHR) and serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).Screening by the combined test was performed in singleton pregnancies, including 19,614 with euploid fetuses, 122 with trisomy 21, 36 with trisomy 18, 20 with trisomy 13 and eight with Turner syndrome. In all cases the fetal nasal bone was assessed and classified as present or absent. We examined the performance of two screening strategies: firstly, assessment of the nasal bone in all patients and secondly, first-stage screening using the combined test in all patients followed by second-stage assessment of the nasal bone only in those with an intermediate risk of 1 in 51 to 1 in 1000 after the first stage. To validate the new risk algorithm we used a second independent dataset of 19 651 fetuses, including 139 with trisomy 21.The nasal bone was absent in 2.6% of the euploid fetuses, 59.8% with trisomy 21, 52.8% with trisomy 18, 45.0% with trisomy 13 and in none of the fetuses with Turner syndrome. Respective figures for an absent nasal bone in the validation population, which contained fewer Black women, were 0.6%, 62.6%, 55.3%, 35.3% and 41.7%. In a screening policy based on maternal age, fetal NT, FHR, serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A, for a fixed risk cut-off of 1 : 100, the false-positive rate was 3.0%. The standardized detection rates were 91% for trisomy 21 and 100% for trisomy 18, trisomy 13 and Turner syndrome, respectively. Assessment of the nasal bone in all pregnancies reduced the false-positive rate to 2.5% without changing the detection rate. A detection rate of 93% was achieved with the two-stage strategy at a false-positive rate of 2.4% in which it was necessary to assess the nasal bone in only 15% of the total population. In the validation dataset, screening by the combined test and using a risk cut-off of 1 : 100 detected 90% of the cases with trisomy 21 for a false-positive rate of 4%. Inclusion of the nasal bone increased the detection rate to 92% for a false-positive rate of 2.9%. Contingent screening detected 92% of cases for a false-positive rate of 2.9%.Assessment of the fetal nasal bone improves the performance of first-trimester screening for trisomy 21.Comparison of different strategies in prenatal screening for Down's syndrome: cost effectiveness analysis of computer simulation.To assess and compare the cost effectiveness of three different strategies for prenatal screening for Down's syndrome (integrated test, sequential screening, and contingent screenings) and to determine the most useful cut-off values for risk.Computer simulations to study integrated, sequential, and contingent screening strategies with various cut-offs leading to 19 potential screening algorithms.The computer simulation was populated with data from the Serum Urine and Ultrasound Screening Study (SURUSS), real unit costs for healthcare interventions, and a population of 110 948 pregnancies from the province of Québec for the year 2001.Cost effectiveness ratios, incremental cost effectiveness ratios, and screening options' outcomes.The contingent screening strategy dominated all other screening options: it had the best cost effectiveness ratio ($C26,833 per case of Down's syndrome) with fewer procedure related euploid miscarriages and unnecessary terminations (respectively, 6 and 16 per 100,000 pregnancies). It also outperformed serum screening at the second trimester. In terms of the incremental cost effectiveness ratio, contingent screening was still dominant: compared with screening based on maternal age alone, the savings were $C30,963 per additional birth with Down's syndrome averted. Contingent screening was the only screening strategy that offered early reassurance to the majority of women (77.81%) in first trimester and minimised costs by limiting retesting during the second trimester (21.05%). For the contingent and sequential screening strategies, the choice of cut-off value for risk in the first trimester test significantly affected the cost effectiveness ratios (respectively, from $C26,833 to $C37,260 and from $C35,215 to $C45,314 per case of Down's syndrome), the number of procedure related euploid miscarriages (from 6 to 46 and from 6 to 45 per 100,000 pregnancies), and the number of unnecessary terminations (from 16 to 26 and from 16 to 25 per 100,000 pregnancies).Contingent screening, with a first trimester cut-off value for high risk of 1 in 9, is the preferred option for prenatal screening of women for pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome.Down syndrome screening: determining the cutoff level of risk for invasive testing.Second-trimester genetic sonogram for detection of fetal chromosomal abnormalities in a community-based antenatal testing unit.To evaluate the efficacy of the second-trimester genetic sonogram for the detection of Down syndrome and other chromosomal abnormalities in a community-based antenatal testing unit.This was a retrospective study using data from two community hospital antenatal ultrasound units. Six hundred and sixty fetal ultrasound examinations in both at-risk (n = 581) and low-risk (n = 79) pregnancies were performed from 15 + 0 to 22 + 6 weeks' gestation and all cases were verified for outcome data. The sonographic detection of a major congenital anomaly or a sonographic marker (increased nuchal skinfold, short humerus, short femur, echogenic bowel, pyelectasis, echogenic intracardiac focus, absence or hypoplasia of fifth mid phalanx or choroid plexus cyst) was recorded. The entire group of 660 ultrasound examinations as well as subgroups with and without non-ultrasound risk factors for a fetal chromosomal abnormality were analyzed to determine the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values and positive likelihood ratio for the detection of Down syndrome and other fetal chromosomal abnormalities.There were 32 (4.85%) chromosomal abnormalities in our study population. Twelve (3.75%) of these were Down syndrome, of which eight (66.6%) had a positive ultrasound examination in the second trimester. Six of seven (85.7%) of the trisomy 18 fetuses, 2/2 of the trisomy 13 fetuses and 2/3 of the non-mosaic 45,X fetuses had positive sonograms. The overall detection rate for chromosomal abnormalities was 20/32 (sensitivity, 62.5%; specificity, 80.7%; negative predictive value, 97.7%; positive predictive value, 14.2%; positive likelihood ratio, 3.24). Major structural defects and sonographic markers, excluding hypoplastic fifth digit and choroid plexus cyst, occurred significantly more frequently in Down syndrome cases compared with normal ones.In a community-based antenatal testing unit we have demonstrated a detection rate for fetal Down syndrome with the second-trimester genetic sonogram that is comparable to the range of sensitivities reported by larger centers involving primarily high-risk patients. However, only 12 of the 32 fetal chromosomal abnormalities that we encountered were Down syndrome.Validation of QF-PCR in a Korean population.Quantitative fluorescence polymerase chain reaction (QF-PCR) is a rapid and reliable method for screening common aneuploidies, but it is not an accustomed way of testing in Korea. Our objectives were to investigate QF-PCR as a means for prenatal aneuploidy screening and to evaluate the short tandem repeat (STR) markers in a Korean population.Three formats of QF-PCR assays that utilize an Elucigene kit (Tepnel Diagnostics), which contains 7 primer pairs located on chromosome 21, 16 primers on chromosomes 21, 18, and 13, or 26 primers on chromosomes 21, 18, 13, X, and Y were performed.Eight hundred of prenatal samples were screened and the results were compared to that of the results obtained with conventional cytogenetics. The 31 of 33 (93%) autosomal and sex chromosome aneuploidies were detected excluding one case of maternal cell contamination and one case of mosaicism respectively; there were no false positives. Interestingly, submicroscopic duplication of the D13S634 marker was observed in 1.6% of cases.For prenatal aneuploidy screening, QF-PCR was proved to be efficient and reliable. However, considering the high frequency of triallelic patterns of one STR marker that has not been found in other populations, careful evaluation is recommended in each STR marker when it is applied to different populations.Tricuspid regurgitation in screening for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 and Turner syndrome at 11+0 to 13+6 weeks of gestation.To investigate the performance of first-trimester screening for aneuploidies by including assessment of tricuspid blood flow in the combined test of maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness, fetal heart rate (FHR) and serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A).Screening by the combined test was performed in singleton pregnancies, including 19 614 with chromosomally normal fetuses or the delivery of a phenotypically normal baby (euploid group), 122 with trisomy 21, 36 with trisomy 18, 20 with trisomy 13 and eight with Turner syndrome. In all cases tricuspid flow was assessed to determine if there was tricuspid regurgitation. We examined the performance of two screening strategies: firstly, assessment of tricuspid flow in all patients and secondly, first-stage screening using the combined test in all patients followed by second-stage assessment of tricuspid flow only in those with an intermediate risk of 1 in 51 to 1 in 1000 after the first stage.Tricuspid regurgitation was observed in 0.9% of the euploid fetuses and 55.7%, 33.3% and 30% of the fetuses with trisomies 21, 18 and 13, respectively, and in 37.5% of those with Turner syndrome. In a screening policy based on maternal age, fetal NT, FHR, serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A, for a fixed false positive rate of 3% the standardized detection rates were 91% for trisomy 21 and 100% for trisomy 18, trisomy 13 and Turner syndrome. Assessment of tricuspid flow in all pregnancies would increase the detection rate of trisomy 21 to 96%, and the detection rates of trisomy 18, trisomy 13 and Turner syndrome would be 92%, 100% and 100%, respectively. The same detection rates were achieved with the two-stage strategy-in which it was necessary to assess tricuspid flow in only 15% of the total population-at a false positive rate of 2.4%.Assessment of tricuspid flow improves the performance of first-trimester screening for trisomy 21.Advanced maternal age as a sole indication for genetic amniocentesis; risk-benefit analysis based on a large database reflecting the current common practice.Recent advances in prenatal screening, including first and second trimester genetic screening as well as targeted sonography, have significantly improved the detection of trisomy 21. Therefore, several investigators have questioned the validity of recommending genetic amniocentesis to all women who are 35 years or older at delivery. Thus, we sought to investigate the risks and benefits associated with performing genetic amniocentesis in women whose sole indication for testing was advanced maternal age (AMA).A retrospective review of a Genzyme Genetics amniocentesis database (January 2006-December 2006) was performed. All specimens obtained from women of AMA as the sole indication were eligible for analysis. The amniocentesis-related potential fetal loss was calculated based on the traditional fetal loss rate of 1/200 as well as the recently published loss rate of 1/1600 procedures. Risk-benefit analysis was performed by comparing the number of trisomy 21 fetuses identified within the AMA group to the potential number of amniocentesis-related fetal losses within this group.A total of 87,241 amniocentesis specimens were processed during the study period. AMA was the sole indication for genetic amniocentesis in 43,303 cases which formed the study group. In 399 (0.92%) of these cases, a trisomy 21 was identified. Assuming an amniocentesis related fetal loss rates of 1/200 or 1/1600; 217 or 27 fetal losses would have been expected, respectively.Our analysis suggests that the benefit of genetic amniocentesis for the sole indication of AMA far outweighs the potential amniocentesis-related fetal loss rate, regardless of the actual rate one considers.[Prenatal diagnosis of trisomy 21: the Tunisian experience].Down syndrome (Trisomy 21) is the most common fetal chromosomal abnormality in humans. Its clinical signs are now well known. Methods for prenatal screening have advanced substantially in the past two decades.To describe our experience with prenatal diagnosis of Down syndrome, including the indications, methods and results.This retrospective study examined cases over a 4-year period. We adopted a sequential screening strategy for patients followed in our department since the beginning of their pregnancies after informed consent. We proposed first trimester ultrasound that measured nuchal translucency thickness and followed it with maternal serum screening. Some patients underwent screening during the second trimester or third trimester ultrasound. To assess the results, we studied the mothers' epidemiological characteristics and analysed the circumstances of prenatal diagnosis of trisomy 21 (T21).We identified 22 cases of T21 during the study period, for a total prevalence of 0.98 per thousand. The diagnosis was prenatal in 13 cases, mainly due to ultrasound signs. Of the 14 patients seen prenatally, only 8 were followed from early pregnancy. Five had enlarged nuchal translucency (> 95th percentile). Three had positive second trimester serum screening tests. One patient had amniocentesis planned because of her age (table 1). T21 was diagnosed in the second trimester in two cases and in the third trimester in three. The major morphological abnormalities observed were cardiac. We found an atrioventricular canal defect in four cases, and fetal hydrops in two cases (Table 2). The median gestational age at diagnosis of T21 in this study was 21 weeks. The diagnosis was missed in one patient followed throughout pregnancy in our unit. The median gestational age at termination of pregnancy was 22 weeks. Only one patient chose not to terminate the pregnancy. Her fetus, delivered at term, had no major pathologies.The establishment of a screening strategy for trisomy 21 in Tunisia is necessary to reduce handicaps. It should begin by expanding first-trimester ultrasound with nuchal translucency measurement. At the same time, serum marker testing should be offered to all patients. Routine amniocentesis for advanced maternal age should be avoided.[Predictive value for fetal outcome of Doppler velocimetry of the ductus venosus between the 11th and the 14th gestation week].to study the value of Doppler velocimetry of the ductus venosus, between the 11th and 14th weeks of pregnancy, associated to the nuchal translucency thickness measurement, in the detection of adverse fetal outcome.a transversal and prospective study in which a total of 1,268 fetuses were studied consecutively. In 56 cases, a cytogenetic study was performed on material obtained from a biopsy of the chorionic villus and, in 1,181 cases, the postnatal phenotype was used as a basis for the result. In addition to the routine ultrasonographic examination, all the fetuses were submitted to measurement of the nuchal translucency thickness and to Doppler velocimetry of the ductus venosus. Aiming at prevalence and accuracy indices, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, probability of false-positive, probability of false-negative, reason of positive probability and reason of negative probability were calculated and analyzed.from the total of 1,268 fetuses, 1,183 cases were selected for analysis. From this number, 1,170 fetuses were normal (98.9%) and 13 fetuses presented adverse outcome at birth (1.1%), including fetal death (trisomy 21 and 22) in two cases; genetic syndrome (Nooman) in one case; two cases of polymalformed fetuses; cardiopathy in three cases; and other structural defects in five cases. The prevalence of the modified ductus venosus (wave A zero/reverse) in the studied population was of 14 cases (1.2%), with a false-positive rate of 0.7%.there is a significant correlation between the alteration of the ductus venosus Doppler velocimetry and the thickness of the nuchal translucency as an ultrasonographic marker for the first trimester of gestation, in the detection of adverse fetal outcome, especially serious malformations. The ductus venosus was able to diminish the false-positive result in comparison to the isolated use of the nuchal translucency thickness, improving considerably the positive predictive value of the test.First trimester predictors of adverse pregnancy outcomes.To identify first trimester indicators of adverse pregnancy outcomes.Data were obtained from the statewide evaluation of first trimester screening for Down syndrome in Western Australia which included 22,695 pregnancies screened between August 2001 and October 2003. Screening data were linked with pregnancy outcome information from the Hospital Morbidity Database and the Birth Defects Registry. The odds ratios (OR) of adverse outcomes were analysed for combined risk incorporating maternal age, nuchal translucency (NT) and biochemical parameters and then separately for each parameter (pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), free beta human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and NT).Risk assessments for first trimester combined screening are derived from maternal age, ultrasound measurement of fetal NT, maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A. Increased combined risk for Down syndrome was significantly (P < 0.01) associated with spontaneous loss at or before 24 weeks gestation (OR 13.51), birth defects (OR 6.58) and preterm birth at or before 32 weeks gestation (OR 3.2). Maternal serum PAPP-A below the 5th centile was associated with Down syndrome (OR 8.43), spontaneous loss before 24 weeks (OR 5.04) and later than 24 weeks (OR 4.50), preterm delivery before 32 weeks (OR 3.11) and before 37 weeks (OR 2.24). NT above the 95th centile was associated with Down syndrome (OR 43.91), birth defects (OR 4.02) and spontaneous loss before 24 weeks (OR 6.24). Low levels of free beta-hCG and increased NT were less consistently associated with adverse outcomes and high levels of free beta-hCG showed limited use as an indicator. The detection rates for all outcomes other than Down syndrome were less than 40%.Biochemical indicators and NT that are measured during first trimester screening for Down syndrome show a number of associations with adverse outcomes, but do not show appropriate performance characteristics for screening tests. These data are consistent with the view that the individual components, specifically low PAPP-A levels alone, do not provide an effective screening tool for adverse pregnancy outcomes.First trimester Down's syndrome screening marker values and cigarette smoking: new data and a meta-analysis on free beta human chorionic gonadotophin, pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A and nuchal translucency.To examine the effect of smoking on three first trimester screening markers for Down's syndrome that constitute the Combined test, namely nuchal translucency (NT), pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and free beta human chorionic gonadotophin (free beta-hCG) and to use the results to determine which of these markers need to be adjusted for smoking and by how much.The difference in the median multiple of the median (MoM) values in smokers compared to non-smokers was determined for NT, PAPP-A and free beta-hCG in 12,517 unaffected pregnancies that had routine first trimester Combined test screening. These results were then included in a meta-analysis of published studies and the effect of adjusting for smoking on screening performance of the Combined test was estimated.The results using the routine screening data were similar to the summary estimates from the meta-analysis of all studies. The results from the meta-analysis were; median MoM in smokers compared to non-smokers: 1.06 NT (95% confidence interval 1.03 to 1.10), 0.81 PAPP-A (0.80 to 0.83) and 0.94 free beta-hCG (0.89 to 0.99). The effect of adjusting for smoking on the Combined test is small, with an estimated less than half percentage point increase in the detection rate (the proportion of affected pregnancies with a positive result) for a 3% false-positive rate (the proportion of unaffected pregnancies with a positive result) and less than 0.2 percentage point decrease in the false-positive rate for an 85% detection rate.Adjusting first trimester screening markers for smoking has a minimal favourable effect on screening performance, but it is simple to implement and this paper provides the adjustment factors needed if a decision is made to make such an adjustment.A new approach to calculating the risk of chromosomal abnormalities with first-trimester screening data.First-trimester screening at 11 - 14 weeks has been proven to be very useful in the early detection of chromosomal defects. The aim of this project was to develop a CE-certified new risk calculation program (PRC = Prenatal Risk Calculation) using a nationwide database.The database underlying the new risk calculation procedure was established in Germany from 2003 through 2006. Overall, the database includes measurements from 70,030 pregnant women having given birth to healthy children. Following consideration of all pregnancies associated with a chromosomally abnormal outcome, the sample size was 451. The algorithm used for calculating the risk of a chromosomally abnormal outcome comprises the following variables: maternal age, crown-rump length (CRL) (restricted to a range from 45 - 84 mm or, equivalently, 11 + 1 - 14 + 0 weeks of gestation), nuchal translucency (NT), as well as the maternal serum parameters PAPP-A (pregnancy associated plasma protein A) and free beta-hCG (free human chorionic gonadotropin). In a preliminary cross-validation study, we applied both the new algorithm and the FMF UK program to an independent sample containing n = 40,568 pregnancies with negative outcome, n = 187 cases of trisomy 21, n = 34 trisomies 18 and n = 13 trisomies 13.Using the primary sample of 70,030 pregnancies with a negative outcome, reference bands were constructed for the sonographic parameter fetal nuchal translucency and the biochemical parameters PAPP-A and free beta-HCG. Instead of MoM values we used "degree of extremeness" (DoE) values. This statistical parameter has been proven to give more precise results than the MoM measure because it assesses the deviation of the actual measurement value from the centre of the reference band expressed as a multiple of the width of the respective band section. The result of the risk calculation is visualized by means of a traffic light graph which allows the patient to comprehend her individual risk at first glance. The red color indicates a high risk, green a low risk, and yellow represents a moderate risk. In our preliminary cross-validation study the detection rate obtained for the German algorithm was 86.6 % for trisomy 21, 94.1 % for trisomy 18 and 92.4 for trisomy 13. The corresponding detection rates obtained with the same data by the FMF UK program were 86.1 %, 82.3 % and 69.2 % throughout. The false-positive rate was 5.0 % throughout.The new risk calculation procedure of the FMF Germany (PRC) has been made available as a CE-certified computer program. In screening for trisomy 21 it yields results comparable to those of the program used by the FMF UK. Regarding the diagnosis of trisomy 13 and 18, even higher detection rates are currently achieved with the German algorithm. Program, data base and license key are available free of charge to registered members of the FMF Germany.[Evaluation of plasmatic A protein as only marker during first trimester of pregnancy].One of main targets of prenatal diagnosis is Down's syndrome. Biochemical and sonographic markers together are efficient. The use of a single marker has not shown the same efficiency, although it has not been sufficient evaluated.To shown results of PAPP-A as a single marker in first pregnancy trimester.Prospective, cross-sectional and random study, which evaluated 400 women with biochemical marker PAPP-A in the first pregnancy trimester.PAPP-A detected a true positive case (0.3%), 28 false positive cases (7.0%) and 371 true negative cases (92.8%), there were no false negative cases. Between 9 to 11 weeks, rate of false positives fluctuated between 5.5 and 6.7%, in 12th week it was 1.2% and in 13th week 18.2%. PAPP-A has 95.1% of specificity (weeks 9 to 12) and 82.2% of maternal age.A 5% of false positive rate is acceptable for prenatal diagnosis markers. It has been reported that PAPP-A is less discriminatory at 10 weeks of gestation. In this study the rate fluctuated between 6 and 7% (weeks 9 to 11), which increased at 13th week. Markers with low false positive rate stimulate the use of prenatal screening.The use of combined markers: biochemical (free fraction of beta-hGC, PAPP-A) and sonographic, are most recommendable in the first trimester of the pregnancy because of them low rate of false positives. PAPP-A can be used as a single marker between 9 to 11 weeks; false positive cases must be studied with combined markers.Screening for triploidy by the risk algorithms for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 at 11 weeks to 13 weeks and 6 days of gestation.To examine the effectiveness in screening for triploidy at 11 weeks to 13 weeks and 6 days of gestation by the combined use of the risk algorithms for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 based on maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness, fetal heart rate (FHR) and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A.Prospective screening for trisomy 21, including 56 376 normal singleton pregnancies and 31 cases with triploidy (24 digynic and 7 diandric). Patient-specific risks for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 were calculated by multiplying the age related risk for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 with the likelihood ratio (LR) for fetal NT and with a combined LR for FHR, free beta-hCG and PAPP-A, respectively. Detection rates (DRs) and false positive rates (FPRs) for triploidy were calculated by taking the proportion with risks above a given risk threshold and standardized for maternal age according to the distribution of pregnancies in England and Wales in 2000 to 2002.In digynic triploidy, free beta-hCG was 0.16 (range 0.02-0.95) MoM and PAPP-A was 0.06 (range 0.02-0.47) MoM and the respective values for diandric triploidy were 8.74 (range 2.83-47.0) and 0.74 (range 0.32-1.51) MoM. Use of the trisomy 21 algorithm identified 5 of the 7 diandric cases and 3 of the 24 digynic ones at a 3% FPR. Combined use of the risk algorithms for trisomies 18 and 13 identified 20 of the 24 cases with the digynic triploidy at the FPR of 0.2%. When screen positivity was defined by a 3% FPR using the algorithm for trisomy 21 and an additional 0.2% FPR using the algorithms for trisomies 18 and 13, the total FPR was 3.1% and the DR was 84%.A beneficial side-effect of first trimester combined screening for trisomies is the detection of a high proportion of fetuses with triploidy.Risk assessment for Down syndrome with genetic sonogram in women at risk.To evaluate the algorithms of risk assessment for Down syndrome (DS).Cohort study conducted in women at risk undergoing midtrimester genetic sonogram. Univariate and logistic regression analysis were used to relate findings to the occurrence of DS. The resulting model was validated in an independent population of patients.In a multivariable model adjusted for gestational age and maternal age, nuchal fold thickness (NFT) >or= 5 mm (OR = 4.6, 95% CI 0.9-23.9), presence of renal pelvic dilation (OR = 18.0, 95% CI 2.9-110.5), absent mid-phalanx of the 5th finger (OR = 29.9, 95% CI 6.1-145.8), presence of noncardiac malformations (OR = 20.1, 95% CI 2.6-154.7) or isolated heart defects (OR = 60.2, 95% CI 9.5-382.8), the interactions of gestational age with NFT >or= 5 mm (P = 0.04) and malformations with heart defects (P = 0.03) were significantly associated with DS. Utilizing this model and a risk cutoff point of 1/270, the sensitivity was 83.3% (5/6) with a false positive rate (FPR) of 28.5% (159/558).Genetic sonogram has adequate accuracy to be incorporated into management algorithms for risk assessment of DS in women at risk.First trimester intact hCG as an early marker of trisomy 21: a promise unrecognised?An initial study of trisomy 21 cases showed that prior to 10 weeks, maternal serum levels of intact hCG in the early first trimester are lower than normal. Here we further study the levels prior to and after 10 weeks of gestation to further establish whether or not the intact hCG is effective as a very early screening marker.Fifty-nine samples from pregnancies with trisomy 21 were identified, 31 were collected between the sixth and ninth weeks of gestation and 28 after the tenth week. A series of 629 gestational age-matched samples collected during the same period formed the control group. Intact hCG was measured by a DELFIA assay.The multiples of the median (MoM) in cases (n = 31) collected prior to 10 weeks were 0.79 (CI 0.62-0.98) at a median gestation of 9.1 weeks. Prior to 9 weeks (n = 14) the median was 0.774 (CI 0.54-1.09) at a median gestation of 8.5 weeks. Modelling the detection rate for a 3 or 5% false-positive rate when screening using intact hCG, free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 8-10 weeks of gestation indicated that 71 or 77% of cases would be detected.More data are needed to establish a secure MoM for intact hCG in pregnancies prior to 10 weeks, before it could be considered a suitable screening marker.Clinical and cytogenetic findings on 31,615 mid-trimester amniocenteses.Since amniocentesis made prenatal diagnosis feasible in 1967, the method has become a popular tool in obstetric practices. In Korea, the demand for genetic counseling and prenatal tests has increased markedly because the number and proportion of pregnancies in women aged 35 yr and older have increased over a 20-yr period. Here we report clinical and cytogenetic findings on 31,615 mid-trimester amniocenteses.To investigate the changes in the annual number of amniocentesis, distribution of indications and age, and cytogenetic findings and abnormality rate according to indications, this study retrospectively analyzed 31,615 cases of mid-trimester amniocentesis performed at Seoul Clinical Laboratories, an independent medical laboratory center, during the past 13 yr (1994-2007).The annual number of amniocenteses has increased substantially since 1994. Among the 31,615 amniocentesis cases, the maternal age between 30 and 34 yr was the most common age group (35.4%). Among clinical indications, abnormal maternal serum screening results have been the most common indication for amniocentesis since 1994. Chromosomal abnormalities were detected in 973 cases (3.1%). Down syndrome was the most common abnormality found (36.9%, 359/973). In sex chromosomal abnormalities, 53 cases of Turner syndromes, 32 cases of Klinefelter syndromes, 20 cases of triple X syndromes, and 15 cases of 47,XYY were diagnosed. Of structural rearrangements, reciprocal translocations between two autosomes were the most common (15.5%, 151/973). Abnormal ltrasonographic findings showed the highest positive predictive value (5.9%) among the clinical indications.The present study could be used for the establishment of a database for genetic counseling. The discovery of an abnormality provides the option of termination or continuation in the pregnancy, a more suitable obstetric management in Korea.Fetal nasal bone length and Down syndrome during the second trimester in a Chinese population.The purpose of the present study was to build a database of reference ranges of fetal nasal bone length (NBL) in a Chinese population. The accuracy rate of detecting Down syndrome was also analyzed using fetal NBL as a marker.The control group of fetuses included 342 normal singleton pregnancies with no chromosomal or congenital anomalies. The present study was a cross-section study and the control group was used to construct percentile values of NBL from 13 to 29 gestational weeks of age. Two-dimensional ultrasonography was used for the nasal bone studies. Measurements of NBL were collected and each fetus contributed a single value to the reference sample. During the study period, 14 fetuses with Down syndrome were examined. Measurement of fetal NBL was made during amniocentesis, with gestational age ranging from 13 to 19 weeks.From 342 normal fetuses with gestational age ranging from 13 to 29 weeks, reference ranges of NBL were constructed. The reference ranges were constructed from the 100(1 - p)% reference range: Y +/- Zp x square root sigma 2, where Y = 25 - exp(3.58 - 0.044 x t + 0.0006 x t2), with Y being the fitted mean of regression model and t being gestational age (weeks). Using fetal NBL, the regression model was Pr(Down syndrome) = exp(W)/ [1 + exp(W)], where W = 0.62-4.80 x NBL (multiples of the median) in predicting Down syndrome. Fetal NBL was found to have a sensitivity and specificity of 0.78 and 0.78, respectively, in predicting Down syndrome in the second trimester of pregnancy.Fetal NBL measurement can provide a simple and useful algorithm to predict Down syndrome during the second trimester of pregnancy.Comparison of the new PRC software with the established algorithm of the FMF UK for the detection of trisomy 21 and 18/13.The aim of this study was to compare the newly developed Prenatal Risk Calculation (PRC) software and the established Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF) UK algorithm for their detection and false-positive rates in prenatal screening of trisomy 21 or 18/13.Nuchal translucency was measured by FMF-certified sonographers in 39,004 pregnancies. Risks for trisomy 21 and 18/13 were calculated together with serum PAPPA and free beta-hCG in all cases. Overall, 109 cases of trisomy 21 and 39 cases of trisomy 18 or 13 occurred. The detection rates were calculated for all 109 trisomy 21 cases using both PRC and ASTRAIA, software based on the official algorithm of the FMF UK. The false-positive rate was calculated on the basis of all 39,004 cases for ASTRAIA and on the basis of 3,620 additional cases for PRC. The comparison of the algorithms was performed by the calculation of receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) curves.The detection rates for trisomy 21 for a 5% false-positive rate were 91% (99/109) for PRC and 90% (98/109) for ASTRAIA. The difference was not significant. ROC curve analysis showed an area under the curve (AUC) of 0.976 for PRC and 0.975 for ASTRAIA (p = 0.80). At a cutoff of 1:300, PRC showed a slightly (nonsignificantly) higher, but nonsignificant false-positive rate (3.8% for ASTRAIA, version since 2005, 5.1% for PRC) associated with a slightly (nonsignificantly) higher, but nonsignificant detection rate of 91% (PRC) versus 88% (ASTRAIA). The false-positive rate of the biochemical risk (without NT) in PRC was significantly higher (17.7%) than with the FMF UK algorithm (9.0%) at a common risk cutoff of 1:300. A reason for the higher false-positive rates in PRC may be the missing correction for maternal weight, smoking status, and ethnicity. The detection rates for trisomy 18/13 at a risk cutoff of 1:150 were 79% for PRC and 77% for ASTRAIA. False-positive rates for trisomy 18/13 at a cutoff of 1:150 were 1.5% for PRC and 0.6% for ASTRAIA (differences were nonsignificant).For a 5% false-positive rate, the new PRC software detects as many trisomy 21 and trisomy 18/13 cases as the established algorithms of the FMF UK. In order to reduce the false-positive rate for the biochemical risk, the algorithm of the PRC software should be redesigned to include the maternal weight, smoking status of the mother, and the ethnicity.How imprecise may the measurement of fetal nuchal translucency be without worsening first-trimester screening?First-trimester screening (FTS) has a trisomy 21 detection rate of about 90%. Despite profound training, the practically reached measurement quality of nuchal translucency (NT) is probably not optimal. This study investigated the impact of measurement errors on FTS.The data on 10,116 combined FTSs were obtained in a multicenter study. Risk assessment was performed by the JOY software following the Nicolaides risk calculation principles. To investigate the impact of measurement errors, the NT values were artificially altered and the adjusted risks were recalculated. Test performance parameters were obtained and compared with the correct measurements.In this study 85 fetuses were genetically affected. The screening was wrongly inconspicuous in 12 cases and in 479 cases the FTS offered false-positive results. An assumed NT error of +/-0.1 mm already causes a highly significant change in the false-positive rate. A difference of -0.2 mm leads to a visible change in false negatives.This study demonstrates that even the smallest deviations will significantly affect the false-negative rate. The detection of really diseased fetuses is influenced at a -0.2-mm measurement error. Therefore the NT measurement has to be as precise as possible.Prediction of patient-specific risk for fetal loss using maternal characteristics and first- and second-trimester maternal serum Down syndrome markers.To develop and evaluate a method of estimating patient-specific risk for fetal loss by combining maternal characteristics with serum markers.Data were obtained on 36,014 women from the FaSTER trial. Separate likelihood ratios were estimated for significant maternal characteristics and serum markers. Patient-specific risk was calculated by multiplying the incidence of fetal loss by the likelihood ratios for each maternal characteristic and for different serum marker combinations.Three hundred eighteen women had fetal loss < 24 weeks (early) and 103 > 24 weeks (late). Clinical characteristics evaluated included maternal age, body mass index, race, parity, threatened abortion, previous preterm delivery, and previous early loss. Serum markers studied as possible predictors of early loss included first-trimester pregnancy-associated plasma protein A and second-trimester alpha-fetoprotein, and unconjugated estriol. A risk assessment for early loss based on all of these factors yielded a 46% detection rate, for a fixed 10% false-positive rate, 39% for 5% and 28% for 1%. The only significant marker for late loss was inhibin A. The detection rate was 27% for a fixed 10% false-positive rate and only increased slightly when clinical characteristics were added to the model.Patient-specific risk assessment for early fetal loss using serum markers, with or without maternal characteristics, has a moderately high detection. Patient-specific risk assessment for late fetal loss has low detection rates.Comparison of the efficiency of second-trimester nasal bone hypoplasia and increased nuchal fold in Down syndrome screening.The purpose of this study was to compare the efficiency of second-trimester nasal bone hypoplasia (NB) and increased nuchal fold (NF) in Down syndrome screening.This was a prospective multicenter cohort study of women who underwent an anatomic survey between 16 and 22 weeks of gestation. The fetal NB and other markers of fetal aneuploidy that included NF were evaluated. NB was defined either as an absent NB or length of <0.75 multiples of the median for the gestational age. Two definitions of increased NF (>5 mm and >6 mm) were evaluated. Fetuses or infants with Down syndrome were compared with those fetuses without for the presence of NB and increased NF.Among 4373 pregnancies that were evaluated over a 5-year period, there were 50 pregnancies with Down syndrome. NB evaluation was obtained in 3936 of 4373 pregnancies (90%); NF was evaluated in all of the fetuses. Absent NB was seen in 14/49 cases (29%), and NF of >6 mm was seen in 6 of 50 cases (12%) with Down syndrome.Nasal bone and nuchal fold are efficient markers for Down syndrome. Absent nasal bone was a better predictor of Down syndrome, compared with nuchal fold, and should be a standard marker when a second-trimester genetic sonogram is performed.Median parameters for Down's syndrome screening should be calculated using a moving time-window method.In Down's syndrome screening, the change in analyte concentrations in maternal serum with advancing gestational age is compensated for by converting concentration to multiples of the median (MoM) by using a mathematical equation describing the expected relationship. However, owing to assay drifts and shift, the equation may be incorrect, leading to deviation of the observed MoM distribution from the ideal MoM distribution. The NHS Fetal Anomaly Screening Programme has produced standards limiting acceptable deviation, and has provided the Down's Syndrome Screening Quality Assurance Service (DQASS) to monitor it. DQASS recommends monitoring by cumulative sum plot.Down's screening data for 61,368 consecutive samples (12 October 2004 to 31 December 2007) was evaluated using different median assignment techniques.A change in the paradigm for median equation derivation is described, which significantly improves the probability that medians will be correct at any point in time.Software developers need to change the way medians are derived in their programmes.[Quality control of prenatal screening].In 2004 the Danish National Board of Health (DNBH) published new guidelines for the prenatal risk assessment and diagnostic service. The new guidelines are nationally implemented. DNBH has pointed out the importance of quality control, but has not given any specific guidelines concerning this. We demonstrate the feasibility of a quality assessment of a considerable part of the screening programme.The quality assessment is conducted on a cohort from Holbaek Hospital during 12 months by merging data from one local hospital database to data from the Danish Cytogenetic Centralregistry and the Danish National Newborn Screening Registry.The study included 1796 singleton pregnancies and 47 twin pregnancies. 46 invasive procedures were carried out among the singleton pregnancies, which corresponds to an invasive rate of 2.6%. Two fetuses with Down's syndrome (DS) and one with trisomy 18 were found and the pregnancies were terminated. One fetus with Turners syndrome was diagnosed prenatally, but ended as a missed abortion. One child with DS was not diagnosed prenatally. The detection rate for DS was 2/3 (67%).We suggest that the outlined quality program is implemented as a national programme.[Three-dimensional scatter plot analysis to estimate the risk of foetal aneuloidy].First trimester screening (FTS) according to Nicolaides is now a worldwide established method for prenatal aneuloidy screening. An improvement was achieved by the "Advanced First Trimester Screening" (AFS). It was the aim of the current study to set up scatter plots from nuchal translucency (NT), Papp-A and fbeta-hCG, to derive likelihood ratios therefrom and to apply them to a test collective. We wanted to examine whether or nor the test performance of FTS could further be improved.In a multicentre study 10 136 singleton pregnancies were recruited. Risk assessment for the presence of aneuploidies was performed by the Pia Fetal Database (PIA). In addition, all data were recalculated by the AFS module of the online platform www.firsttrimester.net . In a third step, a newly developed algorithm was utilised, in which the foetal parameters DeltaNT, Papp-A and fbeta-hCG were put into a three-dimensional scatter plot. The surrounding volume was segmentally divided and for each space the relation of the healthy to the affected foetuses found therein was determined. Furthermore, for all participiants of this study, the likelihood ratios were examinied at the segment according to the currently measured values. This method is designated as AFS-3D.Within the observed fetuses, 86 cases with aneuploidy were detected. By appropriate choice of the cut-off the sensitivities were found to be 83 % (PIA and AFS) and 82 % (AFS-3D), respectively, and do not differ significantly from each other. The specificity could be improved from 94 % (PIA) to 96 % (AFS) and was further advanced to 98 % by the AFS-3D method. At the same time the false positive rate was lowered from 654 (PIA) to 397 (AFS) and 228 (AFS-3D) cases, respectively.By means of the new AFS-3D method the same count of diseased fetuses was detected compared with prior screening tests. Simultaneously, expectant mothers were spared from unnecessary invasive diagnostics in 65 % of the cases. The choice of an altered cut-off or other volume shapes are feasible and should be examined in further studies.Costs and effects of prenatal screening methods for Down syndrome and neural tube defects.To evaluate prenatal screening methods for Down syndrome and neural tube defects (NTD) with regard to costs per detected case and the number of screening-related miscarriages.The screening methods compared were risk assessment tests, i.e. serum tests and nuchal translucency measurement (NT), and invasive testing through chorionic villus sampling (CVS) or amniocentesis. Costs, the number of cases detected and screening-related miscarriages were calculated using a decision tree model.The costs per detected case of Down syndrome ranged from EUR 98,000 for the first-trimester (serum) double test to EUR 191,000 for invasive testing. If NTD detection was included, the (serum) triple test had the lowest costs, EUR 73,000, per detected case of Down syndrome or NTD. The number of screening-related miscarriages due to invasive diagnostic tests varied from 13 per 100,000 women for the (serum) first- and second-trimester combined test to 914 per 100,000 women for invasive testing.Considering screening for both Down syndrome and NTD favors the triple test in terms of costs per detected case. Compared to invasive testing, risk assessment tests in general substantially lower screening-related miscarriages, which raises the question of whether invasive testing should still be offered in a screening program for Down syndrome.Prenatal detection of trisomy 21 by second-trimester ultrasound examination and maternal age in a non-selected population of 49 314 births in Norway.To assess the contribution of the second-trimester routine ultrasound examination and maternal age (>or= 38 years) to the prenatal detection of trisomy 21 in a large non-selected population in which no other screening methods were carried out.A prospective follow-up study was carried out in a non-selected Norwegian population from 1987 to 2004, including a total of 49 314 births. Data from all cases of trisomy 21, detected prenatally by karyotyping following amniocentesis performed for abnormal ultrasound findings or because of maternal age >or= 38 years, or postnatally after delivery, were registered. The study period was divided into three 6-year periods.Eighty-eight cases of trisomy 21 were registered. The prenatal detection rate was 43% (38/88). No significant change in the detection rate was observed over the 18 years. Fourteen percent (12/88) of cases were detected as a result of advanced maternal age and 30% (26/88) by prenatal ultrasound examination. Of all women with a trisomy 21 fetus, 72% (63/88) were under 38 years of age. The percentage of women >or= 38 years opting for karyotyping during the three time periods decreased significantly from 51% to 50% and 36%, respectively. The termination rate of trisomy 21 fetuses was 84%, with no significant change over time.Our data can be considered as a reference standard for population screening for trisomy 21 based solely on maternal age and second-trimester ultrasound imaging. The prenatal detection rate of trisomy 21 cases was poor and remained unchanged throughout the 18-year study period. If improvement in detection rates is desired, additional programs are necessary.Improved performance of first-trimester combined screening for trisomy 21 with the double test taken before a gestational age of 10 weeks.To evaluate if there is a performance difference in the combined screening for trisomy 21 between the double tests performed before and after 10 + 0 weeks of gestation.The study included all 97 trisomy 21 cases from January 2004 to December 2007, in a screening program where the double test was measured in week 8 + 0 to 13 + 6 and the nuchal translucency in week 11 + 3 to 13 + 6.As many as 87 of the 97 cases were diagnosed in the screening program (detection rate = 90%). Among the 53 cases having the double test taken before 10 + 0 weeks, no cases were missed [detection rate (DR) = 100%, CI = 0.94-1.00] and among the 44 having the double test taken after 10 + 0 weeks, 10 cases were missed (DR = 77%, CI = 0.65-0.90). This difference in DR was highly significant (P = 0.0009). No difference was observed between false positive rates or median maternal age of the two groups.A significantly higher DR was obtained when the double test was taken early in pregnancy (<10 + 0 weeks), than when it was taken later (>or=10 + 0 weeks). The results could not be explained by a difference in either the false positive rate or the maternal age between the two groups.Prenasal thickness in trisomy-21 fetuses at 16-24 weeks of gestation.To construct a reference range for fetal prenasal thickness between 16 and 24 weeks of gestation and to evaluate the thickness in fetuses with trisomy 21.We acquired three-dimensional (3D) volumes of the fetal profile from 135 normal fetuses and 26 fetuses with trisomy 21 at 16-24 weeks' gestation. We used the multiplanar mode to obtain the exact mid-sagittal plane and measured the prenasal thickness as the shortest distance between the anterior edge of the lowest part of the frontal bone (at the junction with the nasal bone when present) and the skin anteriorly.In the normal group prenasal thickness increased with gestation from a mean of 2.4 mm at 16 weeks to 4.6 mm at 24 weeks. Repeatability studies demonstrated that in 95% of the cases the difference between two measurements of prenasal thickness by the same operator and by different operators was less than 1 mm. In the trisomy-21 fetuses the mean prenasal thickness was significantly larger than in normal fetuses and in 19 (73.1%) cases it was above the 95(th) centile of the normal range. There was no significant difference in prenasal thickness between the trisomic fetuses with and without ventriculomegaly, nuchal edema, absent nasal bone or a cardiac defect.The fetal profile is routinely examined during the second-trimester scan and therefore the skill needed to obtain the view necessary for the measurement of prenasal thickness is widely available. If the finding of our study--that in more than 70% of fetuses with trisomy 21 prenasal thickness is above the 95(th) centile--is confirmed in prospective screening studies this measurement alone could prove a highly sensitive method of second-trimester screening for trisomy 21.[Ultrasound screening for chromosomal anomalies by assessment of the fetal nasal bone during 11-14 weeks of gestation--a pilot study].To assess the feasibility of ultrasound screening for chromosomal anomalies by verification of the fetal nasal bone at 11-14 weeks gestation.A prospective longitudinal pilot study was performed in State University Hospital "Maichin dom" from September 2006 till September 2007. Thirty-six high-risk singleton pregnancies were examined between 11+0 and 14+0 weeks gestation with high-resolution ultrasound equipment. The first trimester scan included assessment of fetal number, viability and biometry, nuchal translucency measurement and fetal anatomy survey In each case the presence or absence of the fetal nasal bone was documented. The exam was performed in the mid-sagittal plane according to standardized published protocols. Increased NT > or = 95th centile and/or absence of the fetal nasal bone was considered as indication for invasive prenatal diagnosis. Pregnancy outcome was ascertained from hospital records, referring physicians or the patients themselves.Absence of the fetal nasal bone was verified in 11.1% (4/36) of cases. In all four cases an invasive prenatal procedure was performed. Chromosomal anomalies were found in three cases with absent fetal nasal bone (1--trisomy 21, 1--trisomy 18, 1--triplody), while the fourth case had normal fetal karyotype. In all three cases with chromosomal fetal anomalies termination of pregnancy was performed. The remaining 33 pregnancies had normal perinatal outcome.Absence of the nasal bone at 11-14 weeks gestation is a new potential marker for chromosomal fetal anomalies in the first trimester of pregnancy.Improved prenatal aneuploidy screening using the novel advanced first-trimester screening algorithm: a multicenter study of 10,017 pregnancies.: It has been postulated that the maternal age component should be completely excluded from first-trimester screening (FTS) for fetal aneuploidies. In this study, we tested a new algorithm known as advanced first-trimester screening (AFS), which disregards maternal age.: In a multicenter study, FTS findings were retrieved from 10,017 pregnancies. FTS risk assessment was performed using the Nicolaides method, and the AFS score was calculated. The results of both methods were compared.: Within this population, 81 fetuses had an abnormal karyotype. The sensitivity of the 2 algorithms was 86.4%. When the AFS method was used, the positive predictive value rose from 9.6% (FTS) to 12.4% (AFS). Using AFS, the test positive rate could be decreased by 161 cases (-22.2%) (p < 0.0001), due to a reduction of false positive cases. As a result, the false positive rate of AFS was 24.5% lower than that of FTS, while the same number of aneuploidies was detected.: AFS can markedly reduce the rate of false positive test results. If these results are confirmed by larger multicenter studies, the new AFS will represent a great improvement in fetal aneuploidy screening. (c) 2008 Wiley Periodicals, Inc. J Clin Ultrasound, 2008.Maternal serum screening in cases of mosaic and translocation Down syndrome.To determine if the second-trimester maternal serum markers (MSM) screening for Down syndrome (DS) is efficient in DS mosaicism or structural rearrangement cases.DS mosaic or translocation cases were reviewed from databases of routine MSM DS screening. The control group consisted of 977 trisomy 21 cases included in a series of 854 902 patients (routine screening). DS risk was calculated by combination of maternal age and MSM [alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and human choriogonadotrophin (hCG) or free beta-hCG and/or uE3] expressed in multiples of median (MoM). Mosaic DS cases were divided into three groups, < 10%, 10-49%, and >or= 50% trisomy 21 cells. Translocation DS cases were divided into three groups, isochromosome, Robertsonian, or reciprocal translocation. Detection rate (DR) and MoMs were evaluated in each group.As many as 76 cases of nonstandard trisomy 21 were collected. For mosaic DS cases (n = 43) DR was 69.8% (not significantly different from the 70.8% of control group). When mosaicism was less than 10%, the DR dropped to 25%. For translocation DS cases (n = 33) DR was 75.7% (not significantly different from control group) whatever the types of translocation.In the nonstandard DS cases, second-trimester MSMs gave the same detection rate as for standard trisomy 21, except the cases with low-level mosaicism (<10%).Screening for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 by maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency, fetal heart rate, free beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A.A beneficial consequence of screening for trisomy 21 is the early diagnosis of trisomies 18 and 13. Our objective was to examine the performance of first-trimester screening for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 by maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness, fetal heart rate (FHR) and maternal serum-free beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).Prospective screening for trisomy 21 by maternal age, fetal NT, free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 11(+0)-13(+6) weeks in singleton pregnancies, including 56 376 normal cases, 395 with trisomy 21, 122 with trisomy 18 and 61 with trisomy 13. Risk algorithms were developed for the calculation of patient-specific risks for each of the three trisomies based on maternal age, NT, FHR, free beta-hCG and PAPP-A. Detection (DR) and false positive rates (FPR) were calculated and adjusted according to the maternal age distribution of pregnancies in England and Wales in 2000-2002.The DR and FPR were 90% and 3%, respectively, for trisomy 21, 91% and 0.2% for trisomy 18 and 87% and 0.2% for trisomy 13. When screen positivity was defined by an FPR of 3% on the risk for trisomy 21 in conjunction with an FPR of 0.2% on the maximum of the risks for trisomies 13 and 18, the overall FPR was 3.1% and the DRs of trisomies 21, 18 and 13 were 91%, 97% and 94%, respectively.As a side effect of first-trimester screening for trisomy 21, approximately 95% of trisomy 13 and 18 fetuses can be detected with an 0.1% increase in the FPR.Screening for trisomy 21 by maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency thickness, free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A.To derive a model and examine the performance of first-trimester combined screening by maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness and maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).Prospective combined screening for trisomy 21 was carried out at 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks in 56,771 singleton pregnancies, including 56,376 cases with a normal karyotype or delivery of a phenotypically normal baby (unaffected group) and 395 cases with trisomy 21. The blood test and ultrasound scan were carried out in the same visit. In each case the maternal age-related risk for trisomy 21 at term was calculated and adjusted according to the gestational age at the time of screening to derive the a-priori risk. The measured NT was transformed into a likelihood ratio using the mixture model of NT distributions. The measured free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were converted into a multiple of the median (MoM) for gestational age, adjusted for maternal weight, ethnicity, smoking status, method of conception and parity, and a likelihood ratio was subsequently calculated. The likelihood ratios for NT and for the biochemical markers were multiplied by the a-priori risk to derive the patient-specific risk. Detection rates and false-positive rates were calculated by taking the proportions with risks above a given risk threshold after adjustment for maternal age according to the distribution of pregnancies in England and Wales in 2000-2002. These standardized rates were compared with detection and false-positive rates estimated using Monte Carlo methods to sample from the modeled Gaussian distributions.The performance of screening based on the model was in good agreement with that observed in our population. In a strategy for first-trimester combined screening where the blood test and scan are carried out in the same visit it was estimated that, for false-positive rates of 3% and 5%, the detection rates were 92% and 94%, respectively, at 11 weeks, 85% and 90% at 12 weeks, and 79% and 83% at 13 weeks. In an alternative strategy, with the blood taken at 10 weeks and the measurement of NT performed at 12 weeks, the estimated detection rates were 94% and 96% for false-positive rates of 3% and 5%, respectively.The aim of the first-trimester scan is not just to screen for trisomy 21 but also to diagnose an increasing number of fetal malformations. In this respect the ability to visualize fetal anatomy is better at 12-13 weeks than at 11 weeks. Consequently, the ideal gestation for combined testing in the same visit would be 12 weeks. An alternative strategy, with the blood taken at 10 weeks and the measurement of NT performed at 12 weeks, is associated with higher detection rates of trisomy 21. However, the cost of two-stage screening would be higher and, in addition, the potential advantage in terms of detection rate may be eroded by the likely increased non-compliance with the additional step.First-trimester screening for trisomy 21 by free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A: impact of maternal and pregnancy characteristics.To use multiple regression analysis to define the contribution of maternal variables that influence the measured concentration of free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), and the interaction between these covariates, in first-trimester biochemical screening for trisomy 21.This was a multicenter study of prospective screening for trisomy 21 by a combination of fetal nuchal translucency thickness, and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks of gestation. In the pregnancies subsequently found to have trisomy 21 and in those with no obvious chromosomal abnormality, we used multiple regression analysis to account for pregnancy characteristics that influence the measured concentrations of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A. We fitted Gaussian distributions to the distribution of log multiples of the median (MoM) values in trisomy 21 and in unaffected pregnancies.There were 491 cases of trisomy 21 and 96 803 chromosomally normal pregnancies. Compared with values in Caucasian women, those who were parous, non-smokers and those who conceived spontaneously, PAPP-A was 57% higher in women of Afro-Caribbean origin, 3% higher in South Asians, 9% higher in East Asians, 2% higher in nulliparous women, 17% lower in smokers and 10% lower in those conceiving by in-vitro fertilization (IVF). Free beta-hCG was 12% higher in women of Afro-Caribbean origin, 9% lower in South Asians, 8% higher in East Asians, 2% higher in nulliparous women, 4% lower in smokers and 9% higher in those conceiving by IVF. In screening for trisomy 21 by maternal age and serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A the estimated detection rate was 65% for a false-positive rate of 5%.In first-trimester biochemical screening for trisomy 21 it is essential to adjust the measured values of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A for maternal and pregnancy characteristics.Human placental growth hormone is increased in maternal serum in pregnancies affected by Down syndrome.To evaluate the relationship between maternal serum levels of human placental growth hormone (hPGH) and fetal Down syndrome at gestational midtrimester.We retrospectively analyzed samples of serum from 21 women with Down syndrome pregnancies detected at gestational midtrimester. The samples were obtained at 16-23 weeks' gestation during amniocentesis for fetal karyotyping. Sixty-two serum samples were used as controls, which were obtained at 16-23 weeks' gestation from women with singleton, uncomplicated pregnancies, who gave birth to healthy neonates with a birth weight appropriate for gestational age. The hPGH levels were measured by a solid-phase immunoradiometric assay using 2 different epitopes.The median hPGH values in the serum of the Down-syndrome-affected pregnancies were significantly higher (p < 0.05) than those of the normal pregnancies at 16-23 weeks' gestation: the median value in the serum was 9.4 ng/ml (5th to 95th percentiles = 1.49-39.03) versus 4.7 ng/ml (0.53-7.88).The hPGH levels in maternal serum were found to be higher at 16-23 weeks' gestation in pregnancies affected by fetal Down syndrome. Further investigation is needed to examine if maternal serum hPGH could be used as an additional marker in prenatal screening of Down syndrome at gestational midtrimester.Risk of chromosome abnormalities in the presence of bilateral or unilateral choroid plexus cysts.To evaluate the rate of chromosome abnormalities in cases of uni- and bilateral choroid plexus cysts (CPCs).A total of 10,875 ultrasound (US) examinations were performed in the second trimester, and 435 cases with CPC (4%) were found. After genetic counseling, 45 patients decided not to undergo karyotyping. The authors performed a chromosome analysis in 390 cases of CPCs.The total risk of chromosome abnormalities was 3.59% (n = 14) and risk of trisomies was 2.05% (n = 8). Trisomy 18 was found in 6 cases (1.54%), trisomy 21 in 1 case (0.26%), and trisomy 9 in 1 case (0.26%). The risk of 45,X karyotype was 0.77% (n = 3). One case of 47,XXY karyotype and 2 cases with other chromosome abnormalities were found. In 212 unilateral cases there were 7 with chromosome abnormalities (3.3%). In 178 bilateral cases there were 7 with abnormal karyotypes (3.93%). The CPC was associated with additional fetal US anomalies (with or without polyhydramnios/oligohydramnios) in 112 cases; chromosome abnormalities were detected in 4 cases (3.57%). 66 cases were associated with polyhydramnios/oligohydramnios but not with other fetal US anomalies; 3 cases of abnormal karyotypes were found (4.55%). The CPC was isolated in 212 cases and 7 cases were associated with chromosome disorders (3.3%).US plays an important role in prenatal diagnostics. Further genetic counseling is recommended in cases with CPCs.[Prenatal diagnosis of chromosome aberrations after implementation of screening for Down's syndrome].First trimester screening for Down's syndrome was evaluated by the National Board of Health in 2004, and recommended to all pregnant women in the form of an informed choice. We have reviewed prenatal and postnatal chromosome aberrations in 3 counties in Denmark during the years of implementation in 2004, 2005 and 2006.Risk evaluation based on combined screening (fetal nuchal translucency measurement and serum screening of the pregnant woman) was introduced in the counties of Copenhagen, Roskilde and Storstrom, covering approximately 1.1 million inhabitants. We registered the number of chorionic villus biopsies (CVS) and amniocenteses (AC), as well as the number of cases with trisomy, triploidy and sex chromosome aberrations found prenatally. We also registered the number of children born with Down's syndrome during the period.The number of CVS/AC decreased from 1382 to 790, or 40%. There was an increase in the number of foetuses diagnosed with trisomy 21: in 2004 trisomy 21 was diagnosed in 12 foetuses, in 2006 the number was 30. The number of children born with Down's syndrome was 10 and 5 in 2004 and 2006, respectively. National figures from the Danish central cytogenetic registry confirm a decrease in children born with Down's syndrome.The implementation of combined screening in 3 counties resulted in a reduction in invasive procedures (chorionic villus samples and amniocenteses) by 40%, which is in accordance with the aims of the National Board of Health. As expected, a significant increase in the number of prenatally diagnosed foetuses with trisomy 21 was observed. The number of children born with Down's syndrome decreased, but the numbers are small. The investigation does not review aspects of organisation or counselling and psychosocial issues.Sonographical integrated test for detection of chromosomal aberrations.Different sonographical and biochemical methods for the detection of an elevated risk of chromosomal abnormality are used. The aim of our study was to establish a diagnostic scheme with the highest sensitivity by means of an algorithm incorporating all parameters.In a group of 1490 pregnant women, ultrasound examination including nuchal translucency and nasal bone measurement was performed in the first trimester. Then, in the early second trimester, a second ultrasound examination combined with measuring nuchal thickness and nasal bone was carried out.The combination of the NT and NB measurement showed the highest sensitivity (94.7%), specificity (99.21%), PPV (85.7%) and NPV (99.73%).The proposed integrated test is characterised by a high predictive value for the detection of chromosomal abnormalities, low cost of performance and absolute safety for the foetus and could be offered to all pregnant women. The combination of two ultrasound examinations and biochemistry greatly increased the value of the test.Combining 'nasal bone length assessment as MoM' with other markers for trisomy 21 screening: could it be more effective?Pregnancy outcome in fetuses with increased nuchal translucency.The aim of this study was to examine fetal and neonatal outcomes in the setting of nuchal translucency (NT) > or =3 mm at routine first-trimester screening.A nested case-series study within a retrospective cohort of women screened for Down syndrome at 11-14 weeks of gestation. Crown-rump length, NT values and additional anomalies at first and early second trimesters were recorded. Follow-up information was obtained by a review of medical records and self-report from patients. Adverse outcomes included fetal death and termination of pregnancy due to structural or chromosomal anomalies.A total of 1930 pregnant women were screened between 11 and 14 weeks of gestation. The prevalence of increased fetal NT (> or =3 mm) was 1.4% (n=27). Among these, 12 showed increased fetal NT as an isolated finding. In this group, 2 women experienced fetal demise (16%) and 10 delivered healthy babies. In the group with additional abnormalities (n=15), 9 (60%) were found to have chromosomal abnormalities, all of which were terminated. For all cases with increased fetal NT, total incidence of adverse outcome was 62%.At first-trimester ultrasonography, a fetal NT > or =3 mm was associated with a high incidence of chromosomal abnormalities in the presence of associated abnormalities. For cases with the increased fetal NT at first-trimester fetal assessment and follow-up is necessary to detect possible adverse outcomes.First trimester screening for Down syndrome in rhesus negative women.To explore the effect of maternal rhesus status on first-trimester screening markers for Down syndrome.We accessed a database of singleton pregnancies undergoing first-trimester genetic screen with maternal Rh status documented and pregnancy outcome information available. Excluded were cases of fetal chromosomal or structural abnormalities, or maternal systemic disease. Results of maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) adjusted for gestational age were compared between Rh-negative and Rh-positive women with p < 0.05 considered significant.Two thousand two hundred and two pregnancies fulfilled the study criteria, and 160 of them (7%) were Rh negative. Only free beta-hCG corrected multiples of the median (MoM) values were statistically increased in Rh-negative women (p < 0.009). Using a cut-off of 1:300, screen-positive rates of maternal serum biochemistry were not significantly different between Rh-negative and Rh-positive women (12.5 vs 10.4%, p = 0.41).The present study focused on measurements of beta-hCG and PAPP-A in the sera of women with Rh-negative blood group. Women with Rh-negative blood type have similar first-trimester serum PAPP-A MoM values as Rh-positive women, but significantly higher beta-hCG MoM values. However, there was no significant difference in the screen-positive rate for Down syndrome between the two groups.First-trimester maternal serum progesterone in aneuploid pregnancies.First-trimester maternal serum screening for Down syndrome (DS) can be improved by the use of additional serum markers. We examined whether progesterone (P), synthesized by placenta, might be a first-trimester maternal serum marker for fetal DS.P was quantified in first-trimester maternal serum from 42 DS, six trisomy 18 and two trisomy 13 pregnancies and 115 controls. Log-regression of P versus gestational age in days was used to convert P concentrations into multiples of the median (MoM).The P concentrations in controls increased with gestational age (p = 9.5 x 10(-7)). The log10MoM P distribution in DS pregnancies was not significantly different from that in controls. However, from day 58-67, the log10MoM P was elevated in DS pregnancies (n = 10) with a mean (SD) of 0.1040 (0.0956), compared to a mean (SD) of - 0.0109 (0.1661) in controls (n = 24) (p = 0.05). Five out of six trisomy 18 and both trisomy 13 pregnancies had a P MoM < 1.P is not a useful marker for DS in first trimester, except perhaps in a narrow gestational age window from day 58 to 67. P is a trisomy 18/13 marker.Effect of maternal smoking on prenatal screening for Down syndrome and trisomy 18 in the first trimester of pregnancy.To assess the impact of maternal smoking on first-trimester prenatal screening results for Down syndrome and trisomy 18.Data on maternal smoking status, maternal age, gestational dating, levels of free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) in maternal blood and fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness were analyzed from a cohort of 53 114 women. Statistical analyses were carried out for crude and adjusted comparisons between smoking and nonsmoking groups.In women who smoked during the first trimester of pregnancy, PAPP-A and free beta-hCG levels from dried blood were significantly decreased (p < 0.001) and fetal NT thickness was significantly increased (p < 0.001). For an overall risk assessment combining maternal age and biochemical and ultrasound markers, no significant changes for Down syndrome were found with smoking, but significant increases in average risk as well as in positive rates were found for trisomy 18 (p < 0.001). A potential association between maternal smoking and trisomy 18 remains to be clarified.Adjustment for smoking is recommended in first-trimester prenatal screening for trisomy 18 and probably not warranted for Down syndrome because of the cancelling effects of decreased free beta-hCG and increased NT. Further research is required to demonstrate a biological association between maternal smoking and trisomy 18.Comparison of nuchal and detailed morphology ultrasound examinations in early pregnancy for fetal structural abnormality screening: a randomized controlled trial.To compare the effectiveness of a nuchal scan at 10 to 14 + 6 weeks and a detailed morphology scan at 12 to 14 + 6 weeks in screening for fetal structural abnormalities.From March 2001 to November 2004, 8811 pregnant women were randomized into either the control group (10 to 14 + 6-week nuchal scan followed by routine 16-23-week scan) or the study group (10 to 14 + 6-week nuchal scan and 12 to 14 + 6-week detailed scan followed by routine 16-23-week scan).We analyzed 7642 cases of singleton pregnancies with viable fetuses at first-trimester ultrasound examination and with known pregnancy outcome. In the control group, the detection rate of structural abnormalities in the first trimester was 32.8% (21/64; 95% CI, 21.6-45.7%) and the overall detection rate was 64.1% (41/64; 95% CI, 51.1-75.7%). In the study group, the detection rate in the first trimester was 47.6% (30/63; 95% CI, 34.9-60.6) and the overall detection rate was 66.7% (42/63; 95% CI, 53.7-78.0%). The overall detection rate in the control group did not differ significantly from that in the study group (P > 0.05).When the nuchal scan is offered, a basic anatomical survey can be done in conjunction with nuchal translucency thickness measurement. A detailed ultrasound examination at this early gestational age may not be superior to the nuchal scan in screening for fetal abnormalities in the low-risk population. Though a wide range of abnormalities can be detected at 10 to 14 + 6 weeks, the routine 16-23-week scan cannot be abandoned.Fetal aberrant right subclavian artery in normal and Down syndrome fetuses.To evaluate the prevalence of fetal aberrant right subclavian artery (ARSA) in a low-risk population and compare it with that among Down syndrome fetuses, in order to estimate its potential as a marker in Down syndrome screening.Women undergoing routine fetal sonographic examination between 13 and 26 weeks of gestation were evaluated once for the presence of ARSA using either a transvaginal multifrequency 5-9-MHz probe or a transabdominal 4-8-MHz probe as appropriate. Early pregnancy outcome was obtained in all cases.Nine hundred and twenty-four fetuses were recruited. An ARSA was detected in 13 fetuses (1.4%) with normal karyotype. During the study period, eight fetuses with Down syndrome referred either with known karyotype or with signs suspicious for Down syndrome were evaluated by the same protocol. Three of eight fetuses (37.5%) were found to have an ARSA. In none of these cases was ARSA an isolated finding. The odds ratio for ARSA in Down syndrome compared with normal fetuses was 42.04 (95% CI, 9.08-194.6).An ARSA was found in 1.4% of the normal population. In the small group of Down syndrome fetuses we observed a trend towards a higher rate of ARSA than in normal fetuses. In none of the Down syndrome fetuses was ARSA an isolated finding. Larger prospective studies are needed to examine the significance of ARSA as an isolated finding and the potential of ARSA as a marker in Down syndrome screening.[Specificity of biochemical markers of pregnancy second trimester].During the second trimester of 21 trisomy pregnancies, median of maternal serum concentrations of alpha-fetoprotein, not conjugated estriol, beta fraction, and inhibin A differ from normal values, and it can be used to select high risk patients.To evaluate specificity of different forms of second trimester biochemical markers association in a group of healthy pregnant women and determine levels considered as low risk.Random and cross-sectional study in 363 pregnant women with prenatal diagnosis to evaluate specificity of different combinations of biochemical markers. Down's syndrome and defects of neural tube rates of detection were defined as the percentage of pregnancies with tests of detection of true negatives and false positives.Total beta fraction has differences during weeks 13 to 14, with 70% of cases between 23,000 to 70,000 units, with 1.38% of false positives; alpha-fetoprotein fluctuated between 22 to 30 units, with 5.2% of false positives; conjugated estriol increases between 1.2 to 2.2 units during 2nd quarterly, with 6.3% of false positives; and inhibin has an increase, with 70% of cases located between 125 to 486.5 units, with 10.44% of false positives.Marker formula with greater specificity was type IV, included alpha-fetoprotein, not conjugated estriol and beta fraction. In the isolated form, alpha-fetoprotein marker demonstrates greater specificity.[FISH technique in aneuplodies prenatal diagnosis].Chromosomal disorders are severe and affect 0.9% of the newborns. In these conditions, prenatal diagnosis should be compulsory in every public medical system.Our study is a retrospective analysis of pregnant women investigated by amniocentesis and FISH technique.We analyzed 233 samples collected between 2004 and 2007 at Iaşi "Cuza-Vodă" Obstetrics and Gynecology Hospital. The majority of cases were investigated between 16 and 24 weeks of pregnancy. Thirty-eight abnormal cases (16.30%) were identified: 17 cases with 21 trisomy, 16 cases with 18 trisomy, 3 cases with X monosomy, and 2 cases with 13 trisomy. The main reasons for amniocentesis were: advanced maternal age (12.5% abnormal cases) ultrasound abnormalities (26.15% abnormal cases), and biochemical abnormalities (7.14% abnormal cases).Our data are in agreement with other studies, and support our results.[Abnormal second trimester screening for fetal chromosomal abnormalities as a predictor of adverse pregnancy outcome].Second-trimester maternal serum markers (triple test) is common used to estimate of the fetal risk of genetic abnormalities and open neural tube defects. Positive results of the triple test concomitant with the normal fetus karyotype pattern can also predict the adverse pregnancy outcome. Many authors have been indicated such false positive results of the triple test in the cases of the uterine myomas, PIH, IUGR, and IUD.The purpose of this study was to determine the association between abnormal second trimester Down syndrome screening markers and adverse pregnancy outcome.A total of 775 pregnant women underwent maternal serum screening. Pregnancy complications were studied in the groups of pregnancies with structurally and chromosomally normal fetuses--with: elevated AFP > 1,89MoM, elevated beta-hCG > 1,69MoM or low beta-hCG < 0,48MoM.Increased maternal serum AFP > 1,89MoM were found to be significantly associated with IUGR, PIH and placental pathology. Increased beta-hCG > 1,69MoM were significantly associated with PIH and IUGR. Finally decreased beta-hCG < 0,48MoM were found to be significantly associated with IUGR, PIH and IUD.Triple test can be used not only for the detection of fetal chromosomal and NTD abnormalities but also for the detection of high-risk pregnancies.[Serum screening of fetal chromosome abnormality during second pregnancy trimester: results of 26,803 pregnant women in Jiangsu Province].To evaluate the efficiency of the second trimester screening for fetal chromosomal anomaly using maternal serum marker.27,313 pregnant women with the gestational age of 15 - 20 weeks were selected by stratified combined with cluster sampling from 13 counties over Jiangsu province and 5 townships, towns, or subdistricts from 6 randomly selected cities from southern, central, and northern Jiangsu, totally 95 communities, between July 2002 and November 2006. Questionnaire survey was conducted. Body weight was taken. Ultrasonography was used to confirm the gestational age. Peripheral blood samples were collected to detect the maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (f-betaHCG). The risk values of Down syndrome and Edwards syndrome were calculated. The women at high risk of Down syndrome and Edwards syndrome for their fetuses were recommended to receive genetic counseling and amniocentesis. All babies were followed up until six months to four years of age after birth.26,803 of the 27,313 women (98%) were screened. The average was 25.1, and 1.7% of them were over 35. Serum screening showed that 1,244 (5%) were Down syndrome positive and 105 (0.4%) were Edwards syndrome positive. The final pregnant outcomes showed that 20 cases presented chromosomal abnormalities, of which 9 cases suffered from Down syndrome, 5 cases Edwards syndrome, and 6 cases other chromosomal abnormalities. The detection rate of Down syndrome and Edwards syndrome were 56% and 80% respectively.Under good quality control high prenatal detection rate of fetal chromosomal abnormalities can be reached by screening of maternal serum AFP and f-betaHCG during the second pregnancy trimester. Good cost-effectiveness depends on the incidence of targeted birth defects.Combining fetal nuchal fold thickness with second-trimester biochemistry to screen for trisomy 21.To assess second-trimester screening for trisomy 21 by combining ultrasound nuchal fold (NF) measurement with maternal serum biochemistry.NF, maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) were determined concurrently at 14-19 weeks' gestation in a study population comprising 1813 women with singleton pregnancies, including 1257 unselected women undergoing serum screening for trisomy 21 (1999-2002), and 556 high-risk pregnancies prior to amniocentesis (2003-2005), 402 of whom had positive serum screening tests. The results were expressed in multiples of the gestation-specific normal median (MoMs).There were 1799 unaffected singleton pregnancies, and their NF values approximately fitted a log Gaussian distribution over a wide range. There was a weak but statistically significant correlation between log NF and log AFP (r = - 0.069, P < 0.005) and the correlation coefficient between log NF and log free beta-hCG was even smaller and not statistically significant (r = 0.038, P = 0.11). Among the seven trisomy 21 pregnancies, the median NF level was 1.53 MoM (geometric mean 1.75 MoM), a highly statistically significant increase compared with unaffected pregnancies (P < 0.0001, one-tail Wilcoxon Rank Sum Test). In pregnancies referred because of positive serum screening tests (391 unaffected, seven cases of trisomy 21, one of monosomy X and three other chromosomal anomalies) the use of NF to modify the serum screening risk would have reduced the invasive procedures in unaffected pregnancies by 46% without affecting the detection rate of trisomy 21 or other anomalies. Statistical modeling predicted that adding NF to AFP and free beta-hCG would increase detection more than would adding unconjugated estriol as well as inhibin-A, an analyte that is difficult to measure with precision.The addition of NF measurement to second-trimester biochemical markers improves screening performance, and could overcome drawbacks in the implementation of inhibin-A assay in clinical practice.[Birth defects in the Czech Republic--the prenatal diagnostic].An analysis of the efficiency of prenatal diagnostic of selected birth defects in the Czech Republic and its dynamics in past 30 years according to birth defect type and prenatal diagnostic methods.Retrospective epidemiological analysis of selected birth defects, prenatal diagnostics efficiency.Data from the National Birth Defect Register (Institute for Health Information and Statistics) in the Czech Republic in the 1975 - 2005 period were used along with data on prenatally diagnosed and terminated pregnancies from the same period. Mean prenatal diagnostic efficiency values of selected types of defects were analyzed in 5-year periods and minimal/maximal values were assessed.During 1975 - 2005 period, totally 3,935,209 children were born, out of which 83,970 were with a birth defect. Mean incidence was 213.38 per 10,000 live births (with the highest value of 414.58 in 2003). In 1985 - 2005, 7,398 cases of prenatally detected birth defects (resulting in pregnancy terminations) were registered, which made (in relative numbers) a span from 4.9 defects per 10,000 live births in 1985 to 65.2 per 10,000 live births in the year 2005. During this period, an important increase of diagnostics of prenatally detectable defects occurred.The study gives results of relative efficiency of prenatal diagnostics of particular birth defects. The highest efficiency was in anencephaly and encephalocele (100%), the other defects showed the following numbers: spina bifida 81%, congenital hydrocephalus 67%, omfalocele 67%, gastroschisis 92%, cystic kidney 59%, renal agenesis 50%, diaphragmatic hernia 35% and Down syndrome 74%.Second trimester prenatal screening for Down syndrome: the associations between the levels of serum markers in successive pregnancies.To investigate the association of Down syndrome screening results in successive pregnancies, and assess the impacts of including previous screening results in the current risk estimation on screening performance.The study was based on 56,951 women who had triple marker screening in two or more singleton pregnancies in the Ontario Maternal Serum Screening (MSS) program between October 1993 and September 2000. The problem of recurrent false positive results was examined by comparing screening results from different pregnancies in the same individuals. Between-pregnancy associations in the levels of serum markers were estimated using correlation analysis. A published method was used to adjust current risk estimation for previous screening results. The effect of this adjustment was assessed by comparing screening performances prior and subsequent to the adjustment.The observed false positive rate (FPR) in subsequent pregnancies was 2.5 times higher than that expected (26.4% vs 10.7%) among women who screened positive in one previous pregnancy, and 3.9 times higher (47.4% vs 12.1%) among women who screened positive in two previous pregnancies. Adjusting for a previous screening result will significantly reduce the recurrent FPR without compromising detection.Risk estimation for Down syndrome may be adjusted using the screening result from a previous pregnancy.Racial differences in first trimester nuchal translucency.First trimester screening for Down syndrome using free beta hCG, total hCG and PAPP-A: an exploratory study.To investigate the potential utility of first trimester screening for Down syndrome using Free beta-hCG, total hCG and PAPP-A.Using estimates from the literature, a simulation study was undertaken to estimate the performance of tests incorporating, Free beta-hCG, total hCG and PAPP-A at gestations of 8-12 weeks. We used sensitivity analysis to assess the effect of departures from the assumed model.We estimate that detection rates in excess of 75% for a false positive rate (FPR) of 3% can be achieved with first trimester measures of PAPP-A, total hCG and Free beta-hCG at 8 weeks-the addition of total hCG adding 11%. Detection rates of around 90% for a FPR of 3% can be achieved through the inclusion of nuchal translucency (NT) at 12 weeks to these early first trimester biochemical markers. Our analysis indicates that the marginal benefit of adding total hCG diminishes rapidly with gestational age and that there is little benefit from adding total hCG later than 10 weeks of gestation.The performance of first trimester screening using early combinations of total hCG, Free beta-hCG and PAPP-A should be assessed in further studies.Defining nasal bone hypoplasia in second-trimester Down syndrome screening: does the use of multiples of the median improve screening efficacy?The purpose of this study was to compare the efficacy of the use of nasal bone (NB) multiples of the median (MoM) with the biparietal diameter (BPD)/NB ratio as definitions of NB hypoplasia that is associated with Down syndrome in the second trimester.We conducted a prospective cohort study of women who underwent an anatomic survey between 16 and 22 weeks of gestation. The fetal NB and other markers of fetal aneuploidy were evaluated. MoMs for the NB length at each gestational age category were calculated and adjusted for maternal race. NB hypoplasia was defined either as an absent NB or by a ratio of the BPD/NB >11 or by NB lengths <0.75, 0.5, and 0.25 MoM for the gestational age, respectively. Fetuses or infants with Down syndrome were compared with those without for the presence of NB hypoplasia.Among 3634 women whose condition was evaluated, NB assessment was obtained in 3197 women (88%). There were 23 cases of Down syndrome that were detected. Receiver operating characteristic curve comparison revealed NB MoM <0.75 to be the best definition of NB hypoplasia (area under receiver operating characteristic curve, 0.75). NB <0.75 MoM had a sensitivity and specificity of 49% (95% CI, 26-69) and 92% (95% CI, 91%-93%), respectively, compared with 61% (95% CI, 38%-80%) and 84% (95% CI, 82%-85%), respectively for BPD/NB >11. The difference in the sensitivity of 12% (95% CI, -5-31) with the BPD/NB ratio >11 vs with an NB MoM <0.75 was not significant (P < .25). The difference in the specificity of 8% (95% CI, 7.5-9.5) with the BPD/NB ratio >11 vs an NB MoM <0.75 was significant (P < .0001).In the second trimester of pregnancy, the use of nasal bone length <0.75 MoM for the gestational age was the best definition for Down syndrome detection and resulted in improved specificity.[Evaluation of pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and free beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin (beta hCG) levels and sonographic assesement of fetal nuchal translucency (NT) in singleton pregnancies between 11 and 14 weeks of gestation--Polish multi-centre research].Evaluation of pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and free beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin (beta hCG) levels and sonographic assessment of fetal nuchal translucency (NT) in singleton pregnancies between 11 and 14 weeks of gestation--Poland's multi-centers research.Pregnancy-associated plasma protein A has been reported to be low in Down syndrome affected pregnancies during the first trimester of pregnancy. Enlarged nuchal translucency (NT) is observed in about 80% of fetuses affected with chromosomal abnormalities and congenital heart defects (CHD).The aim of this study were to determine value and the medians of free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and nuchal translucency thickness in the first trimester in a prospective study of a non-selected Polish population.All examinations have been performed according to the Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF) rules. We have included 800 women between 11 weeks 0 days and 13 weeks 6 days gestation into a biochemical examination. Women booked into the clinic were offered screening, using a combination of maternal serum free beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and fetal nuchal translucency thickness. The maternal serum were measured using the Kryptor analyzer (Brahms Diagnostica). All pregnant women have been divided into 2 groups younger than (first group) and older than (second group) 35 years of age.Nomogrames for free beta-hCG and PAPP-A levels in physiological pregnancy between 11(+0) and 13(6) weeks were determined in the examined population. A positive correlation between PAPP-A and CRL levels, as well as a weak negative correlation between free beta-hCG and CRL, were demonstrated.[Ultrasound screening program for chromosomal abnormalities--the first 2000 women].Screening for chromosomal abnormalities identifies the group of women at higher risk for having a fetus with chromosomal abnormalities and the need for fetal karyotyping. In order to provide high quality screening, strict criteria Jbo certification of operators are introduced, issued by the Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF), which enables annual external control of results. The aim of this study was to review the results of five-year prenatal screening for chromosomal abnormalities in Novi Sad, Serbia.Ultrasound screening at 11-15 weeks gestation was performed, assessing fetal morphology, crownr-rump length and nuchal translucency (NT) according to the FMF guidelines. Risk for chromosomal abnormalities included the initial risk, based on maternal age, gestational age and anamnestic data, and corrected risk, which took into account the initial risk and the value of the nuchal translucency. The corrected risk was issued by the computer program issued by the FMF.During the period 1999-2004, 4580 pregnant women were scanned. The risk for chromosomal abnormality was calculated using the FMF program in 2245 cases and the outcome was known in 1406 cases. The majority ojf women were between 25 and 29 years of age (37%), and 12% were older than 35 years. NT was below the median in 43% of cases and above in 57%, 3.7% of cases were above the 95th centile. 89% of women iwere younger than 35, and the risk was reduced in 97% of cases. There were three false negative cases. In 3% of women from this group the risk was increased, out cf which there were five cases of trisomy 21 and two terminations were done due to major anomalies. In the group of women over 35 years, the risk was reduced in 95% of cases and in all of them but two the karyotype was normal. In one of the two cases there was a large omphalocele and the karyotype was trisomy 18, and in the other fetus appeared normal, but after amniocentesis due to maternal anxiety, karyotype was 47, XYY. In 5% of women at higher risk there was one trisomy 21, bilateral multicystic kidneys were fund in one case as well as one hydrocephalus.Combined screening by maternal age and nuchal translucency is superior to screening by maternal age only--(sensitivity 66% vs. 20%, false postive results 3% vs. 15%, area under ROC 0.90 vs. 0.69).Stepwise sequential screening for fetal aneuploidy.The purpose of this study was to evaluate stepwise sequential screening for fetal aneuploidy.Women who received first-trimester screening were also offered second-trimester tests with second-trimester risks that were based on both sets of markers. Screen-positive rates, use of second-trimester testing and invasive testing, sensitivity, and changes in risks were evaluated.Of 1528 women who received first-trimester screening, 133 women (8.7%) had an indication for invasive testing that was based on first-trimester results alone; 1173 women (76.8%) received second-trimester tests, which reduced the net number of women with an indication for invasive testing to 105 (6.9%). In unaffected pregnancies, the addition of the second-trimester testing reduced the median Down syndrome risk from 1:2368 to 1:10,301. Six of 10 chromosome abnormalities (60%) were identified by first-trimester screening, and 9 of 10 chromosome abnormalities (90%) were identified by sequential screening.Sequential screening can be introduced successfully into clinical practice, is effective, and can reduce the number of invasive tests that are performed.Fetuses with Down syndrome have an enlarged anterior fontanelle in the second trimester of pregnancy.Neonates with Down syndrome are known to have an enlarged anterior fontanelle. The aim of this study was to assess whether fetuses diagnosed with Down syndrome in the second trimester have larger anterior fontanelles in comparison with normal euploid fetuses.The study population included 13 fetuses with trisomy 21 and 26 normal euploid fetuses analyzed between the 19(th) and the 23(rd) weeks of gestation. The anterior fontanelle was assessed by three-dimensional ultrasound, with the midsagittal plane of the fetal head being the reference view for acquisition of the volume. Anteroposterior and laterolateral diameters, perimeter and area of the fontanelle were then measured offline; the diameters were normalized for biparietal diameter and the perimeter and area were normalized for head circumference. Non-parametric statistical analysis was used to compare the mean values of all variables in the two groups of fetuses. Intra- and interobserver variability were also assessed.All variables except the fontanelle laterolateral diameter were significantly greater in Down syndrome fetuses than in controls, with anterior fontanelle perimeter/head circumference and fontanelle area/head circumference ratios showing the highest sensitivity for the detection of Down syndrome. Using a cut-off of 2.1 for the fontanelle area/head circumference ratio, the sensitivity and specificity for the detection of Down syndrome were 77% and 96%, respectively.During the mid-trimester the dimensions of the anterior fontanelle are significantly increased in fetuses with Down syndrome in comparison with normal euploid fetuses. This finding may be of help in the detection of trisomy 21 at the time of the anomaly scan.Likelihood ratios for fetal trisomy 21 based on nasal bone length in the second trimester: how best to define hypoplasia?To determine the best measure of fetal nasal bone hypoplasia for trisomy 21 risk assessment in the second trimester.This was a prospective, observational study performed at a single institution between February 2003 and December 2005. Fetuses with nasal bone length recorded sonographically between 16 and 20.9 weeks and known karyotype were included. Definitions of nasal bone hypoplasia assessed included: non-visualized nasal bone, nasal bone < 10th percentile, nasal bone < 2.5th percentile, biparietal diameter/nasal bone ratio >or= 10 and >or= 11 and nasal bone multiples of the median (MoM) <or= 0.5, <or= 0.6, and <or= 0.7.A total of 371 chromosomally normal and 11 trisomy 21 fetuses were included. Nasal bone hypoplasia based on MoM was superior to the other measures of hypoplasia for trisomy 21 risk assessment as reflected by a higher positive likelihood ratio. The risk for fetal trisomy 21 was higher with greater degrees of nasal bone hypoplasia.Hypoplasia, as defined by MoM, is the superior approach when incorporating nasal bone evaluation into fetal trisomy 21 risk assessment in the second trimester.Frontomaxillary facial angles in screening for trisomy 21 at 14-23 weeks' gestation.The objective of the study was to investigate the potential value of the frontomaxillary facial (FMF) angle in second-trimester ultrasound screening for trisomy 21.We examined stored images of fetal profiles taken before amniocentesis at 14-24 weeks from 100 euploid fetuses and 34 with trisomy 21. The FMF angles between the upper surface of the upper palate and the frontal bone (FMF(bone)) and the skin over the forehead (FMF(skin)) were measured.In the euploid group the FMF angles decreased with gestation. In the fetuses with trisomy 21, the FMF(bone) and FMF(skin) angles were 79.4% and 87.9% above the 95th percentile for gestation of the respective values from the euploid group. In trisomy 21 fetuses, there was no significant difference in FMF angles between those with nasal bone hypoplasia (n = 19) and those without (n = 15).The FMF angle is substantially higher in trisomy 21 than euploid fetuses. Measurement of the FMF angles is likely to prove a useful method in prenatal screening for trisomy 21 in the second trimester.[First trimester ultrasound screening of chromosomal abnormalities].A retrocervical subcutaneous collection of fluid at 11-14 weeks of gestation, can be visualized by ultrasound as nuchal translucency (NT).To examine the distribution of fetal nuchal translucency in low risk population, to determine the detection rate of chromosomal abnormalities in the population of interest based on maternal age and NT measurement.Screening for chromosomal defects, advocated by The Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF), was performed in 1341 pregnancies in the period January 2000-April 2004. Initial risk for chromosomal defects (based on maternal and gestational age) and corrected risk, after the NT measurement, were calculated. Complete data were collected from 1048 patients.Out of 1048 pregnancies followed, 8 cases of Down's syndrome were observed, 7 were detected antenatally and 6 out of 7 were detected due to screening that combines maternal age and NT measurement. According to our results, sensitivity of the screening for aneuploidies based on maternal age alone was 12.5% and false positive rate 13.1%, showing that screening based on NT measurement is of great importance. Screening by a combination of maternal age and NT, and selecting a screening-positive group for invasive testing enabled detection of 75% of fetuses with trisomy 21.In screening for chromosomal abnormalities, an approach which combines maternal age and NT is effective and increases the detection rate compared to the use of any single test.[Non invasive prenatal diagnosis of trisomy 21: dream or reality?].[Rapid diagnosis of fetal chromosomal abnormalities by fluorescence in situ hybridization].In the course of the Down-screening protocol there are possibilities today for rapid diagnosis of aneuploidies among high-risk pregnancies identified by non-invasive screening tests, however, the diagnostic value of these molecular genetic tests are debated.In this prospective study, data about the reliability of one of the rapid tests, namely; interphase fluorescence in situ hybridization (int-FISH) was to be gathered by the authors.For the period between May 2002 and September 2006 all of the 1279 fetal sample were examined both with int-FISH and full karyotyping.Extra or absent signal was detected in 47 cases (3.7%) (trisomy 21 in 32, various other numerical abnormalities in 15 cases). All of these numerical aberrations were confirmed by metaphase analysis without false positivity or negativity. In 19 cases the finding of int-FISH was negative, however, full karyotyping disclosed abnormalities (in 12 of these 19 cases, the abnormality was balanced). Only 4 of the 1279 fetuses (0.3%) (3 small extra marker chromosomes, 1 de novo unbalanced translocation) were to be found, who would have been born with phenotypical abnormalities without metaphase analysis (2 of them had suspect ultrasound signs).Although more analysis are needed, based on the results of this study it is to be concluded that rapid molecular genetic methods like int-FISH might be accepted as a diagnostic tests of fetal aneuploidy, if its use were restricted to high risk pregnancies identified by advanced maternal age and non-invasive maternal screening only. However, full karyotyping is needed in cases with familial translocation and abnormal 2nd trimester ultrasound signs.Humerus length measurement in Down syndrome screening.To compare the predictive values of different humeral shortness assessment methods in Down syndrome screening.674 high-risk singleton pregnancies with a valid last menstrual period (LMP) date were studied. Nomogram and formulas were derived from a subset of the studied group. Sensitivities of fifth percentile and cut-off values of 0.9 for observed-to-expected (obs/exp) humerus length (HL) ratio according to biparietal diameter (BPD) and gestational age (GA) were compared.Sensitivities were 20%, 46.7% and 60% for the 5th percentile, a cut-off value of 0.9 for obs/exp HL by BPD and a cut-off value of 0.9 for obs/exp HL by GA, respectively.Using gestational age instead of BPD when calculating expected humeral length may increase the predictive role of humeral shortness in Down syndrome screening of pregnant women with valid and correct LMP.[Advanced maternal age as an indication for invasive prenatal diagnostics?].To investigate the effectivity of the first trimester screening (FTS), age and other factors as an indication for invasive testing.A retrospective analysis of indications for invasive procedures and their effectivity in the group of women who underwent screening in the first trimester of pregnancy in our center. Women were offered the combined screening program by ultrasound and biochemical markers. Women with risk more than 1 : 300 for chromosome 21, 18 or 13 trisomies, or those over the age of 35 as this is still and indication for invasive tests in the Czech Republic were offered genetic counseling and invasive testing. Chorionic villous sampling (CVS) or amniocentesis (AMC) was than performed.Of the 1700 women who underwent FTS, 291 were over 35 in which only 24 had a risk higher than 1 : 300. Detection rate of trisomy 21, 18 and 13 were 100%, (16 cases) for a false positive rate of 4.6%. In the whole screened population 79 had a risk more than 1 : 300. The total number of invasive tests was 150. Amniocentesis was performed in 88 cases, only 27 were done on the basis of screening with 3 aneuploidy detected. 36 amniocenteses were done for age and 25 for other indications-- all had normal karyotype. The CVS was performed in 62, 52 on the basis of screening with 13 aneuploidy detected. In the other ten cases 5 for age and 5 for family history the karyotype was normal.Altogether 79 invasive procedures based on screening detected all 16 aneuploidies. Remaining 71 invasive tests (n = 41) for age and (n = 30) for other indications had a complete normal karyotype.First- and second-trimester evaluation of risk for Down syndrome.To investigate the differences in costs and outcomes of Down syndrome screening using data from the First and Second Trimester Evaluation of Risk (FASTER) Trial.Seven possible screening options for Down syndrome were compared: 1) Triple Screen-maternal serum alpha fetoprotein, estriol, and hCG; 2) Quad-maternal serum alpha fetoprotein, estriol, hCG, and Inhibin A; 3) Combined First-nuchal translucency, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A), free beta-hCG; 4) Integrated-nuchal translucency, PAPP-A, plus Quad; 5) Serum Integrated-PAPP-A, plus Quad; 6) Stepwise Sequential-Combined First plus Quad with results given after each test; and 7) Contingent Sequential-Combined First and only those with risk between 1:30 and 1:1,500 have Quad screen. The detection rates for each option were used given a 5% false-positive rate except for Contingent Sequential with a 4.3% false-positive rate. Outcomes included societal costs of each screening regimen (screening tests, amniocentesis, management of complications, and cost of care of Down syndrome live births), Down syndrome fetuses identified and born, the associated quality-adjusted life years, and the incremental cost-utility ratio.Based on the screening results derived from the 38,033 women evaluated in the FASTER trial, the Contingent Sequential screen dominated (lower costs with better outcomes) all other screens. For example, the Contingent Sequential cost 32.3 million dollars whereas the other screens ranged from 32.8 to 37.5 million dollars. The Sequential strategy led to the identification of the most Down syndrome fetuses of all of the screens, but at a higher cost per Down syndrome case diagnosed ($719,675 compared with $690,427) as compared with the Contingent Sequential. Because of the lower overall false-positive rate leading to fewer procedure-related miscarriages, the Contingent Sequential resulted in the highest quality-adjusted life years as well. The Contingent Sequential remained the most cost-effective option throughout sensitivity analysis of inputs, including amniocentesis rate after positive screen, rate of therapeutic abortion after Down syndrome diagnosis, and rate of procedure-related miscarriages.Analysis of this actual data from the FASTER Trial demonstrates that the Contingent Sequential test is the most cost-effective. This information can help shape future policy regarding Down syndrome screening.Dose dependency between cigarette consumption and reduced maternal serum PAPP-A levels at 11-13+6 weeks of gestation.To examine whether in smokers there is a significant dose dependency between the number of cigarettes per day and levels of free ss-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) at 11-13(+6) weeks of gestation.This was a retrospective analysis of the maternal serum free ss-hCG and PAPP-A levels in relation to the maternal smoking status in 109 263 chromosomally normal singleton pregnancies that had undergone first-trimester screening for Down syndrome by a combination of fetal nuchal translucency thickness and maternal serum biochemistry.There were 95 287 nonsmokers and 13 976 cigarette smokers. The overall median PAPP-A MoM among cigarette smokers was 0.827, which was 19.6% lower than the value of 1.029 in nonsmokers (p < 0.0001 for log(10) MoM). The respective values for beta-hCG MoM were 1.003 for smokers and 1.035 for nonsmokers (p < 0.0001 for log(10) MoM) which corresponds to a reduction of 3.1%. There was a significant inverse relationship between the number of cigarettes per day and the level of PAPP-A MoM (r = 0.989, p < 0.0001) but not the level of free beta-hCG MoM (r = 0.733; p = 0.098). Using a statistical modeling approach we found that the screen-positive rate when correcting the PAPP-A MoM by an all or nil smoking factor was reduced by only 0.1% (3.75 vs 3.85%) when compared to correcting with a factor related to the smoking dose per day.In first-trimester screening for Down syndrome by maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG the impact of correcting for the dose dependant rather than the all or nil effect of smoking is marginal. However, a dose dependent correction improves the accuracy of the individual patient-specific risk.Hyperglycosylated-hCG (h-hCG) and Down syndrome screening in the first and second trimesters of pregnancy.To validate Down syndrome screening protocols that include hyperglycosylated-hCG (h-hCG) measurements.Measuring h-hCG in 21 641 fresh first- and second-trimester maternal serum samples, but not for clinical interpretation. Nuchal translucency (NT) and pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) measurements were available in the first trimester; alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated estriol (uE3), and human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) measurements in the second trimester.Of the 23 first- and 26 second-trimester Down syndrome pregnancies identified, 52 and 65% of h-hCG measurements were above the 95th centile, respectively. At a 3% false positive rate, maternal age, NT, PAPP-A and h-hCG detected 78% of cases (95% CI, 56-93%). Other combinations were consistent with previous modeling utilizing stored samples. A literature summary indicates h-hCG is as strong a marker as free-beta between 10 and 13 weeks' gestation.Down syndrome screening performance of h-hCG using fresh samples meets published expectations based on stored samples. h-hCG could replace free beta measurements, at gestational ages as early as 10 weeks.Elevated levels of total (maternal and fetal) beta-globin DNA in maternal blood from first trimester pregnancies with trisomy 21.Elevated levels of circulating fetal DNA have been observed in maternal plasma when a trisomy 21 fetus is confirmed. However, these studies have been limited to pregnancies carrying a male fetus. We sought to quantify total (fetal and maternal) DNA from dried blood spots (DBS) for use as an additional factor in multi-parameter prenatal screening for aneuploidy.Maternal DBS were obtained from the NICHD-sponsored multi-center cohort (BUN) study. Seventeen confirmed trisomy 21 (mean gestational age 12.23 +/- 0.77 weeks) cases were each matched by gestational age to euploid controls (n = 30). DNA was extracted and quantitative PCR was performed to measure four non-chromosome 21 loci, including glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate dehydrogenase (GAPDH) (12p13), beta-globin (11p15.5), beta-actin (7p15-12) and p53 (17p13.1).Beta-globin DNA levels were significantly elevated (P = 0.003) in 13 of 17 trisomy 21 cases (4.08 +/- 1.78 Geq/ml x 10(5)) compared with matched controls (2.35 +/- 1.84 Geq/ml x 10(5)). Following conversion of beta-globin concentrations into multiples of the median (MoM), MoM for trisomy 21 cases was 2.8 compared with 1.0 in euploid cases. No significant differences in levels of circulating GAPDH, beta-actin and p53 sequences were detected.This work demonstrates differential levels of circulating beta-globin DNA in maternal blood of euploid and trisomy 21 cases. Sequence-specific quantification could provide an additional measure to improve non-invasive methods of prenatal screening to detect trisomy 21 using dried blood. Beta-globin in particular is an attractive biomarker that could contribute to enhance multiple serum parameter testing in the first trimester.Clinical impact of systematic genetic sonogram screening in a low-risk population.To determine the clinical impact of a genetic sonogram (GS) on a population at low risk for trisomy 21 (T21).A GS evaluating common major and minor markers was created and prospectively applied to consecutive women at 15-20 weeks' gestation presenting for routine ultrasound and at low T21 risk. Prenatal diagnosis (PND) referral occurred if 1 major marker, 2 minor markers, major malformation or choroid plexus cysts (CPCs) were seen. Neonatal outcomes were determined by chart review for neonates born at our institution and by letter for those born elsewhere. Using an ultrasound database, a similar population was identified prior to study inception and the GS retrospectively applied. PND referrals in both periods were confirmed by chart review. The rates of isolated minor marker (IMM), positive GS and PND referrals were compared using chi2 analysis.IMM detection was unchanged (43 of 434, 10.1%) in the study vs. (23 of 243, 9.5%) control group. Excluding CPCs, 6 of 18 (33.3%) subjects of vs. 2 of 28 (7.1%) controls with IMM were referred for prenatal diagnosis (p < 0.03). The frequency of positive GS was unchanged: 14 of 434 (3.2%) subjects vs. 5 of 243 (2.1%) controls.Currently no prospectively studied, effective ultrasound models exist for screening low-risk populations at 15-20 weeks. A GS with clear criteria for counseling on an increased T21 risk decreased inappropriate referrals without increasing positive screens.Maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in patients with habitual abortion-influence on first-trimester screening for chromosomal abnormalities.To explore if maternal serum free beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) levels in the first-trimester of pregnancy are altered in patients with habitual abortions and if there is an effect on first-trimester screening for Down syndrome.A retrospective study was conducted on 913 normal singleton fetuses that underwent first-trimester combined screening for Down syndrome. Maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG were compared between patients with (n = 64) and without habitual abortions (n = 849).The medians +/- SD log(10) MoM of PAPP-A and free beta-hCG +/- SD in patients with and without habitual abortions were 0.063 +/- 0.28 versus - 0.014 +/- 0.27 and - 0.001 +/- 0.27 versus - 0.018 +/- 0.31, with a p value of 0.042 and 0.87, respectively. The screen positive rate setting the cut off at 1:350 looking at the background risk for trisomy 21 was 71.4% in women with and 81.2% in women without habitual abortion, after combined first-trimester screening it was 7.8% in women with and 10.1% in women without recurrent abortion.Patients with habitual abortions have slightly increased maternal serum PAPP-A levels in the first-trimester. This marginal difference seems not to effect risk calculation in combined first-trimester screening for trisomy 21.The impact of maternal serum screening programs for Down syndrome in southeast Michigan, 1988-2003.Abnormal first-trimester ductus venosus blood flow: a risk factor for adverse outcome in fetuses with normal nuchal translucency.First-trimester nuchal translucency thickness (NT) is a potent tool for assessment of fetal risks of aneuploidy and other adverse outcomes. When NT is increased, Doppler assessment of the ductus venosus (DV) enhances the prediction specificity for Down syndrome. This study assessed abnormal Doppler DV waveform as a predictor of adverse outcome when the NT is normal.This was a case-control study of 2,505 consecutive patients undergoing NT screening in our certified first-trimester screening program. First-trimester Doppler assessment of DV was performed and atrial systolic velocity was rated as antegrade (normal) or absent/reversed (DV-RAV; abnormal). Each case with normal NT (< 95(th) percentile) and DV-RAV was matched with two controls with respect to maternal age within 1 year, NT within 0.2 mm, crown-rump length within 3 mm, and closest calculated aneuploidy risk. Outcomes for paired variables were compared using t-test and Chi-square test.Forty-seven (1.9%) patients had normal NT and DV-RAV. After exclusion of three cases with obvious first-trimester anomalies and two with incomplete outcome data, 42 remained for analysis. Adverse outcome included cardiovascular defects (n = 6), fetal growth restriction (n = 3), renal anomaly (n = 2), aneuploidy (n = 3) and multiple defects (n = 3), in a total of 11/42 cases (26.2%). Cardiac abnormalities, renal abnormalities and perinatal death were all significantly more common in the study group (all P < 0.05).Abnormal first-trimester DV Doppler findings appear to predict adverse outcome independently of a normal NT. These patients need detailed mid-trimester assessment of fetal anatomy with formal echocardiography, and subsequent follow-up.Genetic sonography after first-trimester Down syndrome screening.Approximately 90% of Down syndrome cases are detected during first-trimester screening. We aimed to determine the potential effectiveness of second-trimester genetic sonography as a sequential screen for Down syndrome.In this simulation study, published statistical parameters for first-trimester free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin, pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A and nuchal translucency thickness, and second-trimester ultrasound markers (nuchal fold, hyperechoic bowel, short humerus, short femur, echogenic intracardiac focus, pyelectasis and major abnormality) were used to model the effectiveness of second-trimester genetic sonography combined with first-trimester screening.First-trimester combined screening alone resulted in a detection rate of 88.5% with a 4.2% false-positive rate. A follow-up genetic ultrasound examination in which only one sonographic marker was found and previous results were not taken into account would detect an additional 8% of Down syndrome cases for an additional false-positive rate of 13.2%. Using individual marker likelihood ratios to modify the first-trimester risk for screen-negative patients, genetic sonography detected an additional 6.1% of Down syndrome cases for an additional 1.2% false-positive rate, giving a total detection rate of 94.6% and a total false-positive rate of 5.4%. In a contingent protocol, in which genetic sonography would be performed only for patients with a first-trimester risk of between 1/300 and 1/2500, the detection rate was 4.8% and the false-positive rate was 0.7%, giving a total detection rate of 93.3% and a total false-positive rate of 4.9%.Second-trimester genetic sonography, if used properly, can be an effective sequential screen following first-trimester Down syndrome screening. Further studies on the role of the genetic sonogram as a follow-up to first-trimester combined screening are warranted.Optimal crown-rump length for measuring the nuchal translucency.To determine the optimal crown-rump length (CRL) for obtaining nuchal translucency (NT) measurements.Women undergoing NT measurements by NT-certified sonographers within a combined screening program over an 18-month period were included in the study if they had a living fetus with a CRL of 45-84 mm. NT measurement success and screen-positive rates, transvaginal sonography (TVUS) use, and reasons for failed NT measurements were compared in 3 groups by CRL corresponding to 11-0/7 to 11-6/7 weeks (45-54 mm), 12-0/7 to 12-6/7 weeks (55-66 mm), and 13-0/7 to 13-6/7 weeks (67-84 mm).Eight hundred thirty-seven women aged 34.9 +/- 4.9 years underwent 1 to 3 NT measurements at a mean CRL of 59.8 +/- 25.0 mm. NT measurements were more successful at 11 and 12 weeks (81.8% and 84.4%) than at 13 weeks (66.9%) (p < 0.001). Screen-positive and TVUS rates, and reasons for failed NT measurements did not vary by CRL.NT measurements are most successful at CRL 45-66 mm corresponding to sonographically determined gestational ages of 11-0/7 to 12-6/7 weeks.ADAM 12 as a second-trimester maternal serum marker in screening for Down syndrome.ADAM 12 is a placenta-derived glycoprotein that is involved in growth and differentiation. The maternal serum concentration of ADAM 12 is a potential first-trimester maternal serum marker of Down syndrome (DS). Here we examine the potential of ADAM 12 as a second-trimester maternal serum marker of DS.The concentration of ADAM 12 was determined in gestational week 14-19 in 88 DS pregnancies and 341 matched control pregnancies. Medians of normal pregnancies were established by polynomial regression and the distribution of log(10) MoM ADAM 12 values in DS pregnancies and controls determined. Correlations with alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (free beta-hCG) were established and used to model the performance of maternal serum screening with ADAM 12 in combination with other second-trimester serum markers.The ADAM 12 maternal serum concentration was significantly increased with a median MoM of 1.85 and a mean log(10) MoM (SD) of 0.268 (0.2678) compared to a mean log(10) MoM (SD) of 0.013 (0.4318) in controls. ADAM 12 correlated with maternal weight and ethnicity (with the serum concentration increased in Afro-Caribbeans), but neither with maternal age nor gestational age, and only marginally with AFP (r(DS) = 0.078, r(controls) = 0.093) and free beta-hCG (r(DS) = 0.073, r(controls) = 0.144. The increase in detection rate-for a false positive rate of 5%--by adding ADAM 12 to the double test (AFP + free beta-hCG) was 4%, similar to that of adding uE3 to the double test.ADAM 12 is an efficient second-trimester marker for DS. Further studies should be conducted to determine whether it may be a useful additional or alternative marker to those currently used in the second-trimester.[Efficiency of measuring nasal bone as an ultrasound marker of Down syndrome in 11th to 13th+6 week of pregnancy].The aim of this study is to evaluate the significance of nasal bone as a marker for trisomy 21 in the group of women that underwent invasive procedures in our center at 11 to 14 weeks' gestation.The data of 181 women who had undergone the invasive procedures were evaluated for the presence or absence of nasal bone retrospectively and were correlated with fetal karyotype.A successful view of the fetal profile was obtained in 135 fetuses. The nasal bone was absent in 5 of 8 fetuses with trisomy 21 and in 3 of 4 fetuses with trisomy 18. In the group of chromosomally normal fetuses the nasal bone was absent in 4 of the 123 cases. The false positive rate of our screening program dropped from 4.5% to 2.5% after the introduction of the nasal bone evaluation into our risk calculation model for trisomy 21.Nasal bone evaluation improved the detection of trisomy 21 in the first trimester in our screening program and reduced the need for invasive procedures in our department. Absence of the nasal bone showed a sensitivity of 63% for a 5% false positive rate for trisomy 21 in our study. It is rarely observed in chromosomally normal fetuses (2.5%). An appropriate training is mandatory in order to achieve acceptable results.Clinical first-trimester routine screening for Down syndrome in singleton pregnancies in northern Finland.The purpose of this study was to compare the efficacy of both separate and combined maternal serum testing and fetal nuchal translucency measurement in the first trimester screening for Down syndrome in northern Finland.The following screening tests were evaluated: measurement of nuchal translucency (NT) alone; serum screening (pregnancy-associated plasma protein A [PAPP-A] and free beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin [beta-hCG]) alone; and combined screening (NT plus PAPP-A and free beta-hCG).The participants comprised 7534 pregnant women during the 10+0-12+6 weeks of pregnancy. All 7534 women participated in serum screening, and 4765 women participated in combined screening. In the serum screening-alone group, there were 30 cases of trisomy 21, of which 23 (76%) were detected. In the combined-screening group, there were 24 cases of trisomy 21 and 21 (87.5%) were detected. In the combined-screening group NT alone detected 15 cases of Down syndrome (62%).Combined screening is the method of choice for Down syndrome screening.Advanced first trimester screening (AFS): an improved test strategy for the individual risk assessment of fetal aneuploidies and malformations.First trimester risk assessment for fetal aneuploidies is computed on the base of a general background risk, which is depending on the maternal age. Thereby, the adjusted risk tends to rise with increasing age. Obversely, more unsuspicious fetal parameters [measurement of the nuchal translucency (NT) and biochemical parameters, free beta human chorionic gonadotropine (fbetaB-Hcg) and pregnancy associated plasma protein A (Papp-A)] have to be observed to result in an unsuspicious test at higher age. It was the aim of this study to investigate the potential value of a novel risk assessment algorithm explicitly disregarding the maternal age.This was an ultrasound cohort study of 1,463 singleton pregnancies at 11-14 weeks of gestation undergoing a first trimester screening for fetal aneuploidies by measuring the (NT), Papp-A and fbeta-hCG. In each case, the pregnancy outcome was obtained. Regarding either the detection of genetic affections or the combined detection of genetic or somatic anomalies, the test performance parameters (sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values) were calculated and compared with each other. For risk calculation the standard Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF)-Software and an alternative software with a similar algorithm (JOY-Software) were utilized. Compared to this, the risk assessment had been modified by implementing a novel calculation algorithm (advanced first trimester screening algorithm, AFS) purposely disregarding the maternal age and again, the test performance parameters had been computed and were compared with the first ones.At the mere genetic analysis, all four test-strategies revealed to have identical sensitivity and negative predictive values. Compared to the standard FMF-Software, the JOY-Software showed a reduced false positive rate. In addition, in both softwares, the false positive rate is highly significant-reduced by implementing the AFS-algorithm. At combined genetic and somatic analysis, analogous results on different counts could be found.In the effort to create an algorithm characterising somatic and fetal conditions of the fetus most properly, the inclusion of maternal age is not a helpful value and excluding the age from risk calculation leads to a high significant reduction of the false positive rate. Further, a comparable marked increase of both, specificity and positive predictive values, can be achieved for the FMF- and JOY-Software on the background of the generally more favourable JOY test performance.Are nuchal translucency, pregnancy associated plasma protein-A or free-beta-human chorionic gonadotropin depending on maternal age? A multicenter study of 8,116 pregnancies.First-trimester screening according to Nicolaides uses maternal age to obtain a common background risk for trisomy 21. The likelihood ratios by nuchal translucency, free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A are not with respect to maternal age. It was the aim of this study to investigate if likelihood ratios should better take care of it.Pearson's correlation and different models of regression analysis had been performed on the results of 8,116 first-trimester screenings. The total number of pregnancies was subdivided into three subgroups of healthy fetuses (n = 8,038); fetuses with Down's syndrome (n = 46) and fetuses with other genetic abnormalities (n = 32). Statistical testing was applied to each of the three groups.Strong independence from maternal age could be found for each of the first-trimester screening measurement parameter, as well for healthy and as for affected fetuses. Neither Pearson's test nor nonlinear regression models could detect a correlation. Accordingly significance of Pearson's test is not given.First-trimester screening would not be improved by considering the maternal age in the calculation of the likelihood ratios. Therefore the currently used algorithm is adequate. According, to the results, it seems to be proper as well to disregard the maternal age in newer test strategies advanced first-trimester screening (AFS) at all.Comparison of Nicolaides' risk evaluation for Down's syndrome with a novel software: an analysis of 1,463 cases.The individual risk assessment of fetal Down's syndrome based on measurement of nuchal translucency (NT) according to Nicolaides, optionally complemented by the determination of PAPP-A and free beta HCG has progressively supplanted other search strategies for fetal aneuploidies. It could be shown that this diagnostic strategy equally detects other numeric aneuploidies at a comparable rate. A positive test result is also predictive for the presence of a fetal malformation. In this field, several computer programs are available for clinical use. The objective of our study was to re-evaluate the first consecutive 1463 NT-risk calculations determined by Nicolaides' method and to compare the risk calculation to the JOY software (NT-risk calculation module, JOY Patient Database) introduced in 2002.At the Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology, Hannover Medical School, 1463 consecutive complete data sets comprising first trimester screening performed between May 2, 2000 and June 26, 2003 and corresponding fetal outcome were analysed using risk assessment based on the Nicolaides method (PIA Fetal Database NT-Module) and compared with the risk evaluation as determined by the JOY software (JOY Patient Database NT module). A risk exceeding 1:300 was considered to indicate the need for further invasive testing. In a first step, only cytogenetically detectable chromosomal aberrations were analysed. Then, a second evaluation including fetal malformations was performed.Among the 1463 cases, 1445 (98.77%) fetuses revealed to be cytogenetically healthy. Both softwares showed identical detection rates at the genetic and somatic level:13 cases of Down-Syndrome (0.89%), 2 cases of trisomy 18 (0.14%), one case of triploidy, one Turner-Syndrome, one Klinefelter-Syndrome (0.07% each) were detected. A positive test result was found in 15 cases ending in a spontaneous abortion, intrauterine death or peripartum death (1.03%) and in 22 cases of fetal malformation (1.50%). At the level of genetic detection the test positive rate dropped from 92 (PIA) to 71 (JOY) (-22.8%). At the level of combined adverse outcome the test positive rate was reduced from 100 (PIA) to 76 (JOY) (-22.0%), thus yielding in a marked improvement of the characteristic test performance parameters.The novel, recently developed JOY software package allowed reliable evaluation of the risk for aneuploidy with increased specificity whereas sensitivity was unchanged. Our data suggest an improvement of the screening for aneuploidy when using this novel software: With an identical detection rate, the number of unnecessary invasive measures may be reduced.Comparison of serum markers in first-trimester down syndrome screening.Comparing first trimester screening performance: routine care gynaecologists' practices vs. prenatal centre.To evaluate and compare the screening performance for fetal trisomy 21 in the first trimester of pregnancy in general gynaecologists' practices and specialised centres for prenatal care in Germany.This study included 15,026 serum samples analysed in our laboratory for free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) at 11-14 weeks of gestation between 1.1.2000 and 31.12.2003. Fetal risk for trisomy 21 was calculated using nuchal translucency (NT) values and crown-rump-lengths (CRL), measured either in general gynaecologists' practices or in a tertiary level prenatal centre. The detection rate for a fixed risk cut-off (1:300) and a fixed false-positive rate (5 %) was calculated for NT, serum biochemistry, maternal age and the combination of these components.The estimated risk for trisomy 21 based on maternal age, fetal NT and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A was 1 in 300 or greater in 5.1 % (362 of 6897) and 8 % (329 of 3840) of normal pregnancies, and in 78.9 % (15 of 19) and 88.5 % (23 of 26) of those with trisomy 21. For a fixed false-positive rate of 5 %, the respective detection rates of screening for fetal Down's syndrome by maternal age and serum free beta-hCG and PAAP-A, maternal age and fetal NT and by maternal age, fetal NT and maternal serum biochemistry were (general gynaecologists' practices/prenatal centre) 68.4/69.2 %, 42.1/65.4 % and 78.9/88.5 %, respectively.The screening results are satisfactory in both general gynaecologists' practices and a prenatal centre.Practical issues drawn from the implementation of the integrated test for Down syndrome screening into routine clinical practice.We have evaluated a cohort of women booked for antenatal care at University College London Hospitals. The uptake of screening was 64.4% and was significantly higher (73 versus 46%) in women who booked before 14 weeks. Of the women who booked before 14 weeks, 96.8% opted for the integrated test (IT). Overall, 5.3% failed to attend for the second blood test. The false-positive rate in the women who had the IT was 2.9%. All 11 cases of Down syndrome were detected prenatally. Our study is the first to evaluate implementation of the IT into routine clinical practice.A non-invasive test for prenatal diagnosis based on fetal DNA present in maternal blood: a preliminary study.Use of free fetal DNA to diagnose fetal chromosomal abnormalities has been hindered by the inability to distinguish fetal DNA from maternal DNA. Our aim was to establish whether single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs) can be used to distinguish fetal DNA from maternal DNA-and to determine the number of fetal chromosomes-in maternal blood samples.Formaldehyde-treated blood samples from 60 pregnant women and the stated biological fathers were analysed. Maternal plasma fractions were quantified at multiple SNPs, and the ratio of the unique fetal allele signal to the combined maternal and fetal allele signal calculated. The mean ratios of SNPs on chromosomes 13 and 21 were compared to test for potential fetal chromosomal abnormalities.The mean proportion of free fetal DNA was 34.0% (median 32.5%, range 17.0-93.8). We identified three samples with significant differences in the fetal DNA ratios for chromosome 13 and chromosome 21, indicative of trisomy 21; the remaining 57 samples were deemed to be normal. Amniocentesis or newborn reports from the clinical sites confirmed that the copy number of fetal chromosomes 13 and 21 was established correctly for 58 of the 60 samples, identifying 56 of the 57 normal samples, and two of the three trisomy 21 samples. Of the incorrectly identified samples, one was a false negative and one was a false positive. The sensitivity and positive predictive value were both 66.7% (95% CI 12.5-98.2) and the specificity and negative predictive values were both 98.2% (89.4-99.9).The copy number of chromosomes of interest can be directly established from maternal plasma. Such a non-invasive prenatal test could provide a useful complement to currently used screening tests.Ultrasonographic measurement of fetal nasal bone length in the second trimester in Korean population.To establish the reference range of fetal nasal bone length (NBL) in the second trimester in the Korean population and to determine its clinical value in screening for trisomy 21.A total of 3019 consecutive fetuses at 16-28 weeks of gestation underwent ultrasonographic measurement of NBL at Asan Medical Center from October 2003 to August 2005.Fetal profile was successfully examined in 95.6% (2885/3019) of the fetuses. NBL increased linearly with advanced gestation (R(2) = 0.4337, p < 0.001). During this period, 23 fetuses with chromosomal abnormalities (including nine with trisomy 21, two with trisomy 18, and three with Turner syndrome) were detected. In trisomy 21, hypoplastic nasal bone (<2.5th percentile) was seen in 3/9 fetuses, and the NBL of one fetus was between the 2.5th and 5th percentile. Hypoplastic nasal bone was seen in 3.1% (89/2833) of fetuses with normal chromosomal or postnatal examination findings.We present the normal range of NBL in the second trimester in the Korean population and also their linear relationship with gestational age (GA). The NBL appears to be shorter in Korean fetuses than Caucasian and Chinese fetuses. This indicates that the normal range would vary between races and that a relative percentile is a more reliable screening criterion than an absolute value.Human placental lactogen is a first-trimester maternal serum marker of Down syndrome.Human placental lactogen (hPL) is synthesised by the placenta and found in maternal serum. We analysed the potential of hPL as a first-trimester maternal serum-screening marker for fetal Down syndrome (DS).hPL was quantified by ELISA in 47 DS pregnancies and 136 controls in gestational weeks 8-13. Distributions of log multiples of the median (MoMs) were established. The quantity of hPL in DS screening was estimated using Monte Carlo simulation methods.The mean log10 MoM hPL was - 0.1995 (SD: 0.1993) in affected and 0.0026 (SD: 0.2129) in control pregnancies. This corresponds to a MoM of 0.63 in DS pregnancies. hPL correlated significantly with log10 MoM values of hCGbeta (r = 0.320) and PAPP-A (r = 0.590) in controls, but not with hCGbeta (r = 0.228) or PAPP-A (r = 0.090) in DS pregnancies. The inclusion of hPL in the double test (PAPP-A + hCGbeta) increased the detection rate from 67 to 75% for a false-positive rate of 5%.hPL is a DS screening marker that is applicable at weeks 9-13 and could be included in multiple marker first-trimester screening for DS.Free fetal DNA in maternal circulation: a potential prognostic marker for chromosomal abnormalities?Previous studies on the association of fetal cell-free (cf)DNA levels in maternal circulation have produced conflicting results but the sample sizes were small and based on archived material. We aimed to quantify the levels of fetal and total cfDNA on prospectively collected samples, to understand their correlation with other variables and to clarify their diagnostic value.DNA from pre-CVS maternal plasma was extracted from 264 controls, 72 trisomy 21, 24 trisomy 18, 12 trisomy 13, 16 Turner's syndrome and 8 triploidy first-trimester pregnancies and quantified using real-time PCR. beta-globin was used to determine total cfDNA levels and DYS14 and SRY assays to determine fetal cfDNA levels.Fetal cfDNA levels (DYS14) showed correlation with crown rump length (CRL) (p = 0.004), BMI (p = 0.01) and storage time (p = 0.007) while there was an inverse correlation of total cfDNA levels with nuchal translucency (NT) (p = 0.001). No significant difference was observed between the levels of fetal cfDNA in controls and aneuploidy cases.Quantification of fetal and total cfDNA in maternal circulation showed inverse correlation between NT and total cfDNA levels. Our results also suggest that fetal cfDNA is not an ideal prognostic marker for chromosomal abnormalities in first-trimester pregnancies.Nuchal translucency screening: how do women actually utilize the results?To examine how women use the nuchal translucency (NT) risk adjustment in decision-making for invasive prenatal diagnosis.Retrospective cohort study of 1083 consecutive NT screening exams. A screen-positive test was defined as a risk > or = 1/300. Primary outcome was what proportion of screen-positive or screen-negative women chose to undergo chorionic villus sampling or amniocentesis.Of the women tested, 79% (858/1083) were > or = 35-years-old and 88% (756/858) of these women had a decrease in age-related risk after NT. Of the screen-negative women, 31% (238/756) > or = 35 years of age chose to have invasive testing as compared to only 11.2% (25/223) of those < 35 years of age (p < 0.001). Of the screen-positive women, 71% (72/102) > or = 35 years of age and 100% (2/2) < 35 years of age chose to obtain invasive testing (p = 0.368).First-trimester NT screening for Down syndrome (DS) enables a significant number of women over age 35 to lower the risk for DS several fold and avoid the risks of invasive testing. However, despite significant reductions in age-specific mid-trimester DS risks, a relatively high proportion of women > or = 35 years of age still opted for invasive testing.The "Consecutive Combined Test"--using double test from week 8 + 0 and nuchal translucency scan, for first trimester screening for Down syndrome.To test the performance of the "Consecutive Combined Test", applied on a high-risk population. The classic "Combined Test" (Double test (DT) and Nuchal Translucency (NT) measurement on the same day at app. week 12) gives detection rates (DR) for Down syndrome (DS) of 80-90% for false positive rates (FPR) of 5%. In affected pregnancies, however, the low PAPP-A level is more pronounced, the earlier in pregnancy. Thus, we hypothesized that the Double Test could be taken as early as from week 8 + 0, without compromising the excellent performance of the Combined Test. This "Consecutive Combined Test" allows for a centralised laboratory function.Inclusion criteria were maternal age > 35 years (80%) or a family history (20%). Double test was taken at a median gestational age (GA) = 10 weeks. NT was measured at GA = 11 + 0 - 13 + 6. A combined risk estimate of > 1:400 at birth was used as cut-off.881 had the full test. Screen positive = 34. CVS with aneuploidy = 11 (6 trisomy-21, 5 others). FPR = 3.2%. Positive Predictive Value (PPV) = 17.6% for T-21.The "Consecutive Combined Test" applied on a high-risk population seems to be highly efficient with a remarkably high PPV.Is there a nuchal translucency millimeter measurement above which there is no added benefit from first trimester serum screening?The purpose of this study was to evaluate whether there is a nuchal translucency (NT) measurement, independent of gestational age, above which immediate diagnostic testing should be offered without waiting for first trimester serum markers.Thirty-six thousand one hundred twenty patients had successful measurement of simple NT at 10 3/7 to 13 6/7 weeks and had first trimester serum screening. No risks were reported until second trimester serum screening was completed.Thirty-two patients (0.09%) had NT > or = 4.0 mm; the lowest combined first trimester trisomy 21 risk assessment in euploid cases was 1 in 8 and among aneuploidy cases was 7 in 8. One hundred twenty-eight patients (0.3%) had simple NT > or = 3.0 mm: the lowest combined first trimester trisomy 21 risk assessment of any patient in this group was 1 in 1479 and the lowest risk assessment among aneuploid cases was 1 in 2. Ten patients (8%) had first trimester trisomy 21 risk assessments lowered to less that 1:200 and none of these 10 cases had an abnormal outcome.During first trimester Down syndrome screening, whenever an NT measurement of 3.0 mm or greater is obtained there is minimal benefit in waiting for serum screening results, and no benefit for NT of 4.0 mm or greater. Differentiation between cystic hygroma and enlarged simple NT (> or = 3.0 mm) is now a moot point as both are sufficiently high risk situations to warrant immediate CVS.ADAM 12 as a first-trimester maternal serum marker in screening for Down syndrome.A Disintegrin And Metalloprotease 12 (ADAM 12) is a glycoprotein synthesised by placenta and it has been shown to be a potential first-trimester maternal serum marker for Down syndrome (DS) in two small series. Here we analyse further, the potential of ADAM 12 as a marker for DS in a large collection of first-trimester serum samples.The concentration of ADAM 12 was determined in 10-14-week pregnancy sera from 218 DS pregnancies and 389 gestational age-matched control pregnancies, which had been collected as part of routine prospective first-trimester screening programs (DS = 105) or as part of previous research studies (DS = 113). ADAM 12 was measured using a semi-automated time resolved immunofluorometric assay and median values for normal pregnancies were established by polynomial regression. These medians were then used to determine population distribution parameters for DS and normal pregnancy groups. Correlation with previously established PAPP-A and free beta-hCG multiple of the medians (MoMs) and delta nuchal translucency (NT) were determined and used to model the performance of first-trimester screening with ADAM 12 in combination with other first-trimester markers at various time periods across the first trimester. The benefits of a contingent testing model incorporating early measurement of PAPP-A and ADAM 12 were also explored.The maternal serum concentration of ADAM 12 was significantly reduced (p = 0.0049) with an overall median MoM of 0.79 in the DS cases and a log(10) MoM SD of 0.3734 in the DS cases and 0.3353 in the controls. There was a significant correlation of ADAM 12 MoM in DS cases with gestational age (r = 0.375) and the median MoM increased from 0.50 at 10-11 weeks to 1.38 at 13 weeks. ADAM 12 was correlated with maternal weight (r(controls) = 0.283), PAPP-A (r(controls) = 0.324, r(DS) = 0.251) but less so with free beta-hCG (r(controls) = 0.062, r(DS) = 0.049) and delta NT (r(controls) = 0.110, r(DS) = 0.151). ADAM 12 was significantly (p = 0.026) lower in smokers (0.87 vs 1.00) and elevated in Afro-Caribbean women compared to Caucasian women (1.34 vs 1.00). Population modelling using parameters from this and an earlier study showed that a combination of ADAM 12 and PAPP-A measured at 8-9 weeks and combined with NT and free beta-hCG measured at 12 weeks could achieve a detection rate of 97% at a 5% false-positive rate or 89% at a 1% false-positive rate. PAPP-A and ADAM 12 alone at 8-9 weeks could identify 91% of cases at a 5% false-positive rate. Using this as part of a contingent-screening model to select an intermediate risk group of women for NT and free beta-hCG at 11-12 weeks would enable the detection of 92% of cases with a 1% false-positive rate at a cost of providing NT and free beta-hCG for 6% of women with 94% of women having completed screening by the 10th week of pregnancy.ADAM 12 in early first trimester is a very efficient marker of DS. In combination with existing markers, it offers enhanced screening efficiency in a two-stage sequential first-trimester screening program or in a contingent-screening model, which may have benefits in health economies where universal access to high quality ultrasound is difficult. More data on early first-trimester cases with DS are required to establish more secure population parameters by which to assess further the validity of these models.Sequential and contingent prenatal screening for Down syndrome.To compare the Integrated test in three policies for prenatal Down syndrome screening: Integrated screening for all women, sequential screening (first-trimester tests allowing early completion of screening for high-risk pregnancies), and Contingent screening (early completion of screening for high- and low-risk pregnancies).Estimation of detection rates (DRs) and false-positive rates (FPRs) using Monte Carlo simulation and cost effectiveness for each method.Down syndrome affected and unaffected pregnancies studied in the Serum Urine and Ultrasound Screening Study (SURUSS). RESULTS AND MAIN OUTCOMES: Integrated screening has the best screening performance. The performance of the other two policies approached that of Integrated screening as the first-trimester test FPR decreased. If the first-trimester FPR is set to 0.5% (risk >or= 1 in 30) with an overall DR of 90%, sequential and contingent screening yield overall FPRs of 2.25% and 2.42%, respectively, and 66% of the affected pregnancies are detected by the first-trimester test. The Integrated test on all women yields an FPR of 2.15%. With sequential screening, 99.5% of women would proceed to an Integrated test, or 30% with contingent screening if those with first-trimester test risks of <or=1 in 2000 are classified screen-negative and receive no further testing. About 20% of affected pregnancies identified in the first trimester using sequential or contingent screening would have unnecessary terminations (they would miscarry before the early second trimester). Contingent screening is the most cost-effective if there is no alphafetoprotein screening for neural tube defects, otherwise Integrated screening is more cost-effective.Integrated screening for all women is the simplest, most effective, and the safest policy. Contingent screening is the most complex with the lowest screening performance. Making an earlier diagnosis with sequential and contingent screening has adverse consequences that are sufficient to discourage their use.Umbilical cord diameter at 11-14 weeks of gestation: relationship to nuchal translucency, ductus venous blood flow and chromosomal defects.To compare the umbilical cord diameter (UCD) in euploid and aneuploid fetuses at 11-14 weeks of gestation.In 299 fetuses at 11-14 weeks of gestation the UCD, the nuchal translucency and the a-wave of the ductus venosus were measured. Reference ranges for the UCD according to the gestational age and to the crown-rump-length (CRL) were obtained by measuring the UCD by outer-to-outer border of 244 singleton pregnancies with normal karyotype. The fetal karyotype was established by chorionic villus sampling, amniocentesis or in case of suspected chromosomal abnormalities in the newborn. Linear regression was used to determine the significance of the association between the UCD and CRL or gestational age.Two hundred and ninety-nine fetuses were examined. The median fetal CRL was 64.5 mm (range 45-84) and the median gestational age was 13 (range 11-14) weeks. In the chromosomally normal group the UCD significantly increased with the CRL (r=0.620; p<0.001) and the gestational age (r=0.555; p<0.001). The regression equation for the mean UCD (y) according to the gestational days (x) was: y=-0.604+0.051*x. The regression equation for the mean UCD (y) according to the CRL (x) was: y=1.962+0.029*x. There were no significant differences in the mean UCD in fetuses without and with chromosomal abnormalities. The proportion of fetuses with an UCD above the 95th centile for CRL was higher in aneuploid compared to euploid fetuses (5/14 vs. 13/285, p<0.005). In 5/14 (35.7%) fetuses with chromosomal defects the NT and the UCD were above the 95th centile, whereas none of the fetuses with normal karyotype showed this combination. The proportion of fetuses with increased UCD and abnormal DV blood flow was increased in the cases with chromosomal abnormalities (33.3 vs. 1.8%, p<0.005).Umbilical cord diameter at 11-14 weeks increases with fetal CRL. Fetuses with chromosomal abnormalities are more likely to have an UCD above the 95th centile. Therefore, sonographic evaluation of the umbilical cord during first trimester ultrasound might be of additional value in the assessment of fetuses at risk for aneuploidies.Maternal serum ADAM12 levels in Down and Edwards' syndrome pregnancies at 9-12 weeks' gestation.Maternal serum ADAM12 is reduced, on average, in early first-trimester Down and Edwards' syndrome pregnancies but the extent of reduction declines with gestation. Here we study levels at 9-12 weeks when the marker might be used concurrently with other established markers.Samples from 16 Down and 2 Edwards' syndrome cases were retrieved from storage and tested together with 313 unaffected singleton pregnancies using a semi-automated time-resolved immuno-fluorometric assay. Results were expressed in multiples of the gestation-specific median (MoM) based on regression.The median in Down syndrome was 0.94 MoM with a 10th-90th centile range of 0.22-1.63 MoM compared with 1.00 and 0.33-2.24 MoM in unaffected controls (P = 0.21, one-side Wilcoxon Rank Sum Test). The two Edwards' syndrome cases had values 0.31 and 2.17 MoM.ADAM12 cannot be used concurrently with other markers in the late first trimester. However, it does have the potential to be used earlier in pregnancy either concurrently with other early markers or in a sequential or contingent protocol. More data will be required to reliably predict the performance of either approach.Screening for Down syndrome using first-trimester combined screening followed by second-trimester ultrasound examination in an unselected population.Recent studies have reported the efficacy of first-trimester combined screening for Down syndrome based on maternal age, serum markers (human chorionic gonadotropin, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A), and ultrasound measurement of fetal nuchal translucency. However, those do not incorporate the value of the widely accepted routine 20-22 weeks' anomaly scan.We carried out a multicenter, interventional study in the unselected population of a single health authority in order to assess the performance of first-trimester combined screening, followed by routine second trimester ultrasound examination and/or screening by maternal serum markers (free beta-hCG and alpha-fetoprotein measurement or total hCG, alpha-fetoprotein, and unconjugated estriol measurement) when incidentally performed. Detection and screen positive rates were estimated using a correction method for nonverified issues. A cost analysis was also performed.During the study period, 14,934 women were included. Fifty-one cases of Down syndrome were observed, giving a prevalence of 3.4 per 1000 pregnancies. Of these, 46 were diagnosed through first (n = 41) or second (n = 5) trimester screening. Among the 5 screen-negative Down syndrome cases, all were diagnosed postnatally after an uneventful pregnancy. Detection and screen positive rates of first-trimester combined screening were 79.6% and 2.7%, respectively. These features reached 89.7%, and 4.2%, respectively, when combined with second-trimester ultrasound screening. The average cost of the full screening procedure was 108 euros (120 dollars) per woman and the cost per diagnosed Down syndrome pregnancy was 7,118 euros (7909 dollars).Our findings suggest that 1 pragmatic interventional 2-step approach using first-trimester combined screening followed by second-trimester detailed ultrasound examination is a suitable and acceptable option for Down syndrome screening in pregnancy.Sequential triage in the first trimester may enhance advanced ultrasound scanning in population screening for trisomy 21.To design a trisomy 21 screening protocol for sequential triage in the first trimester, and to evaluate whether it reduces the need for advanced ultrasound scanning to such an extent that this could be dealt with by a limited number of well-trained sonographers only.Screening results of 31 trisomy 21 affected pregnancies and 16 096 unaffected pregnancies from the first trimester screening program of Algemeen Medisch Laboratorium in Antwerp, Belgium, were used to define high-risk, intermediate-risk and low-risk groups. A serum screening result (age, pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG)) of >or=1 : 30 and/or a nuchal translucency thickness (NT) measurement of >or= 3.5 mm were classified as high risk. A serum screening result of < 1 : 1000 together with an NT of < 3.5 mm were classified as low risk. Other results were considered intermediate risk, for which further advanced ultrasound screening would be indicated. This protocol was then evaluated prospectively in another population of 13 493 first-trimester pregnancies.Of the total population, 1.9% was identified as being high risk (14 trisomy 21 pregnancies and 222 unaffected pregnancies; prevalence, 1 : 17), 59.6% was identified as being low risk (three trisomy 21 pregnancies and 9615 unaffected pregnancies; prevalence, 1 : 3206) and 38.4% was identified as being intermediate risk (10 trisomy 21 pregnancies and 6190 unaffected pregnancies; prevalence, 1 : 620). A similar distribution was found in the prospective arm of the study. There was no reduction of overall screening performance compared with our current first-trimester combined screening program. The number of intermediate-risk pregnancies was sufficiently low as to enable advanced ultrasound scanning by well-trained sonographers only.In population screening for fetal trisomy 21, sequential triage in the first trimester can be achieved using very simple methods. Pregnancies at high or at low risk can be identified easily and the number of pregnancies at intermediate risk can be reduced sufficiently to enable advanced ultrasound scanning by well-trained sonographers only. A prospective study is needed to evaluate the performance of this approach and to compare its results with current combined or integrated screening algorithms.Nuchal translucency and first-trimester screening.Three-stage contingent screening for Down syndrome.To demonstrate the potential value of three-stage sequential screening for Down syndrome.Protocols were considered in which maternal serum pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) measurements were taken on all women in the first trimester. Those women with very low Down syndrome risks were screened negative at that stage and nuchal translucency (NT) was measured on the remainder and the risk reassessed. Those with very low risk were then screened negative and those with very high risk were offered early diagnostic testing. Those with intermediate risks received second-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, free beta-hCG, unconjugated estriol and inhibin-A. Risk was then reassessed and those with high risk were offered diagnosis. Detection rates and false-positive rates were estimated by multivariate Gaussian modelling using Monte-Carlo simulation.The modelling suggests that, with full adherence to a three-stage policy, overall detection rates of nearly 90% and false-positive rates below 2.0% can be achieved. Approximately two-thirds of pregnancies are screened on the basis of first-trimester biochemistry alone, five out of six women complete their screening in the first trimester, and the first-trimester detection rate is over 60%.Three-stage contingent sequential screening is potentially highly effective for Down syndrome screening. The acceptability of this protocol and its performance in practice, should be tested in prospective studies.First-trimester screening: lessons from clinical trials and implementation.Screening for trisomy 21 with maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency and maternal serum biochemistry at 11-14 weeks: a regional experience from Germany.To examine the efficacy of first trimester screening for trisomy 21 using a combination of maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency (NT), maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (free beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) in a regional setting [maternity unit of the Women's University Hospital, Hannover Medical School (study center); two regional private centers for prenatal diagnosis and human genetics; laboratory for prenatal diagnosis and human genetics].Fetal NT, crown-rump length, maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were measured at 11-14 weeks of gestation. Risk calculation was carried out using the FMF computer algorithm. The patients were informed and counseled about possible invasive test options if the risk was 1 in 300 or greater. Fetal outcome was obtained by questionnaires given to the patients or sent to their gynecologists. The detection and false-positive rates for the different screening strategies were calculated.Pregnancy outcome was obtained in 2,497 cases, of which 2,196 cases had completed first trimester screening with NT and maternal serum biochemistry and 301 additional cases had NT measurement only. The median age was 32.5 years. In our population 11 affected fetuses were found. The estimated risk for trisomy 21 was 1 in 300 or greater in 64, 82, 88 and 88% of affected fetuses using maternal age alone, in combination with nuchal translucency, with maternal serum biochemical markers or with both NT and biochemical markers for a false-positive rate of 28.2, 5.1, 15.3 and 4.0%.First trimester screening using maternal age, NT, free beta-hCG and PAPP-A is highly effective for the detection of trisomy 21 and is associated with a sensitivity of about 90% for 5% false-positive patients.First-trimester combined screening for Down syndrome and other fetal anomalies.This study assessed fetal outcomes for pregnancies identified at increased risk for Down syndrome by first-trimester combined ultrasound examination and maternal serum biochemistry screening.First-trimester combined screening data were obtained from ultrasound clinics across Western Australia between August 2001 and October 2003. Prenatal screening data were linked with pregnancy outcome information held in state health database registers using probabilistic record-linkage techniques.In 50 of the 60 pregnancies affected by Down syndrome, the adjusted risk was greater than 1 in 300, providing a detection rate of 83% (95% confidence interval [CI] 74-93%). Among all women screened (n = 22,280), 827 had increased risk results but did not have a Down syndrome pregnancy, representing a false-positive rate of 3.7% (95% CI 3.5-3.9%). Ten cases of Down syndrome were detected among women considered not at increased risk, consistent with a false-negative rate of 1 in 2,227. First-trimester combined screening reduced the number of Down syndrome births by 50 in 22,280 (2.24 cases per 1,000 births), which represents the detection of one case of fetal Down syndrome for every 446 women screened. Furthermore, 25% of pregnancies with other birth defects occurred among those identified at increased risk of Down syndrome, and 1 in 8 pregnancies at increased risk were found to have a significant chromosomal or structural defect.First-trimester combined screening in Western Australia detected 83% (95% CI 74-93%) of Down syndrome pregnancies at a 3.7% (95% CI 3.5-3.9%) false-positive rate.II-2.Nuchal translucency thickness measurements for fetal aneuploidy screening: Log NT-MoM or Delta-NT, performer-specific medians and ultrasound training.To evaluate in fetal aneuploidy screening the desirability of using Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF) normal medians of nuchal translucency thickness (NT) measurements or performer-specific medians, and whether the NT measurements should be expressed as Delta-NT or Log NT-MoM values.First trimester-combined screening programme in a low risk population in Flanders, Belgium (Algemeen Medisch Laboratorium, Antwerp).Pregnancies unaffected by trisomy 21 (T21) were screened by FMF-trained or other ultrasonographers. Performer-specific NT medians were established for FMF-trained and other ultrasonographers. NCSS Statistical Software was used to establish probability plots for Log NT-MoM and Delta-NT values, relative to performer-specific references or to the FMF-reference.A total of 16,096 pregnancies were evaluated. Six FMF-trainees and five other ultrasonographers each performed between 83 and 658 NT measurements. For the FMF-trainees, FMF-specific NT-MoM medians were close to one at a crown-rump length (CRL) between 50 and 80 mm, whereas the population-specific NT-MoM medians of the other ultrasonographers were close to one at a CRL between 40 and 80 mm. Performer-specific Delta-NT values fitted a Gaussian distribution between the 5th and 90th percentiles, while for the Log NT-MoM values this was between the 10th and 95th percentiles.We conclude that (i) the use of screening would benefit from performer-specific NT-medians based on Log NT-MoM values; (ii) the use of Log NT-MoM values is marginally better than the use of delta-NT MoMs; and (iii) NT measurements are valid at about 10 weeks (crown-rump length 40-45 mm) as well as at 11-13 weeks.Fetal tricuspid regurgitation at the 11 + 0 to 13 + 6-week scan: association with chromosomal defects and reproducibility of the method.To determine the reproducibility of diagnosing tricuspid regurgitation (TR) at 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks' gestation, to examine further the relationship between TR and the presence of chromosomal defects and to calculate the likelihood ratios for trisomy 21 and trisomy 18 in fetuses with TR.Pulsed wave Doppler of flow across the tricuspid valve was carried out by 12 obstetricians, trained in fetal echocardiography, to ascertain the presence or absence of TR in 1557 fetuses at 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks. The assessment was carried out immediately before chorionic villus sampling for fetal karyotyping. In 128 cases, assessment of tricuspid flow was also performed by experienced fetal cardiologists to examine the reproducibility of the method.Tricuspid flow was successfully assessed in 1538 (98.8%) cases and TR was present in 58 (4.4%) of the 1323 chromosomally normal fetuses, 77 (67.5%) of the 114 cases with trisomy 21, and 14 (33.3%) of the 42 cases with trisomy 18. The kappa coefficient of agreement between obstetricians and cardiologists was 0.872 (P < 0.0001). Logistic regression analysis demonstrated that, in chromosomally normal fetuses, significant prediction of the likelihood of TR was provided by delta nuchal translucency (NT). The likelihood ratio for trisomy 21 and trisomy 18 for TR, derived by dividing the likelihood (%) of TR in trisomy 21 by the likelihood (%) in normal fetuses, decreased with delta NT.At 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks, TR is a common finding in fetuses with trisomies 21 and 18. Assessment of the tricuspid flow can be performed by sonographers trained in fetal echocardiography.Combined first trimester screening for trisomy 21: lack of agreement between risk calculation methods.To call attention to differences in first trimester risk estimates for trisomy 21, as calculated by two different software packages.A total of ninety-four pregnant women who had a first trimester risk assessment for trisomy 21 that was based on maternal age, biochemical analysis and a nuchal translucency (NT) measurement. Two commonly used software packages were used for the estimation of individual risks (i.e. Wallac-Perkin-Elmer software and Fetal Medicine Foundation software).Risk estimates derived from each software programme were strikingly different. In each case the discrepancy in reported magnitude of risk resulted from disparities between the two calculation methods for the assessment of the individual risk for trisomy 21. The disparities in risk estimates can be explained by significant differences in reported likelihood ratios for biochemical analyses (P = 0.01), NT measurements (P < 0.0001) and both screening parameters combined P = 0.003).It is illustrated that the lack of agreement between these risk calculation methods could give rise to major counselling problems. In order to avoid confusion, there is a need for estimating individual risks of trisomy 21 in a standardized way. It is proposed to select a set of parameters that have a proven track record as judged by detection and false positive rates and then use that set exclusively, while simultaneously monitoring its performance.Relation between increased fetal nuchal translucency thickness and chromosomal defects.To examine the prevalence and distribution of all chromosomal defects in fetuses with increased nuchal translucency thickness.Assessment of risk for trisomy 21 was carried out by a combination of maternal age and fetal nuchal translucency thickness at 11-13 + 6 weeks. A search of the database was made to identify, first, all singleton pregnancies in which fetal karyotyping was carried out and, second, the cases where the fetal nuchal translucency was equal to or above the 95th centile for fetal crown-rump length. The prevalence and distribution of chromosomal defects were determined for each nuchal translucency category: between the 95th centile for crown-rump length and 3.4 mm, 3.5-4.4 mm, 4.5-5.4 mm, 5.5-6.4 mm, 6.5-7.4 mm, 7.5-8.4 mm, 8.5-9.4 mm, 9.5-10.4 mm, 10.5-11.4 mm, and 11.5 mm or more.The search identified 11,315 pregnancies. The median maternal age was 34.5 (range 15-50) years, and the median fetal crown-rump length was 64 (range 45-84) mm. The fetal karyotype was abnormal in 2,168 (19.2%) pregnancies, and the incidence of chromosomal defects increased with nuchal translucency thickness from approximately 7% for those with nuchal translucency between the 95th centile for crown-rump length and 3.4 mm to 75% for nuchal translucency of 8.5 mm or more. In the majority of fetuses with trisomy 21, the nuchal translucency thickness was less then 4.5 mm, whereas in the majority of fetuses with trisomies 13 or 18 it was 4.5-8.4 mm, and in those with Turner syndrome it was 8.5 mm or more.In fetuses with increased nuchal translucency, approximately one half of the chromosomally abnormal group is affected by defects other than trisomy 21. The distribution of nuchal translucency is different for each type of chromosomal defect.II-3.Second-trimester Down's syndrome serum screening: double, triple or quadruple marker testing?The recommendations of the UK National Screening Committee (NSC) are based on the findings of the Serum, Urine and Ultrasound Screening Study (SURUSS). Our study sought to establish if the SURUSS findings, in terms of detection rates (DR) and false-positive rates (FPR) for various second-trimester marker combinations, could be replicated in a local setting.We investigated the effects of adding inhibin-A and unconjugated oestriol to our existing double test protocol. This retrospective study examined 1000 control pregnancies and 128 affected pregnancies.The inhibin-A method was associated with considerable assay drift and very marked within-batch imprecision (intrabatch percent coefficient of variation [CV] = 17%). At a cut-off of 1 in 250, the quadruple test showed a DR of 72%, the triple test 70% and the double test 63%. There were no significant differences between the FPRs for any of the combinations, which were all between 6.6% and 7.0% for a 1 in 250 cut-off.In our view, the current inhibin-A assay is unacceptable as a screening marker due to poor assay performance. We have reviewed the NSC benchmark programme outcomes, and would suggest that the 2005 target of a DR of at least 60% with an FPR of less than 5% is achievable using triple testing in the second trimester in conjunction with universal scan dating. Our results suggest that the April 2007 target of a DR of 75% with an FPR of less than 3% is unachievable using current second-trimester maternal serum screening.Higher median levels of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in the first trimester of pregnancy in a Chinese ethnic group. Implication for first trimester combined screening for Down's syndrome in the Chinese population.To study the effect of ethnic Chinese on the medians of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in the first trimester of pregnancy.The data of 943 women undergoing first trimester combined screening for fetal Down syndrome were analysed to derive the Chinese-specific medians. The calculated risk of Down syndrome based on these Chinese-specific medians was compared with that based on the original algorithm of the Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF).The maternal serum levels of multiples of median of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were significantly higher among the Chinese than among the Caucasians. The weight-adjusted gestation-specific medians were developed. Without adjustment for ethnicity, the original FMF algorithm underestimated the risk of Down syndrome by a median of 1%. Adjustment by ethnicity increased the false-positive rate by 10% (from 5.3 to 5.9%).Ethnic Chinese have a significantly higher maternal serum level of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in the first trimester, which could not be explained by differences in maternal weight. Adjustment for ethnicity may be necessary for these biochemical markers in a first trimester screening program.Sequential Down syndrome screening: the importance of first and second trimester test correlations when calculating risk.Down syndrome screening can be particularly effective when both first and second trimester tests are performed. However, the counseling of women who have received sequential first and second trimester screening can be problematic. We evaluated an approximation where the post-test risk from the first trimester screening is used as the new a priori risk for the second trimester screening. The approximation disregards between-trimester test correlations. The Down syndrome detection rate based on the approximation (90.2%) would be close to that obtained when all correlations were considered (90.8%) but the false positive rate would be 26% higher (3.9% versus 3.1%, respectively). For any particular woman, the use of the approximation could result in highly inaccurate risks. We conclude that the correlations that exist between first and second trimester screening tests preclude the use of second trimester risks derived from the direct product of separate first and second trimester screening. Counseling issues in the delivery of sequential screening are discussed.[Increased nuchal translucency with normal karyotype].Increased fetal NT thickness is a common phenotypic expression of trisomy 21 and other chromosomal abnormalities, but it is also associated with fetal death and a wide range of fetal malformations, deformations, dysgenesis, and genetic syndromes. This paper reviews the outcome of chromosomally normal fetuses with increased NT On the basis of these data it is possible to estimate, for each NT group, the chances of intrauterine survival and delivery of a healthy baby with no major abnormalities. These data are useful in counselling parents of pregnancies with increased fetal NT and in planning the appropriate follow-up investigations. In normal fetuses NT thickness increases with fetal crown-rump length (CRL). The median and 95th centile of NT at a CRL of 45 mm are 1.2, and 2.1mm and the respective values at CRL of 84mm are 1.9 and 2.7 mm. The 99th centile does not change significantly with CRL and it is about 3.5 mm. Increased NT, refers to a measurement above the 95th centile and the term is used irrespective of whether the collection of fluid is septated or not and whether it is confined to the neck or envelopes the whole fetus. After 14 weeks, increased NT usually resolves but in some cases it evolves into nuchal edema or cystic hygromas.Population screening for fetal trisomy 21: easy access to screening should be balanced against a uniform ultrasound protocol.To evaluate the performance of a first-trimester fetal aneuploidy screening program, with a documented underestimation of nuchal translucency thickness measurements (NT) compared to the Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF) reference range.We analysed the data of Algemeen Medisch Laboratorium (AML) in Antwerp, Belgium, on combined screening with pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (FB-hCG) and NT. NT-multiples of the median (MoM), relative to the FMF reference range, were used for risk calculations.The proportion of first-trimester screening tests in the total of serum screening tests increased from 1.3% (125/9424) in 2000 to 53.1% (6577/12 377) in 2003. Only 11.4% (1514/13 267) of NT measurements were performed according to FMF criteria. The 80.8% (21/26) trisomy 21 (T21) detection rate (DR) at cut off 1:300 resulted from maternal serum screening. NT measurements did not add to this DR, but reduced the false-positive rate from 16.8% (2212/13181) to 8.6% (1130/13181). Only 23.8% (5/21) of T21 detections were by FMF trainees.Easy access to screening and maternal serum parameters accounted for the majority of T21 detections in our first-trimester combined screening program.Variation of fetal nasal bone length in second-trimester fetuses according to race and ethnicity.The purpose of this study was to determine the influence of race and ethnicity on the expected nasal bone length (NBL) based on biparietal diameter (BPD) measured in second-trimester fetuses.We searched our ultrasound, obstetric, and cytogenetic databases for all second-trimester fetuses with measured NBLs. Fetuses with Down syndrome were identified and excluded from the analysis. Linear regression curves were generated for NBL by BPD according to race and ethnicity. Categories used were African American, Hispanic, Asian, and white. Analysis of variance was used to compare mean variation of observed from expected NBL by BPD according to race and ethnicity.There were 717 fetuses with NBL-by-BPD pairs who were available for analysis in our population, including 139 African American, 58 Hispanic, 22 Asian, and 498 white fetuses. Nasal bone length was highly correlated with BPD for each race (P < .001). Mean variances of observed from expected NBL by BPD were statistically different according to race or ethnicity (P = .0092).Race and ethnicity significantly affect the mean regression line of expected NBL by BPD among fetuses in the second trimester. Genetic sonographic norms, therefore, appear to require race- and ethnicity-specific formulas for NBL.Integrated serum screening for Down syndrome in primary obstetric practice.Integrated serum screening for Down syndrome is potentially more effective than current second-trimester screening. We report results of an intervention trial of integrated serum screening that involved 229 primary prenatal care practitioners throughout Maine.Women provided a first-trimester serum (for PAPP-A) followed by a second-trimester serum (for AFP, uE3, hCG, and DIA). These five marker measurements were used to calculate a Down syndrome risk in the second trimester. Screen-positive women (risk > or = 1:100) were managed according to standard practice.During 24 months' enrollment, 11 159 women provided a first-trimester sample (61% of women receiving screening services). Nine thousand seven hundred twenty-three women also provided a second-trimester sample; 8773 women satisfied gestational age criteria for testing in both trimesters. Integrated serum screening detected 14 of 16 Down syndrome cases (87%) and 79% after adjustment for trimester-of-ascertainment bias. The initial false-positive rate was 3.2% and was 2.7% when restricted to ultrasound-dated pregnancies. Performance was better than any combination of second-trimester markers. Implementation challenges included initial samples being collected too early and sample matching.Integrated serum screening for Down syndrome was successfully implemented in primary care settings; screening performance was consistent with predictions. It provides an accessible and acceptable alternative to screening protocols that require nuchal translucency measurements.Predicting the result of additional second-trimester markers from a woman's first-trimester marker profile: a new concept in Down syndrome screening.To describe a method for deciding whether an individual's first-trimester Down syndrome screening test result justifies further testing in the second trimester.Statistical modelling was used to estimate the distribution of second-trimester marker profiles for a given first-trimester profile and hence the probability of a final positive result, using a 1 in 250 term cut-off. A multi-variate log Gaussian model was used with published parameters. Markers were maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) at 10 weeks, nuchal translucency at 11 weeks, and second-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, total hCG, unconjugated estriol and inhibin-A. To illustrate the method, the model was applied to a published series of 24 Down syndrome and 367 unaffected pregnancies.Modelling predicts that for 63% Down syndrome and 0.4% unaffected pregnancies having first-trimester tests, there is a 50% or more probability of a final positive result. A step-wise sequential screening policy based on immediate prenatal diagnosis for those with high probability and second-trimester testing for the remainder would have a 90% detection rate and 1.7% false-positive rate. Modelling also predicts 8.0% Down syndrome and 89% unaffected pregnancies with probabilities below 3%. A contingent screening policy restricting second-trimester testing to those with 3-49% probabilities would have an 88% detection rate and 1.4% false-positive rate.Predicting the probability of a positive final result from the first-trimester marker profile has potential utility, either as a decision aide for individual women or as a formal part of screening policy in selecting a subset of women for second-trimester testing.Fetal head-to-trunk volume ratio in chromosomally abnormal fetuses at 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks of gestation.To determine the pattern of early growth disturbance in chromosomally abnormal fetuses by comparing the volume of the fetal head to that of the trunk.The fetal trunk and head volume was measured using three-dimensional (3D) ultrasound in 145 chromosomally abnormal fetuses at a median gestational age of 12 (range, 11 + 0 to 13 + 6) weeks. The head volume was measured separately and then subtracted from the total head and trunk volume to obtain the volume of the fetal trunk. The head-to-trunk ratios were then calculated and the Mann-Whitney U-test was used to determine the significance of differences from 500 chromosomally normal fetuses.The fetal head volume for crown-rump length (CRL) was significantly smaller than normal in trisomy 21, trisomy 13 and Turner syndrome (P < 0.001, P < 0.001 and P = 0.001, respectively), whereas no significant differences were found in trisomy 18 and triploidy (P = 0.139 and P = 0.070, respectively). The fetal trunk volume for CRL was significantly smaller in all chromosomal abnormalities (P < 0.001) except Turner syndrome (P = 0.134). The head-to-trunk ratio for CRL was significantly larger in trisomy 18, trisomy 13 and triploidy (P < 0.001), but normal in trisomy 21 (P = 0.221) and Turner syndrome (P = 0.768).In trisomy 21 and Turner syndrome, the growth deficit was symmetrical with the head and trunk being equally affected, whereas in triploidy and trisomies 18 and 13 there was asymmetrical growth restriction with the trunk being more severely compromised than the head.[Sonographic features of chromosomal defects at 11(+0) to 13(+6) weeks of gestation].Each chromosomal defect has its own syndromal pattern of detectable abnormalities. The authors describe the sonographic features of trisomy 21 and other major chromosomal defects in the first trimesters of pregnancy. At 11(+0) - 13(+6) weeks, all major chromosomal defects are associated with increased NT thickness. In trisomies 21, 18 and 13 the pattern of increase in NT is similar and the average NT in these defects is about 2.5 mm above the normal median for crown-rump length. In Turner syndrome, the median NT is about 8 mm above the normal median. In addition to increased NT there are sonographic features that are often seen in some affected fetuses at 11(+0) - 13(+6) weeks. In trisomy 21 fetuses have absent nasal bone, short maxilla and abnormal Doppler waveforms in the ductus venosus. In trisomy 18, there is early onset fetal growth restriction, a tendency for bradycardia, exomphalos, absent nasal bone and single umbilical artery. In trisomy 13, there is tachycardia, early onset fetal growth restriction, megacystis, holoprosencephaly and exomphalos. In Turner syndrome, there is tachycardia and early onset fetal growth restriction. In triploidy, there is early onset asymmetrical fetal growth restriction, bradycardia, holoprosencephaly, exomphalos, posterior fossa cyst and molar changes in the placenta.First trimester screening: the BUN study.First trimester risk assessment for trisomies 21 and 18 is rapidly transitioning from an investigational procedure performed at a few major centers to the clinical arena. The BUN study (Biochemistry, Ultrasound, Nuchal translucency) was conceived to evaluate the performance of first trimester screening using PAPP-A, free beta HCG, and ultrasound measurement of the nuchal translucency when introduced into practice. Over a 4-year period, 13 prenatal diagnostic centers evaluated over 8500 patients and reported an 85.2% trisomy 21 detection rate with a 9.4% false positive rate. Further evaluation of the data revealed that, once training and experience were accomplished, sonographers could perform NT measurements consistent with reported standards. In approximately half of the patients enrolled in the study, second trimester serum analytes were obtained leading to additional trisomy 21 detection but with an unacceptably high false positive rate. A "sequential contingency" screening approach using both first and second trimester values in some patients may provide the additional detection afforded by measuring second trimester analytes with a limited invasive procedure rate.SURUSS in perspective.Until the publication of the Serum Urine and Ultrasound Screening Study (SURUSS) report, it was difficult to compare the different antenatal screening tests for Down's Syndrome because of variations in study designs. We here present the main results from SURUSS, updated to take account of recent information on nuchal translucency in Down's Syndrome pregnancies, and discuss their implications.SURUSS was a prospective study of 47,053 singleton pregnancies (including 101 pregnancies with Down's Syndrome) conducted in 25 maternity units. Nuchal translucency measurements were taken. Serum and urine samples collected between 9 and 13 weeks, and again between 14 and 20 weeks of pregnancy were stored. Samples from each affected pregnancy and five matched controls were tested for currently used or suggested biochemical Down's Syndrome screening markers. Pregnancies were followed up to determine the presence or absence of Down's Syndrome. For an 85% Down's Syndrome detection rate, the false-positive rate for the Integrated test (nuchal translucency and pregnancy associated plasma protein-A [PAPP-A] at 11 completed weeks of pregnancy, and alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol [uE3], free beta or total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and inhibin-A in the early second trimester) was 0.9%, the Serum integrated test (without nuchal translucency) 2.7%, the Combined test (nuchal translucency with free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 11 weeks) 4.3%, the Quadruple test (alpha-fetoprotein, uE3, free beta or total hCG and inhibin-A) 6.2%, and nuchal translucency at 11 weeks, 15.2%. All tests included maternal age. Using the Integrated test at an 85% detection rate, there would be six diagnostic procedure-related unaffected fetal losses following amniocentesis per 100,000 women screened compared with 35 using the Combined test or 45 with the Quadruple test.The Integrated test offers the most effective and safe method of screening for women who attend in the first trimester. The next best test is the Serum integrated test. The Quadruple test is the best test for women who first attend in the second trimester. There is no justification for retaining the Double (alpha-fetoprotein and hCG) or Triple (alpha-fetoprotein, uE3, and hCG) tests, or nuchal translucency alone (with or without maternal age) in antenatal screening for Down's Syndrome.The influence of maternal insulin-dependent diabetes on fetal nuchal translucency thickness and first-trimester maternal serum biochemical markers of aneuploidy.To evaluate the influence of maternal insulin dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM) on maternal serum free beta-hCG, PAPP-A and fetal nuchal translucency (NT), thickness at 11 to 13(+6) weeks of gestation in a large cohort of women screened prospectively for chromosomal anomalies.Information on maternal IDDM status, maternal serum biochemical marker levels and fetal NT were collected from the prenatal screening computer records in two first-trimester screening centres. In total the control group included 33 301 pregnancies of which 16 366 had NT and maternal serum biochemistry results and 16 305 with NT only. The IDDM group included 195 pregnancies of which 79 had NT and maternal serum biochemistry results and 127 with NT only. The median maternal weight corrected free beta-hCG and PAPP-A, expressed as multiple of the median (MoM), and fetal NT, expressed as delta values, in the IDDM and non-IDDM groups were compared.There were no significant differences between the IDDM and non-IDDM groups in median maternal weight corrected free beta-hCG (IDDM 0.87 MoM, 95% Confidence Interval 0.75 to 1.16 MoM, non-IDDM 1.00 MoM), median maternal weight corrected PAPP-A (IDDM 1.02 MoM, 95% Confidence Interval 0.83 to 1.05 MoM, non-IDDM 1.01 MoM), or mean delta NT (IDDM 0.0358 mm, non-IDDM 0.0002 mm).In pregnancies with maternal IDDM, first-trimester screening for chromosomal defects does not require adjustments for the measured fetal NT. However, more data are required before the possible reduction in maternal serum free beta-hCG and the reduction of PAPP-A suggested by the published world series can be considered sufficiently important to take into account in the calculation of risks for chromosomal defects.Variability of nuchal translucency measurement: a multicenter study in Thailand.To evaluate intra- and inter-observer variations of nuchal translucency (NT) measurements and study the duration of measurements.One hundred and forty-seven singleton pregnant women with 10-14 weeks of gestation who had attended antenatal clinic during January 1st, 2000-August 31st, 2001 were included.Crown-rump length and NT were measured three times for each woman. Then, another examiner who was unaware of the previous results did the other three measurements. The duration of measurements was recorded. Intra-observer and inter-observer variations were analyzed by repeated ANOVA and paired t test, respectively. The correlation of NT measurements within each observer and between paired observers was evaluated by intraclass correlation coefficients (ICC). Kappa statistic was calculated for agreement.Intra-observer variation of all 10 examiners at three institutes was varied from 0.20 +/- 0.27 to 0.33 +/- 0.41 mm. Inter-observer variation at Chiang Mai University was 0.40 +/- 0.37 mm which was the highest value compared with those at Prince of Songkla and Khon Kaen University (p < 0.05). The mean duration of measurements was in range of 8-12 min. The intra-observer repeatability of the first two measurements showed ICCs varying from 0.61 to 0.94. The inter-observer repeatability of paired examiners showed a variation in ICC from 0.28-0.90. The kappa value expressing the intra- and inter-observer repeatability as being >95th or < or = 95th percentile was 0.73 and 0.72, respectively.NT measurement was reproducible for small variation and good agreement. The duration of measurements was acceptable.Practical strategies in contingent sequential screening for Down syndrome.To design and assess the performance of protocols for contingent sequential Down syndrome screening that can be implemented in practice.Protocols were designed in which all women received first-trimester measurement of nuchal translucency (NT) together with maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and either free beta- or total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG). Those women with borderline Down syndrome risks received follow-up second-trimester maternal serum involving double, triple, or quadruple serum screening markers: alpha-fetoprotein, free beta-hCG or total hCG, unconjugated estriol and inhibin-A. Specific ranges of risks were used to define the borderline group. Separate protocols were developed for the United Kingdom and the United States to reflect differences in commonly used tests, cut-offs, and the gestational age at testing. Detection rates and false-positive rates were estimated by multivariate Gaussian modelling with Monte Carlo simulation.Proposed protocols based on first-trimester NT, PAPP-A and free beta-hCG or total hCG, followed by selective use of second-trimester quadruple markers can result in a 91% detection rate and 2.1% false-positive rate for the United Kingdom and a detection rate of 89% and false-positive rate of 3.1% for the United States. For both countries, over 60% of affected pregnancies would be detected in the first trimester and less than 20% of women would require a second-trimester Down syndrome risk assessment. Use of alternative cut-offs to define those with borderline risks or different combinations of second-trimester markers also yielded high detection rates and low false-positive rates.With appropriate patient counselling, it should be possible to provide highly effective Down syndrome screening using contingent sequential protocols.Maternal weight and ethnic adjustment within a first-trimester Down syndrome and trisomy 18 screening program.To estimate weight and ethnic group correction factors for first-trimester screening markers.Ethnic-specific median MoM free beta hCG and pregnancy associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and delta nuchal translucency values were calculated for cohorts of maternal weight (20 lb each) using data from 51,206 patients undergoing first-trimester screening. False-positive rates for Down syndrome and trisomy 18 were evaluated both prior to and after weight and ethnicity adjustment.Free beta hCG and PAPP-A significantly decreased with increasing maternal weight while nuchal translucency increased by a clinically insignificant amount. For free beta hCG the regression formula indicated that after accounting for maternal weight MoM values were 16% higher for African Americans, 6% higher for Asians and 9% lower for Hispanics compared to Caucasians (p < 0.001, p = 0.001, p < 0.001, respectively) but there was no significant difference for Asian Indians. For PAPP-A, MoM values were 35% higher for African Americans (p < 0.001) but were not significantly different for the other ethnic groups compared to Caucasians. Down syndrome false-positive rates did not vary with maternal weight prior to (p = 0.291) or after weight adjustment of biochemistry (p = 0.054). Trisomy 18 false-positive rates varied significantly with weight both before (OR = 1.455 per 20-pound increase, p < 0.001) and after (OR = 1.066 per 20-pound increase, p = 0.01) weight adjustment of biochemistry; however, the odds ratio was greatly reduced after weight adjustment.The first-trimester screening markers, free beta hCG, PAPP-A and nuchal translucency vary with maternal weight and ethnicity. Adjustment of free beta hCG and PAPP-A is indicated but adjustment of nuchal translucency results may not be necessary.[Fetal nuchal translucency].In addition to its role in the assessment of risk for trisomy 21, increased nuchal translucency (NT) thickness can also identify a high proportion of other chromosomal defects and is associated with major abnormalities of the heart and great arteries, and a wide range of genetic syndromes. In the first trimester, the term translucency is used to describe the accumulation of fluid behind the fetal neck, irrespective of whether it is septated or not and whether it is confined to the neck or envelopes the whole fetus. During the second trimester, the translucency usually resolves and, in a few cases, it evolves into either nuchal edema or cystic hygromas with or without generalized hydrops. Increased NT is associated with trisomy 21, Turner syndrome and other chromosomal defects as well as many fetal malformations and genetic syndromes. The incidence of these abnormalities is related to the thickness, rather than the appearance, of NT The ability to achieve a reliable measurement of NT is dependent on appropriate training and adherence to a standard technique in order to achieve uniformity of results among different operators. Furthermore, the success of a screening program necessitates the presence of a system for regular audit of results and continuous assessment of the quality of images.[Fetal nuchal translucency thickness and risk for chromosomal defects].In normal pregnancy fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness increases with gestation, in trisomy 21 and other major chromosomal defects fetal NT is increased. The risk for trisomies can be derived by multiplying the a priori maternal age and gestation related risk by a likelihood ratio, which depends on the degree of deviation in fetal NT measurement from the normal median for that crown-rump length. In a pregnant population with a mean maternal age of 28 years, using the risk cut-off of 1 in 300 to define the screen positive group would detect about 80% of trisomy 21 fetuses for a false positive rate of 5%. It was estimated that, for a 5.4% false positive rate, 90% of trisomy 21 fetuses could be detected. Prospective studies have demonstrated that such results are achievable by screening with fetal NT and maternal serum free b-hCG and PAPP-A in the first-trimester. It is therefore essential that, in screening, attention is paid to the provision of high quality sonographic and biochemical services for early diagnosis of chromosomal defects.Invasive trophoblast antigen (hyperglycosylated human chorionic gonadotropin) as a first-trimester serum marker for Down syndrome.Maternal serum invasive trophoblast antigen and first-trimester Down syndrome screening.In the United States, Down syndrome screening is still performed mainly in the second trimester, using 3 or 4 markers. Moving screening into the first trimester has the advantage of earlier diagnosis. Currently, first-trimester screening typically includes maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), the free beta-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin (free beta), and ultrasound measurement of nuchal translucency thickness (NT). The current report describes a case-control study of serum invasive trophoblast antigen (ITA) and its possible inclusion in first-trimester screening for Down syndrome.As part of an earlier observational study, serum samples from 54 Down syndrome and 276 matched unaffected pregnancies were collected between 9 and 15 weeks of gestation. Samples had been aliquoted and stored at -20 degrees C for 8 years. ITA was measured and converted to weight-adjusted multiples of the median (MoM). The distributions of other first-trimester markers are from a single published study.Median ITA MoM in Down syndrome pregnancies increase as gestational age increases (2.02 MoM at 11 and 2.44 MoM at 13 completed weeks). At 75% detection, maternal age in combination with ITA and PAPP-A measurements have an 8.0% false-positive rate, slightly lower than the 8.8% found for the free beta and PAPP-A combination; adding NT measurements reduces false positives for the 2 combinations to 2.0% and 1.8%, respectively.Serum ITA appears to be a useful first-trimester Down syndrome marker that could replace free beta measurements while maintaining performance.Inhibin A is a maternal serum marker for Down's syndrome early in the first trimester.Inhibin A is a maternal serum marker for fetal Down's syndrome (DS) in the second trimester. We examined whether inhibin A could be used early in the first trimester. Maternal serum concentrations of inhibin A were determined in 81 controls and 27 cases of fetal trisomy 21 in gestational week 5-11. The log MoM (Multiple of the Median of normal pregnancies) inhibin A concentration in DS pregnancies increased with gestational age (p = 0.001) from a mean log MoM (standard deviation) of -0.1754 (0.3712) (n = 11) in week 7-8 to a mean log MoM (standard deviation) of 0.1842 (0.2145) (n = 12) in week 9-11. This corresponded to an increase in inhibin median MoM from 0.67 to 1.53. When inhibin A was used together with pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A, free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin and nuchal translucency as DS markers, the estimated detection rates were 81.4 and 82.6% in weeks 7-8 and 9-11, respectively, for false-positive rates of 0.9 and 1.0%. The performance of the latter combination early in the first trimester is nearly as good as that of integrated first- and second-trimester screening, with the further advantage that the risk can be reported to the pregnant woman in first trimester.Screening for Down syndrome based on maternal age or fetal nuchal translucency: a randomized controlled trial in 39,572 pregnancies.Nuchal translucency (NT) screening increases antenatal detection of Down syndrome (DS) compared to maternal age-based screening. We wanted to determine if a change in policy for prenatal diagnosis would result in fewer babies born with DS.A total of 39,572 pregnant women were randomized to a scan at 12-14 gestational weeks including NT screening for DS (12-week group) or to a scan at 15-20 weeks with screening for DS based on maternal age (18-week group). Fetal karyotyping was offered if risk according to NT was > or = 1:250 in the 12-week group and if maternal age was > or = 35 years in the 18-week group. Both policies included the offer of karyotyping in cases of fetal anomaly detected at any scan during pregnancy or when there was a history of fetal chromosomal anomaly. The number of babies born with DS and the number of invasive tests for fetal karyotyping were compared.Ten babies with DS were born alive with the 12-week policy vs. 16 with the 18-week policy (P = 0.25). More fetuses with DS were spontaneously lost or terminated in the 12-week group (45/19,796) than in the 18-week group (27/19 776; P = 0.04). All women except one with an antenatal diagnosis of DS at < 22 weeks terminated the pregnancy. For each case of DS detected at < 22 weeks in a living fetus there were 16 invasive tests in the 12-week group vs. 89 in the 18-week group. NT screening detected 71% of cases of DS for a 3.5% test-positive rate whereas maternal age had the potential of detecting 58% for a test-positive rate of 18%.The number of newborns with DS differed less than expected between pregnancies that had been screened at 12-14 weeks' gestation by NT compared with those screened at 15-20 weeks by maternal age. One explanation could be that NT screening--because it is performed early in pregnancy--results in the detection and termination of many pregnancies with a fetus with DS that would have resulted in miscarriage without intervention, and also by many cases of DS being detected because of a fetal anomaly seen on an 18-week scan. The major advantage of the 12-week scan policy is that many fewer invasive tests for fetal karyotyping are needed per antenatally detected case of DS.Ethnicity and the need for correction of biochemical and ultrasound markers of chromosomal anomalies in the first trimester: a study of Oriental, Asian and Afro-Caribbean populations.To assess whether there is a need to correct first-trimester biochemical markers (free beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A)) or first-trimester fetal nuchal translucency thickness (NT) in different ethnic groups, when screening for Downs syndrome at 11-14 weeks of gestation.Free beta-hCG, PAPP-A and fetal NT were measured at 11-14 weeks of gestation in a group of women presenting for first-trimester screening in two OSCAR centres. The group comprised 61 219 sets of data from Caucasian women (the reference group); 4835 sets of data from South Asian women; 3450 sets of data from Oriental women and 2727 sets of data from Afro-Caribbean women. The Oriental data set was supplemented with a further 480 cases collected in Hong Kong and the Afro-Caribbean data set was supplemented with 216 cases collected from Kings College. The difference in marker values between the reference group and the other ethnic groups was compared before and after weight correction for the biochemical markers using standard statistical techniques. A correction factor for ethnic origin was applied for all three markers and the screen-positive rate before and after correction was assessed for the various groups.After maternal weight correction, in Afro-Caribbean women, the median PAPP-A was increased by 55% and the free beta-hCG increased by 11%. In south Asian women, the PAPP-A was increased by 8% and the free beta-hCG decreased by 7.5%. In Oriental women, the PAPP-A was increased by 9% and the free beta-hCG by 6%. For delta NT in Afro-Caribbean women, the values were 0.064 mm lower on average than in Caucasian women and for south Asian women 0.045 mm lower. The difference of -0.012 for Oriental women was not significant. Before correcting for ethnic origin, these changes resulted in the screen-positive rates being lower in the Afro-Caribbean group (3.7% vs 5.6%), the south Asian group (4.3% vs 5.6%) and Oriental group (4.9% vs 5.6%). After correction, the screen-positive rates were largely similar in the four groups.Differences in median PAPP-A, free beta-hCG and, to a lesser extent, in NT exist in Afro-Caribbean, South Asian and Oriental women. In populations where the medians and delta NT reference ranges are established in predominantly Caucasian populations, some correction for ethnicity is appropriate and can redress differences in screen-positive rates between these different groups.First trimester biochemical screening for Down's syndrome in singleton pregnancies conceived by assisted reproduction.Serum biochemical markers [free betahCG (fbetahCG); pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A)] used in first trimester Down's syndrome screening have not been fully investigated in pregnancies achieved by assisted reproduction techniques. We present data on pregnancies conceived by all types of assisted reproduction techniques, including pregnancies following ovum donation (OD) and a large sample by ICSI.First trimester Down's syndrome screening was performed in 1054 normal singleton pregnancies: natural conception (n = 498), ovulation induction (OS, n = 97), IVF (n = 47), ICSI (n = 222) and OD (n = 190).No differences in maternal levels of fbetahCG and PAPP-A, measured by the Kryptor system, appeared between naturally conceived pregnancies (n = 498) and those obtained with assisted reproduction techniques (n = 556). Several differences were apparent when comparing fbetahCG levels between different technologies but PAPP-A levels only differed between OS and IVF pregnancies (P < 0.05). In a further small study, no differences were observed using frozen embryos (n = 37), preimplantation genetic diagnosis (n = 53) or sperm from testicular biopsy (n = 21).Data accumulated so far suggest that first trimester biochemical markers either do not need any adjustments (e.g. in pregnancies obtained after OS and ICSI), or have very little impact (e.g. IVF pregnancies) or no impact (e.g. OD pregnancies) on the false positive rates.[First trimester diagnosis of chromosomal defects].Fetal nuchal translucency thickness at the 11(+0) - 13(+6) weeks scan has been combined with maternal age to provide an effective method of screening for trisomy 21; for an invasive testing rate of 5%, about 75% of trisomic pregnancies can be identified. When maternal serum free B-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A at 11(+0) - 13(+6) weeks are also taken into account, the detection rate of chromosomal defects is about 85-90%. In 60-70% of fetuses with trisomy 21 the nasal bone is not visible at the 11(+0) - 13(+6) weeks scan and examination of the nasal bone can increase the detection rate of screening by the first trimester scan and serum biochemistry to more than 95%.2nd-trimester maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin and alpha-fetoprotein levels in male and female fetuses with Down syndrome.Several studies have shown that the 2nd-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) level is significantly lower and that the maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) level is significantly higher in the presence of a female fetus. This may potentially affect Down syndrome (DS) screening such that a higher false-positive rate may occur in women carrying a female fetus, whereas a lower detection rate may result in those carrying males. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the gender impact on marker levels in DS pregnancies and its effect on DS screening.The study included 62 DS pregnancies with a single fetus of known gender (31 male and 31 female). Only pregnancies with chromosomal analysis showing trisomy 21 were included. The maternal serum levels of hCG, AFP, and unconjugated estriol were measured at 16-20 weeks of pregnancy. These levels were expressed as gestational-age-corrected multiples of the median.No statistically significant differences were noted in maternal serum levels of hCG or AFP in DS pregnancies between women carrying a female and those carrying a male DS fetus. No statistically significant differences in 'screen-negative' rates were noted among male and female fetuses.In normal pregnancies, the maternal serum hCG level is higher, and the AFP level is lower in the presence of a female fetus. However, this gender-related difference is not apparent in DS pregnancies. Therefore, the gender-related differences in serum marker levels would not result in a lower detection rate of DS in male fetuses.Assessment of the gap between the fetal nasal bones at 11 to 13 + 6 weeks of gestation by three-dimensional ultrasound.To detect the presence of a gap between the fetal nasal bones at 11 to 13 + 6 weeks of gestation and to verify if this gap could lead to the erroneous diagnosis of absent nasal bone.Three-dimensional (3D) ultrasound was used to assess the fetal nose in 450 singleton pregnancies, immediately after two-dimensional (2D) evaluation of the nasal bones and screening for chromosomal defects by a combination of maternal age and the measurement of fetal nuchal translucency at 11 to 13 + 6 (median, 12) weeks of gestation. A 3D volume of the fetal face was acquired and then analyzed using the multiplanar mode. A sequence of transverse views was used to confirm the presence or absence of the nasal bones and when they were present any visible gap between them was measured. A perfectly mid-sagittal plane was then examined to determine if the nasal bone was visible or not.In 421/450 (93.6%) cases the nasal bone was present during 2D ultrasound. Using the multiplanar mode of 3D ultrasound, in 83/421 (19.7%) fetuses a gap between the nasal bones could be demonstrated and in 36/83 (43.4%) cases the nasal bone was found to be absent in the perfect mid-sagittal view. In 29/450 (6.4%) cases the nasal bones were absent during the 2D scan. In the 3D assessment there was absence of both bones in 25/29 (86.2%) cases and absence of one of the two bones in 4/29 (13.8%) cases. Chorionic villus sampling demonstrated that the fetal karyotype was normal in 404 and abnormal in 46 cases, including 31 cases of trisomy 21. There was absence of one or both nasal bones in three (0.7%) of the chromosomally normal fetuses, in 19 (61.3%) with trisomy 21 and in seven (46.7%) with other chromosomal defects.At 11 to 13 + 6 weeks of gestation there is a gap between the nasal bones in about 20% of fetuses, and in about 40% of these cases in the perfect mid-sagittal plane the nasal bone may erroneously be considered to be absent.First trimester maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome: an evaluation of the DPC Immulite 2000 free beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A assays.Recent NICE Guidelines have emphasized the need to have in place by 2007 the capability of offering screening to all women in the first trimester using a combination of maternal age with the ultrasound marker nuchal translucency thickness (NT) and the maternal serum biochemical markers free beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A). Laboratories will therefore need to consider how to introduce the biochemical component of screening. With the recent launch of these assays on the DPC Immulite 2000 platform, it is appropriate and timely to investigate their clinical and analytical performance on a high throughput immunoassay analyser.Within-run and between-day precision was assessed in the normal way. Bias was assessed by comparing samples from normal pregnancies (n=813) and pregnancies with Down's syndrome (n=60) run on both the DPC system and our routine Kryptor system. Gestational day-specific medians for each marker were calculated from the unaffected population. Mathematical modelling was used to predict the clinical performance of the two markers.The within-run coefficient of variation (CV) was around 3.5% and between-day CV was around 6-8% for both assays. Comparison with EQA samples showed a 2% positive bias against the ALTM for free beta-hCG and a 21% positive bias for PAPP-A, which reduced to 11% when compared with the Kryptor method mean. When compared with the Kryptor, the DPC free beta-hCG showed a significant concentration-related negative bias above concentrations of 50 IU/L in both unaffected and affected pregnancy samples. After conversion to MoM in the Down's syndrome group, the DPC free beta-hCG assay showed a MoM-related bias at higher MoM values. For PAPP-A a positive MoM-related bias was also evident. In cases with Down's syndrome, the median free beta-hCG MoM was 1.703 for DPC and 1.698 by the Kryptor, which was not significantly different. For PAPP-A, the median MoM was 0.62 for DPC and 0.47 by the Kryptor, which was significantly (P=0.025) different. This difference, if real, is likely to result in a lower detection of cases with Down's syndrome. Statistical modelling techniques suggest that this would be 58% compared with the expected 67% when combined with maternal age and free beta-hCG. When combined with NT, however, this would be reduced to 85% compared with the 90% expected.While laboratories may find some organizational benefit from running first trimester Down's syndrome screening on such routine high-throughput immunoassay analysers, better clinical performance is likely to be achieved with alternative platforms to the DPC Immulite 2000.Second-trimester maternal serum screening for Down syndrome in in vitro fertilization pregnancies.To examine whether second-trimester maternal serum triple marker screening results differ between in vitro fertilization (IVF) pregnancies and naturally conceived pregnancies.Second-trimester maternal serum triple marker screening results from 88 IVF pregnancies were compared with 596 naturally conceived pregnancies (controls). Controls were matched to each IVF pregnancy by maternal age, gestational age and date of blood collection. All pregnancies in the study were known to have normal outcome. Multiple of the median (MoM) levels of human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), unconjugated estriol (uE3) and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), and the false-positive rate for Down syndrome were compared between the two groups.No statistically significant differences in analyte levels or in Down syndrome false-positive rate were observed between the IVF and naturally conceived pregnancies.IVF patients can be counselled about maternal serum triple marker screening in the same manner as patients with naturally conceived pregnancies. There is no evidence to support the general use of analyte correction factors in the interpretation of second-trimester maternal serum screen results in IVF pregnancies.Nuchal translucency in pregnancies conceived after assisted reproduction technology.Levels of maternal serum markers of fetal Down syndrome in pregnancies conceived after assisted reproduction are different from those of normal spontaneous pregnancies. The present study examined the effects of conventional in-vitro fertilization (IVF), intracytoplasmic sperm injection (ICSI) and embryo cryopreservation on nuchal translucency (NT) thickness.A retrospective analysis on 16 673 spontaneous pregnancies, 119 pregnancies with fresh embryos from IVF, 62 pregnancies with frozen-thawed embryos from IVF, 81 pregnancies with fresh embryos from ICSI and 39 frozen-thawed embryos from ICSI was performed. All were singletons with known normal outcomes. Multiples of the median (MoM) of NT were compared.The median NT MoM of spontaneous pregnancies was 1.01. In the assisted reproduction pregnancies, the median NT MoM were significantly increased to 1.07 (P = 0.003), 1.09 (P = 0.009) and 1.09 (P = 0.001) in pregnancies conceived with fresh embryos from IVF, frozen-thawed embryos from IVF and fresh embryos from ICSI, respectively. A non-significant increase in median NT MoM (1.04; P = 0.489) was also observed in pregnancies with frozen-thawed embryos from ICSI.Increased NT in assisted reproduction pregnancies is postulated to be due to some delay in fetal development. Another possible reason might be related to adverse antenatal course in these pregnancies.Maternal serum alpha fetoprotein among pregnant females in Alexandria.Maternal serum alpha fetoprotein (MSAFP) was introduced as a screening test for congenital malformations especially neural tube defects (NTDs) two decades ago. However, many factors were known to affect its level. From these are racial differences and maternal weight. The aim of the present work is to illustrate the normal distribution of MSAFP among working pregnant women in Alexandria in gestational age 16-18 weeks, to identify some of its determinants, and to determine the specificity and sensitivity of MSAFP for the detection of congenital anomalies and adverse pregnancy outcome.A sample of 608 pregnant working women who were 16-18 week gestation was recruited for the study from the antenatal clinic affiliated to Gamal Abdel Nasser Health Insurance Hospital in Alexandria. The enrolled women were interviewed using a structured questionnaire and a blood sample was collected from each of them to measure the level of MSAFP. At the expected time of delivery, Gamal Abd el Nasser Health Insurance Hospital was visited to collect data about the outcome of pregnancy of the enrolled women.The median of MSAFP level for deliveries with no congenital anomalies were 25.5, 33.5, and 53.2 IU/ml, at gestational weeks 16, 17 and 18 respectively. The significant variables related positively to MSAFP level included abortion or stillbirth, congenital anomalies in the index pregnancy, gestational age, bleeding during pregnancy, gestational diabetes, twin pregnancy, consanguinity between maternal parents, history of congenital or genetic diseases in maternal family, and caesarian section deliveries. Fatigue score was negatively correlated to MSAFP level. Using MSAFP multiples of median (MOM), 42.9 % of abortions and stillbirths, 57.1 % of twin pregnancies, 31.25 % of preterm deliveries and 27.3 % of low birth weight had levels of 3 MOM or more. One fourth of the congenital anomalies were below 0.5 MOM and 41.7 % were at or above 3 MOM. The sensitivity of MSAFP test for the detection of NTDs (cutoff point 2.5+ MOM) or Down syndrome (cutoff point <0.5 MOM) among the study sample was 100% (CI: 19.8-100%). Specificity for NTDs was 92.7% (CI: 90.3-94.6%), while the specificity for Down syndrome was 89.1% (86.3-91.4%). The sensitivity for adverse pregnancy outcome (cutoff point <0.5 or 2.5+ MOM) was 41.6, and the specificity was 85.8%. In conclusion, the cutoff points of MSAFP of the study sample are different from those for other populations. Different factors affect the level of MSAFP including adverse pregnancy outcomes. It is recommended to introduce antenatal screening for congenital anomalies as a routine screening test during pregnancy using levels adapted from the local population for cutoff point determination.Placental growth hormone in Down's syndrome screening.A number of serum markers have been proposed to improve the sensitivity (and specificity) of the triple test, which, until now, has been the gold standard in second-trimester serum screening for Down's syndrome. Among them, human placental growth hormone (hPGH) has been proposed because of its significantly elevated serum levels in pregnancies affected by chromosomal aneuploidies. Our experience, on maternal serum stored from 32 Down's syndrome-affected pregnancies, confirms a slight but significant increase in hPGH levels compared with controls. These data summarized to that of the previous screening could give a calculated detection rate of 71.9%, better than that of the standard triple test alone (65.6%).The association between fetal nasal bone hypoplasia and aneuploidy.To determine the association between fetal nasal bone hypoplasia and aneuploidy in women undergoing prenatal diagnosis.A prospective cohort study involving women undergoing chorionic villus sampling and amniocentesis for an increased risk of aneuploidy. Fetal biometric and nasal bone measurements were obtained at the time of prenatal diagnosis and compared with karyotypes. Nasal bone hypoplasia was defined as nasal bone less than 2.5th percentile for the gestational age.A total of 632 fetuses were evaluated. Twenty-nine (4.6%) had an aneuploidy (18 trisomy 21, 5 trisomy 18, 1 Turner's syndrome, one Marker chromosome 1, 2 sex chromosome anomalies, and 2 triploidy). Nasal bone measurements were documented in 29 aneuploid fetuses. The nasal bone was either absent or hypoplastic in 12 of 29 (41%) fetuses with aneuploidy and in 8 of 18 (44%) with trisomy 21. By using receiver operating characteristics curves, the optimal threshold of nasal bone hypoplasia associated with fetal aneuploidy was a biparietal diameter/nasal bone ratio of 11 or greater. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for the detection of fetal aneuploidy were 50%, 93%, 24%, and 98%, respectively.Absent or hypoplastic nasal bone is a marker for fetal aneuploidy in a high-risk population. However, this marker needs to be evaluated by larger prospective studies in low-risk populations before adoption for clinical use.Phenotypic characteristics of absent and hypoplastic nasal bones in fetuses with Down syndrome: description by 3-dimensional ultrasonography and clinical significance.To determine the frequency and clinical significance of bilateral and unilateral hypoplastic nasal bones for the detection of Down syndrome by 3-dimensional ultrasonography.Thirty-seven volumes of the fetal skull from fetuses with Down syndrome and 37 from fetuses without abnormalities were analyzed by 1 investigator blinded to fetal karyotype. The maximum intensity projection algorithm was used to reconstruct nasal bones. Ossification patterns were identified in anteroposterior and profile views. Sensitivity, false-positive rates (FPRs), and likelihood ratios (LRs) for detection of Down syndrome were calculated.After exclusions (coronal acquisition [n = 11], hand in front of the face [n = 4], poor imaging [n = 2], incomplete follow-up [n = 2], and anomalies detected after delivery [n = 2]), 53 volumes were analyzed (26 fetuses with Down syndrome and 27 without abnormalities; median gestational age, 21 6/7 weeks [interquartile range, 19 6/7-25 2/7 weeks]). Rendered profile views revealed absent nasal bones in 18.9% (10 of 53) of the fetuses, and, among these, 90% (9 of 10) had Down syndrome (sensitivity, 34.6% [9 of 26]; FPR, 3.7% [1 of 27]; LR, 9.3 [95% confidence interval (CI), 1.3-68.7]). Three ossification patterns were identified in anteroposterior views: (1) normally developed, (2) delayed ossification, and (3) absent nasal bones. Sensitivity, FPR, and LR of absent nasal bones for detecting Down syndrome were 34.6% (9 of 26), 3.7% (1 of 27), and 9.0 (95% CI, 1.3-68.7), respectively. Sensitivity, FPR, and LR of delayed ossification for detecting Down syndrome were 42.3% (11 of 26), 22% (6 of 27), and 1.83 (95% CI, 0.8-4.4).Absence of nasal bones is associated with the highest risk of Down syndrome. Delayed ossification is associated with a lower risk of Down syndrome than absent nasal bones. These ossification patterns may be indistinguishable on 2-dimensional ultrasonography.Second-trimester prenatal screening markers for Down syndrome in women with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.Published studies have shown that some serum markers used in screening for Down syndrome tend to be lower among women with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM). On this basis, many screening programmes adjust the marker levels to take account of this difference. Recent studies suggested that the marker levels were not different, and so adjustment may no longer be needed, possibly because of better diabetic control. Data from a prenatal screening programme for Down syndrome were examined to see whether the median values of second-trimester screening markers were still reduced in pregnant women with IDDM. A total of 366 women with IDDM singleton pregnancies without Down syndrome were identified from the screening programme at Barts from 1989 to 2002. After allowing for maternal weight, the median multiples of the median (MoM) for IDDM-unaffected singleton pregnancies were as follows: 0.88 (95% confidence interval 0.84-0.93) for alphafetoprotein (AFP), 0.95 (0.91-0.99) for unconjugated oestriol (uE3), 0.90 (0.80-1.01) for total human chorionic gonadotrophin (total hCG), 0.98 (0.88-1.08) for free beta-hCG, and 0.99 (0.89-1.10) for inhibin-A. The median levels for AFP and uE3 were statistically significantly lower in pregnant women with IDDM. The other markers were not significantly different in women with and without IDDM. There remains a case for adjusting AFP and uE3 levels in women with IDDM in prenatal screening programmes for Down syndrome.Evaluation of second trimester maternal serum screening for Down's Syndrome using the Spiegelhalter-Knill-Jones (S-KJ) approach.Risk estimation for Down's syndrome in antenatal serum screening with maternal age and multiple serum biomarkers is usually complicated and computationally intensive. We have developed a simple scoring system using the Spiegelhalter-Knill-Jones approach, which was based on Bayesian theorem and the logistic regression model.A prospective data set with 3842 singleton pregnancies including 6 affected pregnancies served as "trained data". Maternal age, maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotrophin levels of each pregnant woman were adopted as the predictors to establish the scoring model using the S-KJ approach. Model validation was undertaken using a receiver operating characteristics (ROC) curve with another 3050 singleton pregnancies including 4 affected pregnancies ("validated data").For the trained data the sensitivity and specificity of the scoring system at cut-off value of 1:250 was 66.7% and 92.6%, respectively. For the validated data the sensitivity and specificity at the same cut-off point was 75% and 92.2%, respectively. The area under the ROC curve of the trained and validated data was 76.96% (95% CI: 51.80-100%), and 94.07% (95% CI: 84.47-100%), respectively.The S-KJ scoring system has been demonstrated to be a simple, and efficient method for the risk estimation of Down's syndrome. This system can be applied to other antenatal serum screening systems.Sequential pathways of testing after first-trimester screening for trisomy 21.To evaluate the performance and use of second-trimester multiple-marker maternal serum screening for trisomy 21 by women who had previously undergone first-trimester combined screening (nuchal translucency, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A, and free beta-hCG), with disclosure of risk estimates.In a multicenter, first-trimester screening study sponsored by the National Institute of Child Health and Human Development, multiple-marker maternal serum screening with alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, and total hCG was performed in 4,145 (7 with trisomy 21) of 7,392 (9 with trisomy 21) women who were first-trimester screen-negative and 180 (7 with trisomy 21) of 813 (52 with trisomy 21) who were first-trimester screen-positive. Second-trimester risks were calculated using multiples of the median and a standardized risk algorithm with a cutoff risk of 1:270.Among the first-trimester screen-negative cohort, 6 of 7 (86%) trisomy 21 cases were detected by second-trimester multiple-marker maternal serum screening with a false-positive rate of 8.9%. Among the first-trimester screen-positive cohort, all 7 trisomy 21 cases were also detected in the second trimester, albeit with a 38.7% false-positive rate.Our data demonstrate that a sequential screening program that provides patients with first-trimester results and offers the option for early invasive testing or additional serum screening in the second trimester can detect 98% of trisomy 21-affected pregnancies. However, such an approach will result in 17% of patients being considered at risk and, hence, potentially having an invasive test.II-2Fetal nasal bone length in euploid and aneuploid fetuses between 11 and 20 weeks' gestation: a prospective study.To develop normative data for nasal bone length between 11 and 20 weeks' gestation and to assess the utility of nasal bone hypoplasia in the detection of fetal aneuploidy in the second trimester.Well-dated, nonanomalous fetuses were examined between 11 and 20.9 weeks' gestation. The nasal bone was assessed and measured, and normative data from 11 to 20 weeks' gestation were determined. The nasal bone lengths in fetuses with confirmed aneuploidy were compared with the normative data.The fetal nasal bone length increased linearly with advancing gestational age. Nomograms including the 10th, 50th, and 90th percentiles were created. Nasal bone hypoplasia was seen in 6 of 6 cases of fetal trisomy in the second trimester.Nasal bone hypoplasia in the early second trimester identifies a cohort of fetuses at high risk for aneuploidy.Doppler assessment of cardiac function at 11-14 weeks' gestation in fetuses with normal and increased nuchal translucency.To investigate cardiac dysfunction as a potential underlying mechanism for increased nuchal translucency (NT) in fetuses with chromosomal abnormality or heart defects.Myocardial performance index (MPI) and atrioventricular valve E/A ratios for both sides of the heart were measured by Doppler echocardiography in fetuses at 11-14 weeks' gestation. The study groups consisted of 159 normal control fetuses, 199 otherwise normal fetuses but with increased NT > or = 4 mm, 142 fetuses with trisomy 21, 58 with trisomy 18, 19 with trisomy 13, 37 with Turner's syndrome and 24 with isolated heart defects. Groups were compared using Student's t-test and confidence intervals for differences between groups were calculated.Otherwise normal fetuses with increased NT showed no difference in any of the cardiac Doppler parameters from normal controls. Mean E/A ratio was slightly but significantly increased in trisomy 21 fetuses compared with normal controls (0.604 vs. 0.578 on the right, P = 0.011; 0.581 vs. 0.542 on the left, P = 0.0001). E/A ratio was not significantly different between any of the other groups and the normals but there was a small increase in absolute E-wave velocity in trisomy 18 fetuses. MPI was significantly decreased in trisomy 21 fetuses, (0.330 vs. 0.378, P = 0.002 on the left) and also in Turner's syndrome fetuses (0.301 vs. 0.352 on the right, P = 0.04; 0.320 vs. 0.378 on the left, P = 0.034) implying better performance, but not in the other groups.The magnitude and/or direction of the differences shown do not support a major role for cardiac functional abnormality in the development of NT. Important cardiac dysfunction could not be demonstrated in association with increased NT in normal or abnormal fetuses.Single-step maternal serum screening for trisomy 21 in the era of combined or integrated screening.Single-step maternal serum screening (MSS) in the first (1MSS) or second (2MSS) trimester at maternal age > or =35 years was evaluated in the North Belgian region Flanders, where difficulties are encountered in the general introduction of combined or integrated screening algorithms. The fetal aneuploidy screening database of General Medical Laboratory AML in Antwerp was searched for 2MSS tests between 1992 and 1999 (alpha-fetoprotein, beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-HCG) and unconjugated estriol, cut-off 1:300) and for 1MSS tests between 1999 and 2003 (free beta-HCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A, cut-off 1:85). At > or =35 years, the detection rate for trisomy 21 (DR) was 93.8% (15/16) for 2MSS and the screen-positive rate (SPR) was 24.5% (504/2061). For 1MSS, these figures were 85.7% (6/7) and 17.7% (109/615) respectively. To detect one trisomy 21, missed by MSS at > or =35 years of age, an additional number of 1,557 and 506 primary invasive procedures would be needed for 2MMS and 1MSS respectively. We conclude that the performance of both single-step 1MSS and 2MSS at maternal age > or =35 years in Flanders is excellent, even without the combination with ultrasound parameters or integration of first and second trimester parameters. The simplicity of both methods allows to consider them valuable options for fetal aneuploidy screening at advanced maternal age, until high quality combined or integrated screening is accessible to all pregnant women in Belgium.Nuchal translucency and other first-trimester sonographic markers of chromosomal abnormalities.There is extensive evidence that effective screening for major chromosomal abnormalities can be provided in the first trimester of pregnancy. Prospective studies in a total of 200,868 pregnancies, including 871 fetuses with trisomy 21, have demonstrated that increased nuchal translucency can identify 76.8% of fetuses with trisomy 21, which represents a false-positive rate of 4.2%. When fetal nuchal translucency was combined with maternal serum free-beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A in prospective studies in a total of 44,613 pregnancies, including 215 fetuses with trisomy 21, the detection rate was 87.0% for a false-positive rate of 5.0%. Studies from specialist centers with 15,822 pregnancies, which included 397 fetuses with trisomy 21, have demonstrated that the absence of the nasal bone can identify 69.0% of trisomy 21 fetuses, which represents a false-positive rate of 1.4%. It has been estimated that first-trimester screening by a combination of sonography and maternal serum testing can identify 97% of trisomy 21 fetuses, which represents a false-positive rate of 5%, or that the detection rate can be 91%, which represents a false-positive rate of 0.5%. In addition to increased nuchal translucency, important sonographic markers for chromosomal abnormalities, include fetal growth restriction, tachycardia, abnormal flow in the ductus venosus, megacystis, exomphalos and single umbilical artery. Most pregnant women prefer screening in the first, rather than in the second, trimester. As with all aspects of good clinical practice, those care givers who perform first-trimester screening should be trained appropriately, and their results should be subjected to external quality assurance.Screening for trisomy 21 in Flanders: a 10 years review of 40.490 pregnancies screened by maternal serum.To evaluate maternal serum screening for trisomy 21 (MSS) in Flanders between 1992 and 2002.Data of a large database on the results of MSS, nuchal translucency (NT) and pregnancy outcome were analysed retrospectively.Despite an excellent performance of second trimester MSS at a maternal age > or = 35 years (94.4% detection rate (DR) of trisomy 21 at a false positive rate (FPR) of 22.4%), the proportion of patients above 35 years of age in the study population was significantly lower than in the Flemish general pregnant population (5.5% versus 8.9%, P < 0.001). In the population screened by MSS and NT, the DR of second trimester MSS at a 5% FPR was 44.4%, which was lower than 66.6% in the population screened by MSS without NT. When nine trisomy 21-affected pregnancies were compared to 3265 normal pregnancies, the mean NT-MoM values were not significantly different (1.16 +/- 0.89 versus 1.00 +/- 0.46, P > 0.05). Both the findings comply to a sequential screening practice where second trimester MSS is only performed after a normal measurement of NT in the first trimester.In Flanders, the uptake of second trimester maternal serum screening is low in women aged 35 years or more. Its screening performance decreased after the introduction of sequential screening.Maternal serum levels of placental proteins after in vitro fertilisation and their implications for prenatal screening.To determine whether the serum levels of pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A), pregnancy-specific beta(1)-glycoprotein (SP1), placental lactogen (hPL) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) are different in pregnancies obtained after in vitro fertilisation (IVF) and embryo transfer (ET) in comparison to spontaneous pregnancies. Assessment of the need to establish normal medians for biochemical trisomy screening in IVF pregnancies.The population comprised 96 IVF-ET pregnancies, of which 79 came from fresh gonadotrophin-stimulated cycles and 17 from embryo transfers without gonadotrophin stimulation (natural cycle IVF, frozen embryo transfers), and 156 spontaneous pregnancies. A single blood sample was obtained between 7 + 0 and 16 + 3 weeks. PAPP-A, SP1, hPL and hCG were quantified and the levels compared between gonadotrophin-stimulated IVF, steroid-only- or non-stimulated IVF, and controls with respect to gestational age using non-parametric statistical analysis.PAPP-A and hPL levels were reduced after stimulated IVF in early gestation (before 10 pregnancy weeks); SP1 followed the same trend without reaching statistical significance. hCG tended to be increased after IVF treatment including non-gonadotrophin-stimulation cycles, and also beyond 10 pregnancy weeks.Reduced PAPP-A with increased hCG yields an increased risk in screening for foetal trisomy 21. We confirm recently published observations but do not recommend the establishment of normal medians for IVF pregnancies since the extent of the deviations is varying according to the different stimulation protocols and dosages of gonadotrophins used.Maternal serum screening for trisomy 21 in women with a false positive result in last pregnancy.Maternal serum screening for Down syndrome is a common practice in the United Kingdom. A number of factors have been shown to influence the chance of a false positive test result. Analysis of routinely collated information stored on an electronic database in a district general hospital has shown that women with a previous false positive maternal screen are at much greater chance of having a false positive result in their next pregnancy. Overall, there was a fivefold increased risk attributed to biological variation in their serum concentrations of alpha-feto protein (AFP) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG). The potential effect of this was to increase the chance of such women having an unnecessary amniocentesis. Women should be advised of this effect in subsequent pregnancies. Ideally a correction factor should be applied which would reduce the false positive rate without affecting adversely the sensitivity of the test.SURUSS in perspective.Until the publication of the Serum Urine and Ultrasound Screening Study (SURUSS) report, it was difficult to compare the different antenatal screening tests for Down's Syndrome because of variations in study designs. We here present the main results from SURUSS, updated to take account of recent information on nuchal translucency in Down's Syndrome pregnancies, and discuss their implications.SURUSS was a prospective study of 47,053 singleton pregnancies (including 101 pregnancies with Down's Syndrome) conducted in 25 maternity units. Nuchal translucency measurements were taken. Serum and urine samples collected between 9 and 13 weeks, and again between 14 and 20 weeks of pregnancy were stored. Samples from each affected pregnancy and five matched controls were tested for currently used or suggested biochemical Down's Syndrome screening markers. Pregnancies were followed up to determine the presence or absence of Down's Syndrome. For an 85% Down's Syndrome detection rate, the false-positive rate for the Integrated test (nuchal translucency and pregnancy associated plasma protein-A [PAPP-A] at 11 completed weeks of pregnancy, and alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol [uE(3)], free beta or total human chorionic gondaotrophin (hCG) and inhibin-A in the early second trimester) was 0.9%, the Serum integrated test (without nuchal translucency) 2.7%, the Combined test (nuchal translucency with free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 11 weeks) 4.3%, the Quadruple test (alpha-fetoprotein, uE(3), free beta or total hCG and inhibin-A) 6.2%, and nuchal translucency at 11 weeks, 15.2%. All tests included maternal age. Using the Integrated test at an 85% detection rate, there would be six diagnostic procedure-related unaffected fetal losses following amniocentesis per 100,000 women screened compared with 35 using the Combined test or 45 with the Quadruple test.The Integrated test offers the most effective and safe method of screening for women who attend in the first trimester. The next best test is the Serum integrated test. The Quadruple test is the best test for women who first attend in the second trimester. There is no justification for retaining the Double (alpha-fetoprotein and hCG) or Triple (alpha-fetoprotein, uE(3), and hCG) tests, or nuchal translucency alone (with or without maternal age) in antenatal screening for Down's Syndrome.Prospective evaluation of a first trimester screening program for Down syndrome and other chromosomal abnormalities using maternal age, nuchal translucency and biochemistry in an Australian population.A combination of maternal age and ultrasound assessment of the nuchal translucency (NT) has been used in the first trimester to screen for chromosomal abnormality. In the United Kingdom, the addition of NT screening was shown to be beneficial.To report the sensitivity of combined first trimester biochemistry and ultrasound screening for Down syndrome in an Australian private practice specialising in obstetric ultrasound.A prospective study in a private obstetric ultrasound practice. Over 22 months, 2121 patients were screened and data was analysed for sensitivity (detection) and false positive rates for all chromosome abnormalities.There were 17 chromosomal abnormalities, five of which were Down syndrome. Using maternal age alone or age and biochemistry, four of the Down syndrome cases were detected for a 29 and 19% false positive rate, respectively. Using age and NT or age, NT and biochemistry, all the Down syndrome cases were detected, for a false positive rate of 5.7 and 7.2%, respectively. The difference in detection rates for Down syndrome or other chromosomal abnormalities, using the four screening methods, did not reach statistical significance. However, the false positive rates in screening methods without ultrasound to assess the NT was significantly higher (P < 0.01).A combination of maternal age, NT and maternal serum biochemistry gives a high detection rate for both trisomy 21 and other chromosomal abnormalities. Down syndrome screening using either maternal age alone or age in combination with first trimester biochemistry conferred screen positive rates significantly higher than when combined with NT.A comparison of the impact of screen-positive results obtained from ultrasound and biochemical screening for Down syndrome in the first trimester: a pilot study.To compare the experiences of women who received a screen-positive test result for Down syndrome after nuchal translucency screening or after biochemical screening in the first trimester of pregnancy in the Netherlands.Semi-quantitative questionnaires were sent to 40 women with a screen-positive test result for Down syndrome in the first trimester of pregnancy: 20 had undergone nuchal translucency screening (NT group) and 20 had undergone serum screening (PAPP-A and free beta-hCG) (SS group). In all the cases, chorionic villus sampling (CVS) had not revealed any chromosomal abnormalities.The major reason for undergoing the screening test in both groups of women was to be more reassured about the health of the baby. In the NT group, 5 out of the 20 women stated that they had suddenly been confronted with the NT measurement during the ultrasound examination without even being asked, or had been caught by surprise about the possibility. Together with two other women, they felt that at that stage they had been insufficiently informed about what the test meant. In the SS group, two women also held this opinion. In 10 out of the 20 women in the SS group, the positive-screening result had caused (a great deal of) anxiety. In the NT group, this proportion was as high as 18 out of the 20. Six of the women in the NT group mentioned that 'seeing the baby' had been an important factor in their decision to undergo CVS. Even after a favourable result of CVS, a proportion of the pregnant women were still feeling anxious about the health of their baby (5 women in the SS group and 12 in the NT group). Nevertheless, a large proportion of the women in both groups was pleased that they had undergone the screening test. Only a few of them stated that they would not choose the same screening test again in a future pregnancy.An unfavourable screening result after NT screening appeared to have a greater impact than an unfavourable result after serum screening. This might partly be explained by the ultrasound examination visualising the increased risk during NT screening. An additional important role may have been played by the fact that an abnormal NT screening result implies an increased risk of other disorders besides Down syndrome, which the women should be informed about beforehand. Several factors place special demands on the counselling prior to NT screening.Evaluation of human chorionic gonadotropin beta-subunit mRNA concentrations in maternal serum in aneuploid pregnancies: a feasibility study.Nasal bone measurement during the 1st trimester: is it useful?The aim of this study was to present our preliminary data about nasal bone measurements at 11-14 weeks of pregnancy. This study was conducted in our prenatal unit between 2000 and 2003. A total of 642 pregnant women (single pregnancies) were enrolled into the study. During the first trimester of pregnancy, crown-rump length, nuchal translucency thickness, and fetal nasal bone length measurements and ductus venosus Doppler images were evaluated. The distribution of absent or small nasal bones in both normal fetuses and in those having some pathological conditions was compared by statistical analysis. p < 0.05 was considered significant. Nasal bone evaluation was successful in 600 of 642 (93.4%) ultrasound examinations. The linear regression line showed a significant positive slope with increasing crown-rump length (r=0.54, p < 0.001). Absent or small nasal bones were more common in abnormal than in normal fetuses (p=0.007). It is clear that the fetal nasal bone is becoming a powerful tool in prenatal screening for aneuploidy. Larger studies to be performed in a low-risk population are needed to assess whether the measurement of the nasal bone length provides additional benefits beyond the assessment of the presence or absence of the nasal bone.Sialic acid-deficient invasive trophoblast antigen (sd-ITA): a new urinary variant for gestational Down syndrome screening.Invasive trophoblast antigen (ITA), also known as hyperglycosylated hCG, is a glycosylation variant of hCG produced by invasive cytotrophoblast cells. Publications show that ITA is potentially a sensitive test for Down syndrome screening, reportedly detecting 38 and 80% of cases at a 5% false-positive rate in the first and second trimesters of pregnancy respectively. ITA has six oligosaccharides varying greatly in terminal sialic acid content (0-19 residues), leading to wide-charge heterogeneity. With the objective of developing an improved Down syndrome screening test, we examined the charge, or sialic acid variants, of ITA.Twenty urine samples were collected from the 16th to 18th week of gestation from 10 patients with trisomy 21 fetuses, demonstrated by karyotype analysis, and from 10 patients with normal karyotype pregnancies. Proteins in each sample were separated by preparative isoelectric focusing. Fractions were collected, pooled into the pl ranges of 3.0 to 4.0, 4.1 to 5.0, 5.1 to 6.0 and 6.1 to 7.0 and assayed for ITA.A difference in the distribution of ITA charge variants was demonstrated between cases and controls, most apparent in the less acidic (pl 5.1-7.0) range. The controls and Down syndrome samples contained 26.7 +/- 14% versus 45.6 +/- 20%, respectively, of the less acidic form of ITA (P = 0.02).The ITA in Down syndrome cases is composed of a much higher proportion of less acidic ITA. This could be the major source of elevated levels of ITA in Down syndrome pregnancies. It is postulated that the development of a new assay specifically measuring ITA that is deficient in sialic acid might enhance the utility of the already highly sensitive screening tests for Down syndrome.The impact of correcting for smoking status when screening for chromosomal anomalies using maternal serum biochemistry and fetal nuchal translucency thickness in the first trimester of pregnancy.To evaluate the influence of cigarette smoking status on maternal serum free beta-hCG, PAPP-A and fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness at 11 to 14 weeks of gestation in a large cohort of women screened prospectively for chromosomal anomalies.Information on maternal cigarette smoking status, maternal age, maternal serum biochemical marker levels and fetal NT were collected from the prenatal screening computer records in two OSCAR screening centres. Data was available from 32,730 unaffected pregnancies and from 124 with Down syndrome. Statistical analysis of the marker levels in the smoking and non-smoking group were carried out. The impact on false-positive rate of correcting for smoking status was assessed from a modelling exercise.Prevalence of smoking was significantly affected by maternal age with an overall incidence of 11.5%, which varied from 35% in women under 20 to 7% in women over 35. In the unaffected population, the median free beta-hCG MoM was significantly lower in the smoking group (0.97 vs 1.00) as was that for PAPP-A (0.84 vs 1.02). The standard deviation of the log(10) MoM free beta-hCG was lower in the smoking group and that for PAPP-A was higher in the smoking group. The difference in median marker levels did not seem to be related to the number of cigarettes smoked per day. In the group with Down syndrome, the median MoM free beta-hCG was not significantly different in the smokers (1.69 vs 1.86) as was that for PAPP-A (0.53 vs 0.57). Fetal delta NT was not significantly different in the unaffected smokers (0.11 vs 0.0 mm) or in those with Down syndrome (1.96 vs 2.25 mm). In the smoking group, when screening using maternal serum biochemistry and age alone, the false-positive rate was 6.17%, compared to 4.67% in an age-matched group of non-smokers. Correcting for smoking status by dividing the measured MoM by the median found in the smoking group resulted in the false-positive rate falling to 4.40%. When screening using NT, maternal serum biochemistry and age, the false-positive rate in smokers was 4.48%, which reduced to 3.46% after correction-in line with the 3.76% in the non-smoking group. The impact on detection rate was too small to be accurately measured.The impact of smoking on first-trimester biochemical marker levels does not seem to be dose related. Whilst correcting first-trimester biochemical markers for maternal smoking status has little impact at the population level for detection rates, a considerable reduction in false-positive rate can be achieved, reducing the level to that seen in non-smokers. However, the effect on the individual patient-specific risk can be substantial and could certainly make a difference to the patient's decision on whether to have an invasive test.Evaluation of a dimeric inhibin-A assay for assessing fetal Down syndrome: establishment, comparison, and monitoring of median concentrations for normal pregnancies.Several studies report the role of dimeric inhibin-A in assessing risk for fetal Down syndrome. The majority, however, use the Serotec inhibin-A assay and not the newer Diagnostic Systems Laboratories inhibin-A enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA).To establish normal gestational age day-specific medians, to compare our results against previous studies pertaining to the inhibin-A ELISA, and to evaluate long-term assay performance.Using the inhibin-A ELISA, 100 specimens were assayed for each completed week of gestation for weeks 15 to 20, 50 specimens for 14 weeks, and 54 specimens for 21 weeks or older. Regressed inhibin-A medians were calculated employing a second-degree polynomial fit of the arithmetic medians. Thereafter, inhibin-A ELISA lot comparisons were performed to evaluate consistency.Regressed values of 182, 174, 175, 184, 201, and 226 pg/mL resulted for weeks 15 to 20, respectively [pg/mL inhibin-A = 4.1528(gestational age)2 - 136.49(gestational age) + 1294.9]. A comparison with 2 other studies shows our values to be lower overall by 15 +/- 11.4% and 16 +/- 2.6%. However, variability between kit lots was as high as 30%.The equation derived provides for the calculation of gestational age day-specific inhibin-A medians for integration into maternal serum screening programs with a subsequent decrease in false-positives expected and observed. Our medians differ considerably from those of other studies, with limited data, using the Diagnostic Systems assay. However, lot changes since the initial analysis have exhibited similar inconsistencies. Therefore, we recommend that others incorporating the assay into their screening programs carefully establish, monitor, and adjust their medians accordingly as a result of potential variations.An outcomes analysis of five prenatal screening strategies for trisomy 21 in women younger than 35 years.This study was undertaken to examine the cost-effectiveness and procedural-related losses associated with 5 prenatal screening strategies for fetal aneuploidy in women under 35 years old.Five prenatal screening strategies were compared in a decision analysis model: triple screen: maternal age and midtrimester serum alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol; quad screen: triple screen plus serum dimeric inhibin A; first-trimester screen: maternal age, serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A and free beta-hCG and fetal nuchal translucency at 10 to 14 weeks' gestation; integrated screen: first-trimester screen plus quad screen, but first-trimester results are withheld until the quad screen is completed when a composite result is provided; sequential screen: first-trimester screen plus quad screen, but the first-trimester screen results are provided immediately and prenatal diagnosis offered if positive; later prenatal diagnosis is available if the quad screen is positive. Model estimates were literature derived, and cost estimates also included local sources. The 5 strategies were compared for cost, the numbers of Down syndrome fetuses detected and live births averted, and the number of procedure-related euploid losses. Sensitivity analyses were performed for parameters with imprecise point estimates.In the baseline analysis, sequential screening was the least expensive strategy ($455 million). It detected the most Down syndrome fetuses (n=1213), averted the most Down syndrome live births (n=678), but led to the highest number of procedure-related euploid losses (n=859). The integrated screen had the fewest euploid losses (n=62) and averted the second most Down syndrome live births (n=520). If fewer than 70% of women diagnosed with fetal Down syndrome elect to abort, the quad screen became the least expensive strategy.Although sequential screening was the most cost-effective prenatal screening strategy for fetal trisomy 21, it had the highest procedure-related euploid loss rate. The patient's perspective on detection versus fetal safety may help define the optimal screening strategy.Screening for Down's syndrome in early and late first and second trimester using six maternal serum markers.The efficiency of six maternal serum markers for Down's syndrome (DS), alpha fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), free beta-hCG, pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), the proform of eosinophil major basic protein (ProMBP), pregnancy-specific-beta-1-glycoprotein (SP(1)), and combinations thereof, was examined. Discriminant analysis in 156 DS pregnancies and 546 controls defined three effective combinations of serum marker logMoMs (multiples of the median in control samples) in three gestational age windows, i.e. Index I (weeks 7-9) = 0.52 logMoM ProMBP + 0.28 logMoM PAPP-A - logMoM SP(1); Index II (weeks 10-12) = 1.94 logMoM free beta-hCG - logMoM SP(1), and Index III (weeks 15-19) = 0.78 logMoM free beta-hCG + 1.12 logMoM ProMBP - logMoM AFP. The estimated detection rates of indices and age for a false-positive rate (FPR) of 5% were 73% for Index I, 69% for Index II, and 60% for Index III. Including the ultrasound marker nuchal translucency, using a DS at term risk of 1 : 400 as cut-off, the detection rates of the indices increased to 86, 83, and 82% for FPRs of 4.3, 4.1, and 5.8%, respectively. The indices are promising markers for screening for DS.Assessment of the fetal nasal bone at 11-14 weeks of gestation by three-dimensional ultrasound.To evaluate the benefit of three-dimensional (3D) ultrasound in the examination of the fetal nasal bone at 11-14 weeks of gestation.We examined the fetal nasal bone in 120 stored volumes acquired transabdominally with a 3D scanner from singleton pregnancies at 11-14 weeks of gestation. The volume acquisition had been performed following conventional ultrasound examination that had demonstrated presence of the fetal nasal bone. The volumes were obtained with two-dimensional (2D) start images in transverse, coronal mid-sagittal, parasagittal and oblique longitudinal sections of the fetal head.In the transverse and coronal sections, a satisfactory image demonstrating presence of the nasal bone was achieved in only three and one, respectively, of the 20 volumes that we obtained. In mid-sagittal sections, the nasal bone was always visible when the angle was within a range of 30-60 degrees, without the need for sectional image analysis. None of the images with an angle >60 degrees or <30 degrees was satisfactory. In the parasagittal sections with the fetal profile at 45 degrees, a good-quality image of the nasal bone was possible in all cases that were examined, irrespective of the distance from the mid-sagittal plane. In the oblique longitudinal sections with the fetal profile at 45 degrees, there were 10 volumes where the 2D start section was at 0-25 degrees from the midline and in all these cases the nasal bone was successfully visualized. In contrast, only 5/20 cases where the 2D start section was at 25-90 degrees from the midline provided a satisfactory image demonstrating the nasal bone. In 5/10 volumes obtained with the fetus facing downwards the nasal bone was visible in both the 2D and 3D images.In a 3D volume the extent to which the nasal bone can be demonstrated to be present in a given reconstructed section is entirely dependent on obtaining a good initial 2D view.Elevated maternal midtrimester serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin levels in vegetarian pregnancies that cause increased false-positive Down syndrome screening results.The aim of this study was to examine whether midtrimester maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and alpha-fetoprotein levels for Down syndrome screening differed in vegetarian pregnancies and omnivore pregnancies and to evaluate whether maternal serum vitamin B(12) concentration affected these maker levels.Ninety-eight vegetarian and 122 omnivore singleton pregnancies were studied. Reference levels of free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and alpha-fetoprotein were based on a population of 6312 singleton euploid pregnancies that had been surveyed previously. Serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and alpha-fetoprotein levels were measured by enzyme immunoassay or radioimmunoassay. Multiples of the median values were calculated to determine whether different diet habits affected serum biomarker levels. Maternal serum vitamin B(12) levels were determined with radioimmunoassay.The free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin multiples of the median values were elevated significantly in the vegetarian pregnancies group (1.28 multiples of the median) compared with that of the reference population (1.00 multiples of the median) (P<.001). A negative association between the serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin multiples of the median values and the concentration of maternal serum vitamin B(12) was observed in the vegetarian pregnancies. No correlation was found between the alpha-fetoprotein multiples of the median values and the maternal serum vitamin B(12) concentration.The current data showed that the midtrimester maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin levels increased in vegetarian pregnancies and led to an elevated false-positive rate in screening for Down syndrome compared with pregnant women with regular diet and resulted in unnecessary invasive procedures. It is necessary to establish vegetarian pregnancy alpha-fetoprotein and beta-human chorionic gonadotropin reference levels to correct increased false-positive screening results.Integrated first- and second-trimester Down syndrome screening test among unaffected IVF pregnancies.The aim of the current study was to assess the profile of markers that constitute the integrated test and to measure its false-positive rates (FPR) among a preselected group of unaffected IVF pregnancies. These results were compared with the reference laboratory values that reflect the general obstetric population, which underwent the same investigative protocol.Ninety-nine unaffected singletons from IVF-pregnant women and 1781 controls, all evaluated by the same laboratory, underwent a nondisclosure integrated Down syndrome screening test. This test comprised first-trimester nuchal translucency (NT) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) assessment, followed by a midgestation quadruple test. Only upon completion of the integrated screening test, the parturient women were informed of its results.The mean maternal age of the study and the control group was 32.2 +/- 4 and 30.4 +/- 4 years respectively (t-test <0.005). The marker levels were expressed as multiples of the gestation-specific normal medians. The IVF group had lower PAPP-A (0.78 vs 1.03, t-test P < 0.05) and higher NT (1.14 vs 1.01, t-test P < 0.05) values, respectively. All the other markers were similar for both groups. On the basis of the integrated test, a higher rate of IVF pregnancies were defined as being screen-positive (6.1% vs 3.7%), although the values did not reach a level of statistical significance.Since NT alone yielded the same FPR as the integrated test, the option of various sonographic screening combinations in this group warrants further investigation.Maternal ethnic origin and fetal nasal bones at 11-14 weeks of gestation.Failure to visualise the fetal nasal bones at 11-14 weeks of gestation is associated with a significant increase in the risk for trisomy 21. However, it is not known whether the ethnic origin of the mother has any effect on the fetal profile and the prevalence of this marker.Prospective study.London Teaching Hospital.Four thousand and four hundred and ninety-two consecutive fetuses undergoing routine first trimester ultrasound scanning at 11-14 weeks of gestation in a multiethnic population.Examination of the nasal bones was attempted in the fetuses.Rate of visualisation of the fetal nasal bones.Five hundred fetuses were excluded from the analysis because of chromosomal abnormalities or a technically unsatisfactory examination. In the remaining 3992 fetuses, the maternal ethnic origin was African in 13.0%, Asian in 15.3% and Caucasian in 66.0%. Compared with Caucasians, the failure to visualise the fetal nasal bones was significantly higher in women of African (P= 0.0001) but not Asian origin (P= 0.24). A multivariable logistic regression model showed that having a mother of African origin is still significantly associated with an increased likelihood of absent fetal nasal bones compared with Caucasians (odds ratio 2.33), even after correcting for maternal age, parity and crown-rump length.There is a significant difference in the rate of visualisation of the fetal nasal bones in the first trimester in mothers of different ethnic origin. This suggest that corrections for maternal ethnicity will be required to ensure equity of fetal nasal bone screening in multiracial populations. Whether corrections are required for the father's ethnic origin remains to be determined.First and second trimester antenatal screening for Down's syndrome: the results of the Serum, Urine and Ultrasound Screening Study (SURUSS).Nuchal translucence incorporated into a one-stage multifactorial screening model for Down syndrome prediction at second-trimester pregnancy.The aim of this study was to achieve one-stage screening for trisomy 21 using a combination of nuchal translucency (NuT) measurement and maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) biochemistry levels in the second trimester among a high-risk study population. From January 1998 to June 2001, 45 cases of trisomy 21 were prenatally found and confirmed in the hospital-based cytogenetic diagnosis laboratory. A total of 867 normal singleton pregnancies were enrolled as controls from the antenatal care clinics in the hospital. All study and control subjects between 13 weeks and 18 weeks of gestation with a mean age of 15.2 +/- 1.3 weeks underwent one-stage nuchal translucence measurements and maternal serum biochemical screening for Down syndrome. The final logistic model contained beta-hCG (multiples of the gestational median or MoM), maternal age (matA), nuchal translucence (NuT MoM) and AFP (MoM) as covariates. Also, the estimated coefficients of the regression were highly significant. This model provided the estimated probability of Down syndrome as follows: Pr (Down syndrome) = exp (Z)/ [1 + exp (Z)], where Z = -11.18 + 0.64 x (beta-hCG MoM) + 0.25 x matA + 1.32 x NuT MoM -2.23 x AFP MoM. The logistic regression with estimated coefficients was installed in a Palm digital assistant (PDA) equipped with Excel (Microsoft). The risk probability of Down syndrome could be readily calculated after inputting data for all four predictor variables.ADAM12: a novel first-trimester maternal serum marker for Down syndrome.The concentration of bioavailable insulin-like growth factor (IGF) I and II is important to foetal growth. It is regulated by insulin-like growth factor binding proteins (IGFBP) 1 through 6. Proteolytic cleavage of IGFBP-3 takes place in human pregnancy serum; accordingly, IGFBP-3 serum levels decrease markedly during pregnancy. ADAM12 (A disintegrin and metalloprotease) is an IGFBP-3 and IGFBP-5 protease and is present in human pregnancy serum. The goal of this study was to determine whether ADAM12 concentration in maternal serum is a useful indicator of foetal health.We developed an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for the quantification of ADAM12 in serum. The assay range was 42 to 667 micro g/L. Recombinant ADAM12 was used as the standard for calibration.We found that ADAM12 was highly stable in serum. Serum concentration increased from 180 micro g/L at week 8 of pregnancy to 670 micro g/L at 16 weeks, and reached 12 000 micro g/L at term. In 18 first-trimester Down syndrome pregnancies, the concentration of ADAM12 was decreased, thus the median multiple of mean (MoM) value was 0.14 (0.01-0.76). A detection rate for foetal Down syndrome of 82% for a screen-positive rate of 3.2% and a 1:400 risk cut-off was found by Monte Carlo estimation using ADAM12 and maternal age as screening markers.ADAM12 is a promising marker for Down syndrome.Medically assisted reproduction and second-trimester maternal serum marker screening for Down syndrome.To evaluate the effect of in vitro fertilization (IVF) and intracytoplasmic sperm injection (ICSI) on total hCG, free ss-hCG, AFP and unconjugated estriol (uE3) used as markers for second-trimester Down syndrome maternal serum screening.Second-trimester maternal sera from 1515 singleton pregnancies (970 by IVF, 545 by ICSI) were compared with control sera (21 014 cases). Free ss-hCG, total hCG, AFP and uE3 were compared between the control group and the medically assisted reproduction groups. The percentages of at-risk patients (>/=1/250) were also compared.No differences in values of the maternal serum markers were observed between the medically assisted and control groups. When maternal age was taken into account, the screen-positive rate for Down syndrome screening did not differ between the two groups.Patients undergoing assisted reproduction techniques can be counseled for maternal serum Down syndrome screening with the same efficacy as patients with naturally conceived pregnancies.First-trimester sonographic screening for Down syndrome.Screening for Down syndrome is an important part of routine antenatal care. The most common screening method in the United States involves the assessment of a combination of factors: maternal age, multiple second-trimester serum markers, and second-trimester ultrasonography (as a so-called "genetic sonogram"). More recently, however, there has been significant interest in first-trimester methods of screening, including screening for first-trimester serum markers and the sonographic measurement of fetal nuchal translucency. Multiple studies have demonstrated that fetal nuchal translucency has the potential of being a very powerful predictor of fetal aneuploidy. However, for clinicians a large void remains between this knowledge and the practical issues that must be addressed prior to endorsing this form of screening for widespread use. This article provides an objective assessment of the literature describing nuchal translucency, as well as some adjunct first-trimester sonographic techniques, such as ductus venosus flow and nasal bone studies. Additionally, a detailed description of practical problems that might limit the implementation of this form of screening is presented.Combined sonographic and biochemical markers for Down syndrome screening.To evaluate the efficacy of fetal nuchal fold thickness and proximal long bone biometric measurements in modifying Down syndrome serum screening risk in a population of women referred for second-trimester sonography.Sonographic biometric measurements and biochemical markers were combined retrospectively for 2533 women with known pregnancy outcomes. Four different screening methods were compared: (1) advanced maternal age; (2) biochemical serum screening markers; (3) modification of serum screening risks on the basis of categorical cutoffs for nuchal fold and femur and humerus length; and (4) a combined approach in which the sonographic measurements were treated as multiples of the medians and entered, together with the serum screening results, into a multivariable algorithm. The efficacy was compared at second-trimester risk cutoffs of 1:270 and 1:100.Down syndrome was present in 30 of the 2533 pregnancies (1 in 84). With the use of the 1:270 cutoff, biochemical screening had 93% sensitivity and a 40% false-positive rate. With application of the categorical method of fixed cutoffs to incorporate fetal biometry, the false-positive rate was reduced to 33% with no loss of sensitivity. The combined model had 83% sensitivity and a 19% false-positive rate. The combined method had the highest positive predictive value (1 in 20). Similar gains in efficacy could be shown with the 1:100 cutoff.For this high-risk group, the multivariate model that combines serum screening and sonography can result in a substantial reduction in the number of amniocenteses. Although the addition of the sonographic biometric measurements resulted in some Down syndrome cases being missed, the net effect was a large improvement in the overall positive predictive value of the screening.Ear length in trisomy 21 fetuses at 11-14 weeks of gestation.To determine the value of measuring fetal ear length at 11-14 weeks of gestation in screening for chromosomal defects.The fetal ear length was measured in 450 fetuses immediately before chorionic villus sampling for karyotyping at 11-14 weeks of gestation.The median gestational age was 12 (range, 11-14) weeks. The fetal ear was successfully examined in all cases. The fetal karyotype was normal in 409 cases and abnormal in 41, including 32 cases of trisomy 21. In the chromosomally normal group the fetal ear length increased significantly with crown-rump length from a mean of 3.7 mm at 45 mm to 6.9 mm at 84 mm. In the trisomy 21 fetuses the median ear length was significantly below the normal mean for crown-rump length by 0.45 mm (P = 0.013) but it was below the 5(th) centile of the normal range in only two (6.3%) of the cases. There was no significant association between the delta score of ear length and delta nuchal translucency in either the chromosomally normal (r = - 0.015, P = 0.753) or the trisomy 21 fetuses (r = - 0.014, P = 0.94).At 11-14 weeks of gestation the ear length in trisomy 21 fetuses is significantly reduced but the degree of deviation from normal is too small for this measurement to be useful in screening for trisomy 21.Maternal serum screening in Ontario using the triple marker test.To summarise the experience and evaluate the performance of the Ontario maternal serum screening (MSS) programme.The Ontario MSS programme between October 1993 and September 2000.This study used information collected in the Ontario MSS database, which contains data on each screened pregnancy. In the Ontario MSS programme, women are screened between 15 and 20 weeks of gestation. The risk cut-off for Down's syndrome was >or= 1 in 385 at term and women with a serum alpha-fetoprotein >or= 2.2 multiples of the unaffected population median were defined as screen-positive for open neural tube defects.Between 1 October 1993 and 30 September 2000, 428410 women residing in Ontario were screened for open neural tube defects, and 423895 women were screened for Down's syndrome and trisomy 18. Approximately 48% of all pregnant women in the province had MSS. The uptake rate of amniocentesis following a positive Down's syndrome screening was 67%. Of 717 cases of Down's syndrome ascertained in the screened population, 531 were detected by MSS, giving a term detection rate (DR) of 70.6%, with a false-positive rate (FPR) of 7.2%. For neural tube defects, the DR was 72.7%, with a FPR of 2.0%. The screen also detected 50% of cases of trisomy 18 at term, with a FPR of 0.2%. Coincidentally, 113 cases of chromosome aneuploidies other than Down's syndrome and trisomy 18 were detected.In the Ontario MSS programme, MSS performed as expected in the detection of Down's syndrome, open neural tube defects and trisomy 18. MSS is an effective and practical method for large-scale second trimester screening for Down's syndrome, open neural tube defects and trisomy 18, and the MSS database is an extremely useful tool in monitoring the performance of this screen.Maternal weight correction of maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG MoM when screening for trisomy 21 in the first trimester of pregnancy.To assess the suitability of either the log-linear or reciprocal-linear regression procedure for maternal weight correction of biochemical marker MoMs in the first trimester.Data from two prospective first-trimester OSCAR screening programmes including 32,010 women with first-trimester maternal serum-free beta-hCG and PAPP-A measured by the Kryptor analyser was analysed by regression analysis to provide parameters for the log-linear and reciprocal-linear MoM correction procedures. Assessment was made by goodness of fit to the data. The impact on detection rate and false-positive rate of the different correction procedures was assessed using statistical modelling with biochemical markers alone.Both log-linear and reciprocal-linear correction were shown to fit the data well. For free beta-hCG, the log-linear procedure was marginally superior to the reciprocal-linear procedure (r2=0.986 v 0.980), whilst for PAPP-A the reciprocal-linear procedure was marginally better (r2=0.991 v 0.985). Log-linear correction reduced the variance for both markers more than did the reciprocal-linear procedure. For free beta-hCG, the sd was reduced from 0.2675 to 0.2605 and for PAPP-A, it was reduced from 0.2545 to 0.2336. Correcting for maternal weight was shown to reduce the population false-positive rate from 7.0 to 6.5%, whilst maintaining the same detection rate at a risk cut-off of 1 in a 100. At individual levels, a two-fold variation in risk was demonstrated depending upon the individual's weight.To provide accurate individual patient-specific risks for trisomy 21, maternal weight must be taken into account and should be a mandatory data item for screening programmes. Maternal weight correction in the first trimester using free beta-hCG and PAPP-A can be best achieved using the log-linear procedure.First-trimester screening for Down syndrome in France combining fetal nuchal translucency measurement and biochemical markers.In France, there is a strictly regulated National Screening Programme for Down syndrome, based on second-trimester maternal serum markers. A prospective study of nuchal translucency together with retrospective evaluation of maternal serum markers was carried out to inform decisions on whether to move the programme to the first trimester.Between January 1998 and June 2001, all women who presented for their prenatal care at 12 participating maternity units were, regardless of age, invited to provide a blood sample and to attend for an NT scan at 11 to 13 weeks. The results were used to derive Gaussian distribution parameters. Detection and false-positive rates were computed in two ways: statistical modelling and directly. The cut-off risk was 1 in 250 at term.A total of 5694 women with singleton pregnancies were screened including 26 with Down syndrome and 24 with other aneuploidies. The model-predicted detection and false-positive rates for combined ultrasound and serum screening were 81 and 4.5% compared to 64 and 6.0% for ultrasound alone. The directly observed rates were 73 and 4.7%, compared to 62 and 5.0% respectively.In France, first-trimester screening with nuchal translucency and maternal serum markers is likely to achieve a high screening efficiency. This has important implications for the national screening policy.First-trimester screening for trisomies 21 and 18.Screening for aneuploid pregnancies is routinely performed after 15 weeks of gestation and has a sensitivity of approximately 65 percent, with a false positive rate of 5 percent. First-trimester markers of aneuploidy have been developed, but their use in combination has not been adequately evaluated in clinical practice.We conducted a multicenter study of screening for trisomies 21 and 18 among patients with pregnancies between 74 and 97 days of gestation, based on maternal age, maternal levels of free beta human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A, and ultrasonographic measurement of fetal nuchal translucency. A screening result was considered to be positive for trisomy 21 if the calculated risk was at least 1 in 270 pregnancies and positive for trisomy 18 if the risk was at least 1 in 150.Screening was completed in 8514 patients with singleton pregnancies. This approach to screening identified 85.2 percent of the 61 cases of Down's syndrome (95 percent confidence interval, 73.8 to 93.0), with a false positive rate of 9.4 percent (95 percent confidence interval, 8.8 to 10.1). At a false positive rate of 5 percent, the detection rate was 78.7 percent (95 percent confidence interval, 66.3 to 88.1). Screening identified 90.9 percent of the 11 cases of trisomy 18 (95 percent confidence interval, 58.7 to 99.8), with a 2 percent false positive rate. Among women 35 years of age or older, screening identified 89.8 percent of fetuses with trisomy 21, with a false positive rate of 15.2 percent, and 100 percent of fetuses with trisomy 18.First-trimester screening for trisomies 21 and 18 on the basis of maternal age, maternal levels of free beta human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A, and measurement of fetal nuchal translucency has good sensitivity at an acceptable false positive rate.First-trimester screening for Down syndrome in singleton pregnancies achieved by intrauterine insemination.To evaluate whether achieving a singleton pregnancy by IUI affects the results of first-trimester screening for Down syndrome compared to naturally conceived pregnancy.Forty-nine IUI and 3059 naturally conceived singleton pregnancies were included in the study. Ovulation in IUI pregnancies was induced by clomiphene and human menopausal gonadotropin. Progesterone was given after insemination for 2 weeks. Down syndrome screening was performed using a combination of maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency, and maternal serum concentrations of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A during the period of 10-14 weeks' gestation.In IUI pregnancies, nuchal translucency thickness and the levels of PAPP-A were significantly higher. The values of free beta-hCG were not statistically different between the two groups. The screen-positive rate in IUI pregnancies was significantly higher (14.3% vs. 7.1%).Singleton pregnancies achieved by IUI have a higher screen-positive rate. Not only elder maternal age but also exogenous hormones given during the process of ovulation induction and after conception may play an important factor influencing positive screening results.Nasal bone hypoplasia: is it a common finding amongst chromosomally normal fetuses of southern Chinese women?To assess the incidence of nasal hypoplasia among fetuses of southern Chinese women.This prospective observational study was conducted at Princess Margaret Hospital, Hong Kong. All pregnant women referred for chromosomal studies before 14 weeks were assessed. The crown-rump length, nuchal translucency thickness, and nasal bone were assessed between 11 and 14 weeks.A total of 143 women were recruited. In 119 fetuses, facial profiles were successfully obtained and the presence or absence of nasal bones was assessed. One hundred and fourteen fetuses had normal karyotypes. The rate of absence nasal bone when assessed between 11-14 weeks was 0.88% in the fetuses with a normal karyotype. During the same period, 2 out of 3 fetuses with Down syndrome had absence of nasal bones. A nasal bone was visualized in one fetus with Edward syndrome and the other with Turner syndrome (45 X).The incidence of nasal hypoplasia is not increased among fetuses of southern Chinese women. Assessment of ossification of the nasal bone can be used to supplement first-trimester screening in Chinese women.Mid-gestation Down syndrome screening test and pregnancy outcome among unstimulated assisted-conception pregnancies.Alteration of mid-gestation serum markers in assisted-conception pregnancies is believed to be attributable to ovarian superovulation treatment modalities. We compared alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE(3)) in two groups of unstimulated assisted-conception pregnancies, that is, own-oocyte frozen embryos (own-FET) versus oocyte-donated (OD) embryos.Forty-three OD-conceived and 31 own-FET-conceived singleton parturient women (aged 29 +/- 4 years and 31 +/- 4 years respectively, P < 0.05) were followed from embryo transfer throughout pregnancy.The daily pattern of first-trimester serum beta-hCG was similar in both groups. The OD group had only significantly increased AFP concentrations compared to the own-FET group (1.38 vs 0.99 median MoM respectively, P = 0.002). Although there were no chromosomal abnormalities and no fetal or neonatal deaths in either group, 12% OD women and 6.5% own-FET women were found screen-positive. Eight OD women and 11 FET women had an adverse obstetric outcome (P = NS).OD embryos are a unique clinical model for evaluating the uterine compartment and its contribution to mid-gestation serum marker secretion.[Screening by maternal serum markers for Down's syndrome].To investigate the optimal method of screening for Down's syndrome (DS) with maternal serum mankers.Screening by maternal serum markers for Down's syndrome was offered to all 2886 pregnant women in Peking Union Medical Hospital during 1996.11-2001.3. Alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotrophin (free beta-HCG) were used as markers during the first year of pregnancy. Alpha-fetoprotein, free human chorionic gonadotrophin (HCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) were used as mid pregnancy and first-trimester markers in next three years. Amniocentesis and (CVS) were done in those defined as risk cases.The detection rate of Down's syndrome by maternal serum markers was 3.8% (11/2886). The proportion of false positive results in group of triple markers (alpha FP, free beta-HCG, PAPP-A) was 5%.The PAPP-A was a good marker to detect Down's syndrome in early pregnancy and may be used to predict the outcome during mid trimester of pregnancy. The AFP and free beta-HCG can be useful markers to detect Down's syndrome and fetal abnormality. While prenatal diagnostics can be shifted to an early pregnant period.Combined first- and second-trimester screening for Down syndrome: an evaluation of proMBP as a marker.To estimate the screening performance of different combinations of first- and second-trimester markers, including a new marker, the proform of eosinophil major basic protein (proMBP).The population comprised 195 singleton pregnancies with a normal outcome enrolled in the Copenhagen First Trimester Study, in which a serum sample was available from both the first and the second trimester. The performance of different marker combinations was estimated by receiver-operator-characteristics (ROC) analysis using a Monte Carlo simulation and distributions of log(10)MoM markers and their correlations, derived from our normal material and Down syndrome cases from the literature.Using a fixed screen-positive rate (SPR) of 5%, the first-trimester combined test [nuchal translucency (NT), PAPP-A and free beta-hCG] yielded a detection rate (DR) of 76%, and the integrated test (NT, PAPP-A, AFP, hCG, uE3 and inhibin A) yielded a DR of 86%. With a DR of 90%, the best combination was the first-trimester beta-hCG and NT with the second-trimester proMBP and AFP. ProMBP combined with the triple test increased the DR from 62 to 83%, whereas the addition of inhibin A only increased the DR to 69%.These results suggest that proMBP may be an important new marker in Down syndrome screening and, in particular, a good substitute for inhibin A.Combining nuchal translucency and serum markers in prenatal screening for Down syndrome in twin pregnancies.A method is described to combine the ultrasound marker nuchal translucency (NT) with serum markers so that they can be used together in prenatal screening for Down syndrome in twin pregnancies. For monochorionic twin pregnancies (taken as monozygous), the two fetus-specific NT measurements are averaged before risk is calculated and before the contribution of the serum markers is incorporated. For dichorionic twin pregnancies (taken as dizygous), the risk for each fetus based on the individual NT measurements is calculated, the two fetus-specific risks are added together, and then the contribution of the serum markers is incorporated. In this way, all the screening markers can be used in combination to produce a pregnancy-specific "pseudo-risk", rather than a fetus-specific pseudo-risk. We refer to pseudo-risk because in the absence of sufficient data on the screening markers in affected twin pregnancies, a true risk estimate cannot be calculated. Tentative estimates are given of screening performance in twins using NT, the combined test (NT with first-trimester serum markers), and the integrated test (NT with first- and second-trimester serum markers), all interpreted with maternal age.Nasal bone evaluation with ultrasonography: a marker for fetal aneuploidy.The influence of smoking on the pregnancy-associated plasma protein A, free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin and nuchal translucency.To analyse the effects of smoking on first trimester parameters used in prenatal screening for Down's Syndrome.A chart study.Primary care centres and maternity clinics of the participating universities' and central hospitals.Three thousand and one hundred fifteen women screened by nuchal translucency measurement and 4436 women screened by maternal serum samples. Only normal singleton pregnancies were included.The mean multiples of median of pregnancy associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A), free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) and nuchal translucency were compared by independent samples t test after logarithmic transformation of the data between smokers and non-smokers.PAPP-A and free beta-hCG concentrations and nuchal translucency measurements.PAPP-A was significantly reduced and nuchal translucency increased if the mother smoked. The smokers were more frequently considered as being at high risk for Down's Syndrome.Correcting PAPP-A median for smokers down by 20% might improve the accuracy of the risk evaluations given to individual women. If the association between increased nuchal translucency and smoking can be confirmed, it poses interesting questions as to the reasons for increased nuchal translucency among normal pregnancies.The effect of temporal variation in biochemical markers of trisomy 21 across the first and second trimesters of pregnancy on the estimation of individual patient-specific risks and detection rates for Down's syndrome.In a previous study we examined the changes in the median multiple of the median (MoM) with gestation of free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (F beta-hCG), total human chorionic gonadotrophin (ThCG), alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) in a large series of Down's syndrome pregnancies. Results showed that there was a significant temporal variation of the MoM for each marker. In this paper, we assess the impact of this temporal shift on the estimation of patient-specific risks and the detection rates (DRs) for Down's syndrome pregnancies.Individual patient-specific risks, DRs and false positive rates were estimated using statistical modelling techniques and computer simulations. The data for these simulations were the regressed mean log(10) analyte MoMs, marker standard deviations (as log(10) MoM) and correlation coefficients derived from the analysis of over 1000 cases of Down's syndrome and 150,000 unaffected pregnancies between 6 and 20 weeks of gestation reported in our previous study. Two models were compared: the classical constant median separation model, which assumes no variation in median shift with gestation (model 1), and a variable median separation model (model 2), which takes account of the changes in median shift with gestation as described in our previous study.When individual patient-specific risks calculated for various MoM values using model 1 were compared with those derived from model 2, considerable differences in risk estimates were observed for all marker combinations, particularly in the first trimester. Using a 1 in 250 cut-off risk, DRs at each gestation in the second trimester for the AFP+F beta-hCG combination were maximized at 14-17 weeks of gestation and were virtually identical at 63-65% for model 1 and model 2. A similar trend was observed for the AFP+ThCG combination, with an optimum gestational range of 15-18 weeks and DRs of 66-68%. In the first trimester, using a 1 in 250 cut-off risk, DRs were more variable with gestation for the prime marker combination of F beta-hCG+PAPP-A, varying from 73% at 8 weeks to 65% at 13 weeks with model 1 and from 75% to 66% with model 2.Risk algorithms should take into account temporal variation in marker MoMs in order to produce accurate patient-specific risks. This also helps to maximize DRs, particularly when samples are taken out with the optimal gestational range.The implications of a false positive second-trimester serum screen for Down syndrome.To investigate the genetic and obstetric implications of false positive Down syndrome serum screening results.The study population comprised 162774 women underwent triple marker screening in the Ontario Maternal Serum Screening program between October 1995 and September 1998, with outcomes obtained from the Canadian Institute of Health Information. The study compares the incidence of chromosomal abnormalities other than Down syndrome in screen positive women with background incidence from the literature. It also compares the risks of having a fetus with congenital abnormalities or of developing obstetric complications in 11549 screen positive women with their matched controls.A higher incidence of trisomy 13 (12.4 per 10000) was seen in screen positive women; the incidence of other chromosomal abnormalities in screen positive women was not increased relative to the general population. The higher incidence of trisomy 13 may have been biased by the selective uptake of amniocentesis in women who had high risks for Down syndrome or abnormal ultrasound findings. Incidences of fetal congenital abnormality in screen positive and negative women were similar. Women who screened positive for Down syndrome had increased risk of spontaneous fetal loss (odds ratio 1.80; 95% confidence interval 1.54, 2.07) but no other obstetric complications.Among women who screened positive for Down syndrome, we found a higher number of spontaneous fetal losses and a possibly higher risk of having a fetus with trisomy 13. We did not find an increased risk for other chromosomal abnormalities, congenital abnormalities, or other adverse obstetric outcomes.Changes in nuchal translucency thickness in normal and abnormal karyotype fetuses.To investigate the dynamic trend of the nuchal translucency thickness between fetuses with normal and abnormal karyotype.Prospective observational study.Ospedale Microcitemico, Cagliari, Italy.A cohort of 305 first trimester fetuses.Fetuses with a nuchal translucency greater than or equal to the 95th centile were invited for a second nuchal translucency measurement. The finding of an 'increased or unchanged' or 'diminished' thickness was compared in fetuses with normal and abnormal karyotype.Nuchal translucency and karyotype. Median maternal age was 35 years (min 17, max 44) and median crown-rump length at first visit was 50 mm (min 38, max 80). A second nuchal translucency measurement was carried out in 292 fetuses, resulting in increased or unchanged values in 95 cases and decreased nuchal translucency in 197 cases. Two hundred and twenty-six (77.4%) fetuses had normal karyotype and 66 (22.6%) had abnormal karyotype (44 trisomies 21, 10 trisomies 18, 5 trisomies 13, 4 cases of 45 X0, 1 case of 47,XXY, 1 case of 47,XXX and 1 translocation). In the 66 chromosomally abnormal fetuses, the second nuchal translucency measurement was enlarged or unchanged in 37 (56%), and diminished in 29 (44%), while in the 226 normal fetuses the second nuchal translucency measurement was enlarged or unchanged in 58 cases (25%) and diminished in 168 (75%) (relative risk 2.6, 95% confidence interval 1.7-4.0).In fetuses with abnormal karyotype, the second nuchal translucency measurement tends to be increased or unchanged, while in normal cases the size of nuchal translucency is generally reduced.Combined serum and ultrasound screening for detection of fetal aneuploidy.Experience gathered over the last decade from high-risk centers provide strong evidence that mid-trimester sonographic markers are sensitive for Down syndrome prediction. More recent data indicate that combining mid trimester sonography with traditional serum markers significantly improves diagnostic accuracy over either group of markers by themselves.Absent nasal bone in the prenatal detection of fetuses with trisomy 21 in a high-risk population.To estimate the usefulness of absent nasal bone by ultrasound in the prenatal detection of second-trimester fetuses with trisomy 21.This was a matched case-control study of sonograms from January 1, 1997 to April 30, 2002. Genetic sonograms and facial profile pictures of all fetuses that were subsequently proven to have trisomy 21 were reviewed (study group). A control group was identified during the same study period by using a 4-to-1 ratio matching for gestational age at the time of the ultrasound examination. The sensitivity and specificity of absent fetal nasal bone for trisomy 21 were determined, and overlap with other ultrasound aneuploidy markers was assessed.Forty fetuses were identified with trisomy 21; in 29 (72.5%) a facial profile had been obtained. Of the 160 controls, 102 (64%) had facial profiles documented. Of the 29 fetuses with trisomy 21 with facial profile available, 12 had absent nasal bone (sensitivity 41%). None of the 102 control fetuses with facial profiles available had absent nasal bone (specificity 100%). The sensitivity of genetic ultrasound was increased from 83% (24 of 29) to 90% (26 of 29) by adding absent nasal bone to the other ultrasound aneuploidy markers.In the second trimester of pregnancy, absent nasal bone has a sensitivity of 41% and a specificity of 100% in detecting fetal trisomy 21. Absent fetal nasal bone may be added to the list of ultrasound aneuploidy markers evaluated during a genetic sonogram.Correlation and overlapping between nuchal translucency and triple test among Down syndrome-affected pregnancies.To examine the correlation and extent of overlapping between first-trimester nuchal translucency (NT) and second-trimester triple test (TT) results in Down syndrome (DS)-affected pregnancies.Results of both tests were obtained in 28 cases with DS. Inter-test correlation was performed by comparing the likelihood ratios (LRs). Screen-positive rates (risk >1:380) were calculated for different age groups by adjusting age-dependent background risk and tests' LRs. Overlapping referred to ratio between screen-positive cases by both tests simultaneously and total screen-positive cases by either one or both tests.No correlation was found between the tests' LRs (Pearson correlation test, r = 0.0487). The overlapping between the tests was 25% and 38.5% among young patients of 20 and 35 years of age, respectively. The average overlapping among patients between 25 and 35 years of age was approximately 33%. Only 3 of the 28 DS cases demonstrated LRs <1 by both tests and moreover none exhibited LRs <0.2 by both tests.The degree of overlapping of one third, between NT and TT, confirms the assumption that both tests utilized together improves DS detection. Screen- negative result, by both tests simultaneously, may reassure low-risk population and aid to reduce the number of non-indicated invasive tests.First and second trimester antenatal screening for Down's syndrome: the results of the Serum, Urine and Ultrasound Screening Study (SURUSS).The influence of different sample collection types on the levels of markers used for Down's syndrome screening as measured by the Kryptor Immunosassay system.In a rapid point-of-care screening programme for chromosomal anomalies, analysis of biochemical markers in maternal blood can now be accomplished in a rapid time frame (less than 20 min). The need to leave whole blood samples some 10 min for coagulation and a further 5 min for centrifugation adds additional processing time.The possibilities for reducing this processing time were investigated using various anticoagulated blood collection systems and the Kryptor analytical platform. Plasma levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and free human chronic gonadotrophin beta-subunit (beta-hCG) were compared with those in maternal serum.From the mean results from ten patients it was shown that use of heparin plasma resulted in a statistically significant reduction in levels of PAPP-A and that EDTA plasma reduced the levels of PAPP-A dramatically. For AFP, levels in citrated plasma and EDTA plasma were also significantly reduced, whereas levels of free beta-hCG were not affected.Use of alternative sample types for PAPP-A is not possible. The sample of choice for first trimester screening using the Kryptor platform is maternal serum.Antenatal screening for Down's syndrome with the quadruple test.Second trimester screening for Down's syndrome is widely practised throughout the world. We assessed the performance of antenatal serum screening for Down's syndrome with the quadruple test in 46193 pregnancies from 14 hospitals over 5 years. Women who screened positive (risk > or =1 in 300) were offered diagnostic amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling. Of 88 observed Down's syndrome pregnancies, 71 (81%) had a positive screening result (81% detection rate, 95% CI 72-89), and of 46105 unaffected pregnancies, 3200 tested positive (7% false-positive rate). These results show that the quadruple test is a better method of screening for Down's syndrome than use of maternal age alone (51% detection rate, 14% false-positive rate) and is more effective than other second trimester screening tests. Therefore, we conclude that the quadruple test should be the test of choice in second trimester screening for Down's syndrome.Improved antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.Incorporation of inhibin-A in second-trimester screening for Down syndrome.To evaluate the efficacy of the second-trimester quadruple test (maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, human chorionic gonadotropin, and inhibin-A) in prenatal screening for Down syndrome.All quadruple tests performed on singleton pregnancies over a 32-month period were reviewed. The sensitivity and false-positive rates were compared with the theoretic rates predicted by the screening model when applied to a population of women with the same maternal age distribution.Twenty-three thousand seven hundred four women with unaffected pregnancies and 45 women with Down syndrome-affected pregnancies received the quadruple test. Mean analyte values for both unaffected and affected pregnancies were similar to those expected. The sensitivity of the quadruple test, which was based on ascertainment of all viable affected pregnancies in the screened population, was 85.8%. This sensitivity did not significantly differ from an expected 83.8% (P =.8). The initial false-positive rate, 9.0%, was significantly below that expected (9.9%) (P =.002) and was further reduced to 8.2% after correction for major gestational age errors. The positive predictive value of the quadruple test was one in 51. Women with an affected pregnancy and a positive test result (true positives) generally had very high risks (median 1:22) relative to women with false-positive results (median risk 1:111).The quadruple test meets or exceeds performance expectations and appears to represent an improvement over the widely used triple test.Maternal serum hCG and alpha-fetoprotein levels in pregnancies conceived after IVF or ICSI with fresh and frozen-thawed embryos.Studies have shown that levels of serum markers of Down's syndrome were altered in pregnancies conceived after IVF, though the reason for this remains unknown.Second-trimester maternal serum levels of hCG and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) in pregnancies conceived with fresh and frozen-thawed embryos after assisted reproduction were compared with those conceived spontaneously.There were 203 pregnancies with fresh embryo transfers (130 IVF cases, 73 ICSI cases) and 98 pregnancies with frozen-thawed embryo transfers (61 IVF cases, 37 ICSI cases). The controls consisted of 17 145 spontaneous pregnancies. The median hCG multiples of the median (MoM) was significantly increased to 1.24 in 98 pregnancies conceived after frozen embryo transfer. This elevation was observed only in the IVF-frozen embryo transfer subgroup (P < 0.001), but not in the ICSI-frozen embryo transfer subgroup. The median AFP MoM for 203 pregnancies after fresh embryo transfer was 0.90. Among the subgroups, the median AFP MoM was significantly reduced to 0.90 and 0.86 in IVF-embryo transfer (P = 0.04) and ICSI-embryo transfer (P = 0.001) pregnancies respectively, and significantly raised to 1.20 in the IVF-frozen embryo transfer subgroup.The degree of alterations in maternal serum hCG and AFP levels varied between fresh and frozen-thawed embryos, and also between the mode of fertilization. Pregnancies resulting from ICSI or frozen embryo transfer should be regarded as distinct entities from those of IVF-embryo transfer.Midtrimester triple-test levels in women with chronic hypertension and altered renal function.To study the association between midtrimester triple-test levels and renal function in pregnant women with chronic hypertension.Forty-three patients with chronic hypertension for whom renal function was evaluated by the creatinine clearance test between 14- and 20-weeks gestation were studied. Midtrimester triple-test values obtained as part of Down screening program were correlated with renal function.hCG correlated inversely with creatinine clearance (r = -0.345; p = 0.002) and directly with alpha-fetoprotein (r = 0.499; p = 0.003).In pregnant women with chronic hypertension, impaired renal function may alter midtrimester maternal serum hCG levels.First-trimester maternal serum PAPP-A, SP1 and M-CSF levels in normal and trisomic twin pregnancies.To study PAPP-A and SP1 for biochemical trisomy screening in twin pregnancies and to investigate the role of maternal and placental compartments in marker production by comparing the levels of the decidual cytokine M-CSF with the PAPP-A and SP1 from the placenta.Thirteen twin pregnancies with at least one chromosomally abnormal fetus were compared with 68 normal twin pregnancies. Sera were obtained between 11 + 3 and 13 + 6 weeks of gestation, and PAPP-A, SP1 and M-CSF levels were determined by immunoassay. These concentrations were also compared with gestation-matched groups of 18 singleton normal pregnancies and 18 singleton Down syndrome pregnancies.PAPP-A and SP1, but not M-CSF, levels were higher in normal twin pregnancy than in normal singleton pregnancy. SP1 levels, but not PAPP-A, correlated to M-CSF. PAPP-A, but not SP1, levels were reduced in abnormal twin pregnancies, with an increasing effect according to the number of affected fetuses, and were more pronounced in pregnancies with trisomy 18 or 13 than in trisomy 21 fetuses. M-CSF was inconsistent, with a trend towards increased levels in trisomy 21.PAPP-A remains the best biochemical screening marker for fetal trisomies 21, 18 or 13, in singleton as well as in twin pregnancy. In contrast to SP1, its site of production is not likely to be restricted to the placenta. The role of the (maternally produced) M-CSF remains to be further investigated.Maternal serum marker medians in Aboriginal Canadian women.The study evaluates the differences between Aboriginal and Caucasian women in the levels of maternal serum markers used in second-trimester Down syndrome screening (alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, and total human chorionic gonadotrophin).A case-control study compared the levels of serum markers in 401 Aboriginal women and 1565 matched controls selected from 7717 Caucasian women. The cases and controls were screened in a single centre and matched for maternal age, parity, and sample date. Women with multiple pregnancies and pregnancies associated with Down syndrome, open neural tube defects, trisomy 18, and insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus as well as women without weight recorded were excluded from the study.No differences in the levels of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and total human chorionic gonadotrophin were observed between the two groups. Maternal serum unconjugated estriol was 12% higher in Aboriginal women.Since Aboriginal women make up only a small proportion of women screened, correcting the level of uE3 for this group will have little effect on the overall screening performance. However, if these results are confirmed by further study, individual centres may consider making this correction, so optimal screening performance can be achieved in Aboriginal women.Role of ultrasound evaluation of nuchal translucency in prenatal diagnosis.Nuchal translucency (NT) is the ultrasonographic pattern of the accumulation of subcutaneous fluid (> or = 3 mm) behind the fetal neck. The measurement of NT thickness by ultrasound examination at 11-14 weeks of gestation has been associated with maternal age and to be an effective screening tool for trisomy 21; with an invasive method rate of 5%, about 75% of trisomical pregnancies can be identified. With the association of some biochemical markers like maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) to ultrasonography at 11-14 weeks, it is possible to identify about 90% of chromosomal abnormalities. An increase of NT also allows us to identify most other chromosomal abnormalities, a large number of major cardiac defects, skeletal dysplasias, and genetic syndromes. In monochorial twins the discordance in the measurement of NT represents an early sign of twin-to-twin transfusion syndrome (TTTS).The objective of our study was to assess the detection of fetal structural defects with an ultrasound scan at 11-14 weeks of gestation. We submitted 3,157 pregnant women to a routine ultrasound examination at 11-14 weeks. The patients were then submitted to ultrasound scan in the second or third trimester of pregnancy. An isolated increased NT thickness was not considered an abnormality, but these patients, nonetheless, were submitted to an early echocardiographic evaluation. Fetal structural abnormalities were classified as major or minor and of early or late onset.A detection rate of 4.3% (135 cases) of abnormalities was found and 22.6% of these (30 cases) were diagnosed by ultrasound scan at 11-14 weeks, including seven cardiac defects associated with increased NT. The antenatal ultrasound detection rate was 73.5%, and 33.2% were diagnosed in the first trimester assessment. A rate of 76.8% of the major defects were diagnosed by the prenatal scan and 35.8% by the scan at 11-14 weeks. Fetal structural defects with the ultrasonography at 11-14 weeks were diagnosed in about 24.3% of the cases, therefore, a second trimester abnormality is important in routine antenatal care to increase the prenatal assessment of fetal anomalies.As for the introduction of every new technique in routine clinical practice, the operators who perform the ultrasound scan at 11-14 weeks should be submitted to adequate training and to strict quality control.Temporal changes in maternal serum biochemical markers of trisomy 21 across the first and second trimester of pregnancy.Many maternal serum markers show concentration changes in Down's syndrome pregnancies but the magnitude of the change in median marker levels varies with gestation. To date these changes have not been accurately specified.The trends in marker median levels between 6 and 20 weeks of gestation were examined for alphafetoprotein (AFP), free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (Fbeta-hCG), total human chorionic gonadotrophin (ThCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) by a meta-analysis of data obtained from our collaborative studies and routine screening programmes for Down's syndrome over a 10-year period. Data were available from between 709 and 1082 Down's syndrome pregnancies and from between 14607 and 153909 unaffected pregnancies for each marker. The median multiple of the median (MoM) and mean log10MoM for each marker at each completed week of gestation were estimated and the trend with gestation smoothed using a weighted least squares regression model.The gestational ages at which maximum separation of marker levels occurred, comparing affected and unaffected pregnancies, and the respective regressed median MoMs and mean log10MoMs, were: for AFP at 16 weeks, 0.72 MoM, -0.14288log10MoM; for Fbeta-hCG at 15 weeks, 2-24MoM, 0.35034 log10MoM; for ThCG at 16 weeks, 1.93 MoM, 0.28548 log10MoM, as well as before 8 weeks (<0.65 MoM, -0.18853 log10MoM); and for PAPP-A before 8 weeks, <0.33 MoM, -0.47727 log10MoM.There is significant temporal variation in mean log10MoM values for the screening markers investigated. Screening algorithms, modified to take account of this variation, should allow more accurate gestation-specific risks to be calculated in individual pregnancies.First-trimester pregnancy scanning as a screening tool for high-risk and abnormal pregnancies in a district general hospital setting.This study set out to evaluate the feasibility and acceptability of routine early ultrasound (12-14 weeks) within a district general hospital (DGH) for identifying high-risk and abnormal pregnancies. This was a pilot study for screening by ultrasound examination all women who presented to their community midwife before 12 weeks' gestation. The study involved 991 women who presented clinically pregnant before 12 weeks' gestation between May 1998 and May 1999. Women were offered routinely two ultrasound examinations during their pregnancy, the first at 12-14 weeks' gestation and the second at 20-21 weeks' gestation. The main outcome measures were: range and number of abnormal/high-risk pregnancies identified during an ultrasound scan at 12-14 weeks' gestation; range and number of abnormalities diagnosed during scans at later gestations; outcomes of the pregnancies; questionnaires assessing how the women viewed early pregnancy ultrasound as a method of screening. Nine hundred and eighty-four (99%) women accepted the offer of an early ultrasound scan at 12-14 weeks' gestation; of these 840(85%) women accepted screening for trisomy 21 (T21) by fetal nuchal translucency thickness (NT) and maternal age (fetal medicine foundation risk assessment programme) and this was completed successfully in 797(80%) of cases. Twenty-four women (2%) had a failed pregnancy and where necessary an ERPC was performed following a planned admission. Thirty pregnancies (3%) were diagnosed as abnormal or having high risk of abnormality at the early scan. A major abnormality was confirmed before the expected anomaly scan at 20 weeks in five (17%) pregnancies; all of these patients opted for an elective termination. Twenty-six (3%) pregnancies had a diagnosis of abnormality at their anomaly scan. Of these, three pregnancies were diagnosed as major abnormalities with two resulting in termination of the affected pregnancy before 24 weeks' gestation. Eight hundred and thirty-seven women (85%) completed questionnaires, 833 women (84.5%) were satisfied with the counselling they received before the ultrasound scan and 827 women (84%) answered that they would accept an early pregnancy scan if offered during their next pregnancy. Early pregnancy ultrasound at 12-14 weeks' gestation can be used as an effective method of identifying and screening for major abnormalities of pregnancy within a DGH setting, but it is appropriate to use this in conjunction with an anomaly scan at around 20 weeks' gestation. Women found this method of screening acceptable.[A study on the screening of prenatal trisomy 21 using the fucosylated alpha-fetoprotein ratio measured by a liquid-phase binding assay].Nuchal index: a gestational age independent ultrasound marker for the detection of Down syndrome.To determine if the ultrasound marker Nuchal Index (NIx) is gestational age independent, and to determine its specificity and sensitivity for Down syndrome (DS) identification.Prospective cohort. A prospective database of fetal biometry and soft markers of aneuploidy was searched for fetuses with the following criteria: confirmed gestational age, at least two measurements of nuchal thickness and biparietal diameter, no major detectable fetal anomalies, and either normal karyotype or normal postnatal exam. Nuchal Index (NIx) was defined as 100x (mean nuchal thickness [mm])/(mean Biparietal Diameter [mm]). This cohort was divided into two groups according to the last digit of their hospital unit number. Initial analysis was carried out in the first group (analysis group), with the second group (normal) used to test the results. A prospective cohort of pre- and postnatally diagnosed DS fetuses with at least two measurements of nuchal thickness and biparietal diameter constituted the abnormal study group (abnormal) and was used to determine the sensitivity of the index. P value <0.05 was considered significant.Eight hundred and seventy-five fetuses constituted the control group with 455 in the analysis group and 420 in the normal group. In the analysis group, Pearson coefficient and ANOVA confirm that NIx was independent of gestational age between 14 + 0 and 22 + 6 weeks of gestation. For the analysis group, mean NIx was 7.72, (SD = 2.05) and a threshold value of 11.0 yielded a specificity of 94%. Fifty-two DS fetuses made up the abnormal group. Mean NIx in this group was 17.9 (SD = 13.9), which was highly significant (P < 0.00001) compared to the analysis group. Using an NIx threshold of 11.0, sensitivity for any DS was 61.5% (32/52) and specificity (normal group) was 96% (402/420) (False positive rate = 4%). If DS fetuses with effusions, hydrops, cystic hygromas or central nervous system (CNS) defects are excluded, the sensitivity for an NIx of 11.0 was 50.0% (20/40).Nuchal Index (NIx) can be assumed to be constant between 14 + 0 and 22 + 6. Using a threshold of 11.0, the sensitivity for any Down syndrome (DS) fetus was 62% (32/52) with a specificity of 96% (False positive rate = 4%). Even when obvious fetal conditions that can cause an increase in NIx are excluded, the sensitivity remains acceptable at 50%. NIx appears to be a useful, gestational age independent ultrasound marker for Down syndrome.Combined second-trimester biochemical and ultrasound screening for Down syndrome.To evaluate the efficacy of a Down syndrome screening protocol that combines second-trimester maternal serum analytes and the continuous ultrasound measures of nuchal fold thickness and proximal long bone length.Ultrasound measurements of nuchal fold, femur length, and humerus length were reviewed for 72 second-trimester Down syndrome and 7063 unaffected fetuses. Derived statistical variables for these parameters were entered into a multivariable Gaussian model together with the statistical variables used in the "quad" test (maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, human chorionic gonadotropin, and inhibin A). Maternal age-specific sensitivities, false-positive rates, and positive predictive values were generated together with receiver operating characteristic curves. Overall efficacy of ultrasound screening alone, the quad test, and the combination of the ultrasound and quad test were compared using a 1:270 second-trimester risk cutoff applied to 1999 US births.Using ultrasound, a sensitivity of 79.9% and false-positive rate of 6.7% may be achieved (positive predictive value: 1 in 42). The quad test has a sensitivity of 81.5% and false-positive rate of 6.9% (positive predictive value: 1 in 42). The combination of the quad test with nuchal fold and long bone measurements may achieve 90% sensitivity and a 3.1% false-positive rate (positive predictive value: 1 in 18).Combining second-trimester serum testing and fetal biometry is a feasible approach to Down syndrome screening, compatible with current obstetric practice. This modality is substantially more effective than either serum screening or ultrasound alone. Efficacy may be comparable to that reported for combined first- and second-trimester (integrated) screening.Down syndrome maternal serum marker screening after 18 weeks' gestation.Women having access to prenatal care late in pregnancy may still wish to benefit from maternal serum screening for Down syndrome. Therefore, we established reference values for alpha-feto protein (AFP) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG), and assessed the diagnostic value of maternal serum marker screening at 18-35 weeks' gestation based upon a series of 4072 sera from unaffected pregnancies and 118 sera from pregnant women with fetuses affected by Down syndrome. Using a 1/250 risk cut-off, a detection rate of 72.9% (95% CI = 71.5-74.3%) was achieved with a false-positive rate of 7.51% (95% CI = 6.71-8.3%). This was not significantly different from the percentages observed in our 14-17 weeks routine screening (50 596 patients): 71.9% (95% CI = 71.5-72.3%) and 6.48% (95% CI = 6.28-6.68%), respectively. Detection and screen-positive rates were, respectively, 51.3% (95% CI = 35.6-67.0%) and 5.95% (95% CI = 5.12-6.68%) in women aunder 35 years of age, and 84.8% (95% CI = 76.9-92.7%) and 24% (95% CI = 20.7-27.3%) in women aged 35 years and over. In conclusion, maternal serum marker screening is feasible at 18 weeks' gestation and later, which may be of interest in selected cases.Measurement of nuchal translucency as a single strategy in trisomy 21 screening: should we use any other marker?To evaluate the role of nuchal translucency thickness as a single marker in screening for trisomy 21 at 10-16 weeks' gestation.From December 1996 to October 2001, nuchal translucency was measured in 11,281 consecutive early second trimester fetuses referred to our unit for prenatal care and delivery. Scans were performed by eight experienced ultrasonographers, under strict methodological criteria.Chromosomal abnormalities were found in 118 cases (52 trisomy 21). Using nuchal translucency greater than the 95th centile as a cut-off, the overall detection rate was 71.2% with a specificity of 95.4%, and a positive predictive value of 14%. In the trisomy 21 selected group, detection rate, specificity, and positive predictive value for nuchal translucency were 92.3%, 95.4%, and 8.5%, respectively. The detection rate of trisomy 21 reached 100% when nuchal translucency was measured between 10 and 14 weeks' gestation, maintaining the same specificity.Early second trimester nuchal translucency measurement can achieve prenatal detection rates of trisomy 21 greater than 95% with a 5% false-positive rate. With a detection rate so high, the benefits of using additional markers may be less than previously considered. Although maternal age, other sonographic or Doppler markers, and maternal serum biochemistry might play a role in prenatal strategies to detect fetal chromosomal abnormalities, the high detection rate of trisomy 21 fetuses using nuchal translucency as a single parameter suggests that early nuchal translucency measurement between 10 and 14 weeks' gestation can be a simple screening strategy for this condition.Second trimester trisomy 21 maternal serum marker screening. Results of a countrywide study of 854,902 patients.In France, maternal serum marker screening is governed by specific legislation. We conducted a study of the countrywide trisomy 21 screening based on second trimester maternal serum markers.We reviewed the medical records of 854,902 patients prospectively screened for second trimester maternal serum markers in the 60 authorized laboratories over the two-year period 1997-1998. All patients screened in France were included. The risk of trisomy 21 was calculated from the combination of maternal age and maternal serum markers. The same cut-off (1/250) was used in all laboratories.In 1998, 65% of pregnant women underwent maternal serum screening. In the 837,765 patients under 38 years of age who were screened, 54,321 (6.48%; 5% CI 6.42-6.53%) had a calculated risk >1/250. Of the 884 Down syndrome cases observed, 626 were detected by maternal serum markers (70.8%; 5% CI 67.8-73.8%). These good results can be explained by a strict quality control of all steps. For the 13,891 patients over 38 years of age, the Down syndrome detection rate was 98.9% for a 34% false-positive rate.Strict rules covering prenatal trisomy 21 screening are of benefit to patients, practitioners and laboratories alike, and ensure good quality control, a high trisomy 21 detection rate and a low amniocentesis rate.Agreement between predicted risk and prevalence of Down syndrome in first trimester nuchal translucency screening.The agreement between predicted risks of Down syndrome and observed prevalence was investigated in a population of 11,847 singleton pregnancies screened by first trimester nuchal translucency at a single institution. Twenty-seven cases of Down syndrome were observed; 20 were detected prenatally by nuchal translucency and maternal age screening, three by other means and four postnatally. The screened women were grouped according to their predicted risk of having an affected pregnancy, and this was compared with the observed prevalence. A significant correlation between predicted and observed prevalences was noted, thus demonstrating that risk estimates for Down syndrome based on first trimester nuchal translucency screening are accurate.Screening for chromosomal anomalies in the first trimester: does repeat maternal serum screening improve detection rates?To assess the within person biological variability of first trimester maternal serum biochemical markers of trisomy 21 across the 10-14 week gestational period. To evaluate whether repeat sampling and testing of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A during this period would result in an improved detection rate.Women presenting at the first trimester OSCAR clinic have blood collected prior to ultrasound dating and nuchal translucency measurement. All samples are analysed for free beta-hCG and PAPP-A before an accurate estimate of gestation is available. In 10% of cases the gestation is prior to the minimum time for NT measurement (11 weeks) and these women are rebooked for a repeat visit to the clinic at the appropriate time. Our fetal database was interrogated to obtain cases in which two maternal blood samples had been collected and analysed in the 10-14 week period. Using data from the marker correlations and statistical modelling, the impact of repeat testing on detection rate for trisomy 21 at a fixed 5% false positive rate, was assessed.261 pairs of data were available for analysis collected over a 3 year period. The correlation between free beta-hCG in sample 1 and sample 2 was 0.890 and that for PAPP-A was 0.827. The average within person biological variation for free beta-hCG was 21% and 32% for PAPP-A. The increase in detection rate when using both sets of marker data was 3.5% when using serum biochemistry and maternal age, and 1.3% when using nuchal translucency, serum biochemistry and maternal age.Repeat sampling and testing of maternal serum biochemical markers is unlikely to substantially improve first trimester screening performance.Influence of maternal smoking on the birth prevalence of Down syndrome and on second trimester screening performance.To determine the influence of maternal smoking on the birth prevalence of Down syndrome and on second trimester screening performance.First, a meta-analysis of cohort and case-control studies was performed to estimate the effect of maternal smoking on the live birth prevalence of Down syndrome. Then, data from 8779 women screened using the quadruple test (alphafetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated estriol (uE(3)), human chorionic gonadotrophin (free beta-hCG), and inhibin-A levels with maternal age) were used to determine the effect of smoking on the serum markers. A Monte Carlo simulation was used to assess the impact of adjusting for smoking status on screening performance.The relative risk of Down syndrome in smokers (versus non-smokers) was 0.95 (95% confidence interval (CI) 0.87 to 1.03). Serum marker levels were determined as multiples of the median for non-smokers of the same gestational age and adjusted for maternal weight (MoM). The MoM values for AFP were 5% higher (95% CI 2-7%), uE(3) 4% lower (95% CI 2-5%), free beta-hCG 20% lower (95% CI 17-23%) and inhibin-A 62% higher (95% CI 57-67%) in smokers compared with non-smokers. Adjusting marker levels for smoking resulted in less than a 1 percentage point increase in the detection rate for a 5% false positive rate with the double, triple or quadruple tests.There is no evidence of an association between the birth prevalence of Down syndrome and maternal smoking. The case for adjusting screening marker levels for smoking is not compelling. But if smoking data are collected routinely adjustment could be made and this would yield similar detection and false positive rates in smokers and non-smokers.A first trimester trisomy 13/trisomy 18 risk algorithm combining fetal nuchal translucency thickness, maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A.This study examines 45 cases of trisomy 13 and 59 cases of trisomy 18 and reports an algorithm to identify pregnancies with a fetus affected by trisomy 13 or 18 by a combination of maternal age fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness, and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 11-14 weeks of gestation. In this mixed trisomy group the median MoM NT was increased at 2.819, whilst the median MoMs for free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were reduced at 0.375 and 0.201 respectively. We predict that with the use of the combined trisomy 13 and 18 algorithm and a risk cut-off of 1 in 150 will for a 0.3% false positive rate allow 95% of these chromosomal defects to be identified at 11-14 weeks. Such algorithms will enhance existing first trimester screening algorithms for trisomy 21.Screening for chromosomal defects by fetal nuchal translucency at 11 to 14 weeks.Double-positive maternal serum screening results for down syndrome and open neural tube defects: An indicator for fetal structural or chromosomal abnormalities and adverse obstetric outcomes.The study was designed to evaluate whether double positive maternal serum screening results for Down syndrome and open neural tube defects indicate an increased risk of adverse perinatal outcome.A retrospective case-control study was conducted. In a cohort of 170,394 women who underwent maternal serum triple screening in Ontario, Canada, between October 1995 and September 1998, 189 women received positive screening results for both Down syndrome and neural tube defects. Each case was matched to 5 control subjects who had negative screening results for test center, maternal age, and specimen date. The risks for adverse perinatal outcomes were compared.Women with double-positive screening results had significantly higher risks of having fetuses with structural abnormalities (odds ratio, 14.5) and chromosomal anomalies (odds ratio, 36.3). They also had higher risks of having preeclampsia (odds ratio, 6.7), small-for-gestational age (odds ratio, 9.7), preterm delivery (odds ratio, 5.9), miscarriage, and intrauterine fetal death (odds ratio, 11.8).Double-positive maternal serum screening results are associated with fetal structural and chromosomal abnormalities and/or adverse pregnancy outcomes. Close fetal and maternal surveillance are indicated when such pregnancies are identified.Comparison of first trimester, second trimester and integrated Down's syndrome screening results in unaffected pregnancies.Our aim was to compare the results of first trimester combined test, second trimester triple test, and integrated test in the same pregnant population. We retrospectively studied 927 women, all giving birth to an unaffected baby except for two cases of Down's syndrome. The women underwent a nuchal translucency ultrasound measurement and a blood sampling for pregnancy-associated plasma protein A and free beta-hCG subunit (free total chorionic gonadotropin subunit) assay in the first trimester of pregnancy. A second trimester biochemical screening (alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol and total hCG) was performed later. The correlations between each pair of markers and between each marker level and maternal age were calculated. No marker showed significant correlation with any other or with maternal age, with the obvious exception of free beta-hCG subunit and total hCG. The false-positive rate (cut-off level: 1 in 350 at term) was 1.5% for the first trimester test, 3.6% for the second trimester test and 0.54% for the integrated test. In 10/14 pregnancies, the increased risk in the first trimester was not confirmed neither in the second trimester nor by the integrated test. In 29/33 women with an increased risk in the second trimester, the first trimester and the integrated test results were discordant. The absence of correlation among different marker levels suggests that the information supplied by the first and second trimester tests is different. Integrating first and second trimester markers in a single test could pose the ethical problem of withholding first trimester results and thus denying the possible advantages of an earlier pregnancy termination.First trimester screening with free beta-hCG, PAPP-A and nuchal translucency in pregnancies conceived with assisted reproduction.To evaluate the effect of in vitro fertilization (IVF) and intracytoplasmic sperm injection (ICSI) on free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG), pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and nuchal translucency (NT).First trimester maternal dried whole blood specimens from 74 singleton pregnancies (32 by IVF and 42 by ICSI) and 30 twin pregnancies (16 by IVF and 14 by ICSI) in which conception was achieved with assisted reproduction techniques were matched with five controls resulting in 370 singleton controls and 150 twin controls. NT was measured using the Fetal Medicine Foundation protocol. Free beta-hCG, PAPP-A and NT levels were compared between the IVF and control groups and between the ICSI and control groups using the Mann-Whitney U test.In singleton pregnancies, the only significant difference was a 21% (95% CI: -35%--7%) reduction in PAPP-A in IVF cases. In twin pregnancies, the only significant difference was a 12% (95% CI: -34%--3%) reduction in NT in IVF cases. In singleton pregnancies, the false-positive rate for Down syndrome screening was 1.4% and 1.9% greater for the IVF and ICSI groups, respectively, compared to controls for a general screening population.Patients undergoing assisted reproduction techniques should be counseled about the possibility of increased false-positive rates. Larger studies are needed to confirm this observation and to develop appropriate adjustment factors to reduce false-positive rates.Maternal serum hyperglycosylated human chorionic gonadotrophin (HhCG) in the first trimester of pregnancies affected by Down syndrome, using a sialic acid-specific lectin immunoassay.In a series of 54 cases of pregnancies complicated by Down syndrome and 224 unaffected pregnancies we examined maternal serum levels of hyperglycosylated human chorionic gonadotrophin (HhCG) in samples collected in the first trimester (11-13 weeks) using a sialic acid-specific lectin immunoassay. We compared these levels with those of other potential first trimester serum markers [free beta-hCG, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and total hCG (ThCG)] and modeled detection rates and false-positive rates of various biochemical markers in conjunction with fetal nuchal translucency (NT) and maternal age using an maternal age standardized population. Maternal serum HhCG in cases of Down syndrome were significantly elevated (median MoM 1.97) with 24/54 (44%) of cases above the 95th centile for unaffected pregnancies. Free beta-hCG was also elevated (median MoM 2.09) with 33% of cases above the 95th centile. PAPP-A levels were reduced (median MoM 0.47) with 38% below the 5th centile. ThCG levels, whilst elevated (median MoM 1.34), had only 20% of cases above the 95th centile. Maternal serum HhCG levels were not correlated with fetal NT but showed significant correlation with ThCG and free beta-hCG and with PAPP-A in the Down syndrome group (r=0.536). Maternal serum HhCG levels in cases with Down syndrome had a significant correlation with gestational age, increasing as the gestation increased. When HhCG was combined together with fetal NT, PAPP-A and maternal age, at a 5% false-positive rate the modeled detection rate was 83%, some 6% lower than when free beta-hCG was used and some 4% better than when ThCG was used. Maternal serum HhCG is unlikely to be of additional value when screening for Down syndrome in the first trimester.Application of ductus venosus Doppler velocimetry for the detection of fetal aneuploidy in the first trimester of pregnancy.To test the hypothesis the application of ductus venosus Doppler velocimetry may serve as a screening tool between 10 and 14 weeks' gestation for the detection of fetuses with chromosomal abnormalities.372 consecutive fetuses were studied. Based on prior study, a chromosomal abnormality was suspected when either the nuchal translucency was above the 95th centile, or there was reversed or absent flow in the ductus venosus during atrial contraction. Sensitivity, specificity, and the negative and positive predictive values were calculated.There were 29 chromosomally abnormal fetuses. Of these 29 fetuses, ductus venosus blood flow during atrial contraction was either absent (n = 2) or reversed (n = 25) in 93.1%. In the chromosomally normal fetuses (n = 343), only 6 (1.7%) had abnormal Doppler profiles in the ductus venosus (specificity = 98.3%, positive and negative predictive values = 81.8% and 99.4%, respectively).The Doppler waveform of the ductus venosus was at least equal to NT thickness measurement for the detection of chromosomal abnormalities.The effect of ethnic origin on nuchal translucency at 10-14 weeks of gestation.Fetal nuchal translucency (NT) increases with gestation and is affected by fetal posture and fetal gender. A recent report suggested that there might also be ethnic differences. We investigated the effect of ethnic origin on NT in an Asian population.NT was measured at 10-14 weeks. The measurements were converted into multiples of the median (MoM) for gestational day. The risk of Down syndrome was calculated by combining NT and maternal age. Cases affected by chromosomal and major structural abnormalities were excluded. NT measurements of different ethnic groups were compared.Between January 1997 and October 2001, 16 981 pregnancies with known ethnic origin and normal fetal outcome were analysed. Median NT MoM (95% CI) of the Filipinos was 1.07 (1.04-1.11). This was significantly higher than that of the Chinese, 1.01 (1.01-1.02); other Asians (Indians, Pakistanis and Nepalese), 0.96 (0.94-0.99), and Caucasians, 0.98 (0.93-1.06) (p<0.05, respectively; Mann-Whitney U-test). An NT risk cut-off of 1:180 would classify 5% of the Chinese, 4.6% of the Caucasians, 5.6% of the Filipinos and 4.2% of the other Asians as screen-positive. There were no statistically significant differences between these screen-positive rates (p>0.05, Chi-square test).Although there were statistically significant differences in NT measurements between different ethnic groups, it was clinically insignificant, as reflected by similar screen-positive rates.Combined ultrasound and biochemical screening for Down's syndrome in the first trimester: a Scottish multicentre study.To evaluate the use of ultrasound measurements of fetal nuchal translucency (NT) obtained in a routine antenatal clinic setting in combination with appropriate biochemical markers as a first trimester screening test for Down's Syndrome.Multicentre observational study.Fifteen Scottish maternity units.Pregnant women (n = 17,229) attending routine antenatal clinics at 10-14 weeks of gestation.NT measurements were attempted in all women along with the measurement of maternal serum free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (F beta hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A). All results were converted to multiples of the appropriate gestational median (MoM) and using a statistical model the risk of an affected pregnancy was derived. No results were given to participating women but all were offered routine second trimester biochemical screening. All cases of Down's Syndrome within the study group were ascertained and the detection rate for each marker was estimated.Success rate of obtaining NT measurements and overall effectiveness of ultrasound and biochemical markers individually and in combination for the detection of Down's Syndrome pregnancies.NT measurements were obtained in 72.9% of women and blood samples in 98.4%. Forty-five cases of Down's Syndrome were ascertained (2.6/1,000). NT measurements were obtained in 37 cases (median NT 1.65 MoM), blood samples in 42 cases and both NT and blood in 34 cases. In combination with the a priori maternal age risk, observed detection rates at a 5% false positive rate were 20/37 (54%) for NT, 23/42 (55%) for F beta hCG and PAPP-A and 28/34 (82%) for a combination of NT, F beta hCG and PAPP-A using a cutoff risk of 1:250. The effect of failing to obtain NT measurements in all cases reduces the overall detection rate to 62% (i.e. 28/45) if the entire series of affected pregnancies within the study group is considered.NT in combination with appropriate serum markers has the potential to detect over 80% of Down's Syndrome fetuses in early pregnancy. However, NT measurement is highly operator-dependent. It requires training, external quality control and adequate time to allow accurate measurement, otherwise suboptimal performance will result.A novel method for the detection of Down syndrome with the use of four serum markers.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the use of the Lens culinaris agglutinin-reactive alpha-fetoprotein ratio for the detection of fetal Down syndrome in combination with traditional serum markers.We obtained maternal serum from 530 women with unaffected pregnancies and 31 women who were pregnant with a fetus with Down syndrome at 14 to 20 weeks of gestation. Various combinations of Lens culinaris agglutinin-reactive alpha-fetoprotein ratio, alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated estriol were evaluated by score, without regard for the maternal age-related fetal Down syndrome risk.The best combination of serum markers, according to our scoring method, was a combination of all 4 markers. This combination showed a sensitivity of 83.9%, with a 5.1% false-positive rate for Down syndrome. Moreover, in older women, high sensitivity was obtained without increasing the false-positive rate.The screen using all 4 markers showed high sensitivity in all age groups without increasing the false-positive rate.The variation of risk estimates through pregnancy in second trimester maternal serum screening for Down syndrome.The variation of risk estimates in second trimester maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome has been shown to be considerable in quality control schemes, i.e. UKNEQAS. We studied the biological variation of risk estimates in 16 women through pregnancy. The maternal serum markers alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), unconjugated estriol (uE3) and beta-hCG were determined six times during late first to late second trimester, and the associated likelihood ratios for Down syndrome were calculated. The interpersonal variation of markers, as well as that of the likelihood ratio, was much greater than the intrapersonal variation. The average intrapersonal standard deviation (SD) of the triple test log likelihood ratio was 0.2291, corresponding to a central 95-percentile interval 0.36-2.81 of the likelihood ratio. The interpersonal SD of the log likelihood ratio was 0.5482, corresponding to a central 95-percentile interval 0.08-11.87 of the likelihood ratio. The large difference between the intra- and interpersonal variation makes it unlikely that biological variation through pregnancy is a major contributor to the variation of risk estimates obtained several times in the same pregnancy. Rather, improvements in analytical quality and laboratory management must be expected to result in reduced variation and, in consequence, better performance of screening.The comprehensive midtrimester test: high-sensitivity Down syndrome test.The purpose of this study was to develop a highly sensitive algorithm for midtrimester Down syndrome detection.Urine (hyperglycosylated human chorionic gonadotropin, beta-core fragment of human chorionic gonadotropin), serum (alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin and unconjugated estriol [uE(3)]), and ultrasound biometry (nuchal thickness, humerus length, the presence of gross ultrasonographic anomalies), and maternal age were measured at genetic amniocentesis. Stepwise logistic regression analysis was used to identify the most significant markers. A multivariate Gaussian algorithm plus age was used to derive patient-specific Down syndrome risk. Sensitivity and false-positive rates at different risk thresholds and the area under the receiver-operating characteristic curve were determined. A probability value of <.05 was significant.There were 568 study cases with 17 Down syndrome cases (3.0%). The mean (+/-SD) maternal and gestational ages for the study group were 36.9 (+/-3.5) years and 16.2 (+/-1.4) weeks, respectively. The significant markers were nuchal thickness (P =.0001), hyperglycosylated human chorionic gonadotropin(P <.001), and beta-core fragment (P <.002). Neither maternal age nor gross sonographic anomaly contributed significantly to Down syndrome detection. The comprehensive midtrimester test was extremely efficient for Down syndrome detection in advanced maternal age only cases with a sensitivity of 92.3% at a 0.8% false-positive rate. In women <35 years old, all the Down syndrome cases were detected at 2.2% false positive rate. For the overall population, the sensitivity was 93.7% at 5% false-positive rate.In a preliminary study, the comprehensive midtrimester test appeared highly sensitive in different age groups. Gross anomaly detection was not required for high performance, which makes the comprehensive midtrimester test potentially suitable for low-risk screening and as an alternative to amniocentesis in women who wish to avoid the procedure. This was a small study; thus, the clinical value of this test can only be established in large trials.Serial first- and second-trimester Down's syndrome screening tests among IVF-versus naturally-conceived singletons.It has been reported that second-trimester serum markers may be affected by assisted reproduction, leading to a higher false-positive rate.A total of 285 naturally and 71 IVF-conceived singletons which underwent a serial disclosure Down's syndrome screening programme were compared. The study protocol included first-trimester combined [nuchal translucency (NT), free beta-HCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A)] testing. The second-trimester triple serum screening included alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), intact HCG and unconjugated estriol (uE3). After excluding aneuploidies, miscarriages, anatomical anomalies and cases with incomplete follow-up, the serum samples of normal cases were assessed and correlated.NT measurement was not significantly changed in either group. However, the IVF group had lower PAPP-A [0.96 versus 1.05 multiples of normal median (MoM)] and higher AFP (1.13 versus 1.07 median MoM). Both groups had similar rates of first-trimester false-positive results (FPR; 7 and 9% respectively), but the IVF group had a significantly higher mid-gestation FPR rate (10 versus 5%; Pearson chi2, P = 0.029). This has contributed to amniocentesis uptake rates of 15 and 13% for the IVF and natural conception pregnancies respectively.The IVF group tended to have a significantly higher second-trimester FPR rate. To counterbalance this phenomenon, integrated first- and second-trimester screening tests or the use of NT alone might be a reasonable option that deserves further investigation.Maternal smoking: age distribution, levels of alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotrophin, and effect on detection of Down syndrome pregnancies in second-trimester screening.To study the levels of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) in the second trimester in smokers and non-smokers with unaffected and Down syndrome pregnancies; to examine the rate of smoking in different maternal age groups in a population having routine prenatal screening; and to assess the effect of smoking on the detection rates for Down syndrome and corresponding false-positive rates, both overall and in different maternal age groups.Information on maternal smoking status, maternal age and serum marker levels was collected from case note searches and the screening programme database on 2272 unaffected singleton pregnancies, 36 unaffected twin pregnancies and 103 singleton Down syndrome pregnancies.In unaffected pregnancies the smokers had a median age 3.3 years less than the non-smokers, while in the Down syndrome cases the corresponding age difference was 2.0 years. Median analyte levels in multiples of the median (MoM) in the unaffected singleton pregnancies were, for non-smokers: AFP=0.97, hCG=1.04; and for smokers, AFP=1.04, hCG=0.80. In the Down syndrome pregnancies the medians were, for non-smokers: AFP=0.69, hCG=2.49; and for smokers, AFP=0.70, hCG=1.53. Correction for smoking status gave median MoMs of 1.0 for both AFP and hCG in the unaffected pregnancies in both smokers and non-smokers. In the Down syndrome cases the corrected medians were, for non-smokers: AFP=0.67, hCG=2.29; and for smokers, AFP=0.73, hCG=1.99. Before correction for maternal smoking the overall detection rate for Down syndrome was 66.7% with a false-positive rate of 6.2%. After correction the detection rate was 67.7% with a false-positive rate of 4.9%. Between the smoking and non-smoking groups there was a significant difference in the detection rate (37.5% versus 76.0%) and the false-positive rate (1.8% versus 8.1%), which disappeared after correction for smoking status (detection rate 62.5% versus 69.3%, false-positive rate 3.9% versus 5.4%). No evidence of a lower incidence of Down syndrome in smokers was found.While correcting AFP and hCG results for maternal smoking status will have little impact on the overall detection rate for Down syndrome, it may reduce the false-positive rate and will improve the accuracy of the risks given to individual women.Accuracy of Down syndrome risks produced in a first-trimester screening programme incorporating fetal nuchal translucency thickness and maternal serum biochemistry.Over the past three years approximately 12 000 women have been screened in the first trimester through our OSCAR programme, which utilizes fetal NT and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A. During this time 30 cases of Down syndrome were identified either prenatally or postnatally. Using an established procedure the accuracy of predicted risk for Down syndrome was assessed in a population of 30 cases of Down syndrome and 11 758 unaffected pregnancies. The correlation between predicted risk and prevalence of Down syndrome was very high (r=0.9995). It is concluded that risks produced by the Fetal Medicine Foundation combined risk algorithm agree very closely with Down syndrome prevalence and can be used with confidence when counselling women of their risk.Maternal serum human chorionic gonadotrophin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A in twin pregnancies in the first trimester.To determine the levels of free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) in twin pregnancies in the first trimester.Serum samples were obtained from 67 pregnant women with twin pregnancies and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A concentrations were compared with those of 4279 singleton controls between the 8th and 13th weeks of gestation.The geometric means of chromosomally normal twin pregnancies were 1.85 MoM for free beta-hCG and 2.36 MoM for PAPP-A. There were no cases affected by Down syndrome in either group.Twin pregnancies secrete more PAPP-A than expected on the basis of singleton controls whereas free beta-hCG production is not increased. The results of the present study can be used to establish normal reference values when introducing first trimester Down syndrome screening in prenatal care.Accuracy of expected risk of Down syndrome using the second-trimester triple test.First-trimester placental volume as a marker for chromosomal anomalies: preliminary results from an unselected population.To compare first-trimester placental volume in chromosomally abnormal and normal pregnancies.Placental volumes were routinely recorded at the time of nuchal translucency thickness measurement at 10-13 weeks of gestation. This was done using customized three-dimensional ultrasound equipment and measurements were then converted to the placental quotient (placental volume/fetal crown-rump length). The possible difference in placental quotient between chromosomally normal and abnormal pregnancies was examined.A total of 2863 pregnancies was evaluated, including 17 with major chromosomal defects (nine cases of trisomy 21, four of trisomy 18, two of trisomy 13, and one each of Turner syndrome and 48,XXY + 21). The median placental quotient in the chromosomally abnormal group (0.67) was significantly lower than that in the normal fetuses (0.98). In nine of the 17 affected pregnancies the quotient was below the 10th centile of the normal range.Assessment of placental volume may prove to be useful in first-trimester risk assessment for chromosomal anomalies.Maternal serum urea resistant alkaline phosphatase in Down syndrome pregnancy.The normal levels of alkaline phosphatase (AP) activity in maternal serum are virtually the same as those observed in Down syndrome (DS) pregnancies at 14-20 weeks' gestation. Using urea inhibition of AP, we observed an atypical AP isoenzyme in the neutrophils of mothers with trisomy 21 fetuses.To assess the use of urea as a selective inhibitor of serum AP in order to seek a possible diagnostic difference between normal and DS pregnancies.Serum AP samples from 24 DS pregnancies and 204 control cases were examined at 12-22 weeks' gestation with and without 2.5 M urea AP inhibition at 18 degrees C for 2 h. The levels of AP activity obtained without urea and the percentage urea AP inhibition were analyzed in the two groups.Without urea treatment, no significant difference of total alkaline phosphatase activity levels was detected between the 204 normal controls and the 24 DS samples. Using 2.5 M urea AP inhibition, after 120 min of exposure at 18 degrees C, the residual activity, as a percentage of initial values of AP, showed significantly higher resistance in the DS samples (> or = 50 IU/l of total AP activity) at 15-22 weeks' gestation. However, at 12-14 weeks (< or = 45 IU/l of total AP activity), no significant difference was found between the DS and control cases.Serum urea resistant alkaline phosphatase in DS pregnancies showed a significant difference only at 15-22 weeks' gestation, compared with normal controls.Serum free beta-HCG and alpha-fetoprotein levels in IVF, ICSI and frozen embryo transfer pregnancies in maternal mid-trimester serum screening for Down's syndrome.The aim of this study was to compare the maternal mid-trimester free beta-HCG and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels in pregnancies conceived by assisted reproduction technology and spontaneous pregnancies in Down's syndrome screening. The influence of the number of embryos transferred and the amount of gonadotrophins used on the marker levels was also evaluated.The study population consisted of 58 IVF, 32 ICSI and 26 frozen embryo transfer (FET) singleton pregnancies. The levels of beta-HCG and AFP were compared with the control group of 6548 singleton spontaneous pregnancies.The false positive rate (FPR) in the Down's syndrome screening was 19% overall in assisted reproductive technology pregnancies, being highest (30.8%) in the FET group. The free beta-HCG multiples of the median (MoM) values were statistically significantly elevated only in the FET group (1.33 MoM; P = 0.012). A positive correlation between the number of embryos transferred and the marker levels was observed in the IVF group. No correlation was found between the amount of gonadotrophin medication used and the marker levels.The present data confirm that the overall FPR in the serum screening for Down's syndrome in assisted reproduction pregnancies is high, resulting in unnecessary invasive procedures.Raised maternal serum placenta growth factor concentration during the second trimester is associated with Down syndrome.To compare early second-trimester maternal serum placenta growth factor concentrations in Down syndrome pregnancies and those in normal pregnancies.A case-control study was performed to evaluate the maternal serum placenta growth factor concentrations in 36 Down syndrome and 320 normal pregnancies with matched gestational age during the second trimester. For the detection of serum concentrations of placenta growth factor, a quantitative sandwich enzyme immunoassay technique (R & D Systems Inc., Minneapolis, Minnesota, USA) was performed.Using a multiple linear regression model, maternal serum placenta growth factor level was associated with gestational age (p<0.001) and the existence of Down syndrome pregnancy (p<0.001). After converting maternal serum placenta growth factor concentrations of each analyte to multiples of the appropriate gestational median (MoM), placenta growth factor MoM (p<0.001) was revealed to be an independent variable for Down syndrome pregnancies after adjusting for the effects of maternal age (p<0.001), free beta-hCG (p<0.001) and AFP (p=0.014) by multivariate logistic regression analysis.Maternal serum placenta growth factor concentration was elevated in Down syndrome pregnancies during the early second trimester. Placenta growth factor might be a novel marker for maternal serum Down syndrome screening.The influence of smoking and parity on serum markers for Down's syndrome screening.To evaluate the impact of smoking and number of previous births on maternal serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein and free beta-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin (free beta-hCG).The study included 3,252 completed unaffected singleton pregnancies that proceeded beyond 37 weeks' gestation and resulted with a birth of healthy child. Smoking status of mothers and data concerning gravidity and parity were collected at the sampling date. Serum markers were measured between 13 and 22 gestational weeks, corrected for maternal weight, and converted to multiples of median (MoM) for unaffected pregnancy of the corresponding gestational age. Median MoM values for both markers were examined in relation to both: smoking habits and number of previous births.Smokers had significantly decreased free beta-hCG MoM values compared to nonsmokers (p < 0.001). The median levels showed a negative relationship with the number of previous births. The significance of a decreasing trend was proved, both in smokers (p < 0.001) and nonsmokers (p < 0.001). The median maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein MoM values did not show any significant dependence, neither with regard to smoking (p = 0.65) nor with regard to parity (p = 0.07).The recommendable adjustment of serum markers to smoking habits, especially concerning the free beta-hCG levels, would be worthwhile. The evidence of the coexisting influence of parity on serum levels of free beta-hCG, both in smokers and nonsmokers, should perhaps be a stimulus for reconsideration of which corrections the screening performance is dependent on.Relationship between nuchal translucency at 11-14 weeks and nuchal fold at 20-24 weeks of gestation.To examine the relationship between the measurement of nuchal translucency in the first trimester and nuchal fold in the second trimester in normal pregnancy.This was a prospective study of 592 singleton pregnancies. Fetal nuchal translucency was measured at 11-14 weeks of gestation and nuchal fold at 20-24 weeks of gestation. Linear regression models were used to assess the relationship between nuchal translucency and nuchal fold after adjustment for gestational age.There was no significant association between nuchal translucency and nuchal fold thickness.It is possible that measurement of nuchal translucency and nuchal fold may provide an independent contribution in screening for trisomy 21.Measurement of fetal nuchal translucency thickness by three-dimensional ultrasound.To investigate the feasibility and repeatability of nuchal translucency thickness measurement using three-dimensional ultrasound.Forty consecutive women with uncomplicated singleton pregnancies attending for Down syndrome screening at 11-14 weeks' gestation were included in this prospective crossover trial. Nuchal translucency thickness was measured using both two-dimensional and three-dimensional ultrasound. In each case two three-dimensional volumes were recorded and then examined by using the technique of planar reformatted sections. The initial plane of the first volume always contained a clear image of the nuchal region ('sagittal volume'), whilst the initial plane of the second volume was selected randomly regardless of fetal position ('random volume'). The repeatability of nuchal translucency measurement was examined by constructing a scatter diagram of the difference between the measurements plotted against the mean of two readings.Nuchal translucency measurements could be repeated in 38/40 (95%) sagittal volumes and 24/40 (60%) random volumes. The mean difference between two-dimensional measurements and those obtained by reslicing of sagittal three-dimensional volumes was -0.097 mm (95% limits of agreement from -0.481 to 0.675) and 0.225 mm (95% limits of agreement from -0.369 to 0.819) when random volumes were examined.Reslicing of stored three-dimensional volumes can be used to replicate nuchal translucency measurements only when nuchal skin can also be clearly seen on two-dimensional ultrasound.Total alpha-fetoprotein and Lens culinaris agglutinin-reactive alpha-fetoprotein in fetal chromosomal abnormalities.To examine the differences in multiples of the median (MoM) of total alpha-fetoprotein, and the proportion of Lens culinaris agglutinin reactive alpha-fetoprotein (% alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3) in the maternal serum and amniotic fluid of pregnant women whose fetuses were diagnosed with autosomal or sex chromosomal abnormalities.Prospective consecutive series.University hospital.Maternal sera and amniotic fluids from 46 pregnant women with trisomy 21 fetuses, 10 pregnant women with trisomy 18 fetuses, one pregnant woman with a trisomy 13 fetus, six pregnant women with fetal sex chromosomal abnormalities, and 100 pregnant women for whom the fetal karyotype was diagnosed as normal following a genetic amniocentesis.The proportion of alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3 in maternal serum for trisomy 21 (40.3%. P < 0.0001) and trisomy 18 (39.8%, P < 0.05) showed a significantly higher value compared with normal (32.6%). The proportion of alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3 in amniotic fluid was significantly higher (P < 0.0001) for trisomy 21 (46.6%) than for a normal karyotype (41.5%). Only for the trisomy 21 group was there a strong correlation in the % alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3 between maternal serum and amniotic fluid (r = 0.840, P < 0.0001). For all groups, there was no correlation between alpha-fetoprotein MoM and % alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3 in maternal serum and amniotic fluid.The proportion of alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3 in maternal serum is an appropriate choice for a trisomy 21 biochemical marker, and it is possible that combining alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3 analysis with assays of alpha-fetoprotein in maternal serum could further improve the sensitivity and specificity of multiple marker screening.Effect of fetal gender on first trimester markers and on Down syndrome screening.The purpose of the present study was to evaluate whether a gender-related difference exists in first trimester markers used for Down syndrome screening, namely nuchal translucency (NT), maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG), and whether this has an influence on screening performance.A total of 1325 patients with a singleton pregnancy underwent combined first trimester screening at 10-13 weeks' gestation. Maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG were analyzed by fluoroimmunoassay, nuchal translucency (NT) was measured by transvaginal sonography. Only patients with normal outcomes and known fetal gender were included in the study. Data were categorized by gestational age and by fetal gender.There were no significant gender-related differences in NT and PAPP-A levels. However, free beta-hCG was significantly higher (p=0.00004) in the presence of a female fetus than in the presence of a male fetus. Women with female fetuses had a higher median calculated Down syndrome risk (1:5490) compared to those having males (1:6451). This difference was not, however, statistically significant.First trimester free beta-hCG is significantly higher in pregnancies with a female fetus.First-trimester screening for Down's syndrome in in vitro fertilization pregnancies.Age related detection and false positive rates when screening for Down's syndrome in the first trimester using fetal nuchal translucency and maternal serum free betahCG and PAPP-A.To determine how first trimester detection rates for Down's Syndrome vary with maternal age and to calculate the predictive value of an increased risk report at various maternal ages.Mathematical modelling of first trimester screening performance using fetal nuchal translucency and maternal serum free betahCG and pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).From within the Gaussian distributions of each marker in normal pregnancies and those affected by Down's Syndrome a series of 15,000 marker multiple of the medians were obtained for each group. These markers were then used to calculate the risks of Down's Syndrome using maternal ages ranging from 15 to 49 and the background risk of Down's Syndrome at each age. Using a 1 in 300 risk cutoff (at time of sampling) the false positive rate and detection rate was assessed at each year of maternal age. The predictive value of a positive result was calculated using Baye's theorem.False positive rates and detection rates at each year of maternal age between 15 and 49; the predictive value of a positive result for each maternal age between 15 and 49.At 15 years of age the detection rate was 77% at a 1.9% false positive rate, 84% at a 4% false positive rate at age 30, rising to 100% at a 67% false positive rate at age 49. The probability of Down's Syndrome once identified with an increased risk was 1:34 at 15 years, 1:29 at 30 years and 1:6 at 49 years.As with second trimester biochemical screening, the detection rate and false positive rate vary considerably with age. However, detection rates across all ages are significantly higher than with second trimester screening. The risk of a positive screening result being a Down's pregnancy is considerably greater than with second trimester screening with an average probability of 1:29, compared with 1:55 in the second trimester. This information may be useful in counselling women with an increased risk result in first trimester screening.Pregnancy outcome and prognosis in fetuses with increased first-trimester nuchal translucency.One of the concerns of prenatal diagnosis is to find sensitive markers to screen for chromosome abnormalities, such as serum assays or nuchal translucency (NT). This study reports our experience with NT measurement during the first trimester of pregnancy.The study was performed prospectively on 252 fetuses with either NT > or =3 mm or cystic hygroma.We observed 50 abnormal karyotypes, i.e. 19.8%. The incidence of chromosome abnormalities increased with increasing maternal age and increasing NT thickness. For the 202 fetuses with normal karyotypes, outcome was unfavourable in 32 cases: 23 elective terminations of pregnancy, 8 spontaneous abortions and 1 neonatal death. Outcome was favourable in 141 cases. Twenty-nine pregnancies were lost to follow-up.Measurement of NT at 12 weeks' gestation seems to be a good marker for chromosome abnormalities. When the karyotype is normal, the pregnancy outcome remains correlated with the degree of NT thickness. The finding of NT >3 mm between 10 and 14 weeks' gestation dictates rigorous ultrasound monitoring and caution when predicting pregnancy outcome.Lens culinaris agglutinin-reactive alpha-fetoprotein, an alternative variant to alpha-fetoprotein in prenatal screening for Down's syndrome.Three serum tests, alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotrophin and unconjugated oestriol, are now widely used for screening for Down's syndrome. Lens culinaris agglutinin-reactive alpha-fetoprotein (AFP-L3) is a variant of alpha-fetoprotein with alpha1-->6 fucose appended to the reducing terminal N-acetylglucosamine. It is the most prominent AFP detected in the serum of patients with hepatocellular carcinoma.We investigated microheterogeneities of the carbohydrate chain on AFP in fetal liver tissues, amniotic fluids and maternal sera obtained from pregnancies with Down's syndrome using lectin affinity electrophoresis with four lectins. The percentages of AFP-L3 in maternal sera from 22 Down's syndrome and 227 unaffected pregnancies were determined.Unlike the case with AFP concentration, the percentage of AFP-L3 in maternal serum and amniotic fluid was similar, and apparently not influenced by membrane permeability. Knowing the percentage of AFP-L3 in maternal serum was effective for discriminating between Down's syndrome-affected pregnancies and unaffected pregnancies. The percentage of AFP-L3 in maternal serum identified 55% of Down's syndrome cases with a 5% false-positive rate.AFP-L3 should be an effective replacement for AFP in prenatal Down's syndrome screening.Correlations between first and second trimester markers for Down's syndrome screening.First-trimester maternal serum human thyroid-stimulating hormone in chromosomally normal and Down syndrome pregnancies.Maternal serum human thyroid-stimulating hormone (TSH) levels were investigated in chromosomally normal and Down syndrome pregnancies to determine whether TSH can be used as a marker for Down syndrome in the first trimester. Measurements were conducted on stored serum samples collected from 23 Down syndrome pregnancies and 115 unaffected pregnancies before chorionic villus sampling (CVS), between 9 and 11 completed weeks of pregnancy. The samples were matched for gestational age, maternal age, maternal weight and duration of storage of the serum sample. Maternal TSH concentration was slightly decreased in Down syndrome pregnancies, with a median of 0.84 multiples of the median (MoM). Maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) concentration was slightly elevated in Down syndrome pregnancies, with a median of 1.03 MoM. Both differences were not significant applying matched rank analysis (p=0.50 for TSH and p=0.43 for hCG). The association between TSH and hCG in unaffected pregnancies was also measured. The Spearman correlation coefficient between TSH and hCG was -0.21 which was statistically significant (p=0.02, 95% confidence interval -0.38 to -0.03). However, it was concluded that TSH is not a useful marker for distinguishing Down syndrome-affected pregnancies from normal pregnancies in the first trimester.First trimester maternal serum placenta growth factor (PIGF)concentrations in pregnancies with fetal trisomy 21 or trisomy 18.Placenta growth factor (PIGF), an angiogenic factor belonging to the vascular endothelial growth factor family, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) were measured in maternal serum from 45 pregnancies with trisomy 21, 45 with trisomy 18 and 493 normal controls at 10-13 completed weeks of gestation. In the normal pregnancies maternal serum PIGF levels increased exponentially with gestation. The median multiple of the median (MoM) PIGF concentration in the trisomy 21 group (1.26 MoM) was significantly higher (p<0.0001) than in the control group (1.00 MoM). In the trisomy 18 group the median PIGF was lower (0.889 MoM) but this did not quite reach significance (p=0.064). The corresponding median MoM values for PAPP-A were 1.00 MoM for the controls, 0.49 MoM for trisomy 21 and 0.16 MoM for trisomy 18. The median MoM values for free beta-hCG were 1.00 MoM for the controls, 2.05 MoM for trisomy 21 and 0.38 MoM for trisomy 18. In the control group there was a small but significant correlation of PIGF with free beta-hCG (r=+0.1024) and PAPP-A (r=+0.2288). In the trisomy 18 group there was a significant association between PIGF and free beta-hCG (r=+0.2629) but not with PAPP-A (r=+0.0038). In the trisomy 21 group there was a small but significant association with PAPP-A (r=+0.1028) but not with free beta-hCG (r=+0.0339). The separation of affected and unaffected pregnancies in maternal serum PIGF is small, and therefore it is unlikely that measurement of PIGF would improve screening for these abnormalities provided by the combination of fetal nuchal translucency and maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG.Screening for trisomy 21 in twin pregnancies in the first trimester: does chorionicity impact on maternal serum free beta-hCG or PAPP-A levels?In a study of 180 twin pregnancies I have examined the distribution of maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), in addition to fetal nuchal translucency thickness (NT), in twins classified as monochorionic or dichorionic, based on ultrasound appearance at 10-14 weeks of gestation. In 45 monochorionic and 135 dichorionic twin pregnancies the median MoM free beta-hCG was not significantly different (1.00 vs 1.01), whilst that for PAPP-A was lower (0.89 vs 1.01) but again with no statistical significance. Previous reports of an increased fetal NT in monochorionic twins pregnancies could not be confirmed (1.03 vs 1.00). It is concluded that the existing pseudo risk twin correction algorithm is appropriate for both monochorionic and dichorionic twins in providing accurate first trimester risks for trisomy 21.The effect of fetal gender on second-trimester maternal serum inhibin-A concentration.Second-trimester serum inhibin-A is increasingly used as a fourth marker in addition to the triple test to screen for Down syndrome. We investigated whether fetal gender had an effect on serum inhibin-A concentration. A retrospective analysis was done on 316 normal pregnancies and 48 Down syndrome pregnancies in which maternal serum inhibin-A assays were performed between 15 and 20 weeks of gestation and in which the fetal sex was known. The median inhibin-A MoM (95% CI) for normal pregnancies in the presence of a male fetus was 0.93 (range 0.88-1.03). This was significantly lower than that in the presence of a female fetus (median MoM=1.04). The gender difference was not observed in the Down syndrome pregnancies. The increased inhibin-A concentration would lead to a 2.3-fold higher false-positive rate in the presence of a female fetus (10.6% vs. 4.6%; p<0.05, Chi-square test). Because of the small number of cases studied, the results need to be substantiated by a larger series. If the gender effect is confirmed, adjustment for fetal sex may be necessary when inhibin-A is used as a screening marker.Maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome, open neural tube defects and trisomy 18.Maternal serum screening identifies women at an increased risk of a pregnancy with Down's syndrome or trisomy 18 or an open neural tube defect. The triple test, consisting of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol and human chorionic gonadotropin was carried out by a chemiluminescence immunoassay method in our laboratory. The study consisted of 373 pregnant women. The gestational range for the study group was 14-22 weeks. The mean maternal age for the study group was 28.53 +/- 5.46 years (range 17.4 to 43.5 years); 9.1% of the women were considered at high risk for Down's syndrome based on the test results. In our study the detection rate for Down's syndrome by prenatal karyotyping was 66.6%. Maternal serum screening allows reduction of the number of women requiring amniocentesis without a significant decrease in the detection rate.First trimester screening for Down syndrome and assisted reproduction: no basis for concern.In pregnancies obtained after assisted reproduction the false-positive rate of second trimester Down syndrome (DS) screening is increased by 1.5-3-fold. This may cause an increase in the number of amniocenteses and the fetal loss rate. The present study for the first time examined whether assisted reproductive technologies affect the results of first trimester screening. The markers PAPP-A, free beta-hCG and the nuchal translucency (NT) thickness were examined at 12-14 weeks' gestation. Screening markers in 47 in vitro fertilisation (IVF), 63 ovulation induction (OI) and 3026 spontaneously conceived singleton pregnancies were compared. The MoM (multiples of the median) value in the IVF pregnancies was 1.02 (95% CI: 0.85-1.22) for PAPP-A, 1.14 (95% CI: 0.95-1.37) for beta-hCG and 0.97 (95% CI: 0.89-1.05) for NT; the MoM value in the OI pregnancies was 0.89 (95% CI: 0.76-1.05) for PAPP-A, 1.08 (95% CI: 0.93-1.25) for beta-hCG and 1.02 (95% CI: 0.95-1.11) for NT. The first trimester marker values in assisted reproductive pregnancies and spontaneously conceived pregnancies were not significantly different. Estimated false-positive rates for a risk cut-off of 1:400 varied from 4.7% in IVF pregnancies to 5.1% in OI pregnancies. Therefore the false-positive rate in Down syndrome screening should be independent of the method of conception.Karyotypes found in the population declared at increased risk of Down syndrome following maternal serum screening.Of the 65 328 pregnancies of South Australian mothers screened by the South Australian Maternal Serum Antenatal Screening (SAMSAS) Programme between 1 January 1991 and 31 December 1997, 3431 (5.25%) were declared at increased risk of fetal Down syndrome. Fetal or neonatal karyotype was determined in 2737/3431 (79.8%) of these pregnancies, including 16 with early fetal loss. Interrogation of the database of the South Australian Neonatal Screening Service showed 643 live-born infants whose phenotype was not subsequently questioned among the 694 pregnancies whose karyotype was not determined. Of the remaining 51/3431 pregnancies, 19 ended in early fetal loss without karyotyping and no newborn screening or other records could be found for 32 cases. The 129 instances of abnormal karyotype found were Down syndrome (84), trisomy 18 (four), trisomy 13 (three), triploidy (two), female sex chromosome aneuploidy (six) and male sex chromosome aneuploidy (five), inherited balanced rearrangements (19), mosaic or de novo balanced abnormalities (four) and unbalanced karyotypes (two). In the pregnancies declared at increased risk of fetal Down syndrome, only the karyotype for Down syndrome occurred with a frequency greater than that expected for the general, pregnant population.Screening for Down syndrome using first-trimester ultrasound and second-trimester maternal serum markers in a low-risk population: a prospective longitudinal study.To compare nuchal translucency and second-trimester maternal serum measurements as alternative methods of antenatal screening for Down syndrome in a low-risk population and to evaluate the consequence of combining the results in the estimation of risk.In a consecutive series of 4130 women aged less than 38 years with a singleton pregnancy, we examined both the detection rate of Down syndrome by nuchal translucency measurement at 10-14 weeks and maternal serum screening by human chorionic gonadotrophin and alpha-fetoprotein at 14-18 weeks. Women with a nuchal translucency measurement of > or = 3 mm and women with a maternal serum screening-derived risk > or = 1/250 were recommended to have amniocentesis. A second-trimester detailed ultrasound scan was also performed in all women. The outcome of all pregnancies was recorded prospectively and the detection rate and false-positive rate of different screening strategies were retrospectively analyzed.Out of the 4130 pregnancies that were followed (mean maternal age, 30.1 years), 12 cases of Down syndrome were observed (0.28%), all detected prenatally. Seven of 12 cases had a nuchal translucency measurement of > or = 3 mm (58%), and six out of 10 cases with available maternal serum screening had a calculated risk of > or = 1/250 (60%). Four of the five Down syndrome cases with a nuchal translucency measurement of < 3 mm were detected by subsequent maternal serum screening. At a threshold giving 5% of positive tests, the sensitivity of nuchal translucency, maternal serum screening and combined risk screening were 75%, 60% and 90%, respectively.In screening for Down syndrome, an approach which combines the results from first-trimester nuchal translucency and second-trimester biochemistry is effective and increases the detection rate compared to the use of any single test. However, this strategy is likely to raise the false-positive rate and the interpretation of maternal serum screening-derived risk should be combined with the first-trimester nuchal translucency measurement.Three-dimensional ultrasound measurement of the placental volume in early pregnancy: method and correlation with biochemical placenta parameters.Placental size has been an interesting topic of research for many years. The main aim of this study was to investigate the feasibility of measuring the placental volume at the end of the first trimester using three-dimensional (3D) ultrasound and to correlate these volumes to known placental functional indices and to factors affecting the placenta. Women with singleton pregnancies at the end of the first trimester were included into this study. The volume data of the placentae were correlated to the crown-rump length (CRL), placenta-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A), free beta-human chroangiogonadotropin (f-beta-hCG) and other factors that may affect the placental size or function. A total of 1462 pregnancies could be evaluated. Comparison between CRL and placental volume proved a significant correlation (r=0.43, P< 0.001). Due to the observed proportional growth of CRL and placental volume, a quotient (placental volume/CRL) was calculated for each case. There were no differences between placenta/CRL-quotients in relation to gravidity, parity or smoking. Correlations could be established between the placental volume and PAPP-A and f-beta-hCG (PAPP-A: r=0.28, P< 0.001, f-beta-hCG: r=0.10, P< 0.001). The measurement of the placenta in the first trimester can be performed in a high percentage of cases. The placenta/CRL quotient represents a simple method to compare placentae from different gestational days. The correlation between placental volume and maternal serum screening parameters might provide a chance to refine first trimester Down's syndrome serum screening. Future studies will be needed to evaluate the possible clinical use of first trimester placental volume measurements.Maternal serum levels of dimeric inhibin A in pregnancies affected by trisomy 21 in the first trimester.Dimeric inhibin A was measured in maternal serum samples from 45 pregnancies affected by trisomy 21 and 493 samples from unaffected pregnancies at 10-14 weeks of gestation. Inhibin A levels in affected pregnancies were compared with levels of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in the same series. In the trisomy 21 group, the median multiple of the median (MoM) inhibin A was not significantly elevated (1.28 vs 1.00) with only 15.5% being above the 95th centile. In contrast, the median MoM free beta-hCG was significantly increased (2.05 vs 1.00) with 36% above the 95th centile and PAPP-A was significantly reduced (0.49 vs 1.00) with 42% below the 5th centile. Inhibin A levels in the trisomy 21 group were significantly correlated with gestational age such that median levels rose from 1.04 at 11 weeks to 1.30 at 12 weeks and 1.67 at 13 weeks. These findings suggest that first trimester biochemical screening for trisomy 21, which is currently optimised using maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A and fetal nuchal translucency, will not benefit from the inclusion of inhibin A.Evaluation of first trimester maternal serum and ultrasound screening for Down's syndrome in Eastern and Northern Finland.The current trend in prenatal diagnosis is that trisomy screening is being moved to the first trimester and ultrasonographic nuchal translucency measurement is included in risk calculation. It is likely that biochemical screening in the second trimester will gradually be given up. In Eastern and Northern Finland, during the year 1999 we offered first-trimester ultrasonographic and serum screening for trisomy 21, with measurements of maternal serum PAPP-A and beta-hCG. A total of 2515 pregnant women participated in the screening, yielding the detection of eight foetuses with Down's syndrome. Six affected foetuses (75%) were detected by means of first-trimester serum screening. Since we were in the phase of collecting data for the Finnish medians for PAPP-A and beta-hCG, the women were not given the estimates of risk for trisomy 21. Only 1602 of the 2515 enrolled women had the combination of first-trimester ultrasonographic and serum screening performed, and in that group there were five foetuses with Down's syndrome. The combination ultrasonographic and serum approach yielded a Down's syndrome detection rate of 80% (four out of five) with a 5% false positive rate, whereas in nuchal translucency based-screening the detection rate was 60%, with a 5% false positive rate.Combined measurement of fetal nuchal translucency, maternal serum free beta-hCG, and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A for first-trimester Down's syndrome screening.It has been proposed that first-trimester Down's syndrome screening has a higher detection rate compared to second-trimester biochemical screening. This study investigated the accuracy of Down's syndrome screening during gestational weeks 10 to 13 using the combination of fetal nuchal translucency (NT) measurement with maternal serum concentrations of free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).A total of 1,514 women with singleton pregnancies were enrolled in this study. Fetal NT was measured using the criteria published by the Fetal Medicine Foundation. Maternal serum concentrations of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were determined by microtiter-plate ELISA. Down's syndrome risk was calculated using multivariate Gaussian distribution and Alpha software.Seventeen (1.12%) of the 1514 screened pregnancies had a fetal NT of at least 3 mm, and 41.2% of these had a poor pregnancy outcome, including four fetal aneuploidies. The odds of a fetal aneuploidy when the NT was greater than 2.0 multiples of median (MoM) was 90, when serum PAPP-A concentration was less than 0.45 MoM, it was 8.6, and when serum free beta-hCG concentration was greater than 2.2 MoM, it was 4.7. Using a risk cut-off level of 1 in 400, nine of 10 fetal aneuploidies were identified with a 4.7% false-positive rate, including two with trisomy 21, one with trisomy 18, and three with Turner's syndrome.This study demonstrated that Down's syndrome screening using the combined test in the first trimester had a higher detection rate than that of serum screening in the second trimester. Implementation of NT measurement in the first trimester provides substantial advantages for Down's syndrome detection and early diagnosis of fetal structural abnormalities.First-trimester screening for trisomy 21 in singleton pregnancies achieved by assisted reproduction.The possible effect of assisted reproduction on first-trimester screening for trisomy 21 was examined by fetal nuchal translucency thickness (NT), maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (HCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).Parameters were measured at 11-14 weeks in 411 singleton pregnancies achieved by controlled ovarian stimulation, including 220 that had undergone IVF. Results were compared with 1233 singleton pregnancies conceived spontaneously.In the IVF pregnancies, the median fetal NT was not significantly different from that in controls, whilst the median free beta-HCG was significantly increased, and PAPP-A was significantly decreased. In the intracytoplasmic sperm injection group, fetal NT and free beta-HCG values were not significantly different from those in controls, but PAPP-A was significantly decreased. In those pregnancies achieved by ovarian stimulation, neither fetal NT, free beta-HCG nor PAPP-A were significantly different from the control group.In IVF pregnancies, screening for trisomy 21 by fetal NT, maternal serum free beta-HCG and PAPP-A levels may be associated with a 1.2% higher false-positive rate than in natural conception.Combined use of genetic sonography and maternal serum triple-marker screening: an effective method for increasing the detection of trisomy 21 in women younger than 35 years.The current standard of practice is to screen women younger than 35 years for trisomy 21 with maternal triple-marker screening, followed by amniocentesis in high-risk (1:10-1:190) patients. Non-high-risk patients are not offered further diagnostic testing. This study was conducted to determine whether genetic sonography of fetuses considered to be at moderate risk (1:190-1:1000) after maternal triple-marker screening increases the detection for trisomy 21, is cost-effective, and reduces the number of amniocenteses required to detect a single fetus with trisomy 21.After triple-marker screening, mathematical modeling was used to classify 500,000 theoretical fetuses as high, moderate, or low risk (>1:1001-1:10,000) for trisomy 21. The sensitivity for genetic sonography varied between 60% and 90%, and false-positive rates varied between 5% and 25%. Two programs (I and II) were compared with the control program. The control program included patients with high-risk fetuses (1:10-1:190) who had amniocentesis. Program I consisted of patients in the moderate-risk group (1:191-1:1000) who had genetic sonography followed by amniocentesis only when an abnormal sonographic finding was present. Program II used an approach in which genetic sonography was done for both high- and moderate-risk fetuses, and amniocentesis was performed only when an abnormal sonographic finding was present.When added to the control program, genetic sonography significantly increased the detection rate of Down syndrome (range, 68.1%-77.8% versus 49%), reduced the cost of detection, and resulted in a ratio of fetuses with Down syndrome detected to normal fetuses lost because of amniocentesis of greater than 1 (range, 2.1-4.2). Compared with the control program, program II significantly increased the detection of fetuses with trisomy 21 (range, 56%-72%) when the sensitivity of genetic sonography was >70%, reduced the cost of detection, and had ratios of trisomy 21 detection to normal fetuses lost because of amniocentesis of between 2.38 and 17.88.Women younger than 35 years and classified as having moderate risk after triple-marker screening could undergo genetic sonography under 1 of 2 approaches, either of which would result in an increased detection rate of trisomy 21 and be cost-effective without increasing the loss rate of normal fetuses after genetic amniocentesis.First-trimester Down's syndrome screening by fetal nuchal translucency measurement in Taiwan.Fetal nuchal translucency (NT) measurement is now widely used in many Western countries as a screening tool for Down's syndrome during the first trimester. However, at present there is no data on its use in Taiwan. The purpose of the present study was to evaluate the efficacy of NT measurement in first-trimester Down's syndrome screening in Taiwan.We conducted a prospective study from October 1997 to May 1999. Sonographic measurement of fetal NT was performed in 1,249 fetuses at 9-14 weeks of gestation. Transabdominal ultrasound scanning was performed to obtain a sagittal section of the fetus for measuring the crown-rump length (CRL) and the maximum thickness of the subcutaneous translucency between the skin and the soft tissue overlying the cervical spine. Two different cut-off points were used for screening: a fixed cut-off point of at least 2.5 mm and a CRL-related cut-off point. In the latter method, fetuses with an NT measurement in the 95th percentile were considered at high risk for Down's syndrome.Three fetuses had Down's syndrome, with NT measurements of 2.1 mm, 2.7 mm, and 4.0 mm. The false positive rates for the fixed cut-off point and CRL-related cut-off point were 6.3% and 4.6%, respectively. Both methods had a sensitivity of 66.7%. However, the screening program using the CRL-related cut-off point had two advantages: a higher specificity (95.5% vs 93.8%) and a more reasonable distribution pattern for screening.This study showed that NT measurement is a potential screening tool for Down's syndrome during the first trimester in Taiwan. Using CRL-related cut-off points for screening is more reasonable than using a fixed cut-off point.Clinical validation of a new dimeric inhibin-A assay suitable for second trimester Down's syndrome screening.To compare the Down's syndrome screening performance of a simplified dimeric inhibin-A assay (Diagnostic Systems Laboratories (DSL)) with an assay whose clinical utility has been established (Serotec).A case control set consisting of 51 Down's syndrome and 245 matched unaffected pregnancies collected as part of an earlier multicentre cohort study.Sera were assayed for dimeric inhibin-A using the DSL assay and Serotec reference assay. Data analysis included a method comparison of mass values, fit of data to a logarithmic Gausian distribution, and determination of detection and false positive rates. In addition, 234 fresh sera were assayed using the simplified method.The two assays showed a high correlation (r = 0.93) but average concentrations of the DSL assay were 48% higher. However, the differences were basically proportional over the range of values important for screening. The detection rate was essentially equivalent for the DSL assay whether analysed univariately or in combination with other markers (for example, 79% v 75% at a 5% false positive rate for the DSL and Serotec assays for the combination of alpha fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol, human chorionic gonadotrophin, and dimeric inhibin-A, respectively). The 234 dimeric inhibin-A values measured on fresh sera fitted a logarithm Gaussian distribution for the DSL assay, as indicated by the fit to a probability plot.The Down's syndrome screening performance of a simplified dimeric inhibin-A immunoassay was equivalent to a more labour intensive established dimeric inhibin-A assay.Does a 'notched' nuchal translucency indicate Down syndrome fetuses or other adverse pregnancy outcome?The aim of the present study was to assess the sonographic contour of the increased nuchal translucency (NT) and to correlate this with pregnancy outcome. Fifty sonographic images of fetuses with increased NT [> 95th centile thickness of the normal range for crown-rump length (CRL) between 38 and 84 mm] were retrospectively assessed. In all the cases a complete pregnancy and even infancy follow-up (< 36 months) was available. The NT appearances were subdivided into two forms: a 'notched' or 'uniform' appearance. The images were correlated with karyotype results [trisomy 21 (DS) vs euploid cases] and pregnancy outcome. Complicated outcomes were classified as being either DS fetuses, miscarriage or termination of pregnancy because of structural anomaly. Thus 30/35 (86%) of the euploid fetuses had a 'uniformly' increased NT, whereas 8/13 DS cases (62%) had a 'notched' appearance (Fisher's exact test, p = 0.004). Additionally, 27/29 fetuses (93%) which had an uneventful pregnancy outcome had a 'uniform' increased NT, whereas 12/26 (57%) of the fetuses which had adverse pregnancy outcome had a 'notched' appearance of their NT (Fisher's exact test, p < 0.001). Although it was not possible to correlate the sonographic data with post-evacuation microdissection findings, it is possible that a uniformly shaped, increased NT may be more representative of a developmental delay in a normal fetus. Conversely, a 'notched' nuchal surface may represent abnormal lymphatic or cardiovascular development more commonly seen in DS fetuses.Maternal serum levels of total activin-A in first-trimester trisomy 21 pregnancies.Maternal serum total activin-A concentration was measured in 45 pregnancies affected by trisomy 21 and 493 control unaffected pregnancies at 10-14 weeks of gestation. In the trisomy 21 pregnancies total activin-A concentration was significantly higher (1.36 MoM of the unaffected pregnancies) and in 16% of cases the level was above the 95th centile of normal. The log10 SD for the control group and the trisomy 21 group were 0.17 and 0.22, respectively. The median pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) in this trisomy 21 series was 0.49 and for free beta-hCG was 2.05. In the trisomy group there were significant positive associations between total activin-A and PAPP-A (0.6071) and free beta-hCG (0.4255). The low median difference and the high overlap in values between trisomic and unaffected pregnancies make total activin-A of little practical use in first-trimester screening for trisomy 21.Comparison of triple serum screening and pregnancy outcome in oocyte donation versus IVF pregnancies.The current study compared triple serum screening results and outcomes in 37 oocyte donation (OD) and 46 self oocyte IVF-conceived singletons of similarly aged women (28.8 +/- 4.4 years and 30.7 +/- 4.5 years respectively). Both groups were followed from their embryo transfer and throughout pregnancy. Although the daily pattern of first-trimester serum beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (HCG) was similar in both groups, higher mid-gestation HCG serum concentrations were found, i.e. 1.38 and 1.32 multiples of the median (median MoM) for IVF and OD respectively, in comparison with 0.99 median MoM from the same reference laboratory. Only the OD group had significantly increased alpha fetoprotein (AFP) concentrations (1.45 median MoM) (P = 0.002) compared with the reference laboratory. A total of 11% of the IVF and 13% of the OD women were found to be screen positive. In neither group were chromosomal abnormalities detected and no fetal or neonatal deaths were recorded. Seven (15%) of the OD and seven (19%) of the IVF women had an adverse obstetric outcome. Of those cases, six IVF and four OD women had serum HCG > or = 1.2 MoM and five OD women had AFP >1.2 MoM. Therefore, in those pregnancies the high serum HCG concentrations may alert for adverse obstetric outcome rather than indicating a high risk for Down's syndrome fetuses.Second-trimester ultrasound to detect fetuses with Down syndrome: a meta-analysis.Second-trimester prenatal ultrasound is widely used in an attempt to detect Down syndrome in fetuses, but the accuracy of this method is unknown.To determine the accuracy of second-trimester ultrasound in detecting Down syndrome in fetuses.English-language articles published between 1980 and February 1999 identified through MEDLINE and manual searches.Studies were included if they recorded second-trimester findings of ultrasonographic markers, chromosomal abnormalities, and clinical outcomes for a well-described sample of women. A total of 56 articles describing 1930 fetuses with Down syndrome and 130 365 unaffected fetuses were included.Articles were independently reviewed, selected, and abstracted by 2 reviewers. Discrepancies in data abstraction were resolved by consensus with a third reviewer. Overall estimates of sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative likelihood ratios were calculated for the following markers: choroid plexus cyst, thickened nuchal fold, echogenic intracardiac focus, echogenic bowel, renal pyelectasis, and humeral and femoral shortening. Results were stratified by whether markers were identified in isolation or in conjunction with fetal structural malformations.When ultrasonographic markers were observed without associated fetal structural malformations, sensitivity for each was low (range, 1%-16%), and most fetuses with such markers had normal outcomes. A thickened nuchal fold was the most accurate marker for discriminating between unaffected and affected fetuses and was associated with an approximately 17-fold increased risk of Down syndrome. If a thickened nuchal fold is used to screen for Down syndrome, 15 893 average-risk women or 6818 high-risk women would need to be screened for each case of Down syndrome identified. For each of the other 6 markers, when observed without associated structural malformations, the marker had marginal impact on the risk of Down syndrome. Because the markers were detected in only a small number of affected fetuses, the likelihood of Down syndrome did not decrease substantially after normal examination findings (none of the negative likelihood ratios were significant).A thickened nuchal fold in the second trimester may be useful in distinguishing unaffected fetuses from those with Down syndrome, but the overall sensitivity of this finding is too low for it to be a practical screening test for Down syndrome. When observed without associated structural malformations, the remaining ultrasonographic markers could not discriminate well between unaffected fetuses and those with Down syndrome. Using these markers as a basis for deciding to offer amniocentesis will result in more fetal losses than cases of Down syndrome detected, and will lead to a decrease in the prenatal detection of fetuses with Down syndrome.Repeat testing in antenatal screening for Down syndrome using dimeric inhibin-A in combination with other maternal serum markers.The effect on screening performance of collecting a second fresh blood sample in antenatal screening for Down syndrome has been previously reported for the commonly used double and triple tests. Recently, dimeric inhibin-A has been used with the triple test (together constituting the quadruple test) in several centres and here we assess the effect of repeat testing using inhibin-A. Routine repeat testing using the quadruple test did not yield a material increase in performance compared with having no repeat testing. For a 5% false-positive rate the increase in detection rate was only about 3-5 percentage points; a modest increase which is probably not worthwhile in the light of the extra cost and delay.Estimates for the sensitivity and false-positive rates for second trimester serum screening for Down syndrome and trisomy 18 with adjustment for cross-identification and double-positive results.Second trimester screening for fetal Down syndrome and trisomy 18 is available through separate protocols that combine the maternal age-specific risk and the analysis of maternal serum markers. We have determined the extent to which additional Down syndrome affected pregnancies may be identified through trisomy 18 screening, and the extent to which additional cases of trisomy 18 may be screen-positive for Down syndrome. The combined false-positive rate, taking into consideration those pregnancies that are screen-positive by both protocols, has also been determined. Sensitivity and false-positive rates were determined by computer simulation of results that incorporated previously published statistical variables into the model. Using second trimester risk cut-offs of 1:270 for Down syndrome and 1:100 for trisomy 18, it was found that few additional cases of Down syndrome are identified through trisomy 18 screening. However, approximately 6-10% of trisomy 18 affected pregnancies will be screen-positive for Down syndrome but screen-negative for trisomy 18. For women aged 40 or more, the false-positive rate for trisomy 18 exceeds 1% and approximately half of these cases will also be screen-positive for Down syndrome. For a population with maternal ages equivalent to that in the United States in 1998, after adjusting for the cross-identification, the sensitivity for three-analyte trisomy 18 screening is 78%. If this testing is performed in conjunction with Down syndrome "triple" screening, the Down syndrome sensitivity is 75% and the combined false-positive rate is 8.5%. If the three-analyte trisomy 18 screening is performed with the Down syndrome "quad" screen, the trisomy 18 sensitivity remains at 78%, the Down syndrome sensitivity is 79%, and combined false-positive rate is 7.5%. Sensitivity and false-positive rates are also provided for other widely used Down syndrome and trisomy 18 risk cut-offs. Sensitivity and false-positive rates that take into consideration cross-identification and double-positives should be helpful for pre-test counseling and the evaluation of serum screening programs.Alpha-fetoprotein microheterogeneity: a potential biochemical marker for Down's syndrome.Our purpose was to examine the utility of analyzing alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) microheterogeneity assessed by lectin affinity in Down's syndrome (DS) screening. Maternal sera and amniotic fluids were collected from 18 women who were carrying DS fetuses and 70 unaffected pregnancies around 16 weeks of gestation. The percentages of AFP which reacted with Lens culinaris agglutinin (AFP-L2,3) were determined by lectin affinity electrophoresis. AFP-L2,3 levels were significantly increased (P<0.0001) in both maternal serum and amniotic fluid from DS-affected versus unaffected pregnancies. The fractional areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves were 0.835 and 0.700 (P=0.106) for AFP-L3 and AFP MoM (multiples of the median) in maternal serum. No correlation was found between AFP-L3 and AFP MoM in maternal serum (r=0.006). Our data suggest that the measurement of AFP-L3 in maternal serum is a potential biochemical marker for DS.Triple marker screening for trisomy 21, trisomy 18 and open neural tube defects in singleton pregnancies of native Japanese pregnant women.To report the results of prenatal triple marker screening on a population of Japanese pregnant women.From April 1994 through March 1999, a total of 32,925 native Japanese women with singleton pregnancies requested a triple marker-screening test. Multiples of the median values for 3 markers and individual risks for each patient were calculated following adjustment for the Japanese weight correction factor. The risk cut-off values used for Down syndrome (T21), open spina bifida (OSB) and trisomy 18 (T18) were 1: 295, 1: 290, and 1: 100, respectively. Follow-up information was collected postpartum and statistically analyzed.Detection rates (DR) of T21 for women less than 35 years, over 35 years and overall were 58, 94, and 83%, respectively. DR of T18 for women less than 35 years, over 35 years and overall were 75, 79, and 79%, respectively. DR of open neural tube defects (ONTD) was 100%.The first cumulative data of an intervention program and prospective follow-up studies in Japan have proven to be similar to other published reports. Individual risk values were calculated for each pregnancy for T21, T18 and ONTD. This screening program is more effective than age-dependent screening for detecting T21, T18 and ONTD pregnancies.Detection of aneuploidy with fetal nuchal translucency and maternal serum markers in Japanese women.Extent of correlation between first and second trimester markers for Down's syndrome screening.The influence of parity and gravidity on first trimester markers of chromosomal abnormality.We have studied changes in first trimester fetal nuchal translucency (NT) and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A with gravidity and parity in 3252 singleton pregnancies unaffected by chromosomal abnormality or major pregnancy complications. We have shown that gravidity and parity is associated with a small but progressive decrease in fetal NT and a small but progressive increase in free beta-hCG and PAPP-A. None of these small changes with increasing gravidity or parity are statistically significant and hence correction for these variables is not necessary when considering first trimester screening for chromosomal abnormalities.Combined first trimester nuchal translucency and second trimester biochemical screening tests among normal pregnancies.We prospectively examined whether first trimester nuchal translucency (NT) and second trimester triple test (TT) results are correlated, and determined overlapping and mutual screen-positive rates. Results of NT, TT, amniocentesis and pregnancy outcome were obtained in 508 normal pregnancies. Inter-test correlation was performed by comparing the likelihood ratios (LR). Overlapping of screen-positive cases, of NT and TT, was determined by comparing mutual risks for Down syndrome (DS) livebirth of > or = 1:380. Combined screen-positive rates were evaluated by using summation risk (NT and/or TT exhibiting a risk > or = 1:380) and calculated risk (new risk > or / =1:380, based on multiplication of LR(NT) and LR(TT)). Screen-positive rates between NT and TT differed significantly and when either test showed an increased risk for DS, the probability of the other to predict the same was negligible (p<0.001). Overall screen-positive rates, at a risk > or = 1:380, were 2% and 5.7% for NT and TT, respectively. Summation and calculated combining methods were associated with 7.5% and 2.0% screen-positive rates, respectively. Amniocentesis was performed on 20.7% of the cases, mostly screen-negative ones. Our results showed that, in normal pregnancies, NT and TT do not correlate and that their combined calculated risk in normal pregnancies is associated with a low screen-positive rate of 2.0%.Fetuses with cystic hygroma. A retrospective study.The aim of this study is to analyse several theories of pathogenesis of cystic hygroma, its correlation with chromosomal abnormalities and the indicators of poor or good prognosis.Nuchal translucency in multiple pregnancies.To evaluate the prevalence of increased nuchal translucency (NT) in multiple pregnancies and its relation to fetal karyotype and pregnancy outcome.We measured fetal nuchal translucency (NT) in 6,338 women pregnant from 10+3 to 13+6 weeks by ultrasound and evaluated the prevalence of NT=95th centile in 115 multiple pregnancies, including 100 pairs of twins (70 dichorionic and 30 monochorionic placentas), 9 triplets, 5 quadruplets, and one quintuplet. Chorionicity, fetal karyotype, and pregnancy outcome were also evaluated in 400 singleton pregnancies.NT=95th centile in a single fetus was found in 10/70 cases of dichorionic twin pregnancies (14%), in two quadruplets, in 7/30 monochorionic twin pregnancies (23.3%), and in both fetuses in one dichorionic twin pregnancy. In the control group, NT=95th centile was found in 17/400 (4.2%) cases. In multiple pregnancies, two cases of trisomy 21 and one of 47, XXY were found. NT=95th centile was found in 2/2 fetuses with trisomy 21 (one dichorionic twin pregnancy and one tetrachorionic pregnancy), but not in the 47, XXY trisomy (trichorionic triplet pregnancy). A skeletal dysplasia and a Goldenhar syndrome were found among the 10 dichorionic pregnancies with increased NT. Three intrauterine deaths of both fetuses, one congenital heart disease, and a case of twin-to-twin transfusion occurred in 7 monochorionic pregnancies with increased NT.Increased NT in multiple pregnancies indicates fetuses at risk of chromosomal abnormalities and fetal malformation, and monochorionic twin pregnancies at higher risk of adverse outcome.The influence of fetal sex in screening for trisomy 21 by fetal nuchal translucency, maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 10-14 weeks of gestation.In a study of 2923 normal pregnancies and 203 pregnancies affected by trisomy 21 we have shown a significant difference in the median MoM of the markers: fetal nuchal translucency, maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in the presence of a female fetus compared with a male fetus. For maternal serum free beta-hCG levels are higher by 15% if the fetus is chromosomally normal and by 11% if the fetus has trisomy 21. For maternal serum PAPP-A the levels in chromosomally normal fetuses are 10% higher in the presence of a female fetus and 13% higher if the fetus has trisomy 21. In contrast, fetal nuchal translucency is 3-4% lower in both chromosomally normal and trisomy 21 female fetuses. The consequence of such changes when screening for trisomy 21 will be a reduction in the detection rate in female fetuses by a factor of 1-2%. Correction of risk algorithms for fetal sex, however, is probably not feasible, since ultrasound detection of fetal sex is only 70-90% accurate in the 10-14 week period.Second-trimester prenatal screening for Down syndrome and the relationship of maternal serum biochemical markers to pregnancy complications with adverse outcome.In a group of 26 524 control pregnancies and a group of 3728 pregnancies affected by one or more of the pregnancy complications of low birthweight, intra-uterine growth restriction (IUGR), preterm delivery and stillbirth, I have compared the relative risk of occurrence of these complications in pregnancies which had a raised maternal serum AFP (>2.0 MoM), raised maternal serum free beta-hCG (>2.0 MoM), low AFP (<0.5 MoM), low free beta-hCG (<0.5 MoM), combined raised AFP and free beta-hCG (>2.0 MoM), and in those with an increased Down syndrome risk (1 in 250 or greater). In the low birthweight group, only an increased AFP and decreased free beta-hCG showed significance with relative risks of 1.6 and 2.1. In the IUGR group, also only an increased AFP and decreased free beta-hCG showed significance with relative risks of 1.6 and 2.3. In the preterm delivery group, raised AFP, reduced free beta-hCG, and combined elevated AFP and free beta-hCG showed significance with relative risks of 3.8, 1.8 and 6.2. In the stillbirth group, raised AFP, reduced free beta-hCG, and combined elevated AFP and free beta-hCG showed significance with relative risks of 4.5, 2,4 and 7.2. An isolated raised free beta-hCG or an increased Down syndrome risk were not associated with an increased relative risk for any of the pregnancy complications investigated. However, apart from the six to seven-fold increased risk when both AFP and free beta-hCG are above 2.0 MoM, suggesting increased risk of preterm delivery or impending fetal death, the clinical utility of such significant differences is probably poor.The influence of fetal sex in screening for Down syndrome in the second trimester using AFP and free beta-hCG.In a study of 30 802 unaffected pregnancies and 90 cases of Down syndrome I have analysed second trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) and grouped the data by fetal sex. In pregnancies with an unaffected female fetus maternal serum AFP was significantly lower (3%) than in the presence of a male fetus, whilst free beta-hCG was significantly raised (7%) in the presence of a female fetus. These differences led to a significantly higher false positive rate in women carrying a female fetus (5.78% versus 4.64%). In pregnancies affected by Down syndrome the median AFP in the presence of a female fetus was not significantly different to that with a male fetus (0. 72 versus 0.73); similarly for free beta-hCG the difference (2.37 versus 2.48) was not statistically significant. Although the detection rate amongst male fetuses was slightly higher than in females (74% versus 66%), this was not statistically significant. Although fetal gender does appear to have a significant effect on maternal serum marker levels, leading to a higher false positive rate in females, in cases of Down syndrome there is no evidence that such marker differences are significant and consequently little evidence for any fetal gender bias in detection rates.Dimeric inhibin A as a fourth marker for Down's syndrome maternal serum screening in native Japanese women.This study was conducted to assess the usefulness of dimeric inhibin A as a fourth marker for Down's syndrome screening in addition to AFP, hCG and uE3 markers for native Japanese women.Serum specimens from 367 native Japanese women in the second trimester were assayed for dimeric inhibin A levels. Day specific dimeric inhibin A medians were established for gestational ages 15.0-21.9. Weekly median values for the native Japanese were compared with those of a U.S. population. Selected Japanese specimens from 15 diagnosed Down's syndrome and 3 trisomy 18 cases were also assayed for dimeric inhibin A.Dimeric inhibin A levels did not vary greatly over the gestational age range as expected. Median value comparison showed that native Japanese dimeric inhibin A medians are higher than the U.S. population medians by an average of 7.95%. Native Japanese dimeric inhibin A median values in this study are 1.77 times higher in Down's syndrome cases than in unaffected pregnancies. Trisomy 18 dimeric inhibin A levels show no significant difference from the unaffected pregnancies.This report shows for the first time that dimeric inhibin A can be informative as a fourth marker for Down's syndrome screening in native Japanese women. We expect the addition of dimeric inhibin A to a triple marker protocol will increase the accuracy of predicted risk for all pregnancies screened and increase the detection rate of Down's syndrome affected pregnancies.First-trimester Down syndrome screening using dried blood biochemistry and nuchal translucency.To assess the effectiveness of free beta-hCG, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A, and nuchal translucency in a prospective first-trimester prenatal screening study for Down syndrome and trisomy 18.Risks were calculated for Down syndrome and trisomy 18 based on maternal age and biochemistry only (n = 10,251), nuchal translucency only (n = 5809), and the combination of nuchal translucency and biochemistry (n = 5809).The study population included 50 Down syndrome and 20 trisomy 18 cases. Nuchal translucency measurement was done on 33 Down syndrome and 13 trisomy 18 cases. Down syndrome screening using combined biochemistry and ultrasound resulted in a false-positive rate of 4.5% (95% confidence interval [CI] 3.9%, 5.2%) and detection rate of 87.5% (95% CI 47%, 100%) in patients under age 35 years. In older patients, the false-positive rate was 14.3% (95% CI 12.7%, 15. 8%) and detection rate was 92% (95% CI 74%, 99%). For trisomy 18 screening, the false-positive rate was 0.4% (95% CI 0.24%, 0.69%) and detection rate was 100% (95% CI 40%, 100%) in younger patients, whereas in older patients the false-positive rate was 1.4% (95% CI 0. 9%, 2.0%) and detection rate was 100% (95% CI 66%, 100%). Using modeling, at a fixed 5% false-positive rate, the Down syndrome detection rate was 91%. Conversely, at a fixed 70% Down syndrome detection rate, the false-positive rate was 1.4%.First-trimester screening for Down syndrome and trisomy 18 is effective and offers substantial benefits to clinicians and patients.The influence of ethnic origin on first trimester biochemical markers of chromosomal abnormalities.In a first trimester study of 5422 Caucasian women, 752 Afro-Caribbean women and 170 Asian women we have shown that the median maternal serum marker MoMs for free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were 19% and 48% higher in Afro-Caribbean women and 19% higher and 35% higher in Asian women, compared to Caucasian women. Correcting for maternal weight made very little difference to the effect in Afro-Caribbeans (21% and 57% higher after weight correction) but reduced the effect in Asians (4% and 17% higher after weight correction ). It is estimated that correcting for maternal weight and ethnicity overall would increase the detection rate by a modest 1.4%. However, the effect on an individual's risk could result in as much as a two-fold increase in the patient specific risk for trisomy 21. The impact of ethnic origin seems to be greater than that observed with second trimester biochemical markers and larger studies are required in order to develop robust algorithms for correcting for ethnic origin in the first trimester.Acceptability of serum screening as an alternative to cytogenetic diagnosis of down syndrome among women 35 years or older in Hong Kong.The addition of second trimester serum markers to maternal age increases the efficacy of screening for Down syndrome by maternal age alone. Among women aged 35 years or older, serum screening makes a large proportion of amniocentesis unnecessary. However, there are ethical and medicolegal concerns about serum screening in 'old' women, largely because some of the pregnancies affected by Down syndrome and other chromosomal abnormalities may not be detected. We investigated the acceptability of serum screening in women aged 35 years or older when it was offered as an alternative to prenatal cytogenetic diagnosis after detailed counselling. Women referred for prenatal diagnosis of Down syndrome because of advanced maternal age were given the options of cytogenetic diagnosis by chorionic villus sampling (CVS) or amniocentesis. As an alternative, they could choose to undergo second trimester serum human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) screening first before deciding on whether to undergo amniocentesis. Between January 1997 and October 1999, 3419 subjects were recruited. 1807 women (52. 9%) chose to undergo serum screening, 1516 women (44.3%) chose to have amniocentesis and 96 women chose to have CVS (2.8%). The proportion of women who chose serum screening rose steadily from 38. 8% in the year of 1997 to 63.4% in 1999. Significantly fewer Chinese women chose serum screening than non-Chinese. The decision as to whether to undergo an invasive diagnostic procedure or to be content with the relatively safer but less accurate screening test varies, being affected by the women's background and culture.Maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in fetal sex chromosome defects in the first trimester.We have studied maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A, and fetal nuchal translucency (NT) in a series of 46 cases of fetal Turner's syndrome, 13 cases of other sex chromosomal anomalies and compared these with 947 control pregnancies in the first trimester. In cases of Turner's syndrome (45,X) the median fetal NT was significantly higher than in controls (4.76 MoM), the median PAPP-A was significantly lower (0.49 MoM), whilst the free beta-hCG was not significantly different (1.11 MoM). For NT, 93% (43/46) of cases were equal to or greater than the 95th centile of controls, for PAPP-A 35% (16/46) of cases were less than or equal to the 5th centile of controls and for free beta-hCG 15% (7/46) of cases were equal to or greater than the 95th centile of controls. For other sex chromosomal anomalies (47XXX, XXY, XYY) the median NT was increased (2.07 MoM) whilst PAPP-A was not significantly decreased (0.88 MoM) and free beta-hCG was not significantly different (1.07 MoM) from controls. Using a previously derived multivariate risk algorithm for trisomy 21, incorporating NT, PAPP-A, free beta-hCG and maternal age, 96% of the Turner's cases and 62% of the other sex chromosomal anomalies would have been identified.Is maternal serum total hCG a marker of trisomy 21 in the first trimester of pregnancy?In a study of 130 first trimester cases of trisomy 21 and 959 controls we have shown that the median MoM for alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) is lower (0.82) and that for total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) is higher (1.31) than in the control group. For AFP 15.3% of cases were below the 5th centile and for total hCG 19. 8% were above the 95th centile. The median shift observed for AFP and total hCG is poorer than that for pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) or free beta-hCG and together with maternal age, AFP and total hCG could only be expected to detect 40% of cases. In combination with PAPP-A, total hCG would identify 52% of cases, somewhat less than the 67% observed with free beta-hCG and PAPP-A. However, we have demonstrated for total hCG a significant temporal change in median MoM with gestational age. Before 70 days the median MoM was less than 0.5, between 70 and 83 days this increased to 1.13, and between 84 and 97 days this increased to 1.52. This median shift has significant implications for interpreting previous studies and even more significant implications for detection rates. When population parameters specific to the gestational age in question are used, detection rates with total hCG and PAPP-A increase from 47% at 70-83 days to 60% at 84-97 days. This observation explains much of the confusion around total hCG in the first trimester and shows the importance of selecting analyte pairs and population parameters appropriate to the time in gestation when screening is performed.[Significance of nuchal edema in fetuses of pregnant women under 35 years of age].The aim of this study was to survey the connection between the fetal nuchal oedema and the increased risk of the aneuploidies. According to the prenatal care the thickness of the nuchal fold was measured on the 11-12th gestational week by 6.5 MHz transvaginal transducer (ATL-HDI and Hitachi EUB-450). Cases were underlined where the presence of nuchal oedema (> or = 3 mm) made the indication for chromosomal analysis among the 280 single pregnancies and fetal karyotyping was carried out. Nuchal oedema was observed in 72/280 cases of pregnant women under 35 years old and in 20/280 cases of that above 35 years old, the nuchal oedema was another indication beside the age. Abnormal karyotype was observed in 9/72 (12.5%) cases among the pregnant women under 35 years old and in 10/92 (10.87%) cases among the pregnancies with fetal nuchal oedema. It was also observed abnormal karyotype in 6/188 (3.19%) cases of pregnancies without nuchal oedema and in 16/280 (5.71%) cases of chromosomal analyses with or without nuchal oedema. This can be an effective method for screening the fetal aneuploidies and other fetal anomalies, both in the high risk and the normal pregnant population, especially in cases of pregnant women under 35 years old belonging to the normal genetical risk population.Maternal midtrimester serum AFP and free beta-hCG levels in in vitro fertilization twin pregnancies.We aimed to compare the levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) levels as multiples of the median (MoM) values between spontaneous and in vitro fertilized (IVF) twin pregnancies. The control group of spontaneous singleton pregnancies was used for calculating the gestational age specific median levels of the values. Within a cohort of 19 310 pregnancies, 145 twin pregnancies were identified. The data were collected from Down syndrome (DS) screening programmes in four University catchment areas in Finland between 1994-98. Maternal midtrimester serum marker levels were measured across gestational weeks 14-18. There were no fetal chromosome anomalies in either of the twin groups or the singleton group. Serum AFP of 145 and beta-hCG values of 39 spontaneous twin pregnancies were compared to the values of 6548 singleton pregnancies. In IVF twins 30 AFP and 29 beta-hCG values were compared to the levels of the control group. Both AFP and beta-hCG values were twice as high in the spontaneous twin pregnancies (medians 2.18 and 1.83 MoM respectively) as in the singleton group (medians 1.00 and 1.00 MoM respectively). In IVF twin pregnancies beta-hCG levels were higher (median 2.20 MoM) than in spontaneous twins (p=0.08), whereas no significant difference was found in AFP levels (2.30 MoM). In conclusion, the higher levels of beta-hCG levels in IVF twin pregnancies should be considered in DS screening to avoid high false positive rates.Six year survey of screening for Down's syndrome by maternal age and mid-trimester ultrasound scans.To assess the effectiveness of antenatal screening for Down's syndrome by maternal age and routine mid-pregnancy ultrasound scanning.Retrospective six year survey.Maternity units of a district general hospital.Pregnant women booked for delivery in hospital between 1 January 1993 and 31 December 1998.All cases of Down's syndrome occurring in district identified from regional congenital anomaly register and cytogenetic laboratory records. Women's case notes were examined to identify indication for karyotyping, gestation at diagnosis, and outcome of pregnancy.31 259 deliveries occurred during study period, and 57 cases of Down's syndrome were identified, four in failed pregnancies and 53 in ongoing pregnancies or in neonates. The analysis was confined to ongoing pregnancies or liveborn children. Invasive antenatal tests were performed in 6.6% (2053/31 259), and 68% (95% confidence interval 56% to 80%) of cases of Down's syndrome were detected antenatally, giving a positive predictive value of 1.8%. There were 17 undetected cases, and in seven of these the women had declined an offer of invasive testing. In women aged less than 35 years the detection rate was 53% (30% to 76%). Most of the cases detected in younger women followed identification of ultrasound anomalies.The overall detection rate was considerably higher than assumed in demonstration projects for serum screening. As a result, the benefits of serum screening are much less than supposed. Before any new methods to identify Down's syndrome are introduced, such as nuchal translucency or first trimester serum screening, the techniques should be tested in properly controlled trials.Screening for trisomy 21 in twin pregnancies in the first trimester using free beta-hCG and PAPP-A, combined with fetal nuchal translucency thickness.In the first trimester of pregnancy the biochemical markers free beta-hCG and pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) are used for the prenatal screening of trisomy 21, either alone or in combination with nuchal translucency (NT) thickness. In this study, I have analysed the distribution of these biochemical markers in 159 twin pregnancies and compared this with 3466 singleton pregnancies. On average free beta-hCG values are 2.099 times greater in twins than in singletons and PAPP-A some 1.86 times greater. The width of the analyte distribution in twins is very similar to that in singleton pregnancies. Using statistical modelling techniques I have predicted that at a 5% false positive rate the detection rate in twins discordant for trisomy 21 will be 52% and in twins concordant for trisomy 21 will be 55%, if correction for twin pregnancy is carried out using the 'pseudo risk' approach. The detection rate using biochemical parameters is less than that achievable for twins using NT (75%). However, the combination of NT and maternal serum biochemistry will give detection rates approaching 80%. These rates are some 10% less than in singleton pregnancies, but nevertheless combining NT and biochemistry will allow high rates of detection of affected twins with the benefit of ultrasound and NT being able to specifically locate the affected twin. Twin screening using both modalities should be considered when introducing first trimester screening.[Measurement of pregnancy-associated plasma protein A in maternal peripheral blood and Down syndrome].Integrated screening for Down's syndrome.Serum markers for Down's syndrome in women who have had in vitro fertilisation: implications for antenatal screening.To examine the Down's syndrome screening positive rate among in vitro fertilisation (IVF) pregnancies, we measured second trimester serum marker levels in singleton IVF pregnancies (cases) and in five non-IVF pregnancies (controls) matched to each case for gestational age, age of mother, and duration of storage of the serum sample. There were 151 IVF pregnancies in which alpha fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol (uE3), free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and total hCG were measured, 104 IVF pregnancies in which free alpha-hCG was measured, and 39 IVF pregnancies in which inhibin A was measured. Median uE3 levels were 6% lower (P = 0.003), median free beta-hCG 9% higher (P = 0.024), and median total hCG 14% higher (P = 0.026) in IVF pregnancies compared with controls. The screen positive rate in the IVF pregnancies (28%) was about twice as high as that in controls (17%). High hCG levels may be explained by progesterone remaining high in IVF pregnancies. The low uE3 levels remain unexplained. In Down's syndrome screening in IVF pregnancies hCG and uE3 values should be adjusted to avoid the high screen positive rate.Second trimester prenatal screening for Down's syndrome using alpha-fetoprotein and free beta hCG: a seven year review.To determine the value and impact over a seven year period of a second trimester screening programme for trisomy 21 and trisomy 18, using the two maternal serum markers alpha-fetoprotein and free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin.Retrospective review.A biochemical screening laboratory serving three health districts with three antenatal clinics in both teaching and nonteaching hospitals.67,904 pregnancies in women of all ages screened between 14 and 22 weeks of gestation between 1 April 1991 and 31 March 1998.All women booked into three major antenatal clinics were offered biochemical screening. Women at increased risk of trisomy 21 or trisomy 18 (> or =1 in 250 at term) were offered an invasive diagnostic procedure. Follow up of the outcome of all pregnancies was performed.Detection rate for trisomy 21 and trisomy 18, false positive rates, uptake of screening, uptake of amniocentesis in women identified at increased risk, prevalence of trisomy 21 at birth, detection and false positive rates by maternal age, fetal loss rate after amniocentesis, report turn around time, and identification of other anomalies.Overall, 87% (67,904/78,501) of women underwent screening. The rate of detection of trisomy 21 was 75% (80/107; 95% CI 66 to 83) with a 5.1% false positive rate (3466/67,904; CI 4.9 to 5.3%). In women under 30 years of age the detection rate was 60% (18/30; CI 41 to 77) with a 2.6% false positive rate (956/36,371; CI 2.5 to 2.8). The rate of detection of trisomy 18 was 57% (8/14; CI 29 to 82) with a 0.7% false positive rate (475/67,904; CI 0.64 to 0.76). Uptake of amniocentesis was 83% (2912/3508). Women were 3.3 times more likely to refuse amniocentesis if the risk was close to the cutoff (1 in 250) than if the risk was > or =1 in 50. Fetal loss within 28 days of amniocentesis was 0.9% (25/2912). Prenatal screening identified 84 other anomalies in addition to 41 cases of impending fetal death.Second trimester prenatal screening for trisomy 21 and trisomy 18 using a simple two marker approach incorporating free beta hCG can achieve high detection rates over a long period of time. Health authorities who still have not introduced trisomy 21 screening should be encouraged by what can be achieved and should consider making such screening available to all women. Established second trimester detection rates of 75% for a 5% false positive rate will be the benchmark by which first trimester screening using nuchal translucency, PAPP-A and free beta hCG will be judged.Maternal serum s100b protein is ineffective for Down syndrome screening.The influence of smoking on maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta hCG levels in the first trimester of pregnancy.In an analysis of 3111 singleton pregnancies routinely screened in the first trimester with nuchal translucency, free beta hCG and pregnancy associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) smoking has been found to occur in 20.8 per cent of pregnant women. When the individual marker levels were assessed in smokers and non-smokers, levels of PAPP-A were reduced in smokers by some 15 per cent. Despite free beta hCG levels being reduced by 10-14 per cent in the second trimester of smoking women, in the first trimester period this is not evident. Simulation studies would suggest that in smokers the detection of trisomy 21 using free beta hCG, PAPP-A and maternal age will be reduced by some 5 to 6 per cent compared with that of the general population.Maternal serum superoxide dismutase (SOD): a possible marker for screening Down syndrome affected pregnancies.Superoxide dismutase (SOD: EC1.15.1.1) has been shown to increase in Down syndrome (DS) subjects and in amniotic fluid from DS affected pregnancies. In order to verify a possible increase of maternal serum SOD in DS affected pregnancies and its possible contribution in prenatal screening, the serum enzyme activity was retrospectively measured in samples from normal and DS affected pregnancies. Alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), unconjugated oestriol (uE3) and serum SOD were measured in serum samples collected from 80 normal and 9 DS affected second-trimester pregnancies. The maternal serum SOD activity in the DS group (3. 12+/-0.73 U/ml) was significantly higher (p<0.001) than in the control one (2.20+/-0.7 U/ml). The addition of SOD appeared to be capable of improving the sensitivity of the conventional multi-parametric test (AFP, uE3 and hCG) even if the small number of subjects did not allow the achievement of statistical significance.Elevated second-trimester maternal serum hCG in patients undergoing haemodialysis.Prenatal Down syndrome screening with maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) has become common. High levels of maternal serum hCG and low levels of AFP have been associated with an increased risk of fetal Down syndrome. In this paper, we report five pregnancies in patients undergoing long-term haemodialysis, all of whom had false-positive second-trimester Down syndrome screening results. All of our five patients had extremely high levels of maternal serum hCG, but normal AFP values for their gestational age, and all had serious complications during pregnancy.The proform of eosinophil major basic protein: a new maternal serum marker for Down syndrome.The proform of eosinophil major basic protein (proMBP), the most abundant protein in the eosinophil specific granule, is synthesized by the placenta and secreted into the maternal circulation, where it is found complex-bound to pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and other proteins. We examined the potential of proMBP as a maternal serum marker for fetal Down syndrome (DS) by determining its maternal serum concentration (MSpMBP) in 25 Down syndrome (DS) pregnancies and 152 control pregnancies in the first trimester, and in 105 DS pregnancies and 156 control pregnancies in the second trimester. The median (95 per cent confidence interval) MSpMBP MoM in DS pregnancies (n=15) was 0.66 (0.49-0.79) in gestational weeks 5-9; 1.06 (0.71-1.97) in weeks 10-12 (n=10) and 1.62 (1.18-1.98) in weeks 14-20 (n=105). Using parameterized receiver operator characteristics analysis for proMBP as a single marker for DS, detection rates (DRs) of 22 per cent and 38 per cent, for false-positive rates (FPRs) of 5 per cent, were found in weeks 5-9 (using MSpMBP</=cut-off) and weeks 14-20 (using MSpMBP>/=cut-off), respectively. When age and MSpMBP were used as markers in combination, a DR of 36.8 per cent for an FPR of 5.5 per cent was obtained in weeks 5-9 using a risk cut-off of 1:250. In weeks 14-20 the DR was 48.4 per cent for an FPR of 5.3 per cent using the same risk cut-off. This makes proMBP a marker comparable in diagnostic efficiency to human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and exceeding that of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and unconjugated oestriol (uE3), in the second trimester.Increased first trimester nuchal translucency: pregnancy and infant outcomes after routine screening for Down's syndrome in an unselected antenatal population.Although increased nuchal translucency (NT) has been linked to a wide range of fetal chromosomal abnormalities and genetic syndromes, very few studies have looked at the outcomes of chromosomally normal pregnancies in unselected obstetric populations. This study aims to evaluate the outcomes of pregnancies with nuchal translucency measurements greater than or equal to 4 mm in a low risk obstetric population attending for routine first trimester screening. Women attending for booking scans were routinely offered nuchal translucency measurement as a screening test for Down's syndrome between 10 and 14 weeks gestation. The prevalence of increased nuchal translucency was 0.8% (n = 53). There were 15 (28.3%) chromosomal abnormalities, the commonest of which was Down's syndrome. Of the 38 chromosomally normal pregnancies, seven resulted in intrauterine death, early neonatal death or termination of pregnancy. The remaining 31 cases resulted in livebirths, of which two infants now exhibit developmental delay of unknown aetiology and one has been diagnosed as having Noonan's syndrome. 10 (19%) pregnancies were diagnosed as having major anatomical malformations resulting in fetal or neonatal demise or requiring postnatal surgery. In a routine obstetric population, the finding of an NT measurement greater than or equal to 4 mm is associated with a poor pregnancy outcome in the majority of cases, mainly owing to chromosomal abnormality. This study establishes the need for focused fetal assessment in cases with such first trimester findings.Maternal urine alpha-fetoprotein concentrations between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation.The aim of this study was to ascertain the normal range of the midtrimester maternal urine alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) concentrations in Taiwanese pregnancies.AFP was measured in the urine samples, obtained before genetic amniocentesis, from 268 women with normal singleton pregnancies between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation. Week-specific median values for urine AFP/creatinine (Cr) were calculated by weighted linear regression after log transformation and the data were converted to units in the multiple of the median (MoM). The gestational age in all cases was determined by ultrasound parameters.The levels of urine AFP and AFP/Cr increased gradually with advancing gestational age. The AFP/Cr MoM values of singleton pregnancies after log transformation showed a normal distribution with a mean (standard deviation) of 0.0071 (0.3228). The median, 10th and 90th centiles of AFP/Cr were 0.98, 0.43 and 3.61 MoM, respectively. Of the pregnant Taiwanese women studied, 4.9% (13/268) and 16% (43/268) had urine AFP/Cr MoM levels less than 0.31 MoM and 0.5 MoM respectively.The establishment of a reference range which allows for gestational differences in AFP/Cr levels is essential for further antenatal testing.The value of sonography in early pregnancy for the detection of fetal abnormalities in an unselected population.To determine the value of early pregnancy sonography in detecting fetal abnormalities in an unselected obstetric population. DESIGN Prospective cross-sectional study. All women initially underwent transabdominal sonography and when the anatomical survey was considered to be incomplete, transvaginal sonography was also performed (20.1%). Nuchal translucency was measured and karyotyping was performed as appropriate.University Department of Obstetrics and Gynaecology.6634 sequential unselected women (mean maternal age 29.9 years, range 13-50; mean gestational age 12+4 weeks, range 11+0-14+6), carrying 6443 live fetuses participated in this study.Detection rate of fetal anomalies and the associated cost per case detected in early pregnancy.The incidence of anomalous fetuses was 1.4% (92/6443) including 43 chromosomal abnormalities. The detection rate for structural abnormalities was 59.0% (37/63, 95% CI 46.5-72.4) and the specificity was 99.9% in early pregnancy. When the first and second trimester scans were combined, the detection for structural abnormalities was 81.0% (51/63, 95% CI 67.7-89.2). Seventy-eight percent (31/40) of chromosomal abnormalities (excluding three cases of XXY) were diagnosed at 11-14 weeks, either because of a nuchal translucency greater than or equal to the 99th centile for gestational age (43%; 17/40, 95% CI 27.4-60.4), or due to the presence of structural abnormalities (35%; 14/40, 95% CI 21.2-52.8). Sixty-five percent (15/23) of cases of trisomy 21 were also diagnosed either because of having a nuchal translucency greater than or equal to the 99th centile (57.0%; 13/23) or due to the presence of a structural abnormality (9.0%; 2/23). Overall, the detection rate of structurally abnormal fetuses was 59% (37/63) in early pregnancy and 81% in combination with the second trimester scan. The cost per abnormality diagnosed in early pregnancy is estimated to be pound sterling 6258 per structurally abnormal fetus, pound sterling 7470 per chromosomal abnormality and pound sterling 4453 per anomalous fetus.The majority of fetal structural and chromosomal abnormalities can be detected by sonographic screening at 11-14 weeks, but the second trimester scan should not be abandoned.Integrated screening for Down's syndrome based on tests performed during the first and second trimesters.Both first-trimester screening and second-trimester screening for Down's syndrome are effective means of selecting women for chorionic-villus sampling or amniocentesis, but there is uncertainty about which screening method should be used in practice. We propose a new screening method in which measurements obtained during both trimesters are integrated to provide a single estimate of a woman's risk of having a pregnancy affected by Down's syndrome.We used data from published studies of various screening methods employed during the first and second trimesters. The first-trimester screening consisted of measurement of serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A in 77 pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome and 383 unaffected pregnancies and measurements of nuchal translucency obtained by ultrasonography in 326 affected and 95,476 unaffected pregnancies. The second-trimester tests were various combinations of measurements of serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, human chorionic gonadotropin, and inhibin A in 77 affected and 385 unaffected pregnancies.When we used a risk of 1 in 120 or greater as the cutoff to define a positive result on the integrated screening test, the rate of detection of Down's syndrome was 85 percent, with a false positive rate of 0.9 percent. To achieve the same rate of detection, current screening tests would have higher false positive rates (5 to 22 percent). If the integrated test were to replace the triple test (measurements of serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, and human chorionic gonadotropin), currently used with a 5 percent false positive rate, for screening during the second trimester, the detection rate would be higher 85 percent vs. 69 percent), with a reduction of four fifths in the number of invasive diagnostic procedures and consequent losses of normal fetuses.The integrated test detects more cases of Down's syndrome with a much lower false positive rate than the best currently available test.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotrophin in pregnancies conceived after intracytoplasmic sperm injection and conventional in-vitro fertilization.Data in the Caucasian population suggest that maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and unconjugated oestriol concentrations are reduced and human chorionic gonadotrophin (HCG) concentrations are elevated in pregnancies conceived after in-vitro fertilization (IVF), leading to a higher than expected Down's syndrome screen-positive rate. There are no previous reports on the serum marker values in pregnancies conceived after intracytoplasmic injection (ICSI). Between 1996 and 1998, we measured maternal serum total HCG and AFP concentrations between 15 and 20 weeks gestation in 42 in-vitro fertilization (IVF) pregnancies and 23 ICSI pregnancies with known normal outcome. The results were compared with that of 2799 naturally occurring singleton pregnancies who were known to have a normal outcome. Median AFP multiple of the median (MOM) in ICSI pregnancies was significantly reduced to 0.76 compared with both that of the controls and that of the IVF pregnancies. For the IVF pregnancies, median HCG MOM was elevated to 1.15, and median AFP MOM was reduced to 0.88 compared with the controls, but these differences were not statistically significant. In both the IVF and ICSI pregnancies the changes might result in a falsely high Down's syndrome risk. In particular, the reduced AFP concentration in ICSI pregnancies was substantial. If this preliminary finding is substantiated by other series, the appropriate adjustment needs to be made to allow for valid interpretation of the screen result and to avoid an unnecessarily high false positive rate.A six year study of the antenatal detection of fetal abnormality in six Scottish health boards.To assess the sensitivity of prenatal diagnosis by ultrasound and biochemical methods, to evaluate the reasons for non-detection and to make appropriate recommendations.Six year observational study, during which biochemical screening for trisomy 21 was introduced and there was an increase in routine ultrasound scanning at 18-22 weeks.Six health boards in Scotland.264,481 pregnancies, of which 862 were terminated because of fetal abnormality, and 2123 delivered with prenatally detectable major fetal abnormalities.The prenatal detection of trisomies 13, 18 and 21, and 12 major structural abnormalities, which the average ultrasonographer with average skills using average equipment would be expected to detect.Serum biochemical screening improved detection of trisomy 21 from 33% to 57%. The detection rate for the major abnormalities was 62% (815/1320) and 73% (598/818) when the trisomies were excluded. 18-22 weeks scanning yielded a 92% detection rate. Of the 505 undetected cases, 15% declined prenatal screening, 46% were unscreened because they were ineligible for testing, unbooked, booked too late or scanned too early for a diagnosis to be made, 2% had findings suspicious of a chromosomal abnormality but testing was not undertaken and 37% had a negative scan at a gestation when the abnormality was potentially detectable.A policy of first trimester scanning followed by serum alpha-fetoprotein screening and additional scanning as clinically indicated is effective in detecting major structural abnormalities, but scanning at 18-22 weeks and serum biochemical screening for trisomy 21 improved the detection rates. Supervised training and adequate equipment are essential. Present prenatal diagnostic tests will not detect all abnormalities and patients must be made aware of this.Second trimester maternal serum beta human chorionic gonadotrophin and pregnancy outcome.The aim of this prospective, controlled study was to examine the relation between second trimester maternal serum beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (HCG) and birthweight. The study population consisted of 192 women with maternal serum betaHCG > or = 3.5 multiple of the median and a control group with the same number of women with maternal serum betaHCG < or = 2.0 multiple of the median. There was no difference in birthweight and other pregnancy outcomes between the two groups. When used prospectively, elevated betaHCG in the mid-trimester is not a predictor for intrauterine growth restriction or other pregnancy complications.Maternal serum prostate-specific antigen and Down syndrome in the first and second trimesters of pregnancy. International Prenatal Screening Research Group.It has been suggested that high levels of maternal serum prostate-specific (PSA) may be associated with fetal Down syndrome. We retrieved stored blood samples from 102 singleton Down syndrome pregnancies at 8-14 weeks' gestation and 99 at 15-22 weeks' gestation, together with samples from five unaffected singleton control pregnancies matched for gestational age. PSA was measured using an ultrasensitive assay. Contrary to earlier reports, PSA levels were similar in affected and unaffected pregnancies in both the first and second trimester of pregnancy; 1.1 and 0.9 multiple of the normal median, respectively, in affected pregnancies. There was no indication that PSA would be a useful screening marker.Urine free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin levels between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation in Taiwanese pregnancies.The purpose of this study was to determine the reference range of maternal urine free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta -hCG) concentrations between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation.We measured the concentrations of urine free beta -hCG from 268 healthy singleton Taiwanese pregnancies between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation. Results were corrected for creatinine (Cr) concentration and converted to the multiple of the median (MOM) level for the appropriate gestation. Gestational ages of all cases were determined using ultrasound dating.The median levels of urine free beta -hCG and free beta-hCG/Cr had a downward trend in association with the increasing gestation age. The median, 5th, 10th, 90th and 95th centiles of free beta- hCG/Cr MOM values were 1.02, 0.20, 0.25, 2.32 and 3.38 MOM, respectively. Urine free beta- hCG/Cr MOM values showed a log Gaussian distribution with the mean and standard deviation (SD) distribution of -0.0657 and 0.3792, respectively.To allow for differences in free beta -hCG/Cr median values at various ages of gestation, establishment of the reference range is essential for further development of maternal urine screening for Down syndrome.SP1 in pregnancies with Down syndrome in the first trimester of pregnancy. International Prenatal Screening Research Group.We conducted a study to determine the value of serum pregnancy-specific beta-1-glycoprotein (Schwangerschafts protein 1, SP1) as an antenatal screening test for Down syndrome in the first trimester. Serum samples collected from women at 8 to 14 weeks of pregnancy, immediately prior to having a chorionic villus sampling procedure on account of advanced maternal age, were retrieved from 96 women with Down syndrome pregnancies (cases) and from 480 women with unaffected pregnancies (controls). Cases and controls were ascertained at 21 obstetric centres in nine countries. Each case was matched with five controls for maternal age (same five-year age groups), duration of storage of the serum sample (same calendar year) and gestational age (usually the same week of pregnancy). The levels of SP1 were lower in pregnancies associated with Down syndrome: the median level was 0.86 multiples of the median level in the controls (95 per cent confidence interval 0.76 to 0.97). This difference, though statistically significant, was not large enough for SP1 to be a useful marker in screening, at least from 10 weeks onwards where most of our data lie.Maternal serum activin A and follistatin levels in pregnancies with Down syndrome.Inhibin A is now an established second-trimester maternal serum marker of Down syndrome. Since activin A has a common beta-subunit to inhibin A we evaluated this substance and its binding protein, follistatin, as potential markers. We studied 30 affected and 199 unaffected pregnancies at 13-16 weeks' gestation. There was a statistically significant increase in activin A level among the cases with 8 (27 per cent) exceeding the 90th centile in the controls, and 6 (20 per cent) above the 95th centile. However, the extent of overlap was too great to be of value in screening. There was a small decrease in follistatin levels among cases but it did not reach statistical significance.Appropriate biochemical parameters in first-trimester screening for Down syndrome.Meta-analysis was used to calculate maternal serum marker distribution parameters for Down syndrome risk estimation in the first trimester. Data from 44 series were combined: relating to pregnancy associated plasma protein (PAPP)-A in 18, free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) in 17, alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) in 26 and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) in 9. All levels were expressed in multiples of the normal median (MOM) for gestational age. Individual PAPP-A levels were available for 439 first and second-trimester Down syndrome pregnancies. The median MOM value increased with gestation: 0.35 at 6-8 weeks (31 cases), 0.40 at 9-11 weeks (197), 0.62 at 12-14 weeks (113) and 0.94 thereafter (98). A cubic regression equation was fitted so it could be estimated for each week of gestation. For the other markers the median value in Down syndrome was estimated from the weighted mean across all first-trimester series: 1.98 MOM for free beta-hCG in 579 cases; 0.79 MOM for AFP in 243 and 0.74 MOM for uE3 in 226. Variance-covariance matrices were calculated directly in unaffected pregnancies and from the difference between affected and unaffected pregnancies in Down syndrome. Based on these parameters we estimate that screening at 9-11 weeks with PAPP-A and free beta-hCG will yield a 64.6 per cent detection rate for a 5 per cent false-positive rate. Adding a third marker will increase detection to 66.6 per cent for AFP and 68.6 per cent for uE3; using all four markers it increases to 70.1 per cent. Routine ultrasound nuchal translucency measurement in addition to serum testing will increase the rates to 86.4 per cent, 87.2 per cent, 87.9 per cent and 88.3 per cent, respectively.Maternal serum screening for Down syndrome in the first trimester: experience from Belarus.We have carried out a large retrospective study of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), free-beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein (PAPP-A) in the first trimester of pregnancy. Unlike other studies all women had routine ultrasound dating, carried out during a nuchal translucency measurement project. A total of 13,477 serum samples were tested for AFP and 11,659 for free beta-hCG. A subset of 1564 samples from unaffected pregnancies were also tested for PAPP-A on a case-control basis. All three markers were also determined in 31 samples from pregnancies with Down syndrome. Equations were derived to express results in multiples of the median using both gestational age and crown rump length and to adjust for maternal weight. Statistical modelling with Gaussian distribution parameters obtained in the study were used to predict the detection rate for a 5 per cent false-positive rate. The predicted rates were: 73.7 per cent for all three markers; 69.1 per cent for PAPP-A and free beta-hCG; 47.4 per cent for PAPP-A and AFP; 57.6 per cent for free beta-hCG and AFP. As these rates are similar to those in the second trimester, health planners may now want to consider a change in policy from second-trimester to first-trimester screening with biochemical markers.Predictive value of the triple screening test for the phenotype of Down syndrome.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE3) are routinely measured in the second trimester ("triple" test) and combined with maternal age to evaluate risk for fetal Down syndrome. Triple test results and clinical findings were retrospectively reviewed for 30 newborns with Down syndrome to determine whether analyte values or second trimester risks for Down syndrome were more extreme in affected pregnancies where cardiac or other severe congenital malformations were present compared to those cases where major anatomical abnormalities were absent. Mean MS-AFP, uE3, maternal age, and second trimester Down syndrome risk were all similar in the two groups of pregnancies. However, hCG concentrations did appear to be higher in the group of Down syndrome pregnancies with anatomical anomalies (mean 1.74 MoM versus 1.19 MoM) (P<0.05). Overall, there was no significant difference in the incidence of major anomalies in patients with screen-positive test results versus those cases that were not identified by the triple test. Prenatal counseling should therefore reflect the general expectations of the Down syndrome phenotype that have been established from live-born infants with this disorder.MULTISCAN--a Scandinavian multicenter second trimester obstetric ultrasound and serum screening study.To study the detection rates of second trimester ultrasound screening for neural tube defects (NTD), abdominal wall defects (AWD) and Down's syndrome (DS) in low risk populations at tertiary centers, and to compare the ultrasound screening detection rates with those that were obtainable by biochemical serum screening (double test: alpha-fetoprotein/human chorion gonadotrophin/age test).Prospective multicenter study with a three year inclusion period: 1/1/1989-31/12/1991.27,844 low-risk women at 18-34 years of age who had a second trimester ultrasound screening examination. Of these, 10,264 also had a serum test.An ultrasound malformation scan and a serum test were carried out at 17-19 weeks of gestation. Risk calculations regarding DS were based on alpha-fetoprotein, human chorion gonadotrophin and maternal age; performed retrospectively for the first two years.In total 73 cases were identified in the study population: NTD (n=34), AWD (n=7) and DS (n=32). The detection rates, (%, with 95% confidence interval) for ultrasound screening were: NTD: 79.4 (62.1-91.3); AWD: 85.7 (42.1-99.6); DS: 6.3 (0.8-20.8). In the subgroup of women who had both tests, the detection rates for ultrasound screening vs double test were: NTD: 62.5 (24.5-91.5) vs 75.0 (34.9-96.8); AWD: 66.7 (9.4-99.2) vs 100 (29.2-100.0); DS: 7.7 (0.2-36.0) vs 46.2 (19.2-74.9). The false positive rates (%) for ultrasound screening vs double test were: NTD: 0.01/3.3; AWD: 0.01/3.3; DS: 0.1/4.0.Second trimester ultrasound screening in a low risk population gave a low detection rate for fetal DS (6.3%) and an acceptable detection rate for NTD (79.4%) and AWD (85.7%). In the subgroup of women who had both tests, serum screening performed better than ultrasound as applied in the present study, especially regarding DS.Accuracy of Down's syndrome risks produced in a prenatal screening program.Down's syndrome screening in the second trimester using a variety of combinations of maternal serum markers has become an established part of antenatal care over the past decade. The methodology of calculating Down's syndrome risk using statistical models based on the Gaussian distribution functions of the various markers used is often considered daunting, and many screening centres rely on specific screening computer software to undertake the relevant calculations. Such software is often a closed system which does not allow the user to check or change any of the parameters within the model. It is clear from a recent UK NEQAS survey of Down's syndrome screening laboratories (Spencer, Ellis, Seth, 1997, unpublished data) that many centres are unsure what method of calculating risk and what population parameters are used in their software, and how appropriate these are for the population being screened. This confusion has led to uncertainty over the reliability of the risk estimates produced in Down's syndrome screening programs.Second-trimester maternal serum inhibin-A screening for fetal Down syndrome in Asian women.Case control studies in the Caucasian population showed that maternal serum inhibin-A is elevated in Down syndrome pregnancies and may be a useful second-trimester marker in addition to human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP). Data in the Asian population are lacking. We measured inhibin-A levels in the stored maternal sera of 49 Down syndrome pregnancies and 341 controls with a commercially available assay and expressed them as the multiples of the median of the gestational week. The log means and standard deviations for case and control inhibin-A MOMs were 0.209, 0.226, and 0.002 and 0.177, respectively. Median inhibin-A MOM in Down syndrome cases was elevated to 1.62 (95 per cent confidence interval, 1.29-1.82). 36 per cent of Down syndrome cases were expected to be detected at a 5 per cent false-positive rate. However, inhibin-A MOMs were strongly correlated with hCG MOMs in the cases (r=0.73, p<0.001) and the controls (r=0.56, p<0.001). This will diminish the value of adding inhibin-A to the existing hCG and AFP screening protocol.Early pregnancy screening for fetal aneuploidy with serum markers and nuchal translucency.We determined the aneuploidy detection rate achievable by early pregnancy screening with pregnancy associated plasma protein (PAPP)-A, free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and ultrasound nuchal translucency (NT) measurement. Women having prenatal diagnosis were scanned, and a blood sample was taken and stored. Stored samples were tested and a total of 37 were found to have Down syndrome, 8 to have Edwards syndrome and 255 were controls. Results were expressed in multiples of the gestation-specific median (MOM) value in the controls after regression and, for the serum markers, maternal weight adjustment. In Down syndrome the medians were for PAPP-A 0.63 MOM (95 per cent confidence interval (CI) 0.45-0.87); free beta-hCG 1.88 MOM (1.33-2.66); and NT 2.34 MOM (1.70-3.22). Using these parameters the expected detection rate for a 5 per cent false-positive rate for different marker combinations were: 55.3 per cent for PAPP-A and free beta-hCG; 68.4 per cent for NT alone; and 84.6 per cent for PAPP-A, free beta-hCG and NT. The median values for Edwards syndrome were: 0.17 MOM for PAPP-A; 0.18 MOM for free beta-hCG; and 2.64 MOM for NT. Early pregnancy screening with the combined measurement of maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG and fetal nuchal translucency could achieve a high Down syndrome detection rate.A screening program for trisomy 21 at 10-14 weeks using fetal nuchal translucency, maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A.To examine the potential impact of combining maternal age with fetal nuchal translucency thickness and maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) in screening for trisomy 21 at 10-14 weeks of gestation.Maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were measured by Kryptor, a random access immunoassay analyzer using time-resolved amplified cryptate emission, in 210 singleton pregnancies with trisomy 21 and 946 chromosomally normal controls, matched for maternal age, gestation and sample storage time. In all cases the fetal crown-rump length and nuchal translucency thickness had been measured by ultrasonography at 10-14 weeks of gestation and maternal blood had been obtained at the time of the scan. The distributions (in multiples of the median; MoM) of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A (corrected for maternal weight) and fetal nuchal translucency (NT) were determined in the trisomy 21 group and the controls. Likelihood ratios for the various marker combinations were calculated and these were used together with the age-related risk for trisomy 21 in the first trimester to calculate the expected detection rate of affected pregnancies, at a fixed false-positive rate, in a population with the maternal age distribution of pregnancies in England and Wales.In a population with the maternal age distribution of pregnancies in England and Wales, it was estimated that, using the combination of maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency thickness and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A, the detection of trisomy 21 pregnancies would be 89% at a fixed false-positive rate of 5%. Alternatively, at a fixed detection rate of 70%, the false-positive rate would be 1%. The inclusion of biochemical parameters added an additional 16% to the detection rate obtained using NT and maternal age alone.Rapid diagnostic technology like Kryptor, which can provide automated reproducible biochemical measurements within 30 min of obtaining a blood sample, will allow the development of interdisciplinary one-stop clinics for early fetal assessment. Such clinics will be able to deliver improved screening sensitivity, rapidly and more efficiently, leading to reduced patient anxiety and stress.First-trimester nuchal translucency and maternal serum biochemical screening for Down's syndrome: a happy union?First-trimester screening for Down syndrome using nuchal translucency measurement with free beta-hCG and PAPP-A between 10 and 13 weeks of pregnancy--the combined test.In a population of 1467 women attending the 'G. Gaslini' Institute for antenatal care, we evaluated first-trimester risk screening for Down syndrome using the 'combined test' based on ultrasound measurement of nuchal translucency (NT), maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and free beta-hCG, and maternal age. No clinical action was taken on these results. The gestational age, determined by scan measurement of crown rump length, ranged from 10 weeks to 13 weeks 6 days. The median maternal age was 31 years 8 months. There were 13 Down syndrome pregnancies. The risk of having an affected pregnancy was estimated from a multivariate Gaussian distribution, using commercially available software. With a risk cut-off of 1 in 350, 11 affected pregnancies were detected (detection rate 85 per cent, 95 per cent confidence interval: 56-100 per cent) with a 3.3 per cent false-positive rate. The odds of being affected given a positive result were 1 in 30. Further data are needed to determine, with greater statistical reliability, the relative performance of the combined test with current second-trimester screening.Risk of abnormal triple screen for Down syndrome is significantly higher in patients with female fetuses.Previous studies have shown that mid-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels are significantly higher and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) levels significantly lower in women with male compared with female fetuses. We have evaluated whether triple-screen criteria are more likely to identify women with female fetuses as at risk for Down syndrome. From the Georgetown University genetics database we obtained the absolute values and corresponding multiples of the median (MoM) for AFP, hCG and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) in singleton gestations for the period database November 1992 July 1996. A Down syndrome risk of 1/270 or greater at mid-trimester was considered as high risk. A total of 977 patients with triple screen and outcome information were identified, including 502 female and 475 male fetuses. Patients with female fetuses were significantly more likely to have lower serum AFP (p=0.003) and a positive triple screen for Down syndrome (72 (14 per cent) versus 45 (9 per cent), p<0.02) than those with male fetuses. The gestational age at triple screen, maternal serum hCG and uE3, race and diabetes were not significantly different between the two groups. Since Down syndrome is less common in female than male fetuses, and the rates of female and male Down syndrome fetuses detected by triple screen and subsequent amniocentesis are not significantly different, the excess of positive mid-trimester maternal serum triple screen in women with female fetuses is likely due to false-positive results.Maternal serum S100 protein in normal and Down syndrome pregnancies.Protein S100 is a low molecular weight (10-12 kD) calcium-binding protein the beta subunit of which is coded for at the 22.2-22.3 region of the long arm of chromosome 21. This region has also been shown to be responsible for the phenotypic expression of Down syndrome. Previous studies demonstrated increased immunoreactivity to protein S100 in brain tissue from adults with Down syndrome. We have previously observed a higher concentration of S100 protein in the fetal blood of trisomy 21 fetuses compared with normal subjects. The aim of this study was therefore to investigate the use of measuring S100 protein concentration in maternal blood for Down syndrome screening. Maternal blood was taken at the time of chorionic villus sampling or cordocentesis (11-38 weeks' gestation) for fetal karyotyping. Protein S100 was measured by a two-site immunoradiometric assay (S-100 IRMA, Sangtec). There was no significant difference in the concentration of maternal S100 protein between normal and trisomy 21 pregnancies (p<0.10). Moreover, there was no significant association between maternal serum S100 protein concentration and gestational age (r(s)=0.27, p=0.07), maternal age (r(s)=-0.17, p=0.7) or maternal weight (r(s)=-0.013, p=0.9). This study shows that measurement of maternal serum S100 protein concentration does not appear to have a value in Down syndrome screening.Clinical follow-up of high mid-trimester maternal serum intact human chorionic gonadotrophin concentrations in singleton pregnancies.Mid-trimester biochemical screening of 38 143 pregnancies in south-east Scotland revealed 127 cases (0.34 per cent) in which the maternal serum (MS) intact human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) concentration was > or = 4 multiples of the median in singleton pregnancies (MOM). Three were lost to follow-up but in 72 (58 per cent) complications developed or there were associated fetal abnormalities. This percentage was greatest at very high hCG concentrations, 92 per cent with hCG > or = 10 MOM (n = 12) compared with 48 per cent with hCG concentrations of 4-4.99 MOM (n=69). 22 cases had an MS alpha-fetoprotein > or = 2 MOM in addition to an MS hCG > or = 4 MOM, and in only 3 of these was the pregnancy uneventful; 86 per cent were associated with abnormalities or pregnancy complications.Maternal age- and gestation-specific risk for trisomy 21.To provide estimates of maternal age- and gestational age-related risks for trisomy 21.The prevalence of trisomy 21 was examined in 57,614 women who had fetal karyotyping at 9-16 weeks of gestation for the sole indication of maternal age of 35 years or more. On the basis of the maternal age distribution and the reported maternal age-related risk for trisomy 21 at birth, the expected number of trisomy 21 cases was calculated for each gestational age subgroup (9-10 weeks, 11-14 weeks and 15-16 weeks). The ratio of the observed to expected number of cases of trisomy 21 was then calculated and regression analysis was applied to derive a smoothened curve. The formula for maternal age- and gestational age-related risk was then applied to a population of 96,127 pregnancies that were examined at 10-14 weeks to calculate the expected number of trisomy 21 pregnancies, and this number was compared to the observed number of 326.In the 57,614 pregnancies there were 538 cases of trisomy 21. The relative prevalences of trisomy 21, compared to a prevalence of 1.0 at 40 weeks, was 10 exp(0.2718 x log(10)(gestation)2 - 1.023 x log10(gestation) + 0.9425). On the basis of the estimated maternal age- and gestational age-related risks, the expected number of trisomy 21 cases at 10-14 weeks of gestation in the 96,127 pregnancies was 329 (95% confidence interval 291-361), which was not significantly different from the observed number of 326 cases (chi2 = 0.02).The risk for trisomy 21 increases with maternal age and decreases with gestation. The prevalence of trisomy 21 at 12 and 16 weeks of gestation is higher than the prevalence at 40 weeks by 30% and 21%, respectively.Efficiency of ultrasound and biochemical markers for Down's syndrome risk screening. A prospective study.To evaluate the sequential combination of ultrasound screening for fetal aneuploidy at 11-14 weeks with maternal biochemistry at 12-14 and 15-18 weeks of gestation.A prospective study including 1,656 women, with a singleton pregnancy booked before 13 weeks of gestation. Nuchal translucency (NT) thickness was measured by transabdominal ultrasound examination. alpha-Fetoprotein, free betahCG and hCG were measured by immunoradiometric (12-14 weeks) or immunometric (15-18 weeks) assays. Derived risks were then calculated. Cutoff risks were chosen first arbitrarily at 1/250 and then adjusted for a 5% false-positive rate.Seven fetal aneuploidies were diagnosed, including 5 Down's syndromes, 1 trisomy 18 and 1 triploidy. Three Down's syndromes had concordant high risk with the 3 screenings. One was at low risk with NT, and another was at low risk by maternal serum screening, but sequential combination of screenings led to a 100% detection rate with cutoffs of 1/240, 1/160 and 1/250 for NT, first- and second-trimester biochemistry, respectively (i.e. for a cutoff adjusted for a 5% false-positive rate).This preliminary study suggests a benefit in combining maternal age-related risk together with NT and biochemical markers in the first or the second trimester. The algorithm combining these risks needs to be established in a wide population.Nuchal thickness, urine beta-core fragment level, and maternal age for down syndrome screening.Our purpose was to report the midtrimester Down syndrome screening efficiency of a 2-analyte algorithm, urine beta-core fragment (a metabolite of human chorionic gonadotropin) and nuchal thickness, along with maternal age in a high-risk population undergoing genetic amniocentesis.Nuchal thickness, humerus length, and maternal urine beta-core fragment levels were measured prospectively before genetic amniocentesis in 1360 singleton pregnancies, 21 (1.5%) of which had fetal Down syndrome. All analyte levels were expressed as multiples of the normal medians based on biparietal diameter. Backward-stepwise logistic regression was used to determine whether the markers were significant independent predictors of fetal Down syndrome. Matrix analysis was used to calculate an adjusted Down syndrome likelihood ratio for each patient based on the significant screening markers. Multiplication by age-related midtrimester risk gave the adjusted Down syndrome risk. The sensitivity and false-positive rates at different Down syndrome screening thresholds were used to generate a receiver-operator characteristics curve. The area under the curve was used to assess the value of this screening test.On the basis of logistic regression, beta-core fragment level (P 1/60 the sensitivity and false-positive rate for Down syndrome were 85.7% and 4.9%, respectively, when beta-core fragment level, nuchal thickness, and maternal age were used. Correspondence screening values at a risk threshold > 1/150 were 95.2% and 10.8%, respectively. The area under the receiver-operator characteristics curve was 0.9357 (SE = 0. 0137), indicating that the algorithm is excellent for Down syndrome screening.In this study, a combination algorithm consisting of nuchal thickness, urine beta-core fragment level, and maternal age had a high screening efficiency for Down syndrome. This algorithm should be investigated as a new option for women at high risk of having a fetus with Down syndrome.Midtrimester maternal serum screening after multifetal pregnancy reduction in pregnancies conceived by in vitro fertilization.Data about the effect of multifetal pregnancy reduction on midtrimester maternal serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE3) are scarce and contradictory. Differing gestational ages at fetal reduction, transvaginal versus transabdominal needle insertion, and injection of different feticidal agents compound the analysis of published data.We examined clinical and laboratory data about 27 high-order gestations that were reduced to twins in the first trimester. Fetal reductions were performed transabdominally at 11.41 +/- 1.15 weeks' gestation by fetal intrathoracic injection of KCl, and maternal blood sampling was performed at 16.48 +/- 1.05 weeks. "Pseudo-risks" for singleton pregnancies were calculated by correcting serum analyte levels for twins.Twenty-four (88.9%) of 27 patients had maternal serum AFP levels above 2.0 MoM (mean, 4.60 +/- 3.48 MoM; range, 1.49-14.85 MoM), however, none of the newborns had structural anomalies. AFP serum levels did not correlate with the number of reduced fetuses or with adverse obstetric outcome. The mean hCG levels were 1.22 +/- 0.49 MoM (range, 0.14-2.47), and the mean uE3 levels were 1.15 +/- 0.31 MoM (range, 0.56-1.84). Based on maternal age alone, seven patients (25.9%) would have been offered amniocentesis for a term Down syndrome risk greater than 1:384, whereas combined risk calculations with hCG and uE3 levels resulted in 1 (3.7%) screen-positive case (P < 0.01).Analysis of triple test results in 27 cases of twin pregnancies.The study comprises 889 pregnant women between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation. The control group consisted of 862 pregnant women with unburdened obstetric anamnesis with an uneventful singleton pregnancy. The examined group consisted of 27 pregnant women with uncomplicated twin pregnancy. In the sera of pregnant women AFP (Microparticle Enzyme Immunoassay AxSYM Abbott), total beta-hCG (Microparticle Enzyme Immunoassay AxSYM Abbott) and unconjugated estriol (Radioimmunoassay Amerlex-M. 2T Johnson & Johnson Ortho Clinical Diagnostics Ltd.) were determined. The risk of fetal trisomy 21 was calculated with the use of PRISCA 3.0 software, which corrected the MoM values for twin pregnancy. Ulm Index was also calculated. In the majority of twin pregnancies increased concentrations of AFP, total beta-hCG and uE3 in the range over 1.0 MoM was noted. In the group of women below 35 years of age with singleton pregnancies using PRISCA 3.0 software it approximated to 95%. For women older than 35 optimum index for fetal trisomy 21 risk calculation was Ulm Index with the specificity 93.8%. The specificity of AFP determination in the detection of fetal open NTD in singleton pregnancy was 99%. In the group of women with twin pregnancy the obtained specificity of 77.8% for PRISCA 3.0 software is low, a more advantageous way to calculate the risk of fetal trisomy 21 is Ulm Index with the specificity of 85.2%. The specificity of AFP determination as a screening for fetal open NTD in twin pregnancy was 96.3%.[Clinical uses of maternal serum markers in the prenatal diagnosis].The significance of choroid plexus cysts, echogenic heart foci and renal pyelectasis in the first trimester.To determine the significance of certain soft ultrasonographic markers for chromosomal abnormalities in the first trimester.This was a prospective cross-sectional study.University Department of Obstetrics and Gynaecology, London, UK.A total of 5385 women from an unselected population underwent a detailed assessment of fetal anatomy at 11-14 weeks of gestation (confirmed by crown-rump length) by transabdominal sonography (5.0 MHz) and transvaginal sonography (6.0 MHz) when necessary.In normal fetuses, the prevalences of choroid plexus cysts, pyelectasis and echogenic heart foci were 2.2, 0.9 and 0.6%, respectively in the first trimester and 2.0, 0.8 and 0.8%, respectively in the second trimester. Pyelectasis (likelihood ratio = 8.0, p = 0.03) and echogenic heart foci (likelihood ratio = 10.3, p = 0.02) were found to be associated significantly with fetal aneuploidy, while choroid plexus cysts were not.Although the majority of aneuploidies were detected by increased nuchal translucency and/or the presence of structural abnormalities (78%; 25/32), the use of soft ultrasonographic markers in the first trimester would have increased the overall detection by a further 3%. These data are preliminary and many thousands of pregnancies will need to be examined to determine the significance of the individual markers in different chromosomal abnormalities.Prenatal diagnosis using the triple test.A screening study performed on 2,803 pregnant women using the "triple test" is reported.Nine hundred and twenty-one had a high prior risk, having > 35 years while, after the screening, only 201 women had a positive test at risk higher than 1:270, and underwent to amniocentesis. The detection rate (DR) for all abnormalities was 91% while for Down's syndrome (DS) it was 87.5% and for neural tube defects 85.5%. Foetal abnormalities were detected in 20 cases (1:10) while 181 were false positive cases (6.5%), of which 151 for DS (5.4%). False negative were observed only in 2 cases within 2,339 at term pregnancies.The authors retain that high DR is related to the exactness of determination of gestation age calculated by scan and to the homogeneity of the examined population.Inhibin A and pro-alpha C inhibin in Down syndrome and normal pregnancies.Using two enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays specific for inhibin A and pro-alpha C inhibin, levels of the two proteins were assessed in maternal serum from 43 Down syndrome and 300 chromosomally normal pregnancies at 15-17 weeks' gestation. Compared to the control pregnancies, both inhibin A and pro-alpha C inhibin were significantly elevated in the Down syndrome pregnancies with median levels, expressed as multiples of the normal median, of 1.53 MoM and 1.34 MoM, respectively (P < 0.001 and P = 0.046 compared to controls). Levels of inhibin A and pro-alpha C inhibin were weakly but significantly correlated in both the control and the Down syndrome sera (r = 0.25, P < 0.0001; r = 0.4, P = 0.008, respectively). These data suggest that the mechanism(s) underlying the elevated inhibin levels observed in Down syndrome may affect the regulation of both the inhibin alpha- and beta A-subunits.Midtrimester maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin levels: normal reference values for Taiwanese women.The purpose of this study was to establish normative median values for maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) during the second trimester of pregnant Taiwanese women.We collected the data of midtrimester serum free beta-hCG concentration levels from 15,132 normal Taiwanese singleton pregnancies between 14 and 22 weeks' gestation. The maternal age on the day of delivery and maternal weight at the time of sampling were recorded in all cases. The relationship between gestational days and multiple of the median (MoM) levels of serum markers was analyzed using nonlinear regression methods.The median values of free beta-hCG in pregnant Taiwanese women were higher than those of pregnant white women. The log10 standard deviation distribution of free beta-hCG MoM values in the study population was 0.275 with a log10 mean of 0.0097. There were 1.81% of pregnancies with free beta-hCG levels less than 0.3 MoM and 11.33% with levels less than 0.5 MoM; 12.91% had serum levels greater than 2.0 MoM and 5.29% had serum levels greater than 3.0 MoM.Because of differences in race and methodology, any laboratory intended to provide determination of free beta-hCG for Down syndrome screening should establish its own normal reference values.Schwangerschafts protein 1 (SP1) adds little to the age-related detection of fetal Down syndrome in the first trimester of pregnancy.Schwangerschafts Protein 1 (SP1), being a placental protein appearing in the maternal circulation early in pregnancy, has been investigated as a potential marker for Down syndrome in the first trimester. Our study compared SP1 levels in 15 pregnancies with a Down syndrome fetus and 97 matched controls. Although the median MoM in Down syndrome pregnancies (0.49) was lower than in controls, its use as a marker added very little to the detection rate above the maternal age alone.Maternal serum placental growth hormone and insulinlike growth factor binding proteins 1 and 3 in pregnancies affected by fetal aneuploidy and other abnormalities: implications for prenatal diagnosis of trisomy 21.In the present study, we determined circulating serum levels of human placental growth hormone (hPGH) and insulinlike growth factor binding proteins 1 and 3 (IGFBP-1 and IGFBP-3) using two-site radioimmunoassays during the gestational midtrimester of pregnancies affected by chromosomal disorders with the aim of identifying potential marker substances that might have a significant discriminative and predictive value for prenatal diagnosis of fetal chromosomal aberrations and of organ malformations such as neural-tube defect. Our results show that the maternal serum levels of hPGH were significantly elevated in pregnancies affected by chromosomal anomalies or organ malformations as compared with controls. The distribution of IGFBP-1 concentrations for all experimental groups except trisomy 21 were closely similar to the normal population. IGFBP-3 decreased slightly in pregnancies affected by Down syndrome. These findings suggest that hPGH may be useful as an additional marker in prenatal screening for Down syndrome.Influence of smoking habits on Down's syndrome risk evaluation at mid-trimester through biochemical screening.Expectant mothers who smoke have higher levels of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and lower levels of unconjugated estriol and total human chorionic gonadotrophin than non-smoking mothers. This significantly affects performance of screening for Down's syndrome. This study includes 22,169 pregnant women: 18,876 non-smokers, 2,660 smoking < or = 10 cigarettes/day, and 633 smoking > 10 cigarettes/day. Mean maternal age (32.6 years), maternal weight (60.5 kg), and gestational age (114.7 days) were similar or only slightly different between the three groups. To verify the effects of smoking on screening, we studied retrospectively 130 sequential Down's syndrome cases (47 from the screening program, 83 from the prenatal diagnosis program). The proportion of smokers in the Down's syndrome and unaffected pregnancies was similar, whilst the false-positive rate and detection rate, based on fetal outcome, differed: false-positive rates were 5.63% in smokers and 9.42% in non-smokers, and detection rate 55.6% in smokers and 83.0% in non-smokers. Since the prevalence of Down's syndrome pregnancies was the same at mid-trimester in smokers and non-smokers and the proportion of smokers was not related to maternal age, we propose an adjustment of the Down's syndrome risk evaluation algorithm according to smoking habits.Is prostate-specific antigen a marker for pregnancies affected by Down syndrome?Agreement between predicted risk and prevalence of Down syndrome in second-trimester triple-marker screening in Japan.Based on 9350 pregnant Japanese women who were screened by serum triple-marker determination, accuracy of predicted risk for Down syndrome was examined using 24 Down syndrome cases detected either prenatally or postnatally. The correlation is statistically very high (r = 0.98) between the predicted risks and the prevalence of Down syndrome cases. Here we emphasize that this could be accomplished only by an extensive follow-up study, implemented in our prospective intervention programme.Comparison of urinary free beta (hCG) and beta-core (hCG) in prenatal screening for chromosomal abnormalities.To evaluate the potential utility of free beta (hCG) and beta-core (hCG) in a prenatal screening protocol for Down syndrome we analysed these markers in dried maternal urine specimens from 163 control, 13 Down syndrome and 5 trisomy 18 pregnancies from 8 to 25 weeks' gestation. All results are reported after normalization for urinary creatinine determined by modified Jaffe reagent assay. The correlation of urinary free beta (hCG) and urinary beta-core (hCG) was 0.61 in controls and 0.93 in Down syndrome. Median MoM values in Down syndrome were 2.42 for urinary free beta (hCG) and 2.40 for beta-core (hCG). In trisomy 18 the Median MoM was 0.35 and 0.34 for free beta (hCG) and beta-core (hCG), respectively. The degree of elevation observed in DS cases with urinary free beta (hCG) is consistent with previous reports. Studies of beta-core (hCG) in Down syndrome have yielded discrepant results. In this study, beta-core (hCG) in Down syndrome is lower than values observed in early reports but consistent with more recent reports.Age-specific variation in aneuploidy incidence among biochemical screening programs.Our purpose was to compare the observed age-related incidence of Down syndrome in two large screening programs with the commonly quoted incidences used in biochemical screening programs.Data from two large prenatal screening programs were stratified in 5-year age groups. The age-related incidence of Down syndrome was compared with the commonly used incidence as reported by Cuckle.No significant differences were found in age-related incidences of Down syndrome in any age group between the screening groups or among women ages 15 through 29 in any of the three groups. However, for women 30 to 34 and > or = 40 years old, a trend was noted toward a higher incidence in the screening groups. For women ages 35 to 39, the observed incidence was significantly greater in the screening groups compared with the data of Cuckle.Our data suggest an underascertainment in Down syndrome risk built into the Cuckle model, particularly in high-risk patients.First trimester screening for Down's syndrome using maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG in combination with fetal nuchal translucency thickness.The aim of this study was to evaluate the potential effectiveness of maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and free beta-hCG in combination with nuchal translucency thickness in first trimester screening for Down's syndrome. Maternal serum levels of PAPP-A and free beta-hCG were assayed in stored sera from 32 Down's syndrome and 200 unaffected pregnancies. Fetal nuchal translucency was measured by ultrasound at the time of blood sampling. Screening of Down's syndrome using a combination of maternal age, PAPP-A, free beta-hCG and nuchal translucency would achieve a detection rate of 75.8% for a false positive rate of 5%.The value of screening for Down's syndrome in a socioeconomically deprived area with a high ethnic population.To assess the utility of biochemical antenatal screening for Down's syndrome in a socioeconomically deprived area with a high proportion of Asian women from the Indian Subcontinent.Audit of Down's syndrome biochemical screening service over a four-year period.Teaching hospital and community antenatal clinic in inner city Birmingham.Women booked between October 1992 and December 1996.Blood for screening was collected between 14 and 21 weeks gestation, alpha-fetoprotein and intact human chorionic gonadotrophin were measured in serum and the risk of Down's syndrome was calculated.Uptakes of screening and amniocentesis, screen positive rate, odds of being affected given a positive result, miscarriages associated with amniocentesis offered following a high risk result, detection rate, number of Down's cases prevented and a cost analysis. Outcome measures were compared between Asians and Caucasians.Overall 11,974 women (71%) accepted serum screening. The screen positive rate was 8.3% in Asians and 5.0% in Caucasians. The uptake of amniocentesis in women following a high risk result was 54% overall (35% Asian, 67% Caucasian). Nineteen cases of Down's syndrome were identified, of which 13 occurred in women who opted for biochemical screening. The detection rate of the biochemical screening programme was 85% (11/13). Of these 11 cases, six (none of whom were Asian) elected to have an amniocentesis, of whom four thereafter had a termination.In this study the public health benefits of screening for Down's syndrome in a socioeconomically deprived area with a high Asian population, were small.Influence of ethnic origin on nuchal translucency screening for Down's syndrome.To determine the influence of ethnic origin on access to and equity of nuchal translucency screening for Down's syndrome in a multiethnic population.An observational study in a district general hospital with a large multiethnic population.1944 women attending at a hospital antenatal clinic.First-trimester fetal nuchal translucency measurements at 10-14 weeks in women from different ethnic groups.The racial origin of the screened population was not significantly different from that of the population attending for initial antenatal examination. Multiple regression analysis showed a small but significant difference in nuchal translucency measurement between fetuses of different ethnic origin.Nuchal translucency screening can be effectively and equitably delivered to a multiethnic population. Although there are significant differences in nuchal translucency measurement between ethnic groups, these differences are too small to require correction when nuchal translucency is used to screen for Down's syndrome.Population screening for aneuploidy using maternal age and ultrasound.The coexistence of an epidemiological register and a multidisciplinary centre for prenatal diagnosis promoted us to report data collected during six years (1990-1995) in Isère county on prenatally detected chromosomal aberrations. During the whole study period prenatal diagnosis strategy towards chromosome aberrations was based solely on maternal age and ultrasound examination. Results showed a respective contribution of one-third/two-thirds for the two detection modes (maternal age/ultrasound signs). From 1990 to 1995 a significant increase in the proportion of prenatally detected autosomal aneuploidy was observed, from 52 per cent to 75 per cent (P < 0.001). This significant variation was mainly due to an increase in the proportion of prenatally detected trisomy 21 cases, and to an increase in the proportion of aberrations which were detected through first trimester ultrasound examination. The highest positive predictive values were observed for polymalformation, cardiac anomalies and cystic hygroma ultrasound signs (51 per cent, 21 per cent and 26 per cent, respectively). Our results for trisomy 21 are close to those obtained in other studies, even when prenatal strategies are different. Their interest lies in the fact that they can be considered as a reference level of prenatal diagnosis efficiency due to a strategy based on maternal age and ultrasound signs, a level which has to be taken into account when evaluating the benefits of additional serum screening policies in other studies.First trimester maternal serum concentrations of fetal antigen 2 in normal pregnancies and those affected by trisomy 21.Serum concentrations of fetal antigen 2 (FA-2), the amino-propeptide of the alpha1 chain of collagen type I, were measured in peripheral blood from women with normal (n = 234) and trisomy 21 affected (n = 14) pregnancies between 9 and 11 weeks gestation. Serum FA-2 concentrations were seen to be stable throughout this period, and though raised FA-2 concentrations were seen at the 10th week of gestation, a statistically significant difference between normal and trisomy 21 affected pregnancies was not found overall. Therefore it seems unlikely that FA-2 has a role in first trimester screening for trisomy 21, despite the fact that significantly higher FA-2 concentrations in trisomy 21 and significantly lower concentrations in trisomy 18 had been previously demonstrated in amniotic fluid in the second trimester.Second-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotrophin screening for Down's syndrome in Hong Kong.Second-trimester maternal serum screening for fetal Down's syndrome is well established in many Western countries. Its usefulness and acceptability is unknown in the Asian countries. Between June 1994 and December 1996, we offered second-trimester serum AFP and hCG screening to pregnant women in Hong Kong who were less than 35 years old and without other risk factors for chromosome abnormalities. Each woman was assigned a risk of having a Down's syndrome term pregnancy by using a computer software program that took into account her age. weight, AFP and hCG MOMs. All those with a risk of one in 250 or greater were designated screen-positive, subject to the revision of gestation by ultrasound examination. 9,177 women with singleton pregnancies (93 per cent were Chinese) were screened. The uptake of screening was 75 per cent. 281 women (three per cent) were initially classified to be screen-positive. After revision of the gestation by ultrasound examination, 183 women (two per cent) were 'true' screen-positive and 164 (90 per cent) accepted the offer of amniocentesis. Eight of these pregnancies were affected by Down's syndrome and all the women elected pregnancy termination. The odds of being affected, given a positive screening result, were one in 23. Six Down's syndrome pregnancies were missed by screening programme. The detection rate was 57 per cent. The study showed that second-trimester serum screening for fetal Down's syndrome was feasible and accepted in the Hong Kong population.Nuchal translucency as a screening test for chromosomal abnormalities in a routine first trimester ultrasound examination.To evaluate the implementation of nuchal translucency measurement as an additional examination within the first trimester routine ultrasound in an unselected population of women.A prospective study in which all pregnant women during 1994, referred for the first trimester routine ultrasound scan, were asked to participate. Of a total of 1852 women with a viable pregnancy, results from 1444 women were evaluated. When a nuchal translucency of 4 mm or more was found, the woman was offered both a genetic amniocentesis in gestational week 13-15 and an additional ultrasound examination in gestational week 18-19.Six fetuses had a nuchal translucency of 4 mm or more and none of these had any chromosomal abnormality. Neither had any of the fetuses in the study, karyotyped for other reasons, any chromosomal defect and nor was there any child born with aneuploidy in the study population. No strong relation between major malformations e.g. abnormalities of the heart and increased nuchal translucency was found. The fetus with the largest nuchal translucency (=6 mm) was born healthy.The efficacy of nuchal translucency measurement needs further evaluation before it can be introduced as a screening method in an unselected pregnant population.Down syndrome screening in Singapore--the effectiveness of a second trimester serum screening policy modelled on 29,360 pregnancies in KK Women's and Children's Hospital.To assess the effectiveness of a proposed second trimester Down syndrome serum screening policy in Singapore.Auditing the effectiveness of an age-only policy and comparing it against a serum screening policy modelled on the same maternal population of KK Women's and Children's Hospital in 1994 and 1995.KK Women's and Children's Hospital's (KKH) maternal age distribution is similar to the national age distribution of mothers. Sixteen percent (16.7%) of mothers in KKH, in 1994 and 1995, were 35 years or older at delivery. Based on our hospital birth defect registry, 66% (35/53) of Down Syndrome pregnancies occurred in mothers who were 35 years or older at delivery and 43% (23/53) in the oldest 6.5% of mothers (38 years or older at delivery). Using various models on KKH's population structure to estimate the expected number of Down Syndrome livebirths expected, 52%-55% and 34%-36% of Down Syndrome livebirths were expected to occur in the oldest 16.7% and 6.5% of mothers respectively. These simulated figures are much lower than the figures from the data and needs further study, assuming that the Western Down Syndrome risk model to be applicable to our population. The overall uptake of amniocentesis irrespective of gestational age at booking was 28%. In mothers who were 35 years or older at delivery and booked before 22 weeks gestation, the uptake rate of amniocentesis was 49%. There was a substantial difference in the uptake rate when the counselling was done by trained counsellers compared to those who were not.We would expect that for a fixed amniocentesis rate of 6.5% and 16.7%, serum screening would be able to detect 71% and 85% respectively of the Down syndrome pregnancies. This is more efficient than figures published from Western populations as our patients are older.Triple-marker test as screening for Down syndrome: a meta-analysis.The effectiveness of triple-marker testing as screening for Down syndrome needs to be evaluated by means of formal meta-analytic techniques. We did a MEDLINE search to identify studies evaluating the detection of Down syndrome by use of the triple-marker test. Reference lists of articles were also checked. Papers published in either English, French, or German from 1966 to November 1996 were eligible for this review. Twenty cohort studies were identified. Results of sensitivities and false-positive rates from different subgroups of the study sample were compared by using summary receiver-operating characteristic curve analysis. Medians of sensitivities and false-positive rates were also estimated. A total of 194,326 patients were included. In women of all ages, the medians for sensitivities were 67, 71, and 73 percent when the cutoffs used were 1:190-200, 1:250-295, and 1:350-380, respectively. The median false-positive rates fluctuated between 4 and 8 percent. For women at or above 35 years old, the medians of sensitivity and false-positive rate were 89 and 25 percent, respectively, when the chosen cutoff was 1:190-200. In patients below 35 years old, the median sensitivity was 57 percent if the cutoff used was 1:250-295. Summary receiver-operating characteristic curves showed that 1:190 was the best cutoff for predicting Down syndrome. The triple-marker testing is an effective screening method of detecting Down syndrome pregnancies. It is less effective in younger than in older age groups and may be offered as an alternative to amniocentesis to pregnant women over 35.Preliminary evidence for associations between second-trimester human chorionic gonadotropin and unconjugated oestriol levels with pregnancy outcome in Down syndrome pregnancies.Fifty-six cases of Down syndrome were identified in a population of women who had undergone maternal serum triple marker screening [alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) analyses]. These affected pregnancies represented all known cases present in the population of 34,368 women screened. Using a 1:270 mid-trimester Down syndrome risk to define the screen-positive group, 42 affected pregnancies were screen-positive (medians: AFP = 0.79 MOM, hCG = 2.13 MOM, uE3 = 0.62 MOM, age 34.6 years) and 14 pregnancies were screen-negative (medians: AFP = 0.82 MOM, hCG = 1.57 MOM, uE3 = 0.92 MOM, age 24.2 years). Four affected pregnancies were associated with in utero death and each of these cases was associated with relatively extreme values of AFP, hCG, and uE3, including the three highest levels of hCG in the entire series of Down syndrome pregnancies. Twenty-nine (15 screen-positive and 14 screen-negative) affected pregnancies resulted in liveborns. Down syndrome pregnancies had a significantly shorter gestational term than controls, and Down syndrome babies were also lighter than controls, even after adjustment for sex and gestational age. In affected pregnancies, a low uE3 level appeared to be associated with a greater chance of a small-for-gestational age baby. No correlations could be demonstrated between AFP or hCG levels and gestational age-adjusted term weight. Based on this small series, it would appear that uE3 may be particularly useful in detecting those Down syndrome cases associated with small-for-gestational age fetuses. A very high hCG value may indicate a higher probability of fetal death.Second trimester levels of maternal serum total activin A and placental inhibin/activin alpha and betaA subunit messenger ribonucleic acids in Down syndrome pregnancy.Previous data have shown that inhibin A (alpha/betaA) is increased about twofold in maternal serum samples from Down syndrome pregnancy. Our objectives were to determine whether activin A (betaA/betaA) was similarly increased in maternal serum from pregnancies affected with fetal Down syndrome, and to investigate whether increased expression of each inhibin/activin subunit occurred in placental tissue from cases of fetal Down syndrome.Maternal serum total activin A levels were measured in 20 cases of fetal Down syndrome and 100 unaffected pregnancy samples. In addition, analysis of inhibin/activin alpha and betaA subunit mRNA levels was performed in placental tissue extracts from six cases of fetal Down syndrome and six tissues with a normal karyotype.The median total activin A level in the Down syndrome cases was 0.82 MoM (multiples of the median); values did not differ significantly (P = 0.36, Mann-Whitney U analysis) from those in unaffected pregnancies. The inhibin alpha subunit/GAPDH mRNA ratio, but not that of betaA subunit/GAPDH mRNA, was significantly greater (P < 0.01, ANOVA) in placental tissue from Down syndrome than in control placental tissue.Unlike inhibin A, activin A is not significantly increased in Down syndrome relative to unaffected pregnancy. Furthermore, increased amounts of maternal serum inhibin A in Down syndrome pregnancy probably result from increased placental expression of inhibin alpha, but not betaA, subunit.Second trimester maternal dimeric inhibin-A in the multiple-marker screening test for Down's syndrome.The aim of this study was to evaluate the additional value of dimeric inhibin-A serum concentration in second trimester multiple-marker screening tests for pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome. We anticipated that second trimester maternal serum dimeric inhibin-A concentrations would be altered in pregnancies complicated by fetal Down's syndrome and that dimeric inhibin-A would perform better than one of the three substances analysed in the multiple-marker screening test currently in use. A total of 1156 serum samples were screened for dimeric inhibin-A in parallel with the routine classic triple test screening programme performed on a random obstetric population. Classic triple test performance was compared with detection rates obtained after substitution of unconjugated oestriol by inhibin-A and with the performance of inhibin-A and alpha-fetoprotein alone. Absolute dimeric inhibin-A maternal serum concentrations of Down's syndrome pregnancies were indeed significantly higher than those of normal pregnancies in our screened population. The performance of dimeric inhibin-A in combination with the multiple-marker screening test, however, is limited because of its strong correlation with intact human chorionic gonadotrophin.Fetal gender impact on multiple-marker screening results.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE3) are used in combination with maternal age to calculate the risk for Down syndrome (DS) in pregnancy. Increased levels of hCG and decreased levels of MSAFP and uE3 are consistent with an increased risk for DS. We retrospectively evaluated second-trimester maternal serum marker levels in a large cohort of patients with known normal outcomes and documented fetal gender. These included 15,428 patients who had MSAFP measurements, 11,428 patients with both MSAFP and hCG, and 6,090 patients with all three markers including uE3. MSAFP levels in patients with female fetuses were consistently lower than those with males. Conversely, hCG was higher in pregnancies with females as compared to males. No gender-related difference was noted for uE3. These results would suggest that the computed DS risk for female fetuses is higher than for males, despite the fact that the incidence of DS is similar in both genders. This information could be useful for calculating gender-specific DS risk; however, this would require ultrasonographic determination of fetal sex.Screening for Down syndrome at 14 weeks of pregnancy.To investigate whether statistical parameters used in Down syndrome screening between 15 and 22 weeks of pregnancy can be used at 14 weeks, we assayed alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), free alpha-hCG, free beta-hCG, and inhibin-A in 16 pregnancies with Down syndrome in the 14th week of pregnancy and expressed values in multiples of the normal median. The median and standard deviation values for these 16 pregnancies were not materially different from those published for 15-22 weeks. It is reasonable, therefore, to offer Down syndrome screening using these markers starting at 14 completed weeks of pregnancy instead of 15 weeks. It needs to be recognized, however, that serum AFP measurement for neural tube defect screening is less effective at this time than between 16 and 18 weeks of pregnancy.The distribution of nuchal translucency at 10-13 weeks of pregnancy.There is a need for a simple method of expressing nuchal translucency measurement in early pregnancy that will allow for gestational age and be useful in screening for Down's syndrome. To achieve this objective, we conducted a prospective study of 561 women with singleton pregnancies that were not affected by Down's syndrome at 10-13 weeks of gestation. Nuchal translucency measurements and crown rump length measurements were determined. Nuchal translucency measurement increased by about 17 per cent per week. Expressing the result as a multiple of the median (MOM) nuchal translucency for a given crown rump length allowed for this increase with gestational age and yielded a distribution of values that was approximately Gaussian. About 96 per cent of values lay between 0.5 and 2.0 MOM. The variance and therefore the false-positive rate of nuchal translucency were significantly reduced by recording several measurements and using the average: for example, the false-positive rate reduced from 8.3 per cent to 5.0 per cent if the average of six measurements were used instead of one--a potential 40 per cent reduction in the false-positive rate if the test were used in screening. Estimating the distribution of nuchal translucency in MOM values will assist in specifying the statistical parameters to be used in prenatal screening for Down's syndrome and the use of repeated nuchal translucency measurements is expected to have a useful effect on reducing the screening false-positive rate at a given MOM cut-off level.The influence of smoking on maternal serum AFP and free beta hCG levels and the impact on screening for Down syndrome.I have studied the impact of maternal smoking on the levels of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) during the second trimester in a large series (30,727) of self-reported smokers and non-smokers whose pregnancy resulted in the birth of a normal fetus. I have confirmed in a smaller subset of this population that self-reporting is an accurate method of assessing smoking status as confirmed by biochemical (serum cotinine) assessment. In addition, I have investigated marker levels among 195 pregnancies affected by Down syndrome with smoking status confirmed by measurement of serum cotinine. In both unaffected and Down syndrome groups, the incidence of smoking was 19 per cent but a considerable variation was observed with maternal age when the incidence in younger women (under 25) was 32 per cent. AFP median levels in unaffected smokers were 3 per cent higher, whilst in the Down syndrome group smoker medians were increased by 10 per cent compared with the non-smoker group. Free beta hCG levels in unaffected smokers were reduced by 14 per cent, whilst in the Down syndrome group smoker median levels were decreased by 16 per cent. In the smoker group, the Down syndrome detection rate was 10 per cent lower than in the non-smoker group, whilst the false-positive rate was also 2 per cent lower. Correcting for smoking status would redress this inequality and produce an overall 2 per cent increase in the detection rate for a 0.4 per cent increase in the false-positive rate. This increase in screening performance may be worth building into screening programmes, particularly in populations with a high smoking incidence.Screening of maternal serum for fetal Down's syndrome in the first trimester.Screening of maternal serum to identify fetuses with Down's syndrome is now routinely offered during the second trimester of pregnancy. Prenatal screening by means of serum assays or ultrasonographic measurements, either alone or in combination, may also be possible in the first trimester.We measured serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), the free beta subunit of hCG, and pregnancy-associated protein A in 4412 women (82 percent of whom were 35 years of age or older) who came to 16 prenatal diagnostic centers for chorionic-villus sampling or early amniocentesis at 9 to 15 weeks of gestation. Ultrasound measurements of fetal nuchal translucency were also reported. Fetal chromosomal analysis was performed in all pregnancies. Altogether, there were 61 fetuses with Down's syndrome.A total of 48 pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome and 3169 unaffected pregnancies were identified before 14 weeks of gestation; the rates of detection of Down's syndrome for the five serum markers were as follows: 17 percent for alpha-fetoprotein, 4 percent for unconjugated estriol, 29 percent for hCG, 25 percent for the free beta subunit of hCG, and 42 percent for pregnancy-associated protein A, at false positive rates of 5 percent. The results of the measurements of serum hCG and its free beta subunit were highly correlated. When used in combination with the serum concentration of pregnancy-associated protein A and maternal age, the detection rate was 63 percent for hCG (95 percent confidence interval, 47 to 76 percent) and 60 percent for its free beta subunit (95 percent confidence interval, 45 to 74 percent). Measurements of nuchal translucency varied considerably between centers and could not be reliably incorporated into our calculations.Screening for Down's syndrome in the first trimester is feasible, with use of measurements of pregnancy-associated protein A and either hCG or its free beta subunit in maternal serum.Is maternal serum triple screening a better predictor of Down syndrome in female than in male fetuses?Among euploid gestations, female fetuses have been reported to have significantly lower maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) and higher human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) levels than male fetuses. Since in maternal serum triple screening, low MSAFP and high hCG MOM independently confer greater risk of a Down syndrome fetus, we investigated the hypothesis that maternal serum triple screening is more efficacious at detecting female than male Down syndrome fetuses. A database containing all karyotypes from amniocentesis performed between August 1994 and August 1996 was accessed. All trisomy 21 cases were identified. The male-to-female ratio among trisomy 21 fetuses detected at amniocentesis after abnormal maternal serum triple screening was compared with that among trisomy 21 fetuses detected at amniocentesis for advanced maternal age (AMA), which served as the control group. Statistical analysis utilized chi-square, Fisher's exact test, and Student's t-test. A P value of less than 0.05 was considered statistically significant. Forty-nine trisomy 21 fetuses were detected in the women who underwent amniocentesis because of abnormal triple screening and 311 were detected in the control group. The proportion of male fetuses among the triple screening group was not significantly different from that of the AMA group (55 per cent vs. 57 per cent; P=0.9). Our study had a power of 80 per cent to detect a difference of 25 per cent in the male-to-female ratio (alpha=0.05, beta=0.20). The reported differences in MSAFP and hCG levels between male and female euploid fetuses do not appear to affect the sex ratio among Down syndrome fetuses detected because of an abnormal maternal serum triple screening.The role of midtrimester targeted fetal organ screening combined with the "triple test" and maternal age in the diagnosis of trisomy 21: a retrospective study.Our purpose was to evaluate the role of fetal ultrasonography in prenatal detection of trisomy 21.A retrospective study was performed on all cases of trisomy 21 diagnosed prenatally or postnatally between January 1990 and December 1993 in the Jerusalem metropolitan area. Our program of prenatal detection of trisomy 21 is a three-tiered, chronologically progressive screening that includes maternal age, biochemical serum markers, and targeted fetal organ survey. Sixty-seven thousand ninety-two babies were born during the study period; 17,084 maternal biochemistry analyses (triple test) were performed; and 6315 fetuses were karyotyped.One hundred eight cases of trisomy 21 were diagnosed prenatally and postnatally. The overall rate of detection of trisomy 21 was 92.2% when our recommendations were followed. Among those cases diagnosed prenatally, 66.6% of trisomy 21 cases had been referred for fetal karyotyping because of maternal age > or = 35 years, 18.5% because of abnormal triple test results, and 11.1% because of fetal ultrasonographic findings associated with trisomy 21. Among women < 35 years old, 80% of trisomy 21 cases were detected prenatally. Of these, 50% had been referred for karyotyping because of triple test results and 30% because of abnormal ultrasonographic findings.Midtrimester ultrasonographic targeted fetal organ screening plays a critical role in prenatal diagnosis of trisomy 21 among women under the age of 35 years.Effect of adjustment of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein levels in insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.Our objective was to determine the effect of the 20% upward adjustment of maternal serum alphafetoprotein (MSAFP) in patients with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM) on the number of patients that would be classified at increased risk for pregnancy complicated by either Down syndrome (DS) or neural tube defect (NTD). We retrospectively evaluated a database containing 63,110 patients who underwent multiple serum marker screening between 14 and 22 weeks gestation; 620 patients with IDDM had measurements of MSAFP of which 479 also had measurements of beta-HCG, allowing calculation of DS risk. Increased NTD risk was defined as MSAFP >2.5 MOM while increased DS risk was defined as a calculated risk > or =1/270. One IDDM patient delivered an infant with a NTD; it was not detected on serum screening. No infants were born with DS. Of the 620 patients with MSAFP determinations, 9 had values >2.5 MOM before adjustment. After upward adjustment, 7 additional patients were identified. Sixteen patients were identified at increased risk for DS before and after adjustment. Our data suggest that the 20% upward adjustment of MSAFP increases by 78%, the number of patients who would require further evaluation for NTD's. Although we were able to identify 620 women with IDDM who underwent serum screening for NTD, the low prevalence of NTD's did not allow us to demonstrate an increased detection rate. The effect of upward adjustment of MSAFP on the number of patients categorized at increased DS risk appears to be minimal.First trimester sonographic detection of chromosomal abnormalities in an unselected population.To investigate the role of first trimester sonography in detecting chromosomal abnormalities in an unselected obstetric population.2281 women (mean maternal age 30 years [range 16-47]; mean gestational age 12(+3) weeks [range 11-14]) underwent transabdominal scanning to assess fetal structure and, if anatomical survey was considered to be incomplete (31% of cases), transvaginal sonography was also performed. Measurement of nuchal translucency was included and karyotyping performed as considered appropriate.There were 16 chromosomal abnormalities; 13 (81%) were diagnosed at 11-14 weeks either because of a nuchal translucency greater than or equal to the 99th centile for gestational age (7/16; 44% [95% CI 25-63]) or due to the presence of structural abnormalities (6/16; 38% [95% CI 14.2-61.8]). Seventy-five percent of cases of trisomy 21 were also diagnosed either because of having a nuchal translucency greater than or equal to the 99th centile (5/8; 63%) or due to the presence of a structural abnormality (1/8; 13%).A significant proportion of fetal chromosomal abnormalities can be detected by first trimester sonographic screening to assess fetal structural appearance. The sensitivity of detection can be improved by combining measurement of nuchal translucency with detailed examination of fetal anatomy.[AFP, uE3, beta-hCG levels applied for prenatal diagnosis of Down's syndrome].To investigate the relationship between fetal trisomy 21 and alpha fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3) and beta human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) levels in maternal serum, amniotic fluid and fetal serum.AFP, uE3 and beta-hCG levels in maternal serum, amniotic fluid and fetal serum from 17 pregnancies with fetal trisomy 21 and 131 unaffected control pregnancies were measured between 16 to 28 weeks gestation using radioimmunoassay.In these pregnancies with fetal trisomy 21, the AFP and uE3 levels in maternal serum, amniotic fluid and fetal serum were lower than those in controls; but beta-hCG levels were higher (P < 0.05).To measure maternal serum AFP, uE3 and beta-hCG levels will be useful in prenatal detection of trisomy 21.First-trimester screening for fetal aneuploidy: biochemistry and nuchal translucency.Maternal dried whole-blood specimens were collected prospectively from 2010 singleton pregnancies between 9 + 0 and 13 + 4 weeks that included 18 chromosomally abnormal pregnancies (11 Down's syndrome, four trisomy 18, two trisomy 13 and one triploidy). A subset of 744 pregnancies underwent ultrasound nuchal translucency measurement and included seven Down's syndrome, four trisomy 18, two trisomy 13 and one triploidy. Patients were evaluated for risk of Down's syndrome and trisomy 18 based on biochemistry (free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A), nuchal translucency and the combination of both. In prospective biochemical screening, false-positive rates for Down's syndrome and trisomy 18 were 5.1% (66/1297) and 1.9% (25/1297) in women < 35 years of age and 14.2% (99/695) and 1.6% (11/695) in women > or = 35 years of age, respectively. The detection efficiency of aneuploidy was 6/6 (100%) in women < 35 years and 11/12 (92%) in women > or = 35 years. Nuchal translucency measurement alone detected 57% (8/14) of cases of aneuploidy at a 5.8% (42/730) false-positive rate. Modelling with the age distribution of live births, a 5% false-positive rate resulted in Down's syndrome detection efficiency of 61% by biochemistry, 73% by nuchal translucency and 87% by combining both methods. The data in this study demonstrate that combined biochemical and ultrasound evaluation for Down's syndrome and other chromosomal abnormalities in the first trimester of pregnancy yield a detection capability that may exceed that of current second-trimester prenatal screening protocols. The potential for enhanced detection coupled to an earlier alert of fetal complications could represent a substantial advantage to both clinician and patient.Screening for fetal anomalies by ultrasound at 14 and 21 weeks.A prospective study of screening for fetal abnormalities and chromosomal defects was carried out by ultrasound examination at 13-15 weeks of gestation and 20-22 weeks; the first scan was performed transvaginally and the second transabdominally. During a 4-year period (1991-95), 3490 unselected consecutive pregnancies with a total of 3514 fetuses were examined. There were 21 chromosomally abnormal fetuses, including ten with trisomy 21, and, in 19 (90.5%), fetal defects were detected at the first and/or second ultrasound examination. The most effective marker for chromosomal defects was increased nuchal translucency thickness (> or = 4 mm) at the 13-15-week scan, which was present in seven of the ten fetuses with trisomy 21 and in six of the 11 with other chromosomal abnormalities.Levels of urinary beta-core fragment, total oestriol, and the ratio of the two in second-trimester screening for Down syndrome.Levels of beta-core fragment and total oestriol in second-trimester maternal urine samples were measured in 32 Down syndrome pregnancies and 206 control pregnancies. Beta-core fragment and total oestriol values were corrected for the urinary creatinine level and expressed as multiples of the control medians (MOM). In addition, the ratio of the beta-core fragment level to the total oestriol level, without creatinine correction, was calculated, and expressed as MOM values. The median beta-core fragment, total oestriol, and ratio levels in Down syndrome cases were 5.42, 0.64, and 9.32 MOM, respectively. In the Down syndrome pregnancies, 66 per cent of the beta-core fragment levels were above the 95th centile of control levels, while 22 per cent of the total oestriol levels were below the fifth centile of control levels. In combination with maternal age, measurement of beta-core fragment and total oestriol levels in Down syndrome pregnancy resulted in an 80 per cent detection rate at a 5 per cent false-positive rate. Use of the ratio resulted in a univariate detection rate of 72 per cent. In combination with maternal age, the ratio resulted in a detection rate of 81 per cent at a 5 per cent false-positive rate. Based on this unmatched study, the measurement of a ratio of beta-core fragment to total oestriol levels, without the need for creatinine correction, may be useful in screening for fetal Down syndrome in second-trimester urine.Second-trimester maternal urinary gonadotrophin peptide screening for fetal Down syndrome in Asian women.Maternal urinary gonadotrophin peptide (UGP) was recently found to be elevated in second-trimester Down syndrome pregnancies. There is controversy about its screening efficacy. Data in the Asian population are scanty. We measured the UGP levels in 29 Down syndrome pregnancies and 297 controls and expressed them as a ratio of the urine creatinine concentration. Median UGP MOM was elevated to 3.44 (95 per cent confidence interval 1.99-5.13) in cases, compared with controls. UGP values were widely scattered in cases and controls with extensive overlap such that only 35 per cent of Down syndrome cases were expected to be detected at a 5 per cent false-positive rate. The data of the present study and previous reports show that there is a wide variability of gestation-specific UGP median values. UGP alone does not appear to be an effective screening marker for fetal Down syndrome.Differential increases in AFP, hCG, and uE3 in twin pregnancies: impact on attempts to quantify Down syndrome screening calculations.Since the advent of multiple marker screening (MMS) for Down syndrome (DS) risk calculations, limitations for twins have been apparent. Recent attempts have been made to extrapolate mathematically singleton risks to twins. Here we investigate the pattern of levels among AFP, hCG, and uE3 in twins. MMS screening data from 4,443 twin pregnancies were compared to those from 258,885 singletons from 14-21 weeks of gestational age during a 3-year period (1992-1994) in our laboratory. Medians were determined for singletons and twins, and the ratios of twins to singletons were derived. Median AFP levels for twins are approximately double those of singletons, but median increases for hCG and uE3 are less than double. The data were divided further by ethnic groups (white, African American, Asian, and Hispanic), among which there were significant variations in medians, but not in the ratios of twins to singletons. The increased serum levels of different markers in twins are not consistent across analytes, possibly reflecting independent development of different compartments. Such differences mean that a mere mathematical conversion of singleton DS risks would be imbalanced among the analytes and cannot be applied reasonably to twins. Ethnic-specific databases are as important in twins as they are in singletons.Influence of maternal age and weight on second-trimester serum alpha-fetoprotein, total and free beta human chorionic gonadotropin levels.The purpose of this study was to assess the relation of maternal age and weight on the maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), total human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) and free beta-hCG levels during the second trimester.We collected 419 serum samples from normal singleton pregnancies to assay serum marker levels of AFP, total hCG and free beta-hCG between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation. Maternal age at the day of delivery and maternal weight at the time of sampling were recorded in all cases. The relationship between maternal weight and multiple of the median (MoM) levels of serum markers was analysed by regression models.There was an inverse trend in median MoM levels of serum markers in relation to maternal weight. No significant association between maternal age and serum marker levels was found.Because of its impact on serum marker levels, weight correction may be mandatory for further refinement in the maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome.Maternal serum analyte levels in pregnancies with fetal Down syndrome resulting from translocations.Our purpose was to determine whether pregnancies affected by fetal Down syndrome resulting from Robertsonian translocations are associated with second-trimester maternal serum analyte levels different from those resulting from fetal trisomy 21.Pregnancies with Down syndrome caused by Robertsonian translocations were identified through the cytogenetics laboratories at the participating institutions. Those with maternal serum screening values between 15 and 20 weeks were evaluated.Eleven cases of fetal Down syndrome caused by Robertsonian translocations were identified. The median alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, and human chorionic gonadotropin levels were 0.68, 0.67, and 2.83 multiples of the median, respectively. These analyte levels are similar to those for fetal trisomy 21.These data suggest that Down syndrome resulting from either Robertsonian translocations or trisomy 21 will be detected in a similar percentage of cases because the second-trimester maternal serum analyte levels are similar.Maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome on population basis.The favorable attitude among the public towards prenatal diagnostics in Finland allowed us to start a trial on population basis when screening for Down's syndrome by maternal serum markers and age was introduced.Screening by maternal serum markers for Down's syndrome was offered to all 17,200 pregnant women in the Helsinki area during the study period of 2.5 years. Screening due to advanced maternal age, 37 years or more, was continued as previously, and 1133 pregnant mothers used this option. Alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotrophin, and during the first year also unconjugated estriol were used as markers.The uptake of serum screening was 84%. The proportion of false positive results i.e. risk for Down's syndrome, 1:350 or more at term, was initially 5.7%. After ultrasound scan 4.1% of the mothers remained 'screen positive'. The amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling uptake was 98.4%. Ten out of eighteen cases of Down's syndrome were detected by maternal serum screening, sensitivity 56%, 95% CI 31-79%. Other chromosomal abnormalities were found in three cases, and there were four cases of mosaicisms confined to the placenta. These were trisomies 16, 7 and 2, and tetraploidy. Elevated serum alpha-fetoprotein was found initially in 0.7% of the cases. One case of congenital nephrosis of the Finnish type and ten other, mainly structural, abnormalities were detected by high AFP.The screening was well received by the mothers. The detection rate of 56% is in the same range as in previous studies. Ultrasound scan before the test would effectively lower the false positive rate caused by incorrect timing.Combining ultrasound and biochemistry in first-trimester screening for Down's syndrome.Data on pregnancies with and without Down's syndrome between 10 and 14 weeks of pregnancy were used to determine the performance of combined ultrasound and biochemical markers in prenatal screening for Down's syndrome. We used three datasets: one published by Pandya et al. (1995) on nuchal translucency measurement in 86 Down's syndrome pregnancies; one published by Wald et al. (1996a) on free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) in 77 affected pregnancies and 385 unaffected pregnancies; and the third from Schuchter et al. on 561 unaffected pregnancies with nuchal translucency measurement. Combining the data from these three datasets showed that screening between 10 and 14 weeks by combining the serum markers with nuchal translucency measurement had a detection rate of 80 per cent for a 5 per cent false-positive rate, better than maternal age with two serum markers (62 per cent for 5 per cent) or maternal age with nuchal translucency measurement (63 per cent for 5 per cent). At this time in pregnancy, it appears that screening using the combined test is better than second-trimester serum screening (76 per cent for 5 per cent), though these estimates do not allow for any association between the markers and spontaneous fetal loss, an issue that needs to be clarified by further research. Meanwhile, these results provide a reasonable working estimate of screening performance using different combinations of these markers.Maternal serum inhibin-A in pregnancies complicated by insulin dependent diabetes mellitus.We have examined whether insulin dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM) affects maternal serum levels of inhibin-A, a recently described prenatal marker of Down's syndrome, by comparing levels in 169 women with IDDM with levels in 432 nondiabetic pregnant women between 15 and 20 weeks of gestation. There was a small but significant increase in the inhibin-A level in the diabetic women only when levels were corrected for maternal weight: median MoM 1.17 (P < 0.01 vs controls, Student's t test). The underlying mechanism for this elevation in pregnancies complicated by IDDM currently remains obscure.Screening for Down's syndrome: changes in marker levels and detection rates between first and second trimesters.To monitor changes with gestation in levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (F beta hCG) and pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) in Down's syndrome pregnancies and to compare risks estimated in the first trimester with those obtained by routine screening in the second trimester for the same pregnancies.In each of 47 Down's syndrome pregnancies two maternal serum samples were obtained, one in the first trimester and one in the second trimester. Comparison of marker levels with 10,600 first trimester controls and a smaller sample of second trimester controls allowed case identification criteria based on optimum marker combinations to be developed and compared directly between trimesters.Biochemical genetics laboratory.F beta hCG was an effective marker of Down's syndrome in both the first and second trimesters. PAPP-A levels were significantly reduced in trisomy 21 pregnancies in the first trimester only. Using a population model, these two markers in combination with maternal age gave an overall detection rate of 55% for a 5% false positive rate in the first trimester. For the paired first and second trimester samples, three of six cases classified as low risk by routine second trimester screening were classified as high risk by the first trimester screening protocol of F beta hCG/PAPP-A/maternal age. However, fifteen cases identified as high risk by routine second trimester screening were classified as low risk in the first trimester, a net loss in detection of 12 cases by first trimester screening.The data suggest that first trimester detection rates for Down's syndrome using a combination of F beta hCG and PAPP-A may vary with gestation and will be lower than those currently obtained by routine second trimester screening with AFP/hCG.Results and views of women in population-wide pregnancy screening for trisomy 21 in east Finland.The serum screening test for trisomy 21 was offered to all pregnant women in East Finland during 1993. The results and the women's views on trisomy screening are reported here. A total of 9,343 (89%) of the pregnant women participated in the screening. A total of 615 women were eligible for amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling; among them 22 pregnancies were affected by Down Syndrome. Fifteen of them were detected by double screening; in 2 missed cases only maternal-serum alpha-fetoprotein had been determined. In all 5 cases missed by double screening the maternal age was less than 30 years. The women's attitudes were studied by means of a questionnaire, which was mailed to 214 women. The response rate to our questionnaire was 74%. A total of 87% of respondents highly or very highly valued the opportunity to participate in the screening. Despite the existing problems caused by late testing, 87% of respondents want to be tested again in their future pregnancies.Screening for Down syndrome during first trimester: a prospective study using free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A.Early screening for Down syndrome is desirable so that more time is left for intervention in the event of a positive test. In retrospective first trimester studies, maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A have been reported as useful markers. Our objective was to confirm these results in a prospective study carried on an unselected population.In a cohort of pregnant women recruited prospectively between 9 and 13 weeks' gestation, we measured maternal free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A in all affected pregnancies and 500 representative uneffected pregnancies. Serum concentrations were transformed to multiples of the median value in normal pregnancies of the same length of gestation, and rates of detection of various combinations of the markers were estimated by multivariate analysis.Down syndrome was observed in 18 fetuses from the 10, 160 women recruited. Levels of free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin were elevated in affected pregnancies with an overall median value 1.8 times the median of women with normal pregnancies while pregnancy-associated plasma protein A was significantly diminished (0.51 multiples of the median). At a fixed false-positive risk of 10%, 33% (11-55), 50% (27-73), 44% (11-67), and 67% (45-89) of the affected pregnancies would have been detected (95% CI) with maternal age alone or combined with with free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A or both, respectively.We confirm in a prospective noninterventional study that maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A can be used in the first trimester of pregnancy to screen for Down syndrome with a performance similar to second trimester screening programs.Serum triple-marker screening in in vitro fertilization and naturally conceived pregnancies.To determine whether results of second-trimester maternal serum triple-marker screening for Down syndrome and open neural tube defects in singleton pregnancies conceived from in vitro fertilization (IVF) differ from those of pregnancies conceived spontaneously.The screen-positive rates and triple-marker levels of patients conceiving singleton pregnancies by IVF were compared to age-adjusted standards.Sixty-nine singleton IVF pregnancies with maternal serum screening were identified. Twenty-one (30.4%) of the 69 IVF singleton pregnancies had a positive screen for Down syndrome compared with a 14.4% expected screen-positive rate for the maternal age distribution in our observed sample (P = .013). The screen-positive rate for open neural tube defects in the measured population was similar to anticipated values based on historic controls (5.8% in IVF patients versus 5.3% in the total population). The median levels of the triple markers were 0.95 multiples of the median (MoM) for alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), 0.90 MoM for unconjugated estriol (E3), and 1.22 MoM for hCG.The increased hCG levels as well as the slightly lower AFP and unconjugated E3 levels may contribute to the higher Down syndrome screen-positive rate in this IVF singleton population. These results may be due to the number of embryos transferred, the maternal hormonal environment of the IVF process, or other factors. Pregnancies conceived by IVF may be twice as likely to have a positive maternal serum screening test. As additional data are collected, corrected standards should be determined.First-trimester urine free beta hCG, beta core, and total oestriol in pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome: implications for first-trimester screening with nuchal translucency and serum free beta hCG.We have examined maternal urine concentrations of beta core, free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and total oestriol in 373 control pregnancies and 43 pregnancies affected by aneuploidy (including 22 cases of Down's syndrome) in an attempt to see if any of the analytes have a value in Down's syndrome screening between the tenth and 14th week of pregnancy. We have compared the performance of these analytes against nuchal translucency measurement combined with maternal serum free beta hCG at the same period of pregnancy. Our results show that levels of urine free beta hCG and beta core are increased in Down's syndrome with average multiple of the median levels of 1.81 and 2.91, respectively. Urine total oestriol was reduced (0.83) whilst maternal serum free beta hCG was increased (1.72). In trisomy 18 the levels of all analytes were reduced, although serum free beta hCG was the most discriminating. The spread of results in the control and the Down's group for urine beta core was more than three times than that for serum free beta hCG and with urine free beta hCG it was two times wider. In combination with maternal age, urine total oestriol had a 32 per cent detection rate at a fixed 5 per cent false-positive rate; urine beta core 34 per cent, urine free beta hCG 36 per cent, maternal serum free beta hCG 44 per cent, and nuchal translucency 82 per cent. In combination with nuchal translucency, urine total oestriol added an extra 1 per cent detection, urine beta core an extra 2 per cent, urine free beta hCG an extra 3 per cent, and serum free beta hCG an extra 5 per cent. It is unlikely that any of the urine markers will be of value in first-trimester screening. Optimal first-trimester screening programmes will rely for the foreseeable future on nuchal translucency, serum free beta hCG, and possibly pregnancy-associated plasma protein A.Maternal serum free beta-hCG at 10 to 14 weeks of gestation in trisomic twin pregnancies.Maternal serum free beta-hCG was measured at 10 to 14 weeks of gestation in 136 normal twin pregnancies and in 12 twin pregnancies where one or both fetuses had trisomy 21. The values were compared with a normal range from 4181 singleton pregnancies. In the normal twins the median free beta-hCG (65 ng/mL) was about twice as high as in singletons (34 ng/mL z = -12.1, P < 0.0001). In the trisomy 21 group the median free beta-hCG (95 ng/mL) was significantly higher than in normal twins (z = 2.1, P < 0.05). However, only one of the trisomic pregnancies had a level above the 95th centile. In twin pregnancies maternal serum free beta-hCG at 10 to 14 weeks of gestation is unlikely to be useful in the prediction of fetal trisomy 21.Urinary beta-core hCG: screening for aneuploidies in early pregnancy (11-14 weeks' gestation).Initial studies at 17-22 weeks' gestation evaluating urinary beta-core human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) as a marker for Down's syndrome had suggested that it may have more potential than its serum counterpart. This study measured maternal urinary beta-core-hCG and creatinine at 11-14 weeks' gestation in a series of 26 aneuploidies (nine trisomy 21, five trisomy 18, four 45,X0, and eight others). The normal range for beta-core-hCG and beta-core-hCG/ creatinine was derived from 198 normal singleton pregnancies. Trisomy 18 cases (n = 5) had low maternal urinary beta-core-hCG creatinine levels (median 0.35 MOM, range 0.08-0.82 MOM). Whereas the other aneuploidies had no particular pattern; in particular, the trisomy 21 cases (n = 9) (median 1.16 MOM, range 0.3-4.74 MOM) did not differ significantly from 1 MOM. The findings imply that maternal urinary beta-core-hCG is not as discriminating for Down's syndrome between 11 and 14 weeks as later on in pregnancy.First trimester isolated fetal nuchal lucency: significance and outcome.In this study, we determined the outcome in cases of isolated nuchal lucency seen sonographically in the first trimester in fetuses without karyotypic abnormalities. We reviewed all cases of isolated localized fetal nuchal lucency (3 mm or greater) in 9 to 14 week fetuses over a 4 year period. Fetuses with additional sonographic abnormalities were excluded. The width of the nuchal lucency at initial sonogram as well as findings on subsequent scans were tabulated. Karyotypic, pathologic, and clinical follow-up data were obtained. Of 44 fetuses with an isolated, localized first trimester nuchal lucency, one was lost to follow-up and two were excluded owing to pregnancy termination without karyotype or pathologic analysis, thus resulting in 41 fetuses in our study group. Five fetuses (12%) had abnormal karyotypes. Twenty-seven of the remaining 36 fetuses had normal karyotypes, eight others showed no evidence of aneuploidy at birth, and one patient underwent spontaneous abortion prior to a karyotypic analysis. Among the 36 fetuses without evidence of aneuploidy, six had a poor outcome: two were spontaneous abortions, one was a therapeutic abortion of a fetus with hydrops and a pericardial effusion seen on fetopsy; one fetus died at birth of pulmonary hypoplasia associated with autosomal recessive polycystic kidney disease, and one fetus each had Noonan syndrome, and Joubert syndrome. In addition, three patients delivered their infants prematurely. Overall, 32 of 41 fetuses survived, and two (6%) were abnormal. Excluding premature infants, 27 were normally grown, term survivors. We conclude that other than having an increased risk for aneuploidy, fetuses with isolated nuchal lucency are also at risk for spontaneous miscarriage, premature delivery, and congenital anomalies unassociated with an abnormal karyotype.Maternal serum inhibin-A and free beta-hCG concentrations in trisomy 21 pregnancies at 10 to 14 weeks of gestation.To determine the relation between maternal serum inhibin-A and free beta-hCG concentrations in chromosomally normal pregnancies and to compare the two biochemical markers for their sensitivity in identifying trisomy 21 pregnancies.Inhibin-A and free beta-hCG were measured in maternal serum samples from 800 chromosomally normal singleton pregnancies at 10 to 14 weeks of gestation and 76 singleton pregnancies with fetal trisomy 21.In the normal group maternal serum inhibin-A was significantly associated with both maternal weight and gestational age (F = 11.2, P < 0.0001). In pregnancies with trisomy 21 the maternal serum inhibin-A and free beta-hCG concentrations were significantly increased (mean difference inhibin = 0.51 SD, F = 18, P < 0.0001 and mean difference free beta-hCG = 1.13 SD, F = 80, P < 0.0001). For a 5% false positive rate, the sensitivity of maternal serum free beta-hCG in identifying pregnancies with trisomy 21 was 28.9% compared with 12.8% for maternal serum inhibin-A. Delta inhibin-A was significantly associated with delta-free beta-hCG (r = 0.345, P < 0.01) and the deviation from the normal mean for free beta-hCG was significantly greater than the deviation for inhibin-A (t = 4.0, P < 0.0001). For a 5% false positive rate, the sensitivity achieved by combining information from delta inhibin-A and delta free beta-hCG was similar to the sensitivity of free beta-hCG alone (30.3% compared with 28.9%).At 10 to 14 weeks of gestation fetal trisomy 21 is associated with increased maternal serum inhibin-A and free beta-hCG levels. However, the degree of elevation of inhibin-A is less than that of free beta-hCG, and there is a significant association between levels of the two proteins. The sensitivity for trisomy 21 achieved with the combination of maternal serum inhibin-A and free beta-hCG is not significantly different from that achieved with maternal serum free beta-hCG alone.Maternal serum screening for fetal genetic disorders.Maternal serum analyte screening is an integral component of contemporary antenatal care. Based on elevated MSAFP levels, 85% to 90% of NTDs (e.g., anencephaly or spina bifida) can be detected. Using a combination of serum analytes (e.g., MSAFP, hCG, UE3) 55% to 60% of fetal Down's syndrome can be detected. Future strategies for Down's syndrome screening may include the use of new markers such as dimeric inhibin-A and urinary beta-core fragment of hCG, as well as first-trimester screening, particularly with PAPP-A and free beta-hCG.[Biochemical and ultrasonic screening of chromosomal aneuploidies in the second trimester of pregnancy].For prenatal screening of chromosomal aneuploidies (primarily the most frequent Down syndrome) maternal serum AFP screening in the second trimester of pregnancy has been supplemented by the determination of hCG in Hajdú-Bihar county. In pregnancies at risk on the basis of biochemical tests, a thorough, aimed ultrasound examination for the detection of minor and major anomalies characteristic for chromosomal abnormalities was carried out. If both biochemical and ultrasound examinations were suggestive of high risk prenatal karyotyping was offered. During a two-years prospective study 14328 pregnancies were screened. Authors could detect 38% of Down-syndrome cases prenatally, 5 cases in pregnant women at age under 35 years and at the same time the number of amniocenteses increased only by 70. It was concluded that 66% of all Down syndrome cases could have been prenatally diagnosed if prenatal chromosome test were performed in all cases at high risk on the basis of screening tests and maternal age.Maternal urinary beta-core hCG in chromosomally abnormal pregnancies in the first trimester.We evaluated urinary beta-core human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-core hCG) in the detection of fetal Down's syndrome (DS) in the first trimester of pregnancy. Urine was collected prior to performing chorionic villous sampling (CVS) between 10 and 12 completed weeks from the last menstrual period. In the 9 months of the study, there were 15 chromosomal abnormalities detected by CVS: five trisomy 21, four monosomy X, two trisomy 18, and four cases of confined placental mosaicism (CPM). In these 15 aneuploid pregnancies, the levels of urinary beta-core hCG were expressed as multiples of the median (MOM) of the ratio of beta-core hCG/creatinine for gestational age. The MOMs of this ratio in each of the five DS pregnancies were 0.2, 0.5, 1.3, 1.4, and 1.7. No difference was found between fetuses with DS or any of the other chromosomal abnormalities tested and normal fetuses. Contrary to optimistic reports of urinary beta-core hCG in the second-trimester detection of fetal DS, our data suggest that this is not a useful screening test for DS in the first trimester of pregnancy.Schwangerschaftsprotein 1 (SP1) as a maternal serum marker for Down syndrome in the first and second trimesters.The potential of the maternal serum concentration of schwangerschaftsprotein 1 (MSSP1) as a marker for Down syndrome (DS) pregnancies was evaluated in the fifth to the 20th gestational week using 156 DS pregnancies and 546 unaffected control pregnancies. In DS pregnancies, the median of the multiple of the median (MOM) of MSSP1 was 0.27 [95 per cent confidence interval (CI) 0.11-0.59] in weeks 5-9 (n = 25) and 1.28 (CI 1.11-1.49) in weeks 14-20 (n = 117), significantly different from controls (P < 10(-6). In weeks 10-12, the median MSSP1 MOM was 0.89 (CI 0.20-2.09) (n = 14), not different from controls (P = 0.42). Using MSSP1 alone as a marker for DS gave--in empirical receiver-operator-characteristics (ROC) analysis--a detection rate of about 44 percent for a false-positive rate of about 5 per cent in weeks 5-9 (using MSSP1 MOM < or = cut-off), whereas a sensitivity of about 20 percent was found for a false-positive rate of 5 percent in weeks 14-20 (using MSSP1 MOM > or = cut-off). In parameterized ROC analysis, the detection rates were 38 and 18 percent for a false-positive rate of 5 per cent in weeks 5-9 and 14-20, respectively.Race-ethnicity-specific variation in multiple-marker biochemical screening: alpha-fetoprotein, hCG, and estriol.To identify any race-ethnicity-specific differences in serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), hCG, and unconjugated estriol (E3) levels in women between 14 and 21 weeks' gestation.Data from the 3-year period 1992-1994 were analyzed from 208,257 women who had AFP screening, of whom 155,142 also had hCG and 62,121 also had E3 screened, between 14 and 21 weeks' gestation. Subjects were categorized into four groups: white, black, Asian, and Hispanic.There was a consistent pattern of analyte differences across gestational ages. Levels for AFP were generally higher in Asian and black women than in Hispanic and white women (median AFP at 16 weeks-31.2, 30.9, 27.4, 27.3, respectively), and levels of hCG and E3 were highest in Asians (hCG at 16 weeks-34.7, 30.3, 28.2, 26.8, respectively). Weight correction for AFP, hCG, and E3 levels did not compensate for the ethnic differences.Because hCG and E3 demonstrate the same general pattern of differences as AFP among ethnic groups, averaging values for all ethnic groups tends inappropriately to lower calculated Down syndrome risks for black and Asian women. Additionally, the slopes of the curves are not parallel, such that separate data bases are preferable to multiplicative correction factors. Separate data bases should be used in laboratories with volume sufficient to permit the establishment of race-ethnicity-specific regressions. Use of separate data bases should result in more accurate screening.Medians for second-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated estriol; differences between races or ethnic groups.Second-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE3) are routinely measured in screening fetuses at high risk for Down syndrome or open neural tube defects (ONTD). For test interpretation, individual patient values of these three analytes are related to population-derived median values. We evaluated data from >21000 pregnancies to determine the extent of race-specific differences in median concentrations. For samples at most gestational ages, median AFP, hCG, and uE3 values for white, black, Hispanic, and other patients were all significantly different. Differences remained significant even when data were corrected for patient weights. For each analyte, the extent of the variation was not the same at different gestational ages. Differences in median values across race/ethnicity groups appear to have only a small impact in Down syndrome screening but it may be appropriate to use alternative sets of AFP medians or adjustment factors to AFP medians for some Asian populations receiving ONTD screening.Sonography in the first trimester screening of trisomy 21 and other fetal aneuploidies.Detection of beta-core fragment in second trimester Down's syndrome pregnancies.Urinary analysis for Down's syndrome: is the measurement of urinary beta-core the future of biochemical screening for Down's syndrome.Most Down's Screening protocols have concentrated on the analysis of oncofetal antigen levels present in serum. Urine has largely been ignored, but mass screening based on a urine text has several logistical advantages. We have examined the levels of urinary beta-core as a marker of Down's syndrome. (beta-core is a major immunoreactive degradation product of hCG and in particular its beta-subunit). Elevated maternal serum hCG is the single most effective biochemical marker of Down's syndrome and levels are more than doubled. Measurement of elevated free beta-subunit has been shown to be a superior discriminator than measurement of intact or total-hCG. This was shown by an increase in comparative serum levels from 2.04 to 2.41 multiples of the control population medium (MoM). The median MoM value of beta-core for Down's cases in studies has varied between 4.38 and 6.28. The proportion of true Down's cases having a beta-core value greater than the 95th centile of the controls varied from 61 to 93%. This is far superior to any single serum marker. If other complimentary urinary markers can be found urinary screening could replace serum screening not only because of the logistical advantages but increased sensitivity.Prenatal screening for Down syndrome: should first trimester ultrasound replace maternal serum screening?Refinements in managing maternal weight adjustment for interpreting prenatal screening results.This study examines the relationship between maternal weight and serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol, and human chorionic gonadotropin in a population of 47,585 women being provided with prenatal screening for Down's syndrome and open neural tube defects. The study population contains sufficient numbers of women at the extremes of weight to allow the determination that a reciprocal-linear equation more accurately describes the weight relationship for two of the three analytes than the currently used log-linear equations. The reciprocal-linear equations, while more appropriate, provide only a minimal advantage over the log-linear equations. A more important finding is that published weight equations may not be optimal for some screening programmes, due to differences in the mean weight of the populations being tested. Screening programmes are encouraged to calculate their own weight correction formulae, based on data from their own population, and to monitor the mean maternal weight to detect when modifications in the weight correction formulae might be indicated.Down's syndrome screening marker levels following assisted reproduction.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) levels were examined in 1632 women who had ovulation induction and 327 who had in vitro fertilization. There was a highly statistically significant increase in hCG and reduction in uE3 among those with ovulation induction. The median levels were respectively 1.09 and 0.92 multiples of the normal gestation-specific median (MOM) based on a total of 34582 women. Ovulation induction appeared to have no material effect on the median AFP level but this masked a significant increase when treatment was with Clomiphene (1.05 MOM) and a significant decrease when Pergonal was used (0.93 MOM). There was a highly statistically significant reduction in uE3 among women having in vitro fertilization with a median level of 0.92 MOM. Those fertilized with a donor egg (21) had significantly higher AFP and uE3 levels than when their own egg was used. Our results were confounded by differences in gravidity, but formally allowing for this factor did not materially change the findings. None of the observed effects is great enough to warrant routine adjustment of marker levels to allow for them. Moreover, women with positive Down's syndrome screening results can be reassured that this is unlikely to be due to them having had assisted reproduction.Second-trimester dimeric inhibin-A in Down's syndrome screening.Initial studies of immunoreactive inhibin using a commercial assay have shown levels to be increased in three second-trimester series of maternal samples from Down's syndrome-affected pregnancies. This assay detected non-specifically all forms of circulating inhibin, dimeric and free alpha subunits, whether fully or partially processed. More recently, a new specific assay for dimeric inhibin-A has shown elevated results in both a first-trimester and a second-trimester series of cases. In order to assess the value of dimeric inhibin-A as a potential marker in the second trimester, we have analysed 157 Down's syndrome cases and used 367 unaffected cases across the gestational range 14-20 weeks to establish control medians and population parameters. In our series, the median MOM in Down's cases was 1.77, significantly higher than in the controls. At a 5 per cent false-positive rate, dimeric inhibin-A alone identified 37 per cent of cases. When used in conjunction with maternal age and other marker combinations, mathematical modelling showed detection rates rising from 48 per cent (inhibin-A plus age) to 61 per cent (inhibin-A, free beta hCG, age) and 68 per cent (inhibin-A, AFP, free beta hCG, age). Our data suggest that dimeric inhibin-A may have greater potential earlier in gestation when median levels at 14-16 weeks are 1.92 compared with 1.46 at 17-23 weeks. Dimeric inhibin-A may be a valuable addition to screening protocols, particularly in early gestations.Combining inhibin A with existing second-trimester markers in maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome.To assess the value of inhibin A as an additional second-trimester maternal serum marker of Down's syndrome we studied 56 affected and 280 unaffected pregnancies matched for gestational age. The median level in the cases was 1.62 multiples of the gestation-specific median (MOM) in the controls, with 95 per cent confidence limits of 1.34-1.96. The distribution of inhibin levels in affected and unaffected pregnancies was approximately log Gaussian, with means about 1 standard deviation apart. This degree of separation was similar to that for human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), free beta-hCG, and unconjugated oestriol (uE3), but about double that of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) measured in the same samples. Inhibin was largely uncorrelated with AFP and uE3, whereas the log correlation coefficient with hCG was 0.29 (P = 0.19) for Down's syndrome and 0.41 (P < 0.0001) for unaffected pregnancies; with free beta-hCG, it was 0.18 (P = 0.38) and 0.38 (P < 0.0001), respectively. On the basis of these results and other published studies, we estimate that measuring inhibin A in addition to AFP and hCG or free beta-hCG (with or without uE3) will increase the detection rate for a fixed 5 per cent false-positive rate by about 7 per cent.Screening for Down's syndrome: experience in an inner city health district.To review the experience of Down's syndrome screening in an inner city health district.In this retrospective study the names of the women were obtained from the Regional Cytogenetic Laboratory and District Down's Syndrome Register. Antenatal notes of the mothers were studied. Maternal age during the affected pregnancy, screening test performed if any, gestational age at booking and at screening, screening test results, and pregnancy outcome were reviewed.An inner city health district.Down's syndrome cases diagnosed prenatally and postnatally.None.Antenatal diagnosis of Down's syndrome was made in 15/45 women (33.3%); Edwards' syndrome was diagnosed antenatally in 2/5 women. Screening was not performed in eight women (17.8%) whose infants were affected by Down's Syndrome; it was also not performed in one woman whose baby was affected by Edwards' syndrome due to late presentation to the antenatal clinic or loss of the blood sample. Nineteen women (42.2%) with a Down's syndrome pregnancy and two women with a Edwards' syndrome pregnancy had had a negative screening test. Three women had had a positive screening test but declined amniocentesis. Among those who had a screening test, the overall detection rate of screening was 48.6% (18/37) for Down's syndrome and 50% (2/4) for Edwards' syndrome. The detection rates in different ethnic groups did not show significant difference. Four women chose not to have termination following diagnosis of Down's syndrome, giving a total reduction rate of 21%.Screening programmes for Down's syndrome have not yet resulted in a substantial reduction in the number of affected babies. In addition to trials at developing screening programmes with better detection rates, efforts should be made to improve the provision of the screening service and the quality of antenatal care in general with emphasis on early presentation and optimal understanding of the implications of the tests.Heat-stable and immunoreactive placental alkaline phosphatase in maternal serum from Down's syndrome and trisomy 18 pregnancies.Placental alkaline phosphatase (ALP) activity was investigated in second-trimester maternal sera from 37 pregnancies with Down's syndrome, 28 pregnancies with trisomy 18, and in a series of 497 controls using a fluorimetric heat inactivation assay and specific immunoassay. After conversion of individual analyte values to multiples of the normal gestational median (MOM), no significant differences in total or placental ALP activities were found in the trisomy 21 or trisomy 18 cases (P > 0.01). In the Down's syndrome pregnancies, total ALP activity was 0.93 MOM, heat-stable ALP activity was 1.09 MOM, and placental ALP (by immunoassay) 0.96 MOM. In the trisomy 18 cases, total ALP activity was 0.90 MOM, heat-stable ALP activity was 0.79 MOM, and placental ALP (by immunoassay) 0.94 MOM. We conclude that neither total nor placental ALP activity is a useful marker for Down's syndrome or trisomy 18 screening.Insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus and prenatal screening results: current experience from a regional screening programme.From around 91,000 women having routine prenatal screening for Down's syndrome and neural tube defects between July 1992 and October 1995, 261 women were identified as having insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM). Alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) levels were reduced in these women, with median levels of 0.89 and 0.91 multiples of the median (MOM), respectively. The IDDM patients had a median weight which was 6 kg heavier than that of non-IDDM women. After correction for maternal weight, the AFP and hCG levels in the IDDM patients were 0.98 and 0.92 MOM, respectively. In routine practice, using results which were not weight-corrected, the IDDM women were neither over- nor under-represented in the high-risk group for Down's syndrome, but showed a tendency to be under-represented in the high-risk group for neural tube defects.Maternal serum inhibin-A levels in twin pregnancies: implications for screening for Down's syndrome.A nested case-control study using stored serum samples collected as part of a prospective study of the outcome of pregnancy was performed to investigate concentrations of (dimeric) inhibin-A in maternal serum between 15 and 22 weeks of pregnancy in 200 twin pregnancies and 600 singleton control pregnancies. Each twin pregnancy was matched with three singleton pregnancies for gestational age (same completed week) and duration of sample storage (same calendar year), although for one twin there was insufficient serum. The median inhibin-A level in the twin pregnancies was 1.99 multiples of the median (MOM) for singleton pregnancies (P < 0.001) [95 per cent confidence interval (CI) 1.83-2.16]. These results enable inhibin-A values to be adjusted so that prenatal screening for Down's syndrome can be performed using this marker in twin pregnancies as well as in singleton pregnancies.Maternal serum inhibin-A in pregnancies with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus: implications for screening for Down's syndrome.A nested case-control study using stored serum samples collected as part of a prospective study of the outcome of pregnancy was performed to investigate concentrations of (dimeric) inhibin-A in maternal serum between 15 and 22 weeks of pregnancy in 126 pregnancies among 92 women with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM). Each IDDM pregnancy was matched with two control singleton pregnancies for gestational age (same completed week) and duration of sample storage (same calendar quarter). The median inhibin-A level in the IDDM pregnancies was 0.88 multiples of the median (MOM) for pregnancies without IDDM at the same gestational age (P = 0.05) (95 per cent confidence interval 0.78-1.00) or 0.91 MOM after adjustment for maternal weight. These results enable inhibin-A values to be adjusted so that prenatal screening for Down's syndrome can be performed using this marker in IDDM pregnancies as well as in non-diabetic pregnancies.Nuchal translucency cannot be used as a screening test for chromosomal abnormalities in the first trimester of pregnancy in a routine ultrasound practice.We decided to assess the practicability of introducing nuchal translucency (NT) measurements as a screening programme for fetal Down's syndrome in the first trimester of pregnancy, within the population of women who receive ultrasound examinations in our department. Over a 1-year period, measurements were made in 923 fetuses at < or = 13 weeks' gestation. Fifty-two per cent of the mothers were 36 years or older or had a past history of a chromosomally abnormal fetus or child. Measurements were only successful 58 per cent of the time; this improved to 74 per cent if the fetus was > or = 10 weeks' gestation. Inter-observer variability did not cause a major problem. There were 36 fetuses with an NT > or = 3 mm. Two of these fetuses had a chromosomal abnormality (both trisomy 21). The translucency in these two cases was so large that they would have been detected and offered prenatal diagnosis even prior to this study. There was a total of ten aneuploidies in the study group. Only two of these fetuses were detected by this screening method; five had an NT measurement < 3 mm and in three fetuses (all trisomy 21), measurements were not successful. We outline the practical problems that could be expected by introducing ultrasound screening in a routine setting. Although the efficacy of the test in a research setting may seem good, the effectiveness in everyday usage appears much less impressive, making its uptake as a screening technique in a general ultrasound practice at this stage imprudent.Abnormal biochemical serum screening versus 2nd-trimester ultrasound-detected minor anomalies as predictors of aneuploidy in low-risk patients.To compare the yield of multiple-marker biochemical screening with that of minor fetal anomalies observed on ultrasound for detection of aneuploidy in low-risk patients.The results of 1,073 amniocenteses performed because of abnormal biochemical screening tests were compared against 197 amniocenteses performed for minor anomalies as detected on level II ultrasound at 15-22 weeks of gestation.False-positive results were observed in about 7% of serum screening patients and in 1.7% of the ultrasound cases. Chromosomally abnormal fetuses were detected in 2% of the amniocenteses performed because of abnormal serum screening and in 2.5% of the cases with ultrasound-defined minor anomalies.Both methods identify patients at risk for abnormal karyotypes. Although the evaluation of serum biochemical markers yielded more false-positive results, it is more suitable than ultrasound for mass population screening.Risk of Down syndrome and any clinically significant chromosome defect in pregnancies with abnormal triple-screen and normal targeted ultrasonographic results.Our purpose was to study prospectively the use of ultrasonographic biometry to refine the risk estimates for both Down syndrome and any clinically significant chromosome defect in women with abnormal biochemical triple-screen results.Ultrasonographic biometry and anatomic survey were performed on study and control cases. Expected values for humerus, femur, combined humerus plus femur lengths, and abdominal circumference were generated on the basis of biparietal diameter obtained from a normal group. Threshold observed/expected values of each measurement for screening for Down syndrome and clinically significant chromosome defects were determined with receiver-operator characteristic curves. By stepwise logistic regression analysis the optimal screening parameters, including nuchal thickness, for detection of Down syndrome and clinically significant chromosome defect were determined. Risk tables for chromosome anomalies were developed on the basis of ultrasonography and triple-screen values.Of 1034 cases at risk for Down syndrome (risk > or = 1/270) or trisomy 18 on the basis of triple-screen results, there were 11 cases of Down syndrome, 1 of trisomy 18, and 17 clinically significant chromosome defects. Abnormal nuchal thickness or observed/expected humerus length < 0.92 was the most sensitive parameter for Down syndrome detection. Abnormal nuchal thickness or observed/expected combined femur and humerus length < 0.90 was the most sensitive for significant chromosome defects. With abnormal biometry or anatomy the Down syndrome risk was 8 of 127 versus 1 of 753 in normals, odds ratio 50.4 (95% confidence interval 6.4 to 90.2), p < 0.00001, and the risk of significant defects was 11 of 90 versus 6 of 830 in normals, odds ratio 19.3 (95% confidence interval 6.4 to 60.5), p < 0.00001. In a pregnancy with a 1 in 270 triple-screen risk for Down syndrome, normal biometric and anatomic results reduce the risk to 1 in 2100.Normal ultrasonographic anatomy and biometry significantly reduces the risk of both Down syndrome and any significant chromosome defects in pregnancies with abnormal triple-screen results.Triple marker screening in native Japanese women.Prenatal screening using the maternal serum markers alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated oestriol was investigated in a native Japanese population. Comparison with a Caucasian U.S. population revealed differences which led to modification of the generally used equations for risk calculations. Prenatal screening was shown to be clinically useful.Serum markers for Down's syndrome in relation to number of previous births and maternal age.We conducted a study to investigate the effect of parity on the following six serum markers used in screening for Down's syndrome, after adjusting them for ethnic group and maternal weight: alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), free alpha-hCG, free beta-hCG, and dimeric inhibin A. We aimed to estimate the effect of adjusting for any differences found on the screening performance. AFP, uE3, and hCG concentrations were available from 16,666 women with singleton pregnancies without Down's syndrome or neural tube defects and without insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus, who were screened between 15 and 22 weeks' gestational age. Stored serum samples were available on a subset of 1347 women and these were used to measure free alpha-hCG, free beta-hCG, and inhibin A. Serum concentrations were expressed as multiples of the median (MOM) for women of the same gestational age, weight, and ethnic group. Of the six markers, only hCG levels were affected by parity; hCG levels decreased by 3.1 per cent per previous birth (95 per cent confidence interval 2.2-4.0 per cent); there was no significant relationship between the number of previous abortions and hCG level after adjustment for the number of previous births. The effect of previous births on hCG was not due to maternal age. Only AFP was affected by maternal age, but the effect was small; levels increased by 4.4 per cent per 10 years of age (3.2-5.7 per cent). It is not worthwhile adjusting serum markers for parity or for maternal age in prenatal screening for Down's syndrome because their effect on the performance of screening is negligible.Effect of allowing for ethnic group in prenatal screening for Down's syndrome.We conducted a study to investigate ethnic group differences in levels of serum markers used in screening for Down's syndrome [serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), free alpha- and free beta-hCG, and dimeric inhibin-A], to estimate the extent to which maternal weight differences between ethnic groups explain these differences, and to estimate the effect of adjusting for ethnic group and maternal weight on screening performance. Serum measurements were taken from women who were screened prenatally for Down's syndrome. AFP, uE3, and hCG concentrations were available from 9462 white, 4215 black, and 4392 South Asian women with singleton pregnancies without Down's syndrome or neural tube defects between 15 and 22 weeks' gestational age. Frozen serum samples were available from a subset of 922 white, 449 black, and 135 South Asian women and were used for measurement of free alpha-hCG, free beta-hCG, and inhibin. Values were expressed as multiples of the median (MOM) for women of the same gestational age. There were statistically significant differences in the serum marker levels between ethnic groups that were not explained by differences in maternal weight. The main differences were found in black women compared with white women; black women had serum AFP levels 22 per cent higher (95 per cent confidence interval 20-24 per cent), total hCG levels 19 per cent higher (16-22 per cent), and free beta-hCG levels 12 per cent (3-21 per cent) higher. The other differences were less than 10 per cent. Adjusting for ethnic group only had a small estimated effect on screening performance: a maximum of about 0.5 per cent extra detection at a 5 per cent false-positive rate. At a fixed risk cut-off level, the false-positive rate will not be materially different between different ethnic groups. Adjusting serum markers for ethnic groups improves Down's syndrome screening performance to a very small extent. It is worthwhile because of its established value in AFP screening for open neural tube defects.Can reliable Down's syndrome detection rates be determined from prenatal screening intervention trials?OBJECTIVES - To develop a standardised approach for analysing Down's syndrome screening performance in clinical practice and to apply it to published intervention trials in order to estimate detection and false positive rates more accurately. METHODS - Peer reviewed intervention trials, grouped by specific combination of analytes, were reanalysed. Revised detection rates were calculated for each study, taking into account both the high spontaneous loss during the last half of pregnancy and the possible under ascertainment of Down's syndrome live births not detected by screening. Collective screening performance was estimated, when possible, using a published methodology based on fitting receiver-operator characteristic curves. RESULTS - Sixteen trials were analysed; 11 using three, and five using two, analytes. Collective screening performance for the triple analyte trials was Down's syndrome detection rates of 57, 64, and 69% at amniocentesis referral rates of 3, 5, and 7% respectively. Four of the five studies involving two analytes performed less well, individually, when compared with the overall performance of the three analyte studies. It was not possible to estimate collective performance for the two analyte studies because there were too few. CONCLUSIONS - Accurate Down's syndrome detection rates are difficult to obtain in intervention trials owing to two potential biases, both of which tend to produce overestimates of the true rates. These sources of bias need to be taken into account when analysing and reporting Down's syndrome intervention trials. The methodology presented here offers the opportunity to achieve a more reliable, standardised estimate of both individual and collective intervention trial screening performance.Second trimester levels of maternal serum inhibin A, total inhibin, alpha inhibin precursor, and activin in Down's syndrome pregnancy.To determine the levels of various biochemical forms of the placental protein, inhibin (total inhibin, inhibin A, and alpha inhibin precursor) and activin in maternal serum samples from fetal Down's syndrome, and to determine which of these analytes most effectively identifies samples from affected pregnancies.Maternal serum samples were collected from 100 unaffected pregnancies and 20 cases of fetal Down's syndrome during gestational weeks 15-20 for routine triple marker screening, and were stored frozen after clinical assay. Levels of inhibin A, total inhibin, alpha inhibin precursor (pro-alphaC), and activin were compared retrospectively in the Down's syndrome cases and control samples.There was no association of the inhibin or activin levels with gestational age or length of freezer storage, and therefore single median values were determined for the unaffected pregnancies for each analyte. Multiples of the unaffected median (MoM) values were calculated for all cases, showing that inhibin A (1.95 MoM) provided the best discrimination between cases and controls, followed by total inhibin (1.37 MoM). Mann-Whitney U analysis showed significant group differences in inhibin A (P = 0.0001) and total inhibin (P = 0.0005). In contrast, alpha inhibin precursor (0.81 MoM) and activin (1.16 MoM) levels in Down's syndrome cases were not significantly different from those in unaffected patients.Levels of inhibin A and total inhibin, but not alpha inhibin precursor or activin, are significantly raised in maternal serum from cases of fetal Down's syndrome. These data, taken together, indicate that inhibin A levels are specifically raised in Down's syndrome pregnancy. 45% of the inhibin A levels in the Down's syndrome samples were above the 90th centile of unaffected levels, indicating that inhibin A may be as good a marker as human chorionic gonadotrophin, the most informative serum marker currently in use.First-trimester biochemical screening for Down syndrome with the use of PAPP-A, AFP, and beta-hCG.Biochemical screening for Down syndrome (DS) is well established in the second trimester of pregnancy, but there is little information available on its value in the first trimester. This study describes our preliminary results with biochemical screening for DS in the first trimester of pregnancy in order to evaluate its efficacy at this time. Our study population, including 19 DS pregnancies, was evaluated using maternal serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG), and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A). At a false positive rate (FPR) of 5 per cent, the detection rate (DR) for DS is 9 per cent for beta-hCG, 18 per cent for AFP, and 66 per cent for PAPP-A when considering these parameters individually. With different combinations of the analytes, the best detection rates are obtained with the association of PAPP-A and AFP (85 and 82 per cent DR for a 10 and 5 per cent FPR, respectively). Our data support the value of first-trimester biochemical screening for DS and that of PAPP-A as a single marker.Maternal serum triple analyte screening and adverse pregnancy outcome.The prognostic value of maternal serum triple analyte screening with AFP, hCG and uE3 (unconjugated estriol) was studied early in the second trimester of pregnancy. In this case-control study of 38 women and 76 matched controls derived from a consecutive screened population of 28,897, case selection was based upon elevated MSAFP and MShCG (> or = 2 MOM) and low MSuE3 (< or = 0.6 MOM). Adverse pregnancy outcome was found in 65.8% of cases and 2.6% of controls (RR 25, 95% CI 6.3-100.0). When increased odds (> or = 1 in 270) for Down's syndrome were considered with the abnormal analyte screen, fetal/congenital defects, fetal neonatal loss or low birth weight were noted in 17/26 cases (65.4%). Elevated MSAFP and MShCG with low values for estriol, with or without increased odds for Down's syndrome, imply an unfavorable prognosis for both the fetus and the child.Maternal serum screening for fetal Down syndrome in IVF pregnancies.To assess the influence of in vitro fertilization (IVF) on maternal serum human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), the maternal serum hCG and AFP values were studied in 67 IVF pregnancies and compared with the results of a control group of 4732 spontaneously conceiving patients. Maternal serum hCG was significantly higher and AFP significantly lower in the IVF group. Possible explanations and implications for prenatal diagnosis in IVF pregnancies are discussed.Multiple marker screening for Down syndrome in twin pregnancies.This study documents the screening performance, in practice, of a published protocol for interpreting second-trimester Down syndrome risk in twin pregnancies, using maternal serum biochemical markers. Within a cohort of 35,150 pregnancies, 410 twin pregnancies were identified. The rate of twinning was positively associated with maternal age. Of the 274 twin pregnancies known prior to screening, 15 (5.5 per cent) were classified as being screen-positive for Down syndrome. When maternal age and dating method were taken into account, the screen-positive rates in twin and singleton pregnancies did not differ significantly. Nine of the 14 screen-positive women with viable twin pregnancies chose amniocentesis [64 per cent, 95 per cent confidence interval (CI) 35-87]. No cases of Down syndrome were identified. Based on modelling, an estimated 73 per cent of monozygotic twin pregnancies and 43 per cent of dizygotic twin pregnancies with Down syndrome would be identified at a 5 per cent false-positive rate. The overall detection rate would be about 53 per cent. When laboratories offer multiple marker screening to women with twin pregnancies, the false-positive rate ought to be similar to that found in singleton pregnancies; the detection rate is, however, likely to be lower for dizygotic twins.Similarity of insulin-dependent diabetics' and non-insulin-dependent diabetics' levels of beta-hCG and unconjugated estriol with controls: no need to adjust as with alpha-fetoprotein.To determine if the same systematic alteration of serum values seen for alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) in diabetic patients is also seen for beta-hCG and unconjugated estriol (uE3).Serum AFP, beta-hCG, and uE3 results were obtained in 18,639 patients for whom complete follow-up information was obtained. Patients were divided into euglycemic (n = 18,088), insulin-requiring diabetics (n = 104), and non-insulin-requiring diabetics (n = 437), as well as by race.The 20% adjustment used for AFP appropriately corrects serum values. No such systematic variation is seen for either beta-hCG or uE3 by glycemic status or race.No adjustment for beta-hCG or uE3 is necessary for diabetes for biochemical screening programs.Prenatal screening using maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated estriol: two-year experience in a health maintenance organization.The objective of this study was to evaluate a 2-year experience in a health maintenance organization with mid-trimester maternal serum screening with alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (HCG), and unconjugated estriol (UE) as a screen for fetal Down's syndrome. Women at 15-20 weeks gestation were offered triple marker screening. A patient-specific second trimester risk of 1:295 for Down's syndrome was used as a threshold for referral. Women at risk for trisomy 18 were identified by a protocol with fixed low cutoffs. The AFP threshold for referral for neural tube defects (NTD) was 2.0 multiples of the median (MoM). Patients at risk were offered ultrasonography, genetic counseling, and prenatal diagnosis. A total of 6,474 samples were drawn. The initial screen positive rate for Down's syndrome was 7.1%. After ultrasound evaluation, 351 (5.7%) of the remaining 6,197 women were still at risk for Down's syndrome. After genetic counseling, 292 (4.7%) women underwent prenatal diagnosis. Overall, 12 of 16 (75%) cases of Down's syndrome were detected antenatally by triple marker screening. Using AFP alone, only 3 of 14 (21%) cases of Down's syndrome in women under 35 years would have been detected. We detected 1 abnormal karyotype (including one 45, X) for every 22 amniocenteses performed for abnormal Down's syndrome screening. For trisomy 18, 13 women (0.2%) were at risk and, of these, 3 cases were diagnosed. All 6 cases of NTD during the study period were detected by AFP after identifying 3.8% of women as at risk. In conclusion, in the setting of a health maintenance organization where abnormal screening tests were managed by a single referral center, triple marker screening was effective not only for screening for fetal Down's syndrome, but also for trisomy 18 and NTD.Maternal serum screening of fetal chromosomal abnormalities by AFP, UE3, hCG and free-beta hCG. Prospective and retrospective results.We have conducted a prospective study to ascertain the reliability of the triple test in detecting aneuploid fetuses in a Mediterranean, pregnant population. 2978 singleton pregnancies in the 15-22 completed week's gestational range were enrolled in this study between January 1992 and June 1994. The measurements of the analytes AFP, hCG and UE3 in the maternal serum combined with maternal age in a multivariate risk approach were utilized to detect pregnancies at increased risk (cut of > or = 1:270) to undergo prenatal diagnosis by amniocentesis. This screening was preferentially reserved to young patients (median age of the population 29 years). 212 pregnancies resulted screen positive to triple test and 178 accepted fetal chromosomal analysis. Three Down's syndrome, a Turner 45XO and a triploidy 69XXY were detected in the sample undergoing prenatal diagnosis. One aneuploid pregnancy (Down's syndrome) was recorded in the population with negative result (risk < 1:270). As part of this study we have subsequently compared the sensitivity of the test substituting total hCG with free-beta marker in samples from aneuploid pregnancies (16 cases) and unaffected pregnancies (300 cases). The detection rate for the two combinations was identical (81%) as well as the false positive rate (5.7% versus 5.3%) derived from the normal samples. All together these combined results of our study support the increasing call for triple test in screening programmes and indicate that further data be collected before recommending the replacement of total hCG with free-beta analyte.Effect of in vitro fertilization on human chorionic gonadotropin serum concentrations and Down's syndrome screening.To investigate the association between IVF and Down's syndrome screening analytes (alpha-fetoprotein [AFP] and hCG) during the second trimester.Retrospective analysis.University-based tertiary care infertility clinic.Data on 41 consecutive singleton IVF pregnancies and 4,935 naturally occurring singleton pregnancies.Maternal serum hCG concentrations were elevated (mean 1.52 multiples of the median [MoM]) in IVF pregnancies, whereas there were no significant differences in AFP levels (mean 1.02 MoM). The mean maternal age was higher in the subjects than in controls (33.8 compared with 28.7 years). In relation to Down's syndrome risk assessment, the pattern of the two markers, together with maternal age, indicated high risk more often in the study subjects than in the controls. In vitro fertilization patients had a false-positive rate of 26.8% compared with 6.6% in women without fertility problems.The increased false-positive rate in Down's syndrome screening is related not only to advanced maternal age but also, in part, to the elevated hCG concentrations observed in pregnancies after assisted reproduction. The mechanism behind increased hCG production remains to be elucidated, but it may be an effect associated with infertility or the procedures by which these women conceive. To provide an objective assessment of an individual patient's risk of fetal abnormality, the impact of IVF on hCG biochemistry should be studied further in larger samples and adjustments made if appropriate.Multiple marker screening in multifetal gestations: failure to predict adverse pregnancy outcomes.The objective of the study was to assess whether the association known in singleton pregnancies of high maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) or human chorionic gonadotropin (HCG) with adverse outcomes applies also to multifetal gestations. Maternal serum AFP and HCG were evaluated in 207 multifetal pregnancies. High values were defined as a maternal serum AFP of > 4.5 and a HCG of > 4.0 multiples of the median (MoM), with appropriate adjustments. Results were correlated with premature delivery, stillbirths, or pregnancy termination for fetal anomalies. There were 10 stillbirths, 7 terminations of pregnancy for fetal anomalies, and 66 premature deliveries in the study group. Maternal serum AFP was somewhat higher in abnormal pregnancies than in those with normal outcome (3.4 vs. 2.5 MoM, respectively, NS). A high AFP level was found in 6% of pregnancies with adverse outcomes and in 4% of uncomplicated gestations (NS). High HCG values, also observed in 5% of cases, were all associated with normal outcome. Multiple marker screening suggested an increased risk for aneuploidy in 9% of patients, all of whom were euploid on amniocentesis karyotypes. Maternal serum screening in multiple gestations is confounded by the differing contributions of fetuses, and abnormal results cannot reliably predict adverse pregnancy outcomes.Maternal serum screening for birth defects: results of a Connecticut regional program.Second trimester maternal serum screening provides a method to identify pregnancies at high risk for fetal Down's syndrome, trisomy 18, open neural tube defects, and a variety of other chromosomal and nonchromosomal fetal anomalies. Results are presented for a regional program to identify high-risk pregnancies using alpha feto-protein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE3) analyses (triple marker testing). A total of 27,140 women received screening. Using a midtrimester Down's syndrome risk of 1:270 to define the high-risk group, 5.26% of women of all ages were screen-positive for Down's syndrome resulting in the eventual detection of approximately 72% of the affected fetuses. The detection rate for patients under 35 at estimated date of delivery was 61% and for women 35, or older, the detection rate was 100%. A separate protocol to screen for trisomy 18 identified 0.2% of pregnancies, with 38% of the trisomy 18 cases present in this group. Over 3% of women screen-positive for Down's syndrome or trisomy 18 had a serious fetal chromosome anomaly. In addition, 2.89% of women had an elevated AFP (greater or equal to 2.0 multiples of median). This component of the screening resulted in the identification of 86% of the neural tube defects, 75% of the ventral wall defects, and also some of the other various fetal anomalies present in the screened population. Since both laboratory and clinical data are combined to generate patient-specific risks, there is a need for quality control elements that go beyond that normally required for a clinical laboratory alone. We stress the need for comprehensive follow-up programs to evaluate screening programs and maintain high quality.Prenatal screening for Down's syndrome using inhibin-A as a serum marker.The value of measuring inhibin-A (a beta A dimer) with human chorionic gonadotrophin (total or the sub-units free a-hCG and free beta-hCG separately), alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) was examined to determine the effect on the performance of serum screening for Down's syndrome between 15 and 22 weeks of pregnancy. The study was based on stored serum samples from 77 Down's syndrome singleton pregnancies and 385 unaffected singleton pregnancies, matched for maternal age, gestational age, and duration of storage of the sample, supplemented by data from 970 white women with unaffected pregnancies. Inhibin-A was elevated in the serum of women with Down's syndrome pregnancies with a median of 1.79 multiples of the median (MOM). Using the four serum markers AFP, uE3, total hCG, and inhibin-A, in addition to maternal age, 70 per cent of Down's syndrome pregnancies were detected for a 5 per cent false-positive rate compared with 59 per cent with the conventional triple test (AFP, uE3, and total hCG with maternal age). If the estimate of gestational age were based on an ultrasound scan examination, the detection rate would be 77 per cent [95 per cent confidence interval (CI) 69-85 per cent] using the four serum markers including inhibin-A, compared with 67 per cent with the triple test or 79 per cent (95 per cent CI 71-87 per cent) if marker values were adjusted for maternal weight. If the detection rate were kept at 70 per cent and the gestational age were estimated by an ultrasound scan examination, the four-marker test would reduce the false-positive rate from 6-1 per cent using the triple test to 2-9 per cent. The results were virtually the same if free beta-hCG was used instead of total hCG. The inhibin-A-based four-marker test is the most effective method of prenatal screening for Down's syndrome suitable for routine use. If the extra cost required to carry out the inhibin-A test were less than about [symbol: see text]3 per woman screened, the four-marker test including inhibin-A would be financially cost-effective.Serum screening for Down's syndrome between 8 and 14 weeks of pregnancy. International Prenatal Screening Research Group.To determine the value of serum screening for Down's syndrome at 8-14 weeks of pregnancy using seven potential serum markers (alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol, total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), free alpha-hCG, free beta-hCG, pregnancy associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A), and dimeric inhibin A).Stored blood samples collected from women at about 10 weeks of pregnancy, prior to having chorionic villus sampling procedure on account of advanced maternal age, were retrieved from pregnancies associated with Down's syndrome and from matched unaffected pregnancies.Twenty-one obstetric centres in nine countries.Seventy-seven pregnancies associated with Down's syndrome each matched with five controls (except in two cases that were matched with four controls) for maternal age (same five year age groups), duration of storage of the serum sample (same calendar year), and gestational age (usually same week of pregnancy).The levels of two potential markers differed between affected and unaffected pregnancies sufficiently to be of value in screening--free beta-hCG and PAPP-A. The median free beta-hCG level in affected pregnancies was 1.79 times the median level for unaffected pregnancies, and the median PAPP-A level was 0.43 times the normal median. These two markers were combined with maternal age to estimate a woman's risk of having a fetus with Down's syndrome. A screening programme that used a risk cutoff level of 1:300 would detect 63% of affected pregnancies and also classify 5.5% of unaffected pregnancies as screen positive. None of the other five markers added more than 2% detection for the same false-positive rate.The performance of screening using maternal age and serum-free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 10 weeks of pregnancy was better than the double test (alpha-fetoprotein and hCG with maternal age) and similar to the triple test (alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol and hCG with maternal age) at 15-22 weeks.First-trimester Down syndrome screening: free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A.Our purpose was to determine the feasibility of a first-trimester Down syndrome screening protocol including free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A.First-trimester maternal blood samples from 22 Down syndrome and 483 control cases were assayed for free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay procedures. False-positive and detection rates were determined on the basis of Down syndrome risks calculated from the levels of biochemical markers and maternal age. Because 11 of the 22 Down syndrome cases were from older pregnancies (> or = 35 years old), rates were recalculated with the United States age distribution of live births to get a more representative estimate of false positives and detection efficiency.The median free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A levels in cases of Down syndrome was 2.09 (95% confidence interval 1.69 to 2.62) and 0.405 multiples of the median (95% confidence interval 0.28 to 0.67), respectively. At a 5.0% false-positive rate, 15 (68.2%) Down syndrome cases were detected. By the use of the age distribution of live births, 63% of cases could be expected to be detected at a 5.0% false-positive rate.First-trimester free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A screening for Down syndrome can achieve detection rates as high as those associated with alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotropin or alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated estriol screening in the second trimester. Prospective studies are needed to further assess first-trimester screening.Nicked free beta-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin: a potential new marker for Down syndrome screening.Our purpose was to investigate maternal serum levels of nicked free beta-subunit in normal and Down syndrome pregnancies.Serum specimens were obtained from 64 karyotypically normal and 6 Down syndrome pregnancies before amniocentesis. Two immunoenzymometric assays for the beta- subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin were used to determine the level of free beta-subunits with peptide linkage breaks ("nicks") between residues 43 to 48.The mean level of nicked free beta-subunit in Down syndrome was 4.76 multiples of the median, which was significantly elevated compared with normal controls (1.07 multiples of the median, p<0.05). In 5 of 6 cases levels were > or = 2 multiples of the median, with a range of 1.96 to 15.43 multiples of the median, which was 2- to 3-fold higher than the regular free beta-subunit assay (mean level 1.53 multiples of the median, range 0.70 to 3.10 multiples of the median). In one case no nicked free-beta subunits were detectable.Our preliminary data indicate that nicked free beta-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin might be a sensitive marker for Down syndrome screening.Prenatal maternal dried blood screening with alpha-fetoprotein and free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin for open neural tube defect and Down syndrome.Our purpose was to evaluate second-trimester prenatal screening for open neural tube defects and Down syndrome by use of dried blood specimen collection and transport.A prospective study of 7497 dried blood specimens from patients <35 years old was performed. Specimens were assayed for maternal blood alpha-fetoprotein and free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin. Patient-specific risks for both disorders were calculated and used to determine whether further evaluation was indicated. The study included an evaluation of the median and SD of analyte multiple of the median levels.The initial positive rate for open neural tube defect was 4.4% adjusted to 2.7% after ultrasonographic revision and collection of a second sample. The initial positive rate for Down syndrome was 3.6% adjusted to 2.8% after ultrasonographic revision. All seven cases of open neural tube defect were detected within the increased risk group. Six of 8 (75%) cases of Down syndrome were detected. The median alpha-fetoprotein multiple of the median was 3.5 in open neural tube defect cases and 0.6 in Down syndrome cases. The median free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin multiple of the median was 2.4 in Down syndrome cases. The SD (log e) of alpha- fetoprotein and free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin in 5868 unaffected white patients was 0.4022 and 0.5635, respectively.Second-trimester dried blood screening for open neural tube defects and Down syndrome can achieve screening efficiency comparable to serum-based protocols with distinct advantages over the conventional method of blood collection.Dimeric inhibin A as a marker for Down's syndrome in early pregnancy.In screening for Down's syndrome in the second trimester of pregnancy, the concentrations of alpha-fetoprotein, the beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin, and intact human chorionic gonadotropin in material serum are widely used markers. We investigated a new marker, dimeric inhibin A, and compared its predictive value with that of the established markers.Serum samples were obtained at 7 to 18 weeks of gestation from 58 women whose fetuses were known to be affected by Down's syndrome, 32 whose fetuses were affected by trisomy 18, and 438 whose fetuses were normal, and the samples were analyzed for each marker. Individual serum concentrations of each marker were converted to multiples of the median value at the appropriate length of gestation in the women with normal pregnancies, and rates of detection of Down's syndrome by screening for inhibin A in various combinations with the other markers were estimated by multivariate analysis.In the women with fetuses affected by Down's syndrome, the serum inhibin A concentrations were 2.06 times the median value in the women with normal pregnancies (P < 0.001). This compared with 2.00 times the median for the beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin, 1.82 times the median for intact human chorionic gonadotropin, and 0.72 for alpha-fetoprotein. The serum concentrations of inhibin A in the women with fetuses affected by Down's syndrome did not appear to be significantly elevated above normal until the end of the first trimester and were not significantly different from normal in the women with fetuses affected by trisomy 18 (P = 0.17). The rate of detection of Down's syndrome was 53 percent and the false positive rate was 5 percent when alpha-fetoprotein, the beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin, the maternal age were used together as predictors. The detection rate increased to 75 percent when inhibin A was added (P = 0.002).In the second trimester of pregnancy, measuring inhibin A in maternal serum, in combination with measurements of alpha-fetoprotein and beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin, significantly improved the rate of detection of Down's syndrome.Screening for fetal trisomy 21 in the first trimester of pregnancy: maternal serum free beta-hCG and fetal nuchal translucency thickness.The aim of this prospective study was to measure the contribution of maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) in a screening program for fetal trisomy 21 based on fetal nuchal translucency in the first trimester of pregnancy. The maternal serum was collected at the time of the ultrasound scan and assayed without knowledge of the nuchal translucency measurement or karyotype. A total of 2529 pregnancies were examined (normal group, n = 2427; trisomy 21 group, n = 102). Maternal serum free beta-hCG was significantly associated with gestational age and maternal weight. In the trisomy 21 group the free beta-hCG was significantly higher than in the normals, being above the 95th centile in 29% of the cases. There was no significant association between the deviation from the mean for free beta-hCG and nuchal translucency thickness in either the normal or the trisomy 21 groups. When maternal serum free beta-hCG was added to a model based on maternal age and fetal nuchal translucency thickness, the detection rate for trisomy 21 was increased from 80% to 85%.Enhanced twin pregnancy detection within an open neural tube defect and Down syndrome screening protocol using free-beta hCG and AFP.We have applied our multimarker approach of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free-beta human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) for Down syndrome screening to multiple gestations to assess its efficacy for improved detection of twin and triplet pregnancies. This study matched 225 cases of twin pregnancy and 39 cases of triplet pregnancy each with ten singleton pregnancies based on gestational week, race, time to receive sample, time of year of sample, and geographical area. The ratios of the MOM for each group at the tenth, 50th, and 90th percentiles were compared by the Wilcoxon test. Risks for twins were calculated using Bayes' rule, the age-related incidence of twins, and the levels of AFP and free-beta hCG. The tenth, 50th and 90th percentiles of free-beta hCG MOMs in twin and triplet cases were 0.85, 1.99, and 4.51, and 1.38, 2.78, and 4.07, respectively. For AFP, the MOMs at these percentiles were 1.26, 1.91, and 2.99, and 2.02, 2.68, and 5.30, respectively. The twin and triplet distributions for each marker were statistically significantly different from the singleton distributions (P < 0.0001) and from each other (P = 0.0012). At a twin risk cut-off of 1 in 50, 77.4 per cent of all twin gestations can be detected in a second-trimester AFP and free-beta hCG screening protocol with 5.1 per cent of singleton pregnancies falsely identified as at risk for twins. Our dual marker protocol for mid-trimester pregnancy screening combining AFP and free-beta hCG can identify over 77 per cent of twin pregnancies in women less than 35 years of age. This benefit may contribute to an improved outcome of pregnancy by early detection of multiple gestation.Repeat maternal serum testing for Down's syndrome screening using multiple markers with special reference to free alpha and free beta-hCG.To determine the effect of routine repeat testing in serum screening for Down's syndrome, we compared estimates of the detection and false-positive rates. Five serum markers were measured--alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and its two subunits, free alpha and free beta-hCG. First and repeat test marker levels were available from 142 women whose samples had been routinely collected and stored in an antenatal serum bank. Different repeat testing policies were compared for various combinations of the markers. If all women had repeat tests using the four markers AFP, uE3, and free alpha and free beta-hCG, the detection rate for a 5 per cent false-positive rate was 69 per cent compared with 65 per cent if no women were repeated. Policies of repeating selected women gave similar results. The small gain in screening performance with repeat testing performed routinely is not worthwhile. If a woman does happen to have a repeat test, her risk estimate should, however, be based on both results, not just the second.Screening for Down's syndrome: the first two years experience in Bristol.To evaluate the effectiveness of a programme for antenatal screening for Down's syndrome using alpha fetoprotein and total human chorionic gonadotrophin as maternal serum markers.A district general hospital providing a screening service to a local purchasing authority and (under contract) to another purchasing authority in the same region.Patients were counselled and screened between 15 and 20 weeks gestation and Down's risk estimates calculated using the maternal serum marker results as modifiers of the age related risk. Outcome was determined in collaboration with the Regional Cytogenetics Unit.Detection rate for Down's syndrome, false positive rate, uptake of screening, and uptake of amniocentesis.In two years 22816 women were screened (approximately 84% of population); 32 Down's pregnancies were identified, 19 (59.4%) had a reported risk of > or = 1:250 and 20 (62.5%) a reported risk of > or = 1:300. Of those screened before 17 weeks, 16/20 (80%) had a reported risk of > or = 1: 300 compared with 4/12 (33%) of those screened later (P = 0.008); 4.64% of patients screened had reported risks > or = 1: 250 and 5.87% reported risks of > or = 1:300. Amniocentesis uptake was 70% in patients with reported risks of > or = 1:300.Overall the screening programme was effective but screening before 17 weeks was very much more effective than screening later.Screening for chromosomal abnormalities in an unselected population by fetal nuchal translucency.The aim of this prospective study was to examine the value of nuchal translucency measurement for the detection of fetal aneuploidies in an unselected population of an Austrian National Health Service hospital. A total of 1972 women with singleton pregnancies who attended at 10-13 weeks for the initiation of routine antenatal care at our hospital were examined. Chromosomal abnormalities were found in 11 fetuses, four of then with Down's syndrome. Eight of the 11 chromosomally abnormal fetuses, including two of the four with Down's syndrome, were detected by a nuchal translucency thickness of > or = 2.5 mm. Three of the fetuses with abnormal karyotype had a nuchal translucency thickness of < 2.5 mm. Two of these were fetuses with Down's syndrome, one of which was identified by karyotyping for maternal age, the second one by positive biochemistry testing (triple test). The additional chromosomal abnormality was identified by karyotyping for maternal age. These data suggest that nuchal translucency screening for aneuploidies is efficient even in an unselected population.Maternal serum Schwangerschafts protein-1 (SP1) and fetal chromosomal abnormalities at 10-13 weeks' gestation.Maternal serum SP1 concentration was measured at 10-13 weeks' gestation in samples from 87 pregnancies with fetal chromosomal abnormalities (trisomy 21 n = 45; trisomy 18 n = 19; trisomy 13 n = 8; Turner syndrome n = 7; 47,XXX or 47,XXY n = 4; triploidy n = 4), and in samples from 348 matched controls. In the control group, SP1 increased significantly with fetal crown-rump length (r = 0.20, P < 0.0001) and there was no significant association with fetal nuchal translucency thickness (r = 0.03). Similarly, in the group with fetal chromosomal abnormalities, SP1 increased significantly with crown-rump length (r = 0.31, P < 0.01) and there was no significant association with nuchal translucency thickness (r = -0.08). In the groups with fetal trisomy 18 and trisomy 13, the median SP1 (0.76 MoM and 0.57 MoM, respectively) was significantly lower than in the controls (z = 2.64 and z = 3.27, respectively); in 21% and 25% of the cases, values were below the 5th centile. In the group with trisomy 21 and other chromosomal abnormalities the median SP1 (0.96 MoM and 0.93 MoM, respectively) was not significantly different from controls (z = 1.17 and z = 0.67, respectively). Measurement of SP1 concentration at 10-13 weeks' gestation is not likely to be useful in the prediction of fetal chromosomal abnormalities.Measurement of urinary free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin by immunoradiometric assay.An immunoradiometric assay for free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (F beta hCG) is now available. Measurement of serum F beta hCG has been shown to be valuable for the diagnosis of trophoblastic disease and for screening Down's syndrome pregnancies. Urine specimens may be preferable to blood samples since collection of urine specimens usually are less inconvenient to patients than venipuncture. We have evaluated whether the immunoradiometric assay can be applicable to urine samples. The assay was sensitive and precise. When urine samples were diluted 4-fold or more, the diluted samples gave quantitative values, and recovery of beta hCG added to urine samples was satisfactory. Creatinine corrected urinary F beta hCG levels correlated with serum F beta hCG levels. Thus, the immunoradiometric assay was considered to be applicable to urine samples. Serum F beta hCG to hCG ratio has been reported to be important to distinguish among normal pregnancies, hydatidiform mole and choriocarcinoma. However, urinary F beta hCG to hCG ratio did not significantly correlate with serum F beta hCG to hCG ratio. And therefore, the clinical value of urinary F beta hCG to hCG ratio should be further investigated.Screening for Down syndrome during the first and second trimesters: impact of risk estimation parameters.To evaluate impact of risk estimation parameters for screening for Down Syndrome during the first and second trimesters.We prospectively examined for their performance in the prenatal prediction of trisomy 21, alphafetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated estriol (uE3), total human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and its free subunits (free alpha-hCG, free beta-hCG) at both the first and second trimesters, and the impact of three sets of published risk estimation parameters. A total of 14,612 pregnancies were studied. All Down syndrome specimens (12 and 11 cases for first and second trimesters, respectively) and a sample of the unaffected pregnancies were analyzed.The median multiple of median (MoM) for total hCG was lower in the first trimester (1.83 vs. 2.01 in the second trimester) but no loss in discriminative power was observed if the lower variability of the results in the first trimester is taken into account (interquartile range of 0.251 vs. 0.338). The choice of distribution parameters did not alter significantly the detection rates for the various combinations of markers (p > 0.05). False positive rates were affected significantly however and for the combination AFP-uE3-free beta-hCG they varied from 14.6% to 22.6% (p < 0.001).Our results suggest that specific distribution parameters would be necessary to account for the lower variability of the markers in the first trimester and the peculiarity of the total hCG assay we used.First-trimester Down's syndrome screening using nuchal translucency: a prospective study in patients undergoing chorionic villus sampling.The value of the measurement of nuchal translucency thickness for predicting fetal Down's syndrome and other aneuploidies was prospectively evaluated at 8-15 weeks of gestation in 1819 consecutive pregnancies scheduled for karyotyping by chorionic villus sampling. In 43 cases, a chromosomal unbalanced aberration was found. Two teams of ultrasonologists who examined patients attending either National Health Service (Series 1) or private practice clinics (Series 2) were involved in the study. The same type of ultrasound machine and standardized approach were used in both study groups. In those cases in which the maximum subcutaneous thickness of the translucency was 3 mm or greater, the incidence of chromosomal aberration was 18.6% compared to 1.7% in the cases in which this was below 3 mm. The sensitivity, specificity and relative risk for all aneuploidies were 30%, 96% and 10.83, respectively, and no difference was found between trisomy 21 and other types of aneuploidy. The sensitivity and specificity and relative risk were significantly higher at 9-10 weeks than between 11 and 15 weeks. The results were concordant in the two series; however, the overall values for sensitivity (20% vs. 39%), specificity (94% vs. 98%) and relative risk (4.13 vs. 24.20) were clearly higher in the group of private patients. The results obtained confirm the potential application of the measurement of nuchal translucency thickness for fetal aneuploidy screening before the end of the first trimester and suggest that a multiplicity of individual, structural and organizational factors may interact and play a crucial role in determining the actual efficiency of ultrasound screening programs.Maternal serum screening and routine 18-week ultrasound in the detection of all chromosomal abnormalities.Over a 15-month period, maternal serum screening (alpha fetoprotein, oestriol, chorionic gonadotrophin) and ultrasound were evaluated in the detection of all chromosomal abnormalities. Of the 981 screened, there were 8 chromosomally abnormal pregnancies. Six of these were considered to be at increased risk on serum screening, all of which were detected. Of the remaining 2, one was detected by ultrasound and the other resulted in a liveborn baby with trisomy 21. The positive and negative predictive values for serum screening for all chromosomal abnormalities was 7.8% and 99.9% respectively. The sensitivity and specificity was 87.5% and 91.5% respectively. Serum screening is useful in the detection of many chromosomal abnormalities, not just Down syndrome. The combination of maternal serum screening and ultrasound has a high negative predictive value and is valuable in providing reassurance of no underlying chromosomal abnormality. With a positive predictive value of 7.8% a chromosomal abnormality will be found once in every 13 amniocenteses performed.Evaluation of maternal serum dimeric inhibin A as a first-trimester marker of Down's syndrome.While second-trimester prenatal screening programmes for Down's syndrome have become established in prenatal care, it would be advantageous to be able to offer screening in earlier pregnancy. To this end, we have evaluated a new potential maternal serum marker, dimeric inhibin A, as a possible first-trimester marker. Dimeric inhibin A was measured in prospectively collected maternal serum from 23 cases of Down's syndrome and matched chromosomally normal controls, at 11-13 weeks' gestation. Levels of this protein were significantly elevated in the Down's pregnancies compared with the control pregnancies. The median multiple of the normal median (MOM) for the Down's samples was 2.46 (95 per cent confidence interval: 2.11-3.26, P < 0.0001 vs. controls). These results suggest that dimeric inhibin A is a useful discriminator of Down's-affected pregnancies from normal pregnancies in the first trimester and that sensitive screening in combination with maternal age and other possible markers may be practicable in the first trimester.First trimester fetal nuchal translucency: problems with screening the general population. 1.To evaluate the feasibility of measuring first trimester nuchal translucency in an unselected population, to assess the relationship with gestation and maternal age and to measure reproducibility.A prospective observational study.University College Hospital, London.One thousand and four women attending for a routine first trimester dating scan between eight and thirteen weeks of gestation. Measurements of nuchal translucency were attempted in 1368 (80.3%) and successful in 1127 (82% of attempts).Nuchal translucency is most easily measured at 11 weeks of gestation. If a cut-off of > or = 3 mm is used, 6% of unselected fetuses between eight and thirteen weeks of gestation are classified as abnormal. Nuchal translucency increases with gestational but not maternal age. Reproducibility is poor: by repeating measurements with a different operator, the same operator using a different still image, or the same operator using the same still image, 18.8%, 17.5% or 12.4% of nuchal translucency measurements, respectively, change their classification as normal or abnormal.If nuchal translucency > or = 3mm were used as an indication for karyotyping, 6% of the normal pregnant population would be screen positive. However, the percentage will vary greatly depending on the gestational age profile of the screened population. The poor reproducibility of nuchal translucency measurement could diminish its usefulness as a screening test for Down's syndrome.Ultrasonography of the fetal neck in the first and second trimesters. Part 2. Anomalies of the posterior nuchal region.Over a 5-year period, the author examined the posterior nuchal region of the fetus in 7200 first- and second-trimester sonograms. Nuchal fluid collections were analysed to differentiate physiologic collections, which resolve spontaneously, from pathologic ones, which necessitate invasive testing for chromosomal abnormalities. Recommendations for evaluating ultrasonographic findings, based on the results of the study, are presented algorithmically in this pictorial essay. A single echogenic line representing a skin reflection was usually visible in normal fetuses. Thin double echogenic lines, observed in eight cases in this series, were due to fetal rotation or the presence of an amniotic membrane adjacent to the normal dorsal pseudomembrane and were not indicative of abnormality. In three cases the spectral reflection of the fetal neck surface was relatively thick, leading to the appearance of thick double echogenic lines; of these, two cases involved Down's syndrome. Therefore, karyotyping is suggested in all cases of thick echogenic lines. Of the 11 nuchal fluid collections up to 5 mm in diameter observed in this series, 10 resolved spontaneously by 24 weeks gestational age. In the other case the collection enlarged, and karyotyping revealed Turner's syndrome. Of the 16 cases of nuchal fluid collections greater than 5 mm in diameter, 5 were associated with an abnormal karyotype (Down's syndrome in 4); karyotyping is recommended in all such cases. Nuchal edema occurred in 22 cases. It was associated with Down's syndrome in 8 cases and with trisomy 18 in 1 case. Among fetuses with nuchal edema, the frequency of aneuploidy was substantially greater if other abnormalities were also present.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Analysis of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin in the first trimester: implications for Down's syndrome screening.The aim of this study was to determine the maternal population, pregnancy, serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotrophin (F beta hCG) parameters in a large series of women attending prenatal clinics before 15 weeks' gestation and to assess the practical problems of population screening for Down's syndrome in the first trimester using these markers. Serum samples were collected from 8600 women attending prenatal clinic booking visits. Maternal serum AFP and F beta hCG medians were calculated for each day of gestation (49-104 days), using both dates and ultrasound estimates of gestation. The effects of maternal weight, twin pregnancies, and threatened abortion on AFP and F beta hCG levels were analysed. The median age of the population was 27.1 years and the median weight 62.1 kg. Twenty-six per cent of samples were collected before 70 days and 50 per cent before 78 days' gestation. Eighty-nine per cent of all samples had gestational estimates by dates, 60 per cent by ultrasound and 52 per cent by both dates and ultrasound. The AFP median was 5 kU/l at 49 days, 5.9 kU/l at 70 days, and 17.9 kU/l at 100 days. The peak median F beta hCG level was 66.4 ng/ml at 64 days, falling to 20.6 ng/ml at 100 days' gestation. Both AFP and F beta hCG levels showed log Gaussian distributions but the standard deviation for AFP was 20 per cent greater than that found in the second trimester. AFP and F beta hCG levels showed an inverse relationship with maternal weight and were increased in twin pregnancies (1.68 and 1.97 multiples of the median, respectively). AFP and F beta hCG can be readily measured in a large screening population in the first trimester. Down's syndrome screening protocols based on these markers could be refined by the use of gestations in individual days but AFP is likely to be a less effective marker and detection rates are likely to be lower than in the second trimester. To realize the potential of first-trimester screening, more women should be encouraged to attend the prenatal clinic in early pregnancy and ultrasound dating should be carried out for all pregnancies at this stage.Maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome in the first trimester of pregnancy.Prenatal diagnosis of diverse chromosome abnormalities in a population of patients identified by triple-marker testing as screen positive for Down syndrome.Our purpose was to determine the incidence of all types of chromosome abnormalities (i.e., trisomy 21 and other abnormalities) in women receiving prenatal chromosome analysis after a Down syndrome screen-positive result by maternal serum triple-marker testing (alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated estriol analyses).A total of 11,434 patients between 15.0 and 21.9 weeks' gestation received second-trimester Down syndrome risk evaluation by triple-marker testing. By use of a 1:270 midtrimester Down syndrome risk cutoff value, and after ultrasonographic confirmation of gestational age, 677 patients were screen positive for Down syndrome (corrected screen-positive rate 5.92%). Karyotypes were reviewed for 468 (69%) of these patients who received prenatal chromosome analysis.In addition to 12 cases of Down syndrome, 12 other fetal chromosome abnormalities were found (i.e., 5.13% had a chromosome abnormality of some type). Expressed as a proportion of all patients with a corrected Down syndrome screen-positive result, at least 3.69% had a chromosome abnormality. The overall spectrum of abnormal karyotypes (approximately 50% autosomal trisomy, 25% structural and 25% sex chromosome abnormality) appears to be comparable to that seen in patients undergoing amniocentesis because of advanced maternal age.As is the case for women of advanced maternal age, preamniocentesis counseling for patients with positive triple-marker testing results should reflect the relatively high probability that an abnormality other than Down syndrome may be identified.First trimester fetal nuchal translucency.This review examines the development of a new method of screening for Down's syndrome based on the combination of fetal nuchal translucency thickness, maternal age and maternal serum biochemistry at 10-14 weeks of gestation. This method can potentially identify more than 80% of affected fetuses for a false-positive rate of less than 5%.Maternal serum hCG and fetal nuchal translucency thickness for the prediction of fetal trisomies in the first trimester of pregnancy.To compare the potential value of maternal serum total hCG and free beta-hCG in predicting the risk for fetal trisomies during the first trimester of pregnancy and to examine whether data on maternal hCG and fetal nuchal translucency thickness can be combined to derive risks.Maternal serum total hCG and free beta-hCG were measured in samples from 83 singleton pregnancies with fetal chromosomal abnormalities (trisomy 21 (n = 41), trisomy 18 (n = 19), trisomy 13 (n = 8) sex chromosome aneuploidies (n = 11), triploidy (n = 4) and 394 chromosomally normal controls at 10 to 13 weeks gestation. In all cases, the fetal nuchal translucency thickness was measured at the time of fetal karyotyping.In the 249 chromosomally normal controls with fetal nuchal translucency less than 3 mm, total hCG and free beta-hCG decreased significantly with increased fetal crown-rump length. In 145 chromosomally normal fetuses with nuchal translucency 3 to 9 mm total hCG and free beta-hCG were not significantly different from the 249 with nuchal translucency less than 3 mm. In fetuses with trisomy 21, total hCG and free beta-hCG were significantly higher, whereas in trisomies 18 and 13 levels were lower than in chromosomally normal controls. When the cutoff levels for total hCG and free beta-hCG were selected to include 4% of chromosomally normal fetuses, the detection rates for trisomy 21 were 24% and 32%, respectively. There was no significant association between hCG and nuchal translucency thickness in either the chromosomally normal (r = -0.01) or abnormal group (r = -0.15).An improved estimate of risk for fetal trisomies at 10 to 13 weeks gestation can be derived by combining data on maternal age, maternal serum total or free beta-hCG and fetal nuchal translucency thickness.The influence of gravidity on Down's syndrome screening with free beta hCG.Total human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) levels have been shown in one previous small study to vary with gravidity. In order to establish if maternal serum free beta hCG was similarly affected, approximately 4500 pregnancies of varying gravidity were analysed. The results indicated that there was a 6 per cent higher median MOM in primigravid compared with multigravid women. The impact of such elevation in Down's syndrome screening programmes will be minimal.Maternal urinary beta-core fragment of hCG/creatinine ratios and fetal chromosomal abnormalities in the second trimester of pregnancy.Our aim was to evaluate the potential value of the ratio of the maternal urinary beta-core fragment of human chorionic gonadotropin (beta C-hCG) to creatinine (Cr) in discriminating between normal pregnancies and pregnancies associated with fetal chromosomal abnormalities. We hypothesized that pregnancies with fetal chromosomal abnormalities had abnormal quantities of beta C-hCG in the urine. The aims of the present study were to investigate retrospectively whether maternal urinary ratios of beta C-hCG/Cr are abnormal in women carrying fetuses with chromosome aberrations and to determine normative median values and a reference range for beta C-hCG/Cr between 14 and 19 weeks' gestation. Maternal urinary beta C-hCG and Cr concentrations were measured in 150 healthy women from 14 to 19 weeks and compared with ten cases of fetal chromosomal abnormalities matched for gestational age. The preliminary cut-off points corresponded to 0.29 multiple of the normal median (MOM) and 2.83 MOM, which were equivalent to the tenth and 90th centiles of the normal range. Of ten cases of fetal chromosomal abnormalities, one out of one (100 per cent) case with trisomy 18 and three of four (75 per cent) cases of variant 9 chromosomes had low beta C-hCG/Cr (< or = 0.29 MOM). One of five (20 per cent) cases with Down syndrome had elevated beta C-hCG/Cr (> or = 2.83 MOM). Urinary beta C-hCG/Cr ratios obtained in the second trimester may be useful for improved detection efficiency of Down syndrome, trisomy 18, and inversion of chromosome 9. Second-trimester maternal urinary beta C-hCG/Cr should be investigated further as a potential marker for fetal chromosome anomalies.The advantages of using triple-marker screening for chromosomal abnormalities.Our purpose was to assess the utility of triple-marker serum screening for chromosomal abnormalities.Our laboratory received 10,605 samples that were between 15 and 22 weeks' gestation for maternal serum screening of chromosomal abnormalities. Triple-marker maternal serum screening consisted of alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated estriol in conjunction with maternal age. Women > or = 35 years old were first offered amniocentesis. If they refused amniocentesis, they were offered the screening test. A second-trimester risk for trisomy 21 > or = 1:270 was considered screen positive. Patients were screen positive for trisomy 18 if all three markers were low: alpha-fetoprotein < or = 0.75 multiples of the median, unconjugated estriol < or = 0.60 multiples of the median, and human chorionic gonadotropin < or = 0.55 multiples of the median.The initial screen-positive rate was 8.3% (880 women); amniocentesis was offered to 766 (7.2%). Twelve of 16 ascertained cases of trisomy 21 (75%), two of three cases of trisomy 18 (67%), five cases of 45,X karyotype, and one case each of 45,X/46,XX, 47,XXY, 47,XYY, 46,XX,ins(2)(q21p13p15)mat, and 69,XXX karyotypes were identified in the screen-positive patients. All four known cases of trisomy 21 in the 886 women > or = 35 years old who were screened were detected, with a 21% false-positive rate. Omitting unconjugated estriol from our screening program would have resulted in detecting nine of 16 trisomy 21 and six of 12 other chromosomal abnormalities. The false-positive rate would have remained the same.In our sample cohort addition of unconjugated estriol to the screening program resulted in an increased detection rate of chromosomal abnormalities with no change in the false-positive rate. Considering the advancement in screening for chromosomal abnormalities, maternal age alone as an indication for amniocentesis should be reevaluated.First trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein in fetal trisomies.To evaluate the potential value of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein concentration in the detection of fetal trisomy at 10 to 13 weeks gestation and to examine the possible association between maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and fetal nuchal translucency thickness.Cross-sectional study.Harris Birthright Research Centre for Fetal Medicine, King's College Hospital Medical School, London.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein concentration was measured at 10 to 13 weeks gestation in samples from 57 pregnancies with fetal trisomies (trisomy 21 (n = 35), trisomy 18 (n = 16), and trisomy 13 (n = 6)) in 228 matched controls in whom the fetal nuchal translucency was < 3 mm and in 114 chromosomally normal fetuses with translucency > or = 3 mm.In the control group maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein increased significantly with fetal crown-rump length (r = 0.451). In this group, the median maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein was not significantly different from that in the groups with trisomy 21 (median = 0.84 MoM), trisomy 18 (median = 0.86 MoM), or trisomy 13 (median = 0.94 MoM), respectively. Neither in the control group nor in the group with trisomic fetuses was maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein significantly associated with fetal nuchal translucency thickness (r = 0.01 and r = 0.03).Measurement of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein concentration in the first trimester of pregnancy is not likely to be useful in the prediction of fetal trisomies.Triple marker (alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, human chorionic gonadotropin) versus alpha-fetoprotein plus free-beta subunit in second-trimester maternal serum screening for fetal Down syndrome: a prospective comparison study.Our purpose was to compare the efficacy of triple-marker screening (alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, human chorionic gonadotropin) with alpha-fetoprotein plus free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin.Free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin was concurrently assayed in 2349 maternal serum samples. Trivariate and bivariate algorithms were used to calculate the risk for fetal Down syndrome by the two protocols. Free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin from 12 cases of fetal Down syndrome previously screened with the triple marker was retrospectively assayed.Mean maternal age of our study was 29.8 years (range 14 to 51 years). The initial screen-positive rate with the triple marker was 8.0% compared with 12.8% for alpha-fetoprotein plus free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin. All three cases of fetal Down syndrome ascertained in our prospective study were detected by the triple marker; in contrast, one of three was detected by alpha-fetoprotein plus free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin. By adding 12 additional cases of fetal Down syndrome, 12 of 15 (80%) were screen positive with triple marker and nine of 15 (60%) were screen positive with alpha-fetoprotein plus free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin.The detection rate of fetal Down syndrome was greater by use of a triple marker screen than when using alpha-fetoprotein plus free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin. Our data do not support the claims of other studies that suggest that alpha-fetoprotein plus free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin is superior to triple markers.The influence of maternal weight on human chorionic gonadotropin in the multiple-marker screening test for fetal Down syndrome.Our purpose was to determine the effect of maternal weight on human chorionic gonadotropin concentration in the multiple-marker screening test for fetal Down syndrome.Two genetics databases were used: database I contained the results of 8297 multiple-marker screening tests and database II contained the results of 1936 multiple-marker screening tests and fetal karyotypes.The overall screen-positive rate in database I was 7.1%; it was 7.5% in patients weighing < 180 pounds and 5.1% in patients weighing > or = 180 pounds (p = 0.001). Weight significantly affected the screen-positive rate only in women > or = 30 years old (p = 0.003 for 30 to 34 years, p = 0.00004 for > or = 35 years). A weight correction formula was derived; when applied to database II it eliminated individual weight-related differences but had no effect on the overall screen-positive rate or Down syndrome detection rate.Human chorionic gonadotropin concentration is affected by maternal weight. A weight correction formula eliminates individual weight-related differences in the screen-positive rate but has no discernible effect on the overall screen-positive or Down syndrome detection rates.Comparison of multiple-marker screening with amniocentesis for the detection of fetal aneuploidy in women > or = 35 years old.Our purpose was to compare the multiple-marker screening test with elective amniocentesis for the detection of fetal Down syndrome and other aneuploidies in women aged > or = 35.Our database included the multiple-marker screening test (maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, unconjugated estriol, and maternal age) and genetic amniocentesis results from 1942 women aged > or = 35. A Down syndrome risk > or = 1:190 was considered screen positive. An algorithm to detect trisomy 18 was also used.The multiple-marker screening test Down syndrome screen-positive rate was 26.1% (507/1942). The Down syndrome detection rate was 75% (33/44); the trisomy 18 detection rate was 75% (3/4). However, the multiple-marker screening test detection rate for all aneuploidies was only 61%. Missed aneuploidies included trisomy 21, sex chromosome abnormalities, trisomy 13, trisomy 22, and trisomy 18.The multiple-marker screening test fails to detect approximately 39% of all fetal aneuploidies in women aged > or = 35. These data should be provided to women considering prenatal diagnosis so that they can make an informed decision regarding the multiple-marker screening test versus amniocentesis for advanced maternal age.Normal nuchal thickness in the midtrimester indicates reduced risk of Down syndrome in pregnancies with abnormal triple-screen results.Our purpose was to determine whether nuchal thickness measurement can identify the euploid fetuses in midtrimester pregnancies at increased risk for Down syndrome on the basis of maternal age and serum screening.Nuchal thickness was obtained prospectively in 651 consecutive fetuses at 14 to 21 weeks' gestation and at > or = 1:270 risk for Down syndrome on the basis of unconjugated estriol, alpha-fetoprotein, and human chorionic gonadotropin levels. The risk of Down syndrome with a normal nuchal thickness was determined. A receiver-operator characteristic curve was used to determine a serum-based risk threshold below which the risk for Down syndrome was low. The prevalence of Down syndrome in fetuses with both a normal nuchal thickness and a below-serum-risk threshold was compared with prevalence in either those above threshold risk or with an abnormal nuchal thickness.There were eight cases of trisomy 21 and one case each of 46,XX/47,XXX, 46,XY/47,XY, +7, and 46,XX, 11q-. The sensitivity of an abnormal nuchal thickness (> or = 6 mm) for detecting Down syndrome was four in eight (50%) (95%) confidence interval 15.3% to 84.6%). The risk of Down syndrome was significantly increased with an abnormal compared with a normal nuchal thickness, four in 13 (30.8%) versus four in 638 (0.6%), p < 0.0001. A risk threshold was defined at > or = 1:100 on the basis of the receiver-operator characteristic plot. Of 390 cases with a normal nuchal thickness and a serum risk estimate < 1:100, there were no cases of Down syndrome (0/390 vs 8/253, p = 0.002).Normal nuchal thickness significantly reduces the risk of Down syndrome and may help reduce the number of amniocenteses done for abnormal triple screen results.Second-trimester levels of maternal urinary gonadotropin peptide in Down syndrome pregnancy.Urinary gonadotropin peptide (UGP; beta-core fragment), a major metabolite of human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), was shown recently to be markedly elevated in Down syndrome pregnancy between 19 and 22 weeks of gestation. To confirm and extend this finding, we obtained maternal urine and matching maternal serum samples from 14 cases of Down syndrome and six other aneuploidies between 17 and 21 weeks of gestation. UGP was measured in all these samples and in 91 singleton control urines. Results were corrected for urinary creatinine level and expressed as multiples of the control median (MOM). hCG levels were assayed in all serum samples from the cases and compared with previously established reference values. The median UGP level in Down syndrome cases was 5.34 MOM (range 2.71-12.57); 88 per cent of the values were above the 95th centile of control levels after modelling. The median maternal serum hCG level for the same cases was 2.20 MOM (range 0.84-3.40); 36 per cent of the values were above the 95th centile. The level of UGP in every case including all other aneuploidies was higher than the comparable maternal serum hCG level. Elevated UGP measurements are strongly associated with fetal Down syndrome during the second trimester and could contribute to improved Down syndrome screening protocols that are more accessible and less expensive than are currently available.Choice of serum markers in antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.First-trimester maternal serum immunoreactive inhibin in chromosomally normal and abnormal pregnancies. Dutch Working Party on Prenatal Diagnosis.To investigate the maternal serum immunoreactive inhibin level in chromosomally normal and abnormal pregnancies in the first trimester.This was a retrospective study under the auspices of the Dutch Working Party on Prenatal Diagnosis. Maternal serum samples were taken before prenatal diagnosis. Forty-eight maternal serum samples from chromosomally abnormal pregnancies, including 23 with Down syndrome, were available for analysis; 284 samples from chromosomally normal pregnancies were used to establish reference ranges.The median value of maternal serum immunoreactive inhibin in the 23 Down syndrome pregnancies was 1.3 multiples of the normal median (95% confidence interval 0.8-2.1). No significant difference was found between the distributions of the inhibin concentrations in the normal and the Down syndrome pregnancies or in the normal and the other chromosomally abnormal pregnancies.In contrast to the second trimester of pregnancy, the level of maternal serum immunoreactive inhibin in the first trimester is not related to fetal chromosomal abnormalities and therefore is not useful as a biochemical screening index.Trisomy 21 and cystic hygromas in early gestational age fetuses.Chromosomal aberrations are associated with 60% of cystic hygromas and the majority of these are females with a 45,X karyotype. Trisomy 21 has rarely been reported. Six cases of cystic hygromas with trisomy 21 were detected during a 6-month time period in our laboratory. An earlier gestational age of 14 weeks was present in our cases compared with a gestational age of 18 weeks reported in the literature. Because of the high rate of fetal loss prior to 16 weeks, many cases of trisomy 21 with cystic hygromas may go undetected. This suggests that cystic hygromas detected before 16 weeks of gestation may be clinically different from those detected later in gestation. With the increasing use of chorionic villus sampling and amniocentesis at 10 to 12 weeks of gestation, trisomy 21 may be a common finding in fetuses with cystic hygromas.First-trimester fetal nuchal translucency thickness and risk for trisomies.To define the relation between fetal nuchal translucency thickness at 10-13 weeks' gestation and the risk for fetal trisomies and pregnancy outcome.Five hundred sixty fetuses with nuchal translucency thickness of 3-9 mm at 10-13 weeks' gestation were karyotyped. The ratio of the observed number of fetal trisomies to that expected on the basis of maternal age was calculated.The incidence of trisomies 21, 18, or 13 was 18% (102 of 560 cases) and was significantly associated with both maternal age (r = 0.97) and fetal nuchal translucency thickness (r = 0.75). In 383 fetuses with nuchal translucency of 3 mm, the observed number of fetal trisomies was 23, in contrast to the frequency of 6.0 expected on the basis of maternal age. In 177 fetuses with nuchal translucency of 4 mm or more, 79 cases were observed, compared with 2.7 expected on the basis of maternal age. In fetuses with nuchal translucency of 4 mm or more and normal karyotype, there was a high association with other defects and the prognosis was often poor, whereas the translucency resolved for those with 3 mm and the pregnancy outcome was usually normal.At 10-13 weeks' gestation, fetal nuchal translucency of 3 mm is associated with a fourfold increase, and translucency of greater than 3 mm with a 29-fold increase, in the maternal age-related risk for trisomies 21, 18, and 13. Fetal nuchal translucency of 4 mm or more is associated with poor pregnancy outcome even when the fetal karyotype is normal.Do racial differences exist in second-trimester maternal hCG levels? A study of 23,369 patients.In Down syndrome screening by maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) determination at 15, 16, 17, and 18 weeks of gestation, we prospectively examined 23,369 sera from white (21,549), North African (970), black African (525), and Asian (325) patients. When expressed as multiples of the median (MOM), no difference was observed between white, North African, and black African patients. However, higher serum hCG concentrations were noted in Asians, for whom we therefore recommend correction of hCG values before calculation of the risk of Down syndrome.Evaluation of maternal serum immunoreactive inhibin as a first trimester marker of Down's syndrome.Maternal serum immunoreactive inhibin has been shown to be significantly elevated in Down's affected pregnancies in the second trimester, suggesting that it may be useful in prenatal diagnosis. We have investigated whether it is similarly elevated in the first trimester.Stored maternal sera from women with Down's affected pregnancies and chromosomally normal control pregnancies were retrieved for analysis. These sera had been collected prospectively at either 11 or 12 weeks gestation as a routine antenatal booking procedure.From records, 11 women were identified as having had a Down's pregnancy. For each of these, 4 controls matched for gestation and duration-of-storage were also identified.Two different inhibin immunoassays were evaluated, one using an antibody raised against 31 kDa bovine inhibin and the other, a commercial two-site assay, using two antibodies directed against two distinct alpha-subunit epitopes.Neither assay detected a significant effect of gestation on serum inhibin levels. After combining the data from both gestations, no significant difference between the Down's samples and controls for either assay was detected. However, analysis of the data for each gestation separately revealed that one assay detected a significant difference in inhibin levels between Down's affected and unaffected pregnancies at 11 weeks gestation (mean +/- SEM 3186 +/- 195 vs 2020 +/- 172 ng/l, P < 0.01) but not at 12 weeks. The other, commercial, assay did not detect a significant difference at either gestation. In addition, there was poor association between the results of the two assays.These data suggest that immunoreactive inhibin, as detected by these assays, will not be useful as a late first trimester marker for Down's syndrome and also that these two assays detect different inhibin species in pregnancy serum.Serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG are first-trimester screening markers for Down syndrome.Serum measurements of pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and the free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) subunit were made in 13 women with Down syndrome (DS) pregnancies and six other women with fetal aneuploidy ascertained at chorionic villus sampling (CVS), as well as 89 women with contemporaneous normal control pregnancies. Median serum PAPP-A measurements (0.31 MOM, 95 per cent confidence interval (CI) 0.22-0.65 vs. normal 1.06, 95 per cent CI 0.89-1.20) were lower and free beta-hCG subunit measurements (1.13 MOM, 95 per cent CI 0.93-2.63 vs. normal 0.91, 95 per cent CI 0.79-1.03) were higher at statistically significant levels. Receiver operator characteristics (ROC) curves showed that the highest sensitivity for detection, 71.2 per cent (95 per cent CI 54.7-87.6 per cent), was for depressed PAPP-A levels; the combination of low serum PAPP-A levels, maternal age, and elevated free beta-hCG levels yielded a detection rate of 78.9 per cent (95 per cent CI 64.9-92.8 per cent) of the affected pregnancies at 8-12 weeks' gestation.First trimester maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A and pregnancy-specific beta 1-glycoprotein in fetal trisomies.To examine the potential value of maternal serum levels of pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and pregnancy-specific beta 1-glycoprotein (SP1) in the detection of fetal trisomy.Cross-sectional study.The Harris Birthright Research Centre For Fetal Medicine, King's College Hospital Medical School, London, UK and Division of Maternal-Fetal Medicine, Jefferson Medical College, Philadelphia, USA.Maternal serum PAPP-A and SP1 concentrations were measured at 10 to 13 weeks gestation in samples from 42 pregnancies with fetal trisomy (trisomy 21, n = 29; trisomy 18, n = 9; trisomy 13, n = 4) and in samples from 210 matched controls.In controls, both maternal serum PAPP-A and SP1 increased significantly with gestation and in trisomic fetuses levels of both hormones were reduced. However, discriminant analysis demonstrated that SP1 did not contribute significantly in the distinction between trisomic and control pregnancies. Although levels of PAPP-A were reduced throughout the gestational range examined (10 to 13 weeks), especially in cases with fetal trisomy 21, the deviation was more pronounced at 10 to 11 weeks than at 12 to 13 weeks gestation. In 45% of pregnancies with fetal trisomy 21 and 70% of pregnancies with trisomies 18 or 13 maternal serum PAPP-A levels at 10 to 11 weeks gestation were below the 5th centile of the normal range.Maternal serum PAPP-A concentration in the first trimester of pregnancy may prove to be useful in the prediction of risk for fetal trisomies.Maternal serum free alpha-human chorionic gonadotrophin levels in twin pregnancies: implications for screening for Down's syndrome.Maternal serum free alpha-human chorionic gonadotrophin (free alpha-hCG) levels were determined in twin and singleton pregnancies at 15-22 weeks of gestation using a set of stored serum samples relating to 200 twin pregnancies and 600 singleton control pregnancies matched for gestational age and duration of storage. Free alpha-hCG values are, on average, 1.66 times greater in twin pregnancies than in singleton pregnancies (95 per cent confidence interval 1.56-1.76). If maternal serum free alpha-hCG is used in screening for Down's syndrome, values in twin pregnancies can be adjusted using this result so that screening can be performed in twin pregnancies as well as in singleton pregnancies.Maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A and fetal nuchal translucency thickness for the prediction of fetal trisomies in early pregnancy.To determine if the risk for fetal trisomies during the first trimester of pregnancy can be derived by combining data from maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and fetal nuchal translucency thickness.Pregnancy-associated plasma protein A was measured in samples from 87 singleton pregnancies with fetal chromosomal abnormalities (45 trisomy 21, 19 trisomy 18, eight trisomy 13, 11 sex chromosome aneuploidies, four triploidies) and 348 chromosomally normal controls at 10-13 weeks' gestation. Likelihood ratios for trisomies 21, 18, and 13 in relation to PAPP-A, in multiples of the normal median (MoM) for crown-rump length, were derived from the overlapping gaussian frequency distribution curves for normal and abnormal pregnancies.In the chromosomally normal group, maternal serum PAPP-A correlated significantly with fetal crown-rump length (r = 0.421, P < .0001). In the chromosomally abnormal group, the median PAPP-A was significantly lower than in the normal controls. The respective median values expressed in MoM for trisomies 21, 18, and 13 and other aneuploidies were 0.5 MoM (90% confidence interval [CI] 0.09-1.67, z = 6.0, P < .001), 0.17 MoM (90% CI 0.06-1.45, z = 6.6, P < .001), 0.25 MoM (90% CI 0.10-0.62, z = 4.5, P < .001), and 0.72 MoM (90% CI 0.09-2.48, z = 2.2, P < .05), respectively. There was no significant linear association between PAPP-A and fetal nuchal translucency thickness in either the chromosomally normal (r = -0.01, P = .89) or abnormal groups (r = -0.19, P = .08).The risks for fetal trisomies at 10-13 weeks' gestation can be derived by combining data on maternal age, maternal serum PAPP-A, and fetal nuchal translucency thickness.Expanded maternal serum alpha fetoprotein screening.Multiple marker screening.Second-trimester maternal serum screening using alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotrophin, and unconjugated oestriol: experience of a regional programme.Over a 2-year period from January 1991 to December 1992, second-trimester maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome using alpha-fetoprotein (alpha FP), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) was made available to five health districts in East Anglia, with a total population of 1.2 million. Amniocentesis was offered when the risk of Down's syndrome at term was 1:200 or greater. 25,359 singleton pregnancies were screened, representing an uptake of 77 per cent. The recall rate for the 24 per cent of women who had not had a dating scan prior to the test was 9.4 per cent compared with 3.9 per cent for those who had been scanned (P < 0.0005). Seventy-five per cent (36/48) of Down's syndrome pregnancies were detected for a false-positive rate of 4.0 per cent. Twenty-five out of 36 of detected Down's syndrome pregnancies were dated by scan prior to sampling, and in the 11 remaining cases, the dates were confirmed by scan after a high-risk result was obtained. The exclusion of uE3 from the screening protocol would have reduced the detection rate to 52 per cent (25/48) for the same false-positive rate. Eighty-five per cent of women identified at high risk accepted the offer of an amniocentesis. Other fetal abnormalities detected were trisomy 18 (3), trisomy 13 (2), 45,X (6), 69,XXX (5), other chromosome abnormalities (9), open neural tube defects (26), hydrocephalus (7), abdominal wall defects (4), and steroid sulphatase deficiency (6).Maternal serum human chorionic gonadotrophin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A, markers for fetal Down syndrome at 8-14 weeks.Maternal serum levels of human chorionic gonadotrophin and its subunits (intact, alpha, and free beta h CG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) were measured in 279 women between 8 and 14 weeks' gestation. This group included 23 pregnancies in which the fetus had Down syndrome (DS), diagnosed either at birth or during the second trimester (n = 17) or from chorionic villus sampling (CVS) (n = 6). Normal medians were determined from the 258 apparently normal pregnancies. The median levels of intact hCG (1.4 MOM) and free beta hCG (2.1 MOM) were significantly raised, whereas the median level of PAPP-A (0.39 MOM) was significantly lower in the DS pregnancies when compared with the control group. Levels of alpha hCG were similar in both the control and the DS pregnancies. Analysis of samples taken prior to 14 weeks' gestation demonstrated that only PAPP-A (0.34 MOM) was significantly altered in DS pregnancies. However, after the exclusion of DS cases diagnosed at CVS, the median intact hCG (1.56 MOM), free beta hCG (2.27 MOM), and alpha hCG (1.8 MOM) were all raised in DS pregnancies. This emphasizes the problem of the interpretation of biochemical markers when DS cases are diagnosed at CVS.Effectiveness of combining maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and hCG in a second-trimester screening program for Down syndrome.To evaluate the efficacy of combining hCG and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) with maternal age in a two-analyte maternal serum screening program for Down syndrome.A prospective study involved the screening of 12,170 maternal sera from patients at 14-25 weeks of gestation. The risk for Down syndrome at term was calculated from maternal serum hCG and AFP, and maternal age. For women 36 years of age and younger, a risk of 1:307 or greater was considered screen-positive. For women over 36, a risk greater than that a priori was considered screen-positive. False-positive rates and detection rates were compared with those resulting from a screening protocol using only AFP and age.Seven hundred eighty-two sera were initially screen-positive (6.4%). Subsequent sonography decreased this total to 687 (5.6%), and 467 (3.8%) of these patients accepted amniocentesis. Ten cases of Down syndrome and seven other chromosomal abnormalities were detected. Follow-up investigations revealed eight additional Down syndrome cases that were missed by screening. The identification of 18 Down syndrome cases in 12,170 pregnancies corresponds closely with the prediction of 14.1 Down syndrome births (18.2 second-trimester fetuses) in this population calculated from age-dependent risks. The detection rate for Down syndrome was 56% (ten of 18 expected cases). Only five of 18 (28%) would have been detected by AFP and age alone.These results support the mathematical model that hCG is the major contributor to the increased sensitivity of multi-analyte screening and demonstrate that screening programs can attain substantial improvement in detection of second-trimester Down syndrome by adding hCG to AFP and age.Maternal serum free beta hCG screening: results of studies including 480 cases of Down syndrome.The median maternal serum free beta human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) multiple of the median (MOM) of 480 Down syndrome cases in the second trimester was 2.64, significantly greater than the reported median MOM of intact hCG (p < 0.0001). In 234 of these cases from retrospective and prospective studies, the effectiveness of maternal serum free beta hCG was evaluated in combination with alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and maternal age in second-trimester Down syndrome screening. Down syndrome detection in the gestational age range of 14-16 weeks was 82 per cent. In all gestational weeks (14-22), a 77.7 per cent Down syndrome detection rate was achieved. In prospective screening of 44,272 patients under the age of 35 years, 69 per cent of Down syndrome cases were detected (73 per cent in gestational weeks 14-16). The false-positive rate for the prospective study was 3.8 per cent. The use of free beta hCG combined with maternal serum AFP and maternal age-related risk for Down syndrome in a screening population (i.e., women under 35 years) yields an improved detection efficiency over other protocols.Human chorionic gonadotropin and unconjugated oestriol measurements in insulin-dependent diabetic pregnant women being screened for fetal Down syndrome.This prospective study investigates the relationship between insulin-dependent diabetes and maternal serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), and human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG). It also examines the potential impact on screening for Down syndrome. The population-based cohort included 20,321 pregnant women in Maine who underwent routine serum screening for Down syndrome in the second trimester. The cohort included 52 women with insulin-dependent diabetes. Maternal serum AFP levels are now routinely adjusted for insulin-dependent diabetes. These adjustments, therefore, were made routinely in the diabetic women, but no equivalent adjustments were made for uE3 and hCG values. The initial false-positive rate (using all three markers) among the women with diabetes was not significantly different from that in the non-diabetic population (7.7 and 5.4 per cent, respectively). Prior to adjustment for insulin-dependent diabetes, the median AFP level in the 52 women was 0.73 multiples of the median (MOM); the median levels of uE3 and hCG were 0.93 and 0.98 MOM, respectively. When the uE3 and hCG levels were adjusted, the initial false-positive rate was unchanged. Median serum levels of uE3 were significantly higher in the 33 women whose onset of diabetes was prior to 19 years of age (0.99 MOM) than in the 19 women whose onset of diabetes was at age 19 or older (0.84 MOM). This is the first population-based study to investigate the relationship between diabetes and serum levels of AFP, uE3, and hCG, and confirms earlier observations from a case-control study that found only slightly lower uE3 and hCG levels.Elevated levels of maternal serum inhibin immunoreactivity in second trimester pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome.First-trimester simple hygroma: cause and outcome.First-trimester fetuses with simple nuchal hygromas represent a population that is different from midgestation nuchal cystic hygroma in terms of karyotype abnormalities and long-term prognosis.Sixty-eight consecutive fetuses diagnosed with simple nuchal hygromas between 10 and 14 weeks' gestation were evaluated ultrasonographically and karyotyped. Those with normal chromosome complements were ultrasonographically monitored throughout the remainder of the pregnancy for resolution of their hygromas.Twenty-three of 27 fetuses with normal karyotypes resolved their hygromas within 4 weeks of diagnosis and were phenotypically normal at birth. Forty-one fetuses were karyotypically abnormal, with trisomy 21 being the most common abnormality.Fetuses with first-trimester simple nuchal hygromas are at high risk for aneuploidy and should be offered prenatal testing. Such fetuses with normal karyotypes will likely resolve their hygromas by 18 weeks' gestation, and most will be phenotypically normal at birth.First-trimester maternal serum Schwangerschafts protein 1 (SP1) in pregnancies associated with chromosomal anomalies.The relationship between first-trimester maternal serum Schwangerschafts protein 1 (SP1) and the karyotype of the pregnancy was examined in 692 women who underwent chorionic villus biopsy at 6-12 weeks. There were 30 pregnancies with abnormal karyotypes, consisting of 14 Down's syndrome (DS), eight trisomy 18, and eight other anomalies, two of which were mosaics. The normal ranges and medians for gestation were defined from the 662 cases in which the karyotype was normal. The median SP1 (0.5 MOM) of the abnormal group was significantly lower than that of the normal group (1.0 MOM). This relationship was maintained for the DS pregnancies (0.4 MOM) and for anomalies other than trisomy 18 (0.43 MOM) but not trisomy 18 (1.1 MOM). It is possible that the use of SP1 as a screening test for chromosome anomalies in the first trimester could have a 43 per cent detection rate for a 5 per cent false-positive rate.Ultrasound screening for chromosomal anomalies in the first trimester of pregnancy.For the last 6 years, sonographic signs for excessive fluid accumulation in the backs of 10- to 12-week-old fetuses have been looked for prior to transabdominal chorionic biopsy. In 1400 pregnancies, subsequent karyotype analyses revealed 28 cases of Down syndrome. In 15 (= 54 per cent), a large fluid cushion over most of the back had been documented at the time of biopsy. Only a few chromosomally normal fetuses with the same peculiarity were observed. The cushion was also present in fetuses with trisomies 18 and 13, and in Turner syndrome. Systematic first-trimester screening for nuchal fluid accumulation seems to be a recommended method for the detection of Down syndrome and other chromosome anomalies in young pregnant women at low risk. It compares favourably with current methods of maternal serum screening performed at 16-18 weeks which require a higher number of invasive procedures.First-trimester biochemical screening for fetal chromosome abnormalities and neural tube defects.Alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (UE3), intact human chorionic gonadotrophin (intHCG), and the free beta subunit of chorionic gonadotrophin (F beta HCG) were investigated in a series of 21 chromosomally abnormal and 14 open neural tube defect pregnancies ascertained from a series of 14,000 prospectively collected maternal serum samples at 6-14 weeks' gestation. In 16 cases of Down's syndrome, significant reductions were found for AFP (0.65 multiples of the normal median) and UE3 (0.67 MOM). IntHCG levels were unaltered (0.97 MOM) but a significant increase was found for F beta HCG (1.96 MOM). Significant correlations were found for AFP and UE3 in the controls and for intHCG and F beta HCG in both the control and the Down's syndrome pregnancies. In a group of five trisomy 18 pregnancies, median MOMs were for AFP 0.71, for UE3 0.34, for intHCG 0.27, and for F beta HCG 0.15. None of 13 pregnancies with open neural tube defects at 8-13 weeks gestation had elevated maternal serum AFP levels, whereas matched second-trimester samples from the same pregnancies at 16-18 weeks gestation all had significantly elevated AFP levels. Thus, biochemical screening for chromosome abnormalities may be practicable in the first trimester using free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin in combination with AFP and maternal age. However, a separate screening protocol using AFP at 15-18 weeks gestation would still be required for effective detection of neural tube defects.[Maternal serum markers and prenatal screening for trisomy 21].Nuchal translucency in the first trimester.All fetuses reported as having nuchal (nape of the neck) thickening or translucency detected by a first trimester ultrasound at 2 centres were reviewed to determine the incidence of aneuploidy. Twenty nine pregnancies were registered, amongst which 12 (41%) had an abnormal karyotype, the most common aneuploidy being trisomy 21 (5 fetuses). The likelihood of aneuploidy increased with increasing thickness of the translucency. Where the karyotype was found to be normal, there was complete resolution of this ultrasound appearance by the second trimester in 15 of the 16 ongoing pregnancies: 9 have delivered normal neonates and 6 pregnancies are continuing. The other fetus developed evidence of a skeletal dysplasia by the second trimester.Maternal serum CA 125 levels in pregnancies with chromosomally-normal and -abnormal fetuses. Dutch Working Party on Prenatal Diagnosis.We measured the maternal serum cancer antigen 125 (MS-CA 125) levels in 98 nonpregnant women, 765 first- and second-trimester pregnancies with chromosomally-normal fetuses, and 54 chromosomally-abnormal pregnancies. To determine the MS-CA 125 concentration, we used a new automated microparticle enzyme immunoassay with low inter-assay variability. The median MS-CA 125 level decreased from the first to the second trimester of pregnancy and was higher than that in non-pregnant women. We found no difference between normal and Down's syndrome (n = 29) pregnancies (t-test: t = 0.57, p > 0.5). The MS-CA 125 levels in pregnancies with other chromosomal abnormalities showed no difference either, compared with the normals. We conclude that MS-CA 125 is not a useful marker for fetal Down's syndrome, nor for other chromosomal disorders in pregnancy.Evaluation of multiple-marker screening for Down syndrome in a statewide population.Our purpose was to evaluate our experience with a statewide, multiple-marker Down syndrome screening program.The results of 18,712 screening tests performed from July 1, 1991, to Oct. 31, 1992, were reviewed. Amniocentesis and aneuploidy detection rates were compared with the experience of a previous year (1989-1990) in which material serum alpha-fetoprotein was used for detection of Down syndrome.Positive screening tests (Down syndrome risk > or = 1/190) occurred in 665 of 18,712 (3.5%) patients; 516 of 665 (78%) patients accepted amniocentesis. Fifteen aneuploidies were identified: 12 trisomy 21, one trisomy 18, one trisomy 13, and one 48,XXXY. The overall detection rate was one in 34 amniocenteses performed; for trisomy 21 it was one in 43. In a previous year in which maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein alone was used, 3.6% had positive screening tests (Down syndrome risk > or = 270); the detection rate for all aneuploidies was one in 57 amniocenteses, and for trisomy 21 it was one in 114. The expanded maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein test was well accepted by clinicians, with 36% of gravid state residents undergoing screening.The multiple marker test is a good screening tool and is superior to material serum alpha-fetoprotein alone.Prospective study of prenatal screening for Down's syndrome with free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin.To assess the value and impact of a screening programme for Down's syndrome that uses the two maternal serum markers: alpha fetoprotein and free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin.All women booked into clinics were screened. Further tests were offered to women with a risk of one in 300 or greater of having an affected baby. Follow up of outcome of all pregnancies.Biochemical screening laboratory serving two health districts.8179 women of all ages with singleton pregnancies screened between 15 and 22 weeks' gestation from 1 April 1991 to 31 March 1992.Detection rate of Down's syndrome, false positive rate, uptake of screening, uptake of amniocentesis in women identified as at increased risk, prevalence of Down's syndrome at birth.Overall 89% (8317/9345) of women underwent screening. The rate of detection of Down's syndrome was 69% (11/16; 95% confidence interval 41 to 89%) with a 5.2% false positive rate (426/179; 4.7 to 5.7%). In women under 30 the detection rate was 50% (four out of eight; 32 to 86%) Uptake of amniocentesis was 89% (389/437), resulting in a reduction of prevalence of Down's syndrome at birth from 1.1 per 1000 in previous years (66/59,696) to 0.4 per 1000 during the screening year (4/9345). Additionally, several other abnormalities were identified.The benefit of a high detection rate with this approach and the additional anomalies identified should encourage others to introduce screening programmes for Down's syndrome that use free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin and alpha fetoprotein.Dual analyte immunoassay in neural tube defect and Down's syndrome screening: results of a multicentre clinical trial.We report a multicentre clinical field trial of a novel dual analyte enzyme immunoassay method for the simultaneous measurement of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta-human choriogonadotropin (hCG) in the same microtitre well. The assay was shown to have good technical performance in the hands of all trial centres, with between assay coefficients of variation better than 10% for both analyte across the whole of the assay ranges. The method compared well with single analyte measuring procedures and produced acceptable performance as judged by external quality assurance criteria. Recovery of added analyte and analyte dilution curves also showed acceptable performance. In clinical evaluation of a large set of neural tube defect cases, good clinical discrimination from unaffected cases was observed using AFP. With over 150 Down's syndrome cases, the combination of AFP and free beta hCG confirmed the high detection rates achievable using this marker combination, with detection rates in excess of 70% in early gestation. We conclude that the combination of clinically superior markers coupled with technologically innovative assay design will lead to more efficient Down's screening programmes.The use of free beta-hCG in antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.To investigate the value of the measurement of free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) as a serum marker of Down's syndrome in the second trimester of pregnancy.A prospective observational study using stored antenatal serum samples.Serum samples collected from women receiving routine antenatal care in Oxford.Seventy-five singleton pregnancies with fetal Down's syndrome and 367 unaffected singleton pregnancies. Each affected pregnancy was matched with five control pregnancies for maternal age, gestational age, and duration of storage of the serum sample. None of the pregnancies were associated with neural tube defects.Maternal serum free beta-hCG levels. These were compared with total hCG levels in the same pregnancies. The performance of screening using free beta-hCG was compared with that using the principal markers, namely alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), and total hCG together with maternal age.The median free beta-hCG level in the affected pregnancies was 2.22 multiples of the normal median (MoM), significantly higher than in the unaffected pregnancies (95% confidence interval, 1.84-2.68 MoM). The discriminatory performances of free beta-hCG and total hCG, each considered separately, were similar; with a cut-off level of 2.5 MoM the detection rate was 43% and 5.7 of unaffected pregnancies had raised free beta-hCG levels (likelihood ratio of 7.5 (43/5.7)), somewhat better discrimination than the 32% and 4.6% respectively using total hCG (likelihood ratio of 7.0 (32/4.6)). With a higher cut-off level of 3.5 MoM, the rates were 19% and 2.7% respectively (likelihood ratio of 7.0), using free beta-hCG, worse than the 19% and 1.4% using total hCG (likelihood ratio of 13.6). Screening using maternal age, AFP, uE3 and free beta-hCG (instead of total hCG) yielded a detection rate of 62% (instead of 58%) at a screening risk cut-off level corresponding to a 5% false-positive rated).The main advantage in using free beta-hCG instead of total hCG is that there is a small increase in the detection rate (4%) for a given false-positive rate when used with maternal age, AFP and uE3. The main disadvantage is that there is less practical experience with free beta-hCG measurement and insufficient data to screen in certain categories of pregnancy (e.g. twins). The best practical advice is to use total hCG for the present but consider changing to free beta-hCG either (i) after further data are available that will permit the interpretation of screening results in the same way as is currently available with total hCG, or (ii) if its use with another marker confers a worthwhile increase in the detection rate for a given false-positive rate.Second-trimester unconjugated oestriol levels in maternal serum from chromosomally abnormal pregnancies using an optimized assay.Second-trimester unconjugated oestriol (UE3) levels were measured retrospectively in maternal serum from 78 chromosomally abnormal pregnancies and 390 matched controls using a radioimmunoassay kit (Amersham AMERLEX-M) optimized for use in the second trimester. Reduced levels of UE3 were found in a group of 49 Down's syndrome pregnancies with a median UE3 level of 0.79 multiples of the median (MOM) of the controls. Four trisomy 18 pregnancies had UE3 levels less than 0.7 MOM. There was a highly significant level of correlation between alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and UE3 levels in the controls (r = 0.25, p < 0.01), the Down's syndrome pregnancies (r = 0.44, p < 0.01), and the other chromosome abnormalities (r = 0.61, p < 0.01). When used as an additional marker to AFP and human chorionic gonadotrophin in screening for Down's syndrome, UE3 does not appear to add to the sensitivity of such screening.Racial differences in maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin and unconjugated oestriol levels.We assayed maternal serum samples from 134 black and 268 white women from 16 to 18 weeks of gestation for intact human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated oestriol (uE3). Serum from women with high (> or = 2.5 MOMs) or low (risk for Down syndrome > or = 1/365) maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) levels were excluded. After correcting for maternal weight, we found that median hCG levels were 16 per cent higher in black women but uE3 levels were not significantly different. These results confirm three other studies for hCG and one study for uE3. Corrections are recommended for both maternal serum hCG and AFP before calculating the risk for Down syndrome in black women.Stability of intact chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) in serum, liquid whole blood, and dried whole-blood filter-paper spots: impact on screening for Down syndrome by measurement of free beta-hCG subunit.The use of multiple maternal serum biochemical markers in screening for Down syndrome is gaining worldwide acceptance. We sought to study the impact of the potential instability of intact human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) on free beta-hCG subunit, a marker that has recently been used successfully in such screening. We found that, in practice, any changes in free beta-hCG due to the instability of intact hCG do not inhibit the effectiveness of free beta-hCG as a marker for Down syndrome. This was proven by controlled laboratory experiments at various stress temperatures, freeze-thaw studies, and analysis of a large set of screening data with particular reference to time in transit for individual samples. Data from controlled dissociation studies demonstrate that any apparent increase in free beta-hCG due to the instability of intact hCG cannot be attributed simply to the dissociation of intact hCG. Finally, for large-scale mass population screening in areas of the world where transport delays, safety concerns, and high temperatures preclude the shipment of liquid whole blood, dried whole-blood spots in filter paper provide a suitable delivery system with many advantages.Low maternal serum levels of pregnancy associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) in the first trimester in association with abnormal fetal karyotype.To assess the relation between maternal serum pregnancy associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) in the first trimester and the outcome of pregnancy by karyotype.A retrospective study of PAPP-A levels in blood samples collected prior to chorionic villus sampling.Milan, Italy.Five hundred twenty-two women aged 20 to 47, at 7 to 11 weeks gestation, prior to undergoing chorionic villus sampling. Four hundred forty-five women had a pregnancy with a normal karyotype; in 30 pregnancies the karyotype was abnormal (including 14 cases of Down's syndrome and 7 of trisomy 18).Normal or abnormal fetal karyotype. Serum PAPP-A at 6 to 11 weeks gestation measured by radioimmunoassay.The median value of PAPP-A in the abnormal group was 0.27 multiples of the normal median (MoM). This is significantly lower than the median value in the normal group (1.01 MoM) (95% CI for the difference 0.46-0.84 MoM; P < 0.00001 Mann-Whitney test).There is an association between low levels of PAPP-A in the first trimester with chromosome anomalies. Screening by measurement of PAPP-A might detect 60% of cases of Down's syndrome in the first trimester with a false positive rate of 5%.Cigarette smoking and levels of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, and hCG: impact on Down syndrome screening.To investigate the association between maternal cigarette smoking and serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated estriol (uE3), and hCG and to determine whether it is appropriate to take smoking status into account when screening for fetal Down syndrome.Smoking information was obtained from 23,668 pregnant women at the time of routine screening for fetal Down syndrome. Serum levels of AFP, uE3, and hCG were stratified by smoking status and compared. Individual risks for fetal Down syndrome were analyzed both before and after adjusting the hCG levels for the effect of smoking. The prevalence of Down syndrome in the study population was calculated for both smokers and non-smokers.The average AFP, uE3, and hCG levels in women who smoked cigarettes were 3% greater (95% confidence interval [CI] 2-4%), 3% less (95% CI 2-4%), and 23% less (95% CI 22-24%), respectively, compared with levels in non-smokers. At comparable maternal ages, women who smoked cigarettes were identified as being at high risk for fetal Down syndrome 40% less often than non-smokers (4.0 versus 7.1% at a risk level of 1:250). Adjusting hCG levels for smoking status reduced the overall false-positive rate from 6.4 to 6.1% (using a term risk cutoff level of 1:250). The predicted effect on detection was small (a 0.7% increase). The prevalence of Down syndrome was lower among smokers, but the difference was not statistically significant (odds ratio 0.51, 95% CI 0.15-1.5).Adjusting the serum markers used for Down syndrome screening for the effect of maternal smoking has a small effect on overall screening performance. Given the uncertainty over whether there is a lower birth prevalence among women who smoke cigarettes, such adjustment is not currently justified.Adjustment formulae for maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated oestriol to maternal weight and smoking.Serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) were measured in serum samples of 4131 non-smoking and 1018 smoking women during the second trimester of pregnancy. The levels of all three analytes decreased with increasing body weight. The AFP median was significantly increased in smokers in a dose-response association; hCG decreased by 21 per cent and uE3 decreased by 3 per cent in smokers in a non-dose-related fashion. Regression functions for adjustment of serum levels for weight and smoking should be considered in risk estimation for Down syndrome in order to give a woman's individual risk more precisely.Free alpha-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin in Down syndrome.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the potential value of maternal serum free alpha-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin concentrations in discriminating between pregnancies associated with Down syndrome and normal matched controls.Maternal serum concentrations were evaluated in 36 cases of fetal Down syndrome and compared with concentrations in 180 control unaffected pregnancies within the gestational age range 16 to 20 weeks matched for maternal age, gestational age, and storage duration.The results of the study indicate that free alpha-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin concentrations in the Down syndrome group were not significantly different from those in the unaffected group (median multiple of the median: for Down syndrome group, 0.991; for unaffected group, 1.000).Caution is urged in the interpretation of published data; a case for using this subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin in Down syndrome screening protocols in the second trimester is not yet proved.A prospective evaluation of a second-trimester screening test for fetal Down syndrome using maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, hCG, and unconjugated estriol.To test the efficacy of a screening protocol using a combination of maternal age plus three biochemical markers--maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP), hCG, and unconjugated estriol (E3)--for the antenatal detection of fetal Down syndrome.We conducted a prospective cohort study of 7718 women who underwent the triple-marker analysis between weeks 15-18 of pregnancy. A second-trimester risk for Down syndrome of 1:195 or greater was considered positive. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and their 95% confidence intervals (CIs) were calculated. We evaluated test performance for various maternal age groups and screen-positive cutoffs, as well as the relative screening efficacies of maternal age and MSAFP, MSAFP plus hCG, and MSAFP, hCG, and unconjugated E3.Four hundred sixty-one of the 7718 women screened (6%) were identified as positive; 319 women chose amniocentesis, for an overall amniocentesis rate of 4.1%. Twenty of 22 pregnancies affected with Down syndrome were correctly identified, as were 7255 of 7696 unaffected pregnancies, yielding a sensitivity and specificity of 91% (95% CI 79-100%) and 94% (95% CI 93.8-94.8%), respectively. The use of maternal age plus all three analytes improved test performance compared with maternal age plus MSAFP and hCG, but either had a significantly improved detection rate compared with that for maternal age and MSAFP alone.The triple-marker screen appears to be an effective method of detecting Down syndrome pregnancies while maintaining an acceptable amniocentesis rate.Serum PAPP-A measurements in first-trimester screening for Down syndrome.Serum PAPP-A measurements taken from 254 women in the first trimester are reported. Eleven chromosomal abnormalities were detected. The mean serum PAPP-A levels in cases of Down syndrome were 0.44 MOM at 9 weeks gestation, 0.15 MOM at 10 weeks, and 0.29 MOM at 11 weeks. The PAPP-A level at 10 weeks was below those of pregnancies which aborted spontaneously. At 11 weeks, the pregnancies with Down syndrome recorded the lowest PAPP-A levels at that gestation. On this small sample, offering chorionic villus sampling to women with singleton pregnancies and a PAPP-A level below 0.3 MOM (approximately 6.5 per cent of this at-risk group) would have detected all the Down syndrome fetuses at 10 weeks and 50 per cent at 11 weeks without selecting those cases destined to abort. This suggests that serum PAPP-A should continue to be investigated as a potential first-trimester screening test for Down syndrome.Maternal serum screening for neural tube defects and Down syndrome.Screening for fetal Down syndrome with maternal serum hCG and oestriol: a prospective study.We report the preliminary results of a prospective study aimed at evaluating the effectiveness of Down syndrome (DS) screening using second-trimester measurement of maternal serum human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) together with maternal age. Reference values for hCG, uE3, and the hCG/uE3 ratio in normal pregnancies were established from more than 3000 normal gestations and found to follow a log-normal statistical distribution. Risk evaluation was made using reference values for affected pregnancies from retrospective studies. Screening of 10,000 women under 38 years resulted in 412 amniocenteses and the prenatal diagnosis of six cases of DS, whereas four cases remained undetected until term. In a parallel study, diagnostic amniocentesis was performed in women over 38 years and in women with a previous affected child, and an evaluation of the risk of fetal DS based on serum hCG and uE3 levels was made in all cases. Fourteen cases of DS were detected. Median values for hCG and uE3 in the 24 affected pregnancies were close to the 90th and tenth centiles of the normal reference values, respectively, and thus are in good agreement with the values reported by others in retrospective studies.Maternal serum CA 125 for aneuploidy detection in early pregnancy.Maternal serum CA 125 levels were determined at 9-11 menstrual weeks for 26 cases of trisomy 13 (n = 4), trisomy 18 (n = 7), trisomy 21 (n = 15), and appropriate controls. There were no statistically significant differences between groups.First-trimester maternal serum human chorionic gonadotrophin as a marker for fetal chromosomal disorders. The Dutch Working Party on Prenatal Diagnosis.The Dutch Working Party on Prenatal Diagnosis has initiated a study on the possibilities of first-trimester screening for fetal chromosomal disorders. We report on maternal serum human chorionic gonadotrophin (MS-hCG) measurements in 1348 pregnancies with a chromosomally normal fetus and 53 pregnancies with a chromosomally abnormal fetus. The median MS-hCG concentration in 24 pregnancies with Down's syndrome was 1.19 multiples of the normal median (MoM). The MS-hCG distributions in normal and Down's syndrome pregnancies did not differ significantly (t-test: t = 1.945, p greater than 0.05). We also found no difference between normal pregnancies and pregnancies with other chromosomal disorders (six cases of trisomy 18, MoM = 0.80; four cases of sex chromosome abnormality, MoM = 1.01; 17 cases of chromosomal mosaicism in chorionic villi, MoM = 1.11). Selecting an upper limit at the 90th centile could detect 25 per cent of pregnancies with Down's syndrome. We conclude that, in the first trimester, MS-hCG as a screening factor for Down's syndrome is of minor value. However, MS-hCG could be a useful factor in a first-trimester screening programme based on a combination of markers.Antenatal maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome: results of a demonstration project.To assess the implementation of antenatal screening for Down's syndrome in practice, using individual risk estimates based on maternal age and the three serum markers: alpha fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol, and human chorionic gonadotrophin.Demonstration project of Down's syndrome screening; women with a risk estimate at term of 1 in 250 or greater were classified as "screen positive" and offered diagnostic amniocentesis.Hospital and community antenatal clinics in four health districts in London.12,603 women of all ages with singleton pregnancies seen between February 1989 and the end of May 1991, with follow up of the outcome of pregnancy completed to the end of 1991.Uptake of screening, detection rate for Down's syndrome, false positive rate, odds of being affected given a positive result, and uptake of amniocentesis in women with positive screening results, together with the costs of the screening programme.The uptake of screening was 74%. The detection rate was 48% (12/25), and the false positive rate was 4.1%, consistent with results expected from previous work based on observational studies. There was a loss of detection due to the selective use of ultrasound scans among women with positive screening results. One affected pregnancy occurred among 205 reclassified as negative; this illustrated the danger of false negatives occurring in this group and lends weight to the view that if an ultrasound estimate of gestational age is used it should be carried out routinely on all women rather than selectively among those with positive results. The estimated cost of avoiding the birth of a baby with Down's syndrome was about 38,000 pounds, substantially less than the lifetime costs of care.Antenatal maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome is effective in practice and can be readily integrated into routine antenatal care. It is cost effective and performs better than selection for amniocentesis on the basis of maternal age alone.Maternal serum screening for fetal Down syndrome in women less than 35 years of age using alpha-fetoprotein, hCG, and unconjugated estriol: a prospective 2-year study.To evaluate prospectively maternal serum screening with alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), hCG, and unconjugated estriol (uE3) as a screen for fetal Down syndrome.Women less than 35 years of age were offered screening between 15-20 weeks' gestation. Screening results calculated by an algorithm to be equal to or greater than 1:274 (the risk of a 35-year-old for fetal Down syndrome at the second trimester) were considered positive. If gestational age was confirmed by ultrasonography, genetic counseling and amniocentesis were offered.In the first 2 years of our program, 9530 women were screened, of which 686 (7.2%) were found to be screen-positive. Ultrasonographic examination explained the abnormal values in 379 (4.0%). The remaining 307 (3.2%) received genetic counseling and 214 (2.2%) elected amniocentesis or CVS. Four cases of fetal Down syndrome and one de novo chromosomal marker were detected. In three additional cases of fetal Down syndrome, triple-analyte screening failed to identify the pregnancies to be at increased risk. None of the seven cases of fetal Down syndrome would have been detected through screening with maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) and age alone.Measurement of MSAFP, hCG, and uE3 in women less than 35 years old is an effective screening test for fetal Down syndrome, with a sensitivity of 57% in our study and an amniocentesis rate (false-positive rate) of 3.2%.Prenatal screening for Down's syndrome with use of maternal serum markers.Approximately 35 percent of all cases of Down's syndrome in fetuses can be detected by measuring maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein during the second trimester in the general population of pregnant women. Recent case-control studies indicate that this detection rate could be approximately doubled by measuring serum levels of unconjugated estriol and chorionic gonadotropin, which are abnormally low and abnormally high, respectively, in women carrying fetuses affected by Down's syndrome.We prospectively screened 25,207 women and adolescents in the second trimester of pregnancy and assigned each a risk of fetal Down's syndrome with an algorithm that took into account measurements of all three serum markers in combination with maternal age. On this basis, 1661 subjects (6.6 percent) were initially assigned a second-trimester risk of fetal Down's syndrome of at least 1 in 190, and 962 (3.8 percent) were offered amniocentesis for chromosomal analysis after verification of gestational age. Gestational age was determined on the basis of the first day of the last menstrual period or, when available, by ultrasonography.Among the 760 women and adolescents who chose amniocentesis, 20 cases of fetal Down's syndrome were detected, along with 7 other chromosomal disorders. There was 1 additional case of fetal Down's syndrome among the 202 women who chose not to have amniocentesis. The rate of detection of Down's syndrome was thus 58 percent (21 of 36 expected cases), and the frequency of identifying a fetus with Down's syndrome in women undergoing amniocentesis was 1 per 38 amniocenteses (95 percent confidence interval, 1 in 25 to 1 in 62).Measuring serum alpha-fetoprotein, chorionic gonadotropin, and estriol is more effective in screening for fetal Down's syndrome than measuring maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein alone. Such an expanded protocol can readily be incorporated into existing prenatal screening programs.Improved performance in a prenatal screening programme for Down's syndrome incorporating serum-free hCG subunit analyses.A prenatal screening programme for Down's syndrome potentially detecting 76 per cent of affected pregnancies in the South Australian general population at an amniocentesis rate of 3.9 per cent was designed following analysis of mid-trimester serum samples from 57 women who carried an affected fetus. This equates to one affected pregnancy being detected for 41 chromosomal analyses performed. For the experimental series, 75.4 per cent of affected pregnancies were detected, while 4.1 per cent of control specimens produced estimated risk odds consistent with further action. A maternal risk odds of birth of a Down's syndrome fetus of 1:420 was taken as the decision value, which is the prevalence of Down's syndrome births to 35-year-old mothers in South Australia. This screening performance was achieved by investigating combinations of serum analytes not previously reported and by refining the calculation of maternal risk odds to include selective weighting of indicator analytes. Combination of the measurements of free alpha-subunits and beta-subunits of chorionic gonadotrophin, alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol, and placental lactogen was found to be most effective in indicating Down's syndrome fetuses. In all combinations of analytes tested, replacing the measurements of free alpha-subunits and free beta-subunits of chorionic gonadotrophin with the measurement of intact chorionic gonadotropin produced a less effective screen.CA-125 as a maternal serum marker for Down's syndrome in the first and second trimesters.CA-125, alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), and human chorionic gonadotropin (HCG) were determined in maternal serum in the first trimester from 14 women with a Down's syndrome fetus and 61 women with a healthy fetus. In the second trimester, 15 and 60 serum samples were determined from women with a Down's syndrome and a healthy fetus respectively. In both trimesters, maternal serum CA-125 was found to be elevated in Down's syndrome pregnancies compared with controls. Using discrimination functions, our preliminary results indicate that CA-125 is a better marker than AFP and HCG respectively for a Down's syndrome fetus in the first trimester and improves the detection rate in the second trimester.Maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome: the effect of routine ultrasound scan determination of gestational age and adjustment for maternal weight.To investigate the effect of using a routine ultrasound estimate of gestational age and maternal weight adjustment on maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) levels in antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.Women with a singleton pregnancy without Down's syndrome were screened using the three serum markers and an estimate of gestational age based on 'dates' (time since first day of the last menstrual period) and one based on an ultrasound scan examination was recorded together with maternal weight.Women attending the Homerton Hospital, Hackney, for their antenatal care between February 1989 and January 1990.2113 women with a singleton pregnancy without Down's syndrome.The use of ultrasound to estimate gestational age (usually based on the biparietal diameter of the fetal skull) led to a significant reduction in the variance of each marker at a given week of pregnancy. The level of each marker was negatively associated with maternal weight, so that adjustment for weight also led to a reduction in variance. These data on gestational age and maternal weight, taken together with published data on pregnancies associated with Down's syndrome, indicate that the routine use of ultrasound to estimate gestational age will increase the detection rate from 58% to 67% while maintaining the false-positive rate at 5%, or reduce the false-positive rate from 5.7% to 3.1% while maintaining the detection rate at 60%. Routine maternal weight adjustment for the serum marker levels was much less useful, increasing the detection rate by about 0.5% for a given false-positive rate, or reducing the false-positive rate about 0.1% for a given detection rate.An ultrasound gestational age estimate available at the time of Down's syndrome screening confers a substantial advantage to screening performance with a further small benefit resulting from maternal weight adjustment, which is worth adopting if it can be done without difficulty or extra cost.Maternal serum unconjugated oestriol and human chorionic gonadotrophin levels in pregnancies with insulin-dependent diabetes: implications for screening for Down's syndrome.To investigate maternal serum unconjugated oestriol (uE3) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) levels in pregnant women with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus and to consider the implications of the results for antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.Descriptive study using stored antenatal serum samples.Stored serum samples collected from women receiving routine antenatal care in Oxford.126 singleton pregnancies in 92 women with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus and for each pregnancy, two pregnancies without diabetes matched for gestational age and duration of storage of the serum sample. None of the pregnancies was associated with fetal neural tube defect or Down's syndrome.Maternal serum uE3 and hCG levels at 15-22 weeks gestation. Alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels were also measured for comparison.The median uE3 level in the diabetic pregnancies was 0.92 multiples of the median (MoM) for pregnancies without diabetes at the same gestational age (P less than 0.05); and the hCG level was 0.95 MoM (P = 0.48). The median AFP level was also reduced to 0.77 MoM (P less than 0.001).The reduction in uE3 and AFP levels in insulin-dependent diabetic pregnancies is sufficiently great to be taken into account in maternal serum screening programmes for Down's syndrome. Dividing the uE3 and AFP levels in such pregnancies by the corresponding median for insulin-dependent diabetic pregnancies will yield a similar false-positive rate in pregnancies with and without insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.Second-trimester cancer antigen 125 and Down's syndrome.This study explores if assay of cancer antigen 125 (CA 125) in maternal serum might aid the detection of Down's syndrome in the second trimester of pregnancy. CA 125 levels were determined retrospectively in stored maternal serum samples from ten Down's syndrome pregnancies and 78 controls matched for gestational and maternal age. In addition, second-trimester amniotic fluid samples from nine Down's syndrome and 109 unaffected pregnancies were analysed for CA 125. Maternal serum CA 125 values for Down's syndrome pregnancies were lower, with the median being 0.72 multiples of the unaffected population median. The medians for affected and unaffected pregnancies did not differ significantly and there was a considerable overlap in the range of values of cases and controls. The distribution of amniotic fluid CA 125 levels for Down's syndrome pregnancies resembled that for controls. From our present results, we could not find an association between Down's syndrome and second-trimester maternal serum or amniotic fluid CA 125 levels.Free beta human choriogonadotropin in Down's syndrome screening: a multicentre study of its role compared with other biochemical markers.To ascertain the value of maternal serum free beta-human choriogonadotropin subunit measurement in Down's syndrome screening and to compare its effectiveness when screening with a variety of biochemical markers, we have evaluated maternal serum free beta-human choriogonadotropin, total human choriogonadotropin, alpha-fetoprotein and unconjugated oestriol in a large multicentre study of over 2800 unaffected cases and 90 affected cases, the largest collection of Down's cases ever reported. Of all the markers identified to date, free beta-human choriogonadotropin is the marker of choice for use in Down's syndrome screening. When used in early gestation (14-16 weeks) in combination with alpha-fetoprotein and maternal age, it will allow the detection of 77% of Down's cases. A side-by-side comparison with the performance of total human choriogonadotropin shows the superior detection efficiency of free beta-human choriogonadotropin. Unconjugated oestriol adds nothing further to the detection rate compared with the use of alpha-fetoprotein and free beta-human choriogonadotropin alone, and its use results in a 1% increase in false positive rate. We conclude that unconjugated oestriol has no value in Down's screening. The superior detection rate obtained using free beta-human choriogonadotropin is a result of superior detection of Down's cases in women under 30 years old, where the free beta-human choriogonadotropin combination detects 100% more cases than does the total human choriogonadotropin combination.Maternal serum CA125 is not a second trimester marker for Down's syndrome.First trimester CA 125 and Down's syndrome.First-trimester aneuploidy screening using serum human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), free ahCG, and progesterone.Immunochemical serum assays for human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), the free ahCG subunit, and progesterone (P) were considered separately and in combination for their ability to screen for chromosomally abnormal pregnancies in the first trimester. Maternal serum was collected from 141 women undergoing chorionic villus sampling at 9-12 menstrual weeks. Trisomy 21 pregnancies had significantly higher hCG levels, while trisomy 18 and 13 pregnancies had markedly lower hCG and progesterone levels than those of chromosomally normal pregnancies. However, the discrimination of normal from aneuploid pregnancies was poor with either hCG alone, progesterone alone, or free ahCG alone. Much improved discrimination was obtained by combining hCG, free ahCG, and P into an aneuploidy index [(P/hCG)(free ahCG/hCG)]. This index distinguished 9 out of 17 (53 per cent) of the trisomy 21 pregnancies, while only misidentifying 5 out of 112 (4.5 per cent) of the normal pregnancies. The aneuploidy index thus appears promising as a first-trimester biochemical screen for aneuploid pregnancies.[Proposed normal values for alpha fetoprotein in maternal serum for the detection of neural tube closure defects and Down syndrome. Preliminary study].To establish a normal range of alpha fetoprotein in maternal serum (AFP sm) in the population at the "20 de Noviembre" Hospital in Mexico City, there were studied 46 patients with a normal pregnancy confirmed with ultrasonography between 16 to 18 week of gestation. The 97 determinations of AFPsm were made by radioimmunoanalysis. The multiples of the median (MoM) were 2.16 al 16th weeks, 2.33 a 17th week 2.43 al 18th week of pregnancy. Now the methods to determine abnormalities in the product and the genetics studies are proposed only to the patients considered high risk (older than 35 years old, previous malformed son or family history of those abnormalities). AFPsm and the establishment of normal range allow us to amplify the study to every pregnant woman and to determine those malformations in the pregnant women of low risk which represents about 90-95% of DCTN and about 80% of SD.First-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and chorionic gonadotropin in aneuploid pregnancies.First-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and human chorionic gonadotropin (HCG) levels were measured in samples from 29 women with cytogenetically abnormal pregnancies and 145 women with cytogenetically normal pregnancies matched for gestational age, race, and sample storage time. All patients had a risk of fetal aneuploidy greater than or equal to that of a mother 35 years of age. AFP was significantly lower in samples from pregnancies affected with trisomy 21 (0.67 MoM; p less than 0.05), while HCG values were no different from those of matched controls. Trisomies 13 and 18 could not be distinguished from matched controls by AFP. However, levels of HCG were significantly lower in such pregnancy samples, with median values of 0.65 MoM in trisomy 13 and 0.32 MoM in trisomy 18 (p less than 0.05). Variations in AFP and HCG levels suggest that expressed differences between autosomal aneuploidies include differences in fetal and placental protein production in the first trimester.Estimating the risk of a fetal autosomal trisomy at mid-trimester using maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and age: a retrospective study of 142 pregnancies.Risks appropriate for mid-trimester prenatal screening for autosomal trisomies have been estimated from a combination of maternal age and maternal serum (MS) alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels at 16-20 weeks gestation. Published data on the frequency of Down's syndrome births relative to maternal age were modified to include the additional age-related frequency of trisomy 18 and trisomy 13 cases to provide an overall risk for an autosomal trisomy at mid-trimester. MSAFP results from a retrospective study of 142 affected (114 trisomy 21, 19 trisomy 18, and 9 trisomy 13) and 113,000 unaffected pregnancies were converted to multiples of the appropriate gestational median (MOM). The AFP levels in the autosomal trisomy pregnancies were found to be significantly reduced at 0.72 MOM of the unaffected pregnancies. Risks (likelihood ratios) were derived from the overlapping log Gaussian distributions for affected and unaffected pregnancies and combined with maternal age risks to give the overall odds of an affected pregnancy. A mid-trimester cut-off risk of 1:280 gave an estimated 37 per cent detection rate for autosomal trisomies in the west of Scotland population for a follow-up (false-positive) rate of 6.6 per cent. These figures compare with a 30 per cent detection and 6.7 per cent false-positive rate if age 35 years and over is used as the sole criterion for selection of at-risk pregnancies.[Antenatal screening of maternal alpha-fetoprotein with dried-blood spot samples on filter paper].Abnormal levels of maternal serum alphafetoprotein (AFP) have been used as a good biochemical marker for the screening of neural tube defects (NTD) and Down syndrome. From January 1988 to June 1989, we conducted a community-based maternal AFP screening program in Nan-Tou County, which is located in the middle of Taiwan. A total of 3,776 pregnant women, which accounted for about 42% of the total number of women pregnant during that period of time in Nan-Tou county, were screened using the filter paper blood collecting technique. Of those screened, 5.1% of them were found to be borderline positive for NTD (2.0 less than MoM less than 2.5). The screening positive rates for NTD (MoM greater than 2.5) and Down syndrome (Down's risk greater than 1/100) were 3.7% and 1.7%, respectively. Except for those lost to follow-up, 3 (2.1%) of the borderline cases were confirmed to have serious pregnancy complications (porencephaly, fetal demise, and imminent miscarriage). Eleven (10.8%) of the abnormal pregnancies, which included 1 case of possible hydrocephalus, 2 cases of anencephalus, and 1 case of triploid, were found in the NTD positive group. Six (18.7%) anomalies (1 Down syndrome, 1 hydatidiform mole, and 4 miscarriages) were detected in the increased Down's risk group. Totally, 20 adverse pregnancies, i.e. 0.5% (20/3,776) of the screened women, were confirmed in this screening program. No false-positive cases were reported, or were found among the 1,777 post-delivery questionnaires completed.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Maternal serum unconjugated oestriol and human chorionic gonadotrophin levels in twin pregnancies: implications for screening for Down's syndrome.To investigate maternal serum unconjugated oestriol (uE3) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) levels in twin pregnancies and to consider the implications of the results for antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.Measurement of maternal serum uE3 and hCG levels from 15-22 weeks of gestation in twin and singleton pregnancies. Previously available maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels were also presented.Stored serum samples collected from women receiving routine antenatal care in Oxford were used.200 women with a twin pregnancy and, for each, three singleton control pregnancies matched for gestational age (same completed week of pregnancy) and duration of storage of the serum sample (same calendar quarter).The median uE3, hCG and AFP levels in the twin pregnancies were respectively, 1.67 (95% CI 1.56-1.79), 1.84 (95% CI 1.64-2.07) and 2.13 (95% CI 1.97-2.31) multiples of the median (MoM) for singleton pregnancies at the same gestational age. The variance of values for the three serum markers (expressed in logarithms), and the correlation coefficients between any two, were similar in the twin and singleton pregnancies.In maternal serum screening programmes for Down's syndrome dividing uE3, hCG and AFP MoM values in twin pregnancies by the corresponding medians for twin pregnancies will, in expectation, yield a similar false-positive rate in twin pregnancies as in singleton pregnancies.Maternal serum screening for neural tube defects and Down's syndrome.Prenatal screening for chromosome abnormalities using maternal serum chorionic gonadotrophin, alpha-fetoprotein, and age.Human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) levels were assayed retrospectively in stored maternal serum samples from 78 chromosomally abnormal pregnancies and 410 controls matched for gestation and maternal age. The median serum hCG concentration in 49 pregnancies with Down's syndrome was significantly elevated, at 2.18 multiples of the normal median. Significantly reduced hCG concentrations were found in a group of four trisomy 18 pregnancies (all less than 0.4 multiples of the median). Eight cases of unbalanced chromosome rearrangements appeared to show some lowering of hCG levels, while there was no significant difference in the levels in the cases of trisomy 13, balanced translocations, and sex chromosome abnormalities. Maternal serum hCG alone is a better indicator of Down's syndrome pregnancies than maternal age or maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), either individually or in combination, and provides a further virtually independent measure of risk. On the basis of our findings, screening for Down's syndrome using hCG and AFP results combined with maternal age risks is predicted to result in a higher detection rate (57 per cent) for a lower false-positive rate (5.0 per cent) than would be attainable by combined AFP and age screening (37 per cent detection at a 6.6 per cent false-positive rate).Evaluation of an assay of the free beta-subunit of choriogonadotropin and its potential value in screening for Down's syndrome.In this study I investigated the analytical and clinical performance of the measurement of the free beta-subunit of choriogonadotropin (hCG) in normal pregnancies and in pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome. Free beta-hCG in maternal serum has been shown to be increased in Down's syndrome-affected pregnancies and is proportionally increased in more cases than is total hCG. This study confirms previous findings of low concentrations of unconjugated estriol and alpha-fetoprotein in maternal serum in Down's syndrome-affected pregnancies. Using a multivariate risk analysis of maternal age and concentrations of alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, and hCG in maternal serum, I determined that, at a risk cutoff value of 1 in 300, 52% of Down's cases could be detected with total hCG in the calculation, compared with 66% with the free beta-hCG concentration. The false-positive rate was 5.9% in both cases. Therefore, free beta-hCG can be used effectively in a screening program for Down's syndrome; however, further studies are required to ascertain whether the measurement of free beta-hCG has any advantages over the use of total hCG for detecting Down's syndrome.Alteration in age-specific risks for chromosomal trisomy by maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotropin screening.Maternal serum screening for alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) increases the detection rate of Down's syndrome (DS) pregnancies. To estimate the risk of a DS pregnancy for a particular woman, Wald et al. combine a trivariate function of AFP, hCG, and unconjugated oestriol with age-specific risk. Calculation of independent likelihood ratios (LRs) for AFP and hCG has allowed us to examine the predictive value of each test alone and the combination. AFP and hCG were measured in stored serum samples from 672 normal, 8 trisomy 21 (DS), 9 trisomy 18, and 2 trisomy 13 pregnancies. AFP and hCG multiples of the median (MOM) were calculated for each sample. The LRs for AFP MOM and hCG MOM were calculated and combined with age-specific risk. Of eight DS pregnancies, six had increased risk based on age and AFP. Addition of hCG detected two additional DS pregnancies. Of nine trisomy 18 pregnancies, four (44 per cent) had hCG MOM under 0.25. Three out of nine would have been classified as high risk by AFP, but none by combined AFP and hCG. Amniocentesis would have been recommended in 74 per cent of aneuploid pregnancies if both age and serum screening were used. Abandonment of amniocentesis based on age alone would have excluded two abnormal pregnancies from detection. Screening programmes should note that combined risk figures are specific for DS and do not include other trisomies. Detection of other trisomies requires inclusion of low hCG level as a discriminator and continuation of age-based testing.Ultrasound detection of fetal aneuploidy in patients with elevated maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein.Increasing confidence in the ability of high-resolution ultrasound to detect neural tube and ventral wall defects has enabled us to offer a revised risk estimate to the patient with an elevated maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) level, such that amniocentesis may not be necessary. Recent authors have suggested that a reduced emphasis on follow-up amniocentesis fails to consider an increased risk for chromosomal anomalies in pregnancies with an elevated MSAFP, and that amniocentesis should still be performed. We reviewed our ultrasound findings from patients who underwent amniocentesis for evaluation of an elevated MSAFP and who had a karyotype prepared from the amniotic fluid sample. Four abnormal karyotypes were detected among 313 amniocenteses, and three of these were correctly predicted based on an abnormal ultrasound. The risk of an unexpected fetal aneuploidy after a normal consultative ultrasound in our series was one in 310. This is comparable to the risk of detecting abnormal chromosomes in the fetus of a 32-year-old woman, an age at which amniocentesis is not routinely offered.Sensitivity and specificity of screening for Down syndrome with alpha-fetoprotein, hCG, unconjugated estriol, and maternal age.The sensitivity and specificity of maternal serum screening for Down syndrome with different biochemical markers were evaluated. Detection rates with different combinations of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP), hCG, and unconjugated estriol (uE3) were established by retrieving and analyzing 54 serum specimens from women with confirmed Down syndrome pregnancies, compared with 657 specimens from women with normal outcomes. With a risk cutoff of 1:270 at the second trimester, the detection rate with MSAFP, hCG, and uE3 was two to three times higher than with MSAFP alone. With all three markers, the detection rate for Down syndrome increased from 50 to 77% as maternal age increased, and was 60% in a representative screened population. If uE3 was omitted, the detection rate decreased from 60 to 48%. One thousand women were screened prospectively, either with MSAFP or with all three markers prospectively, either with MSAFP or with all three markers and 4.1% with MSAFP. With the three markers, the positive predictive value for Down syndrome was 2.2% overall and as high as 5.9% in older women. Therefore, the addition of hCG and uE3 to the maternal serum screen increases the positive predictive value by 50-300%, depending on maternal age. These results confirm the efficacy of screening for Down syndrome using maternal age and three serum markers.Diagnosis and significance of cystic hygroma in the first trimester.Thirty cases of cervical cystic hygroma were diagnosed in the first trimester of pregnancy. Karyotype analysis was available in 29 (97 per cent). Fifteen (52 per cent) had a chromosomal abnormality. The ultrasound appearance was described as posterior cervical, lateral cervical, or cervical hygroma with hydrops. Of the 14 euploid embryos, six were electively aborted, two are undelivered, and six have been delivered as phenotypically normal infants. In cases in which the chromosomes were normal and the pregnancy continued, all lesions resolved by 18 weeks.Identification of haptoglobin alpha-2FF variants in mid-trimester maternal serum as potential markers for Down syndrome.Exploratory protein analysis in mid-trimester maternal sera by 2-dimensional electrophoresis and image analysis was performed to determine the differences between mothers carrying fetuses with Down syndrome (DS) and control mothers. Nine haptoglobin alpha-1 and alpha-2 (Hp1 and Hp2) variants were detected. Three apparent isoforms of the Hp2FF protein having the same relative charge but different Mr's were detected, with the two smaller variants--Hp2FF (-0.7k) and Hp2FF (-1.3k)--believed to be first reported here. Ninety-two percent of the cases (n = 83) had the Hp2FF (-0.7k) protein, and 61% had Hp2FF (-1.3k). The geometric mean concentration of Hp2FF (Mr = 18.0 kd) was found to be significantly increased (P less than 0.01) in mid-trimester sera from cases (n = 27) compared to controls (n = 56). When the concentrations of the three Hp2FF isoforms were added, the cases had larger sums on average than controls (P less than 0.01).The role of ultrasound in screening for Down syndrome.First-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotropin screening for chromosome defects.The aim of this study was to determine the efficacy of combined maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) and maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin (MShCG) screening in detecting chromosome defects in the first trimester of pregnancy. Sera of 492 women (previously assayed for MSAFP) were analysed for MShCG under code without knowledge of cytogenetic results. Overall, 48 of 492 patients (9.8 per cent) had either an MSAFP multiple of the median less than or equal to 0.5 or an MShCG beta/alpha ratio multiple of the median less than or equal to 0.25, eight of whom had a fetus with a serious chromosome defect. A third of fetuses with Down's syndrome and 83 per cent with trisomy 18 were detected at a potential 'cost' of providing chorionic villus sampling or amniocentesis in 8.6 per cent of women screened.Maternal serum Down syndrome screening: free beta-protein is a more effective marker than human chorionic gonadotropin.The use of quantitative human chorionic gonadotropin measurement in obstetrics has a long and successful history. Prior studies on the utility of human chorionic gonadotropin in Down syndrome screening have utilized assays that measure the intact human chorionic gonadotropin molecule. This study targeted a distinct marker, the human chorionic gonadotropin free beta-protein, which is present in second-trimester maternal serum at much lower concentrations than is intact human chorionic gonadotropin. Our study of 29 cases of trisomy 21 and 450 control samples shows 80% detection efficiency with maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, the free beta-protein, and maternal age in pregnancies under 17 weeks' gestation. We conclude that the combination of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and the human chorionic gonadotropin free beta-protein will be useful in the prenatal detection of trisomy 21.First-trimester maternal serum biochemical indicators in Down syndrome.A set of 21 early maternal serum samples (19 first-trimester and two at 14 weeks) from pregnancies resulting in a child with Down syndrome was matched for gestation and length of storage with 63 samples from unaffected pregnancies. The concentrations of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), pregnancy-specific beta 1-glycoprotein (SP1), and placental alkaline phosphatase (PALP) were measured. The ratios of the medians for Down syndrome pregnancies compared with the medians for controls were AFP 0.71, uE3 0.67, hCG 1.43, SP1 0.79, and PALP 0.92. Although the differences between the medians for affected and unaffected pregnancies were not significant, the trends for AFP, uE3, and hCG confirm earlier findings on first-trimester samples.Down syndrome screening in women under 35 with maternal serum hCG.Human chorionic gonadotropin and maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) concentrations were measured in frozen maternal serum samples from 16 pregnancies with Down syndrome and from 614 unaffected pregnancies in women younger than 35. By using only maternal age and MSAFP level to determine Down syndrome risk, four of 16 (25%) Down syndrome pregnancies were identified, using risk estimates as a screening variable. This detection rate required performing amniocentesis on 4.8% of pregnancies with a normal outcome. By adding hCG level as a third risk parameter, ten of 16 (62.5%) Down syndrome pregnancies were detected. To achieve this detection rate, 4.7% of women under 35 would be recommended for amniocentesis. These results indicate that the estimation of risk for Down syndrome based on the addition of maternal hCG level to MSAFP level and maternal age will substantially improve the detection rate for Down syndrome, with no change in the amniocentesis rate. These findings are in agreement with other studies that suggest that hCG is a valuable addition to screening programs for Down syndrome.The effect of smoking in pregnancy on maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol, human chorionic gonadotrophin, progesterone and dehydroepiandrosterone sulphate levels.Maternal serum markers in screening for Down syndrome.The addition of two new markers in maternal serum, estriol and HCG, to those already known, namely the level of maternal serum alfa-fetoprotein and maternal age, considerably improves the expected results of a screening strategy for Down syndrome. The detection rate is slightly increased from 53.0% to 57.6%, but, more importantly, the false-positive rate decreases from 9.4% to 7.3%. It is our belief that, at least in women aged less than 35 years, a screening strategy based on a combination of maternal age and biochemical markers should be incorporated into antenatal care. For older women, the results of such a maternal serum test may refine counseling for genetic amniocentesis, as a much more explicit risk calculation can be performed than that based on age alone.Prenatal screening for Down syndrome with maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin levels.Human chorionic gonadotropin levels in midtrimester pregnancies may be predictive of Down syndrome. A commercially available enzyme immunoassay kit was used to measure the beta-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin in maternal sera from 38 Down syndrome pregnancies and 114 gestational age matched controls. The human chorionic gonadotropin levels were also assayed in 236 normal sera and plasma samples to determine normative values and appropriate individual corrections. Serum and plasma human chorionic gonadotropin levels are closely correlated and are stable at room temperature, during refrigeration, and throughout freeze-thaw cycles. There is no correlation between the human chorionic gonadotropin level and maternal age, weight, or race. However, the human chorionic gonadotropin level decreases with each week of gestation from 15 to 19 weeks. Medians for each week of gestation were established to account for this variable. Up to 63% of the Down syndrome pregnancies were detected with a cutoff of 2.0 multiples of the normal median. A computational combination of human chorionic gonadotropin and maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein testing will detect additional Down syndrome pregnancies and decrease the false-positive rate. The measurement of human chorionic gonadotropin appears to be a valuable addition to maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening programs that can significantly increase the proportion of Down syndrome cases diagnosed.Evaluation of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and ultrasound examination to screen fetal chromosomal abnormalities.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP), anatomic anomalies and precocious defects of foetal growth were shown as possible "indicators" of foetal chromosomal pathology, in particular Down's syndrome, and thus suggested for prenatal screening of risk patients for this chromosomal abnormalities. The Authors carried out a retrospective study on 1472 patients who underwent amniocentesis for prenatal diagnosis. Between the 15th and the 20th week, a dosage of MSAFP was effected, in order to evaluate if the serum concentration of this substance could predict Down's syndrome. A contemporary study by echographic monitoring was effected on 500 patients from the 1st trimester of pregnancy, in order to detect possible foetal growth retardation precociously and to determine the karyotype in these cases. Results are very interesting and suggest both the dosage of MSAFP and the ecographic monitoring for prenatal screening of trisomy 21, especially in maternal age classes younger than 40 years, where the cost/benefit ratio of screening for maternal age is less favourable.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein prenatal screening for Down syndrome.The relationship between maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) levels, maternal age and Down syndrome risk factors were studied in the greater Birmingham and North Alabama areas. After adjustment for race and maternal weight, 3.84 percent of women in this study were determined to have Down syndrome risk factors equal to or greater than that of a 35 year old woman with a normal pregnancy. Maternal weight adjustment was of special importance, reducing the number of MSAFP values considered low from 5.12 percent to 3.40 percent. The use of race and area specific medians was also important in the use of prenatal MSAFP screening for Down syndrome affected pregnancies.[Screening for chromosomal anomalies with maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein].Between July 1, 1986 and January 31, 1988, genetic amniocentesis was performed on 205 patients. The maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and amniotic fluid AFP levels were measured by enzyme immunoassay. Gestational dates were confirmed by sonography, and AFP results were expressed as multiples of the median (MOM). The median of maternal serum AFP from 15 to 17 weeks of gestation was 43.4, 62.6 and 72.5 ng/ml. Three fetuses with chromosomal anomalies were diagnosed; trisomy 21, 4p trisomy, and trisomy 18 (trisomy 18 was in one fetus of a twin pregnancy; the other fetus was normal). Maternal serum AFP levels were, 0.41, 0.49 and 1.30 MOM. Maternal serum AFP less than 0.5 MOM in normal pregnancies was 1/205 (0.5%) and less than 0.6 MOM was 9/205 (4.4%). There was no relationship between maternal serum AFP and amniotic fluid AFP levels. Our results are in agreement with the majority of the results in the literature, showing that maternal serum AFP levels are lower in association with autosomal trisomy fetuses.Maternal serum AFP levels in the first trimester of pregnancy.Maternal serum alphafetoprotein was assayed in 436 women presenting for termination of pregnancy at 6 to 12 weeks. The normal range for each week is presented. There was a progressive rise of AFP levels from week 7 onwards, but a clear separation from non-pregnant values was only apparent after 8 weeks. The definition of a 'low normal' range for the identification of cases at risk of Down's syndrome will probably only be possible at 11 weeks or later.Combining maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein measurements and age to screen for Down syndrome in pregnant women under age 35. New England Regional Genetics Group Prenatal Collaborative Study of Down Syndrome Screening.Eight prenatal diagnostic centers in New England enrolled 77,273 second-trimester pregnant women between January 1986 and March 1987 to study prospectively the sensitivity and detection efficiency of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein measurement as a screening test for Down syndrome. The study was limited to women under the age of 35 because it is accepted practice to offer amniocentesis to all women above that age. Based on risk estimates derived from a combination of maternal age and maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein measurement, 4.7% of the study population was initially classified as being at high risk for having a Down syndrome fetus (second-trimester odds for Down syndrome greater than or equal to 1:270). Forty percent of the high-risk population were subsequently placed in the low-risk category, usually because ultrasound findings corrected the gestational dates and caused the maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein interpretation to be changed. Seventy-six percent of the 2.7% of women remaining at high risk had amniocentesis; 18 fetuses with Down syndrome and 4 fetuses with trisomy 18 were identified in that group. Overall, one fetus with Down syndrome was detected per 89 amniocenteses, and an estimated 25% of all fetuses with Down syndrome were identified. These data establish the feasibility of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein measurements as a method to screen for Down syndrome and suggest the possibility that such screening might be applicable in women over age 35 as well.Maternal levels of pregnancy-specific beta 1-glycoprotein (SP-1) are elevated in pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome.Concentrations of pregnancy-specific beta 1-glycoprotein (SP-1) were measured in maternal blood and amniotic fluid of patients with a trisomic fetus and compared with that of a cytogenetically normal fetus at weeks 16-19 of pregnancy. The SP-1 concentrations were significantly elevated in the sera of women with a Down's syndrome fetus, whereas amniotic fluid levels were only slightly increased. It is suggested that high levels of maternal SP-1 in the second trimester of pregnancy may be a valuable indicator in the prenatal detection of fetal trisomy 21.Low second trimester maternal serum unconjugated oestriol in pregnancies with Down's syndrome.Second trimester maternal serum unconjugated oestriol levels were measured in the stored serum samples from 22 pregnancies associated with Down's syndrome and 110 unaffected control pregnancies, matched for maternal age, gestational age, duration of storage of the serum sample, smoking habits and maternal weight. The serum unconjugated oestriol level of each affected pregnancy was expressed as a multiple of the median (MoM) of its five matched controls. The unconjugated oestriol levels were significantly lower in the affected pregnancies than in the unaffected pregnancies; the median MoM was 0.79 (P less than 0.05). This association between low serum unconjugated oestriol and fetal Down's syndrome early in pregnancy raises the possibility that serum unconjugated oestriol measurement may be added to maternal age and alpha-fetoprotein measurement in the antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.[Prenatal screening for Down's syndrome by measuring the AFP concentration in the maternal serum].California's experience with low MS-AFP results.The California AFP Screening Program was developed to offer pregnant women the opportunity to have their pregnancies screened for open neural tube defects (NTD). Because it is unwise to withhold potentially important clinical information about low MS-AFP results from the screened women and their physicians, follow-up diagnostic evaluations and counseling were offered to women with low MS-AFP results in addition to those with high results or positive family histories of NTD. Between April 7, 1986 and September 30, 1987, over 275,000 women voluntarily participated in the screening program. During the first year of the program 3,939 women were seen for follow-up evaluations due to low MS-AFP results. These evaluations occurred at state-approved AFP follow-up centers where ultrasonographic dating led to reinterpretation of 35% of the results. Of the remaining 2,552 (65%), 1,940 women (76%) had an amniocentesis. Sixteen Down syndrome fetuses were detected for a yield of 1/121 amniocenteses. Additional chromosome abnormalities included trisomies 18 and 13, Ullrich-Turner syndrome, (45,X), Klinefelter syndrome (47,XXY) and triploidy. The total yield of significant chromosome abnormalities was 1/78 amniocenteses.First-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening for chromosome defects.Low maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein values during the second trimester of pregnancy are associated with an increased risk of Down syndrome in the fetus. In this study a sensitive, monoclonal-based radioimmunoassay for alpha-fetoprotein was used to determine whether such an association also applies to the first trimester and if maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening could successfully detect a significant number of pregnancies in which the fetus had a trisomy or other chromosome disorder. Sera were obtained prospectively from 540 women just before chorionic villus sampling for prenatal diagnosis of chromosome defects (largely because of advanced maternal age) at 8 to 12 weeks' fetal age and assayed for alpha-fetoprotein under code without knowledge of the cytogenetic results. Eight of 27 (29.6%) of all serious chromosome defects were associated with low maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein values (less than or equal to 0.6 multiples of the median). Overall, 59 of 540 patients (10.9%) had maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein values less than or equal to 0.6 multiples of the median, eight of whom had a fetus with a serious chromosome defect. Women whose maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein value was less than or equal to 0.6 multiples of the median had one in eight odds of carrying a fetus with a trisomy and one in seven odds of the fetus having any serious chromosome defect. From this study of a group of women at higher risk, we conclude that first-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening for chromosome defects is feasible. A prospective study to determine detection efficiency is now required of a consecutive routine pregnancy population in whom gestational age is determined by menstrual dates as is usually the case in clinical practice.Maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome in early pregnancy.The possibility of improving the effectiveness of antenatal screening for Down's syndrome by measuring human chorionic gonadotrophin concentrations in maternal serum during the second trimester to select women for diagnostic amniocentesis was examined. The median maternal serum human chorionic gonadotrophin concentration in 77 pregnancies associated with Down's syndrome was twice the median concentration in 385 unaffected pregnancies matched for maternal age, gestational age, and duration of storage of the serum sample. Measuring human chorionic gonadotrophin in maternal serum was an effective screening test, giving a lower false positive rate (3%) at a 30% detection rate than that for maternal age (5%) and the two existing serum screening tests, unconjugated oestriol (7%) and alpha fetoprotein (11%). The most effective screening results were obtained with all four variables combined; at the same 30% detection rate the false positive rate declined to 0.5%. The new screening method would detect over 60% of affected pregnancies, more than double that achievable with the same amniocentesis rate in existing programmes (5%), and could reduce the number of children born with Down's syndrome in the United Kingdom from about 900 a year to about 350 a year.Maternal serum unconjugated oestriol as an antenatal screening test for Down's syndrome.The median maternal serum unconjugated oestriol level between 13 and 27 weeks gestation in 77 pregnancies associated with Down's syndrome was lower than the median level in 385 unaffected control pregnancies matched for maternal age, gestational age, and duration of serum sample storage (P less than 0.001). The median level for the affected pregnancies was 73% of that in the controls. Low unconjugated oestriol levels can be used to detect fetal Down's syndrome; at cut-off levels selected to detect at least 35% of affected pregnancies, unconjugated serum oestriol was a better screening test than either maternal age or serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP). The use of all three variables in combination to select women with a 1:250 or greater risk of a Down's syndrome term pregnancy would yield a 45% detection rate with a false-positive rate of 5.2%. The same detection rate using maternal age alone or using age and serum AFP in combination would yield higher false-positive rates, 15% and 9.8% respectively. The addition of unconjugated oestriol to a Down's syndrome screening programme would therefore be more efficient than the use of age and AFP alone; for a given detection rate fewer women would need an amniocentesis or, for a given percentage of women having an amniocentesis, more pregnancies with Down's syndrome would be detected.Screening for Down's syndrome using an iso-risk curve based on maternal age and serum alpha-fetoprotein level.On the basis of the significantly different distributions of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels in 86 pregnancies associated with fetal Down's syndrome and in 2018 unaffected pregnancies, an iso-risk curve for Down's syndrome was constructed. An iso-risk curve shows, for women of all ages, which combinations of maternal age and level of maternal serum AFP result in the same risk of carrying a fetus with Down's syndrome. A 1:400 risk of Down's syndrome, corresponding to the risk of a 35-year-old woman, was chosen as the lowest risk indicating referral for amniocentesis. If all women, irrespective of their age, are offered amniocentesis, when their risk of carrying a Down's syndrome fetus is 1:400 or higher, 53% of the affected fetuses can be detected as compared with 28% of the affected fetuses diagnosed at present in women above 35 years of age.Screening for fetal Down's syndrome in pregnancy by measuring maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein levels.Although the risk of Down's syndrome increases with maternal age, women under 35 bear about 80 percent of the infants born with this condition. We prospectively investigated the utility of measuring maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein during the second trimester in women under 35 in order to identify pregnancies in which the fetus was affected with Down's syndrome. Over a two-year period, 34,354 women in this age group were screened. Amniocentesis was offered when the risk of Down's syndrome, calculated as a function of maternal age and maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein concentration adjusted for maternal weight and race, was 1:270 or higher, the risk for a 35-year-old woman. This threshold was exceeded in 1451 women in whom gestational age was confirmed by ultrasound; 9 women in this group had a fetus with the syndrome. In three women whose fetuses had trisomy 18 and one whose fetus had trisomy 13, the calculated risk of Down's syndrome was 1:270 or higher. Thus, among women in whom the risk exceeded our cutoff point, 1 in 161 were found to have a pregnancy in which the fetus was affected with Down's syndrome; the figure was 1 in 112 for all autosomal trisomies. Eighteen pregnancies involving Down's syndrome, three involving trisomy 18, and two involving trisomy 13 were not associated with a calculated risk above the cutoff point. The available data indicate that in our population, using a cutoff for risk at which 5 percent of women under 35 are offered amniocentesis, we will detect one quarter to one third of pregnancies in which the fetus has Down's syndrome.Estimating a woman's risk of having a pregnancy associated with Down's syndrome using her age and serum alpha-fetoprotein level.The risk of an individual woman having a pregnancy associated with Down's syndrome was estimated from her age and her serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) level at 14-20 weeks gestation. The estimates were made using published data on the risk of Down's syndrome in relation to maternal age from 4528 affected and over 5 million unaffected pregnancies, and on the risk in relation to serum AFP from 68 affected and 36,645 unaffected pregnancies. Separate estimates were derived for AFP levels using gestational age based on the time since the first day of the last menstrual period and on an ultrasound biparietal diameter measurement. In each case this was done with and without adjusting AFP levels to take account of maternal weight. The same sources of data were also used to construct six Down's syndrome screening policies, each combining information on maternal age and serum AFP. For example with one policy the detection rate would be 28% and would involve selecting 2.8% of unaffected pregnancies for amniocentesis; using age alone the same detection rate could only be achieved by selecting 4.3% of unaffected pregnancies for amniocentesis--an increase of 50%. In general, screening for Down's syndrome using both maternal age and serum AFP is more efficient than either alone.Screening for maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein: what about the low side?Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and fetal trisomy-21 in women 35 years and older: implications for alpha-fetoprotein screening programs.A retrospective study of 3,411 women who underwent midtrimester amniocentesis for fetal chromosome analysis between June 1979 and August 1984 was performed to evaluate an association between low maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) concentrations and Down syndrome (DS) pregnancies. A total of 71 pregnancies was found with abnormal fetal chromosomes; of these, 26 cases were trisomy-21 and 10 cases were trisomy-18. The maternal serum AFP in women with DS fetuses was relatively lower than levels in women with fetuses that had normal chromosomes. In addition, the AFP concentrations in amniotic fluid were decreased in cases involving DS fetuses. We have estimated the risks for DS pregnancy at all maternal ages and most serum AFP concentrations. Using these calculations, genetic counselors will be able to provide more accurate risk estimates for trisomy-21 following maternal serum AFP testing.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening: low and high values for detection of genetic abnormalities.In initiating a maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening program, we pursued not only elevated values for the detection of neural tube defects but also low values to detect trisomic fetuses. We detected neural tube defects (0.2%) as expected but were surprised by the efficacy with which low serum alpha-fetoprotein values identified aneuploid fetuses. In 1421 pregnant women, 132 (9.3%) showed maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein values less than 0.4 multiple of the median. After repeat sampling, 57 women still had low values. These 57 women and six others who were too anxious for repeat sampling underwent level I ultrasound examination with the following results: gestational age overestimated by 2 weeks (n = 8), fetal death (n = 1), and no explanation (n = 54). Of the 54, 49 underwent amniocentesis with detection of three aneuploid fetuses: trisomy 18 (n = 2) and trisomy 21 (n = 1); maternal ages were 27, 29, and 31 years, respectively. Autosomal aneuploidy did not occur in other women screened. We conclude that low maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein values could efficiently detect aneuploid fetuses, perhaps with greater sensitivity than previously predicted.Combining maternal age and serum alpha-fetoprotein to predict the risk of Down syndrome.Twenty-eight cases of Down syndrome with maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) measured at second trimester were added to 137 previously reported cases. Seventy-eight percent of affected pregnancies had levels at or below the median AFP value, compared with 50% of unaffected pregnancies. Maternal age at delivery and serum AFP levels by multiples of the median were used to construct a table to determine the risk of Down syndrome. This was compared with the risk for a 35-year-old woman (one in 365). Similar risks were estimated for a 21-year-old with AFP below 0.4 multiples of the median, a 23-year-old below 0.5, a 26-year-old below 0.6, and a 29-year-old below 0.7 multiples of the median. This study provides guidelines for counseling pregnant women who have low serum AFP levels.Alpha-fetoprotein: an enhanced-sensitivity assay for neural tube defect and Down syndrome evaluation.[Low maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein concentration and Down syndrome].Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and fetal autosomal trisomies.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein values in 61 patients with fetal autosomal trisomies diagnosed at 6581 genetic amniocenteses were significantly lower than those in an equal number of matched control subjects. The genetic risk of fetal autosomal trisomies for women less than age 35 offered amniocentesis with maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein values less than 0.5 multiples of the median is in the same range as that currently accepted for advanced maternal age. Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening for autosomal trisomies (mainly Down syndrome) is feasible.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening of fetal trisomies.Thirty-two trisomy pregnancies were retrospectively studied in which the maternal serum level of alpha-fetoprotein was determined prior to amniocentesis. Median levels of alpha-fetoprotein in serum (0.83 multiples of the median) and in amniotic fluid (0.72 multiples of the median) were lowered, but this was statistically significant only in the case of amniotic fluid.Screening for Down's syndrome using serum alpha fetoprotein: a retrospective study indicating caution.A report was made on the outcome of a four year retrospective study in 27 064 pregnancies, of the clinical efficiency, sensitivity, and specificity of a screening programme for Down's syndrome based on reported strategies related to the measurement of maternal serum alpha fetoprotein. This study identified 27 pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome with a median multiple of the median maternal serum alpha fetoprotein concentration of 0.82. This figure is considerably higher than that obtained from previous reports on this subject. With an age related multiple of the median maternal serum alpha fetoprotein strategy, 30.8% of Down's affected pregnancies were identified as well as 11.6% of unaffected pregnancies. Perhaps a United Kingdom collaborative study should begin to investigate the reasons for such wide population variance in the reports for the median multiple of the median for Down's affected pregnancies. Until such studies are carried out, screening for Down's syndrome based on low maternal serum alpha fetoprotein concentration is premature.An association between low maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and fetal chromosomal abnormalities.An index case of "undetectable" maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein at 16 weeks in the first pregnancy of a 28-year-old woman was associated with birth of an infant with trisomy 18. This fortuitous finding stimulated a retrospective study of prenatally diagnosed chromosomal abnormalities. From among a series of 3,862 genetic amniocenteses, 32 cases of fetal autosomal trisomy were diagnosed for which corresponding maternal serum and amniotic fluid alpha-fetoprotein data could be retrieved. From a second laboratory, nine additional cases were added. The maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein levels expressed as multiples of the median were significantly lower in distribution for these 41 women than those from a group of normal matched control subjects (p less than 0.001). Since maternal age is shown to be a less than adequate predictor of autosomal trisomic birth, we proposed that a low level of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein obtained through routine screening may prove to be valuable in improving the prenatal detection of these serious anomalies.First trimester Down Syndrome screening by nuchal translucency in a Thai population.Pregnancy outcomes with increased nuchal translucency after routine Down syndrome screening.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the outcomes of pregnancies with nuchal translucency greater or equal to 3 mm for routine first trimester screening in unselected populations.A total of 2980 pregnant women for first trimester ultrasonography were routinely offered crown-rump length (CRL) and nuchal translucency (NT) for screening for Down syndrome between 11 and 14 weeks' gestation. A complete follow-up was obtained in all cases by a review of medical records.Using a cut-off value of 3 mm, the prevalence of increased fetal NT was 0.7% (n=22). Among the 22 cases, there were five (22.7%) chromosomal abnormalities. Of the 17 chromosomally normal pregnancies, four resulted in fetal demise (spontaneous abortion, intrauterine death or termination of pregnancy due to fetal abnormalities). The remaining 13 pregnancies resulted in live births, including one gestational hypertension and one preterm delivery, respectively. The total incidence of an adverse outcome in the group of increased fetal NT was 45.5%.In a routine population with first-trimester ultrasonography, fetal NT measuring greater than or equal to 3 mm was associated with a poor pregnancy outcome with not only chromosomal abnormalities and congenital cardiac diseases, but also poor maternal and fetal health or adverse pregnancy outcomes. In addition, this study also demonstrated the necessity for fetal assessment and follow-up in cases where the fetal NT is increased in the first trimester.Fetal facial sonographic markers for second trimester Down syndrome screening in a Thai population.To assess the efficacy of using facial sonographic markers for screening fetuses in the second trimester for Down syndrome (DS) in a high-risk Thai population.Frontomaxillary facial angle (FMF) and nasal bone length (NBL) were measured prospectively in pregnant women at high-risk for DS who were undergoing genetic amniocentesis from November 2008 to October 2009. The receiver operator characteristic (ROC) curves were constructed to assess the screening efficacy of FMF angle and NBL.A total of 460 pregnant women were recruited, and a mid-sagittal facial profile was obtained for 403 fetuses. There were 386 fetuses with normal chromosomes, 10 fetuses with DS, 1 fetus with trisomy 13, and 1 fetus with trisomy 18. The remaining 5 fetuses had balanced translocation (n = 2), deletion (n = 1), and mosaic Turner (n = 2). Two different combinations of FMF angle and biparietal diameter to nasal bone length (BPD:NBL) ratio for DS screening in the second trimester achieved 50% and 90% detection rates and 4.4% and 14.0% false positive rates, respectively.The combination of FMF angle and BPD:NBL ratio has a high sensitivity and specificity for screening for DS in the second trimester in a high-risk Thai population.Is there any effect of fetal gender on the markers of first trimester Down's syndrome screening?At present, the most effective trisomy 21-screening method is the estimate of risk combining maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency, beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated PAPP-A.The aim of this study was to investigate the possible effect of fetal gender in first trimester Down's syndrome screening markers.Retrospective study.Prenatal Diagnosis Centre in a tertiary hospital in Lagos.Of a total of 350 pregnancies in which fetal nuchal translucency and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were performed were included in this study. These markers were investigated to see if they differed on the basis of fetal gender.PAPP-A levels were higher in female fetuses although the difference was not statistically significant. Nuchal translucency was 0.099 mm more in male fetuses.The results suggest that first trimester markers differ on gender but are of no clinical significance, confirming the result of other authors.Implications of a first trimester Down syndrome screening program on timing of malformation detection.To determine the impact which introduction of the 11-14 week scan has had on the gestational age at which fetal malformations are detected by ultrasound in an unselected population of pregnant women.Retrospective study.University hospital, Copenhagen, Denmark, covering the period 1 January 2003 to 30 June 2007.All pregnant women who chose a nuchal translucency scan at 11-14 weeks for Down syndrome risk estimate, and a scan at 18-20 weeks to screen for fetal malformations.Review of cases detected ante- and postnatally.Detection rates at 11-14 weeks relative to all malformations in the population.A total of 216 anomalies were detected in 200 fetuses among the 9 324 fetuses included, while 70 anomalies were diagnosed in 59 infants postnatally. The prevalence of fetuses with anomalies was 2.8% (259 of 9 324). After excluding cases of pyelectasis (127), which may be considered physiological and transitory changes, the prevalence of malformed fetuses was 1.4% (132 of 9 324). Of the malformations detected antenatally, 25.8% were detected before week 15 and 59.6% in weeks 16-22. The remaining 14.6% of malformations were discovered after week 22. Among the lethal malformations, 50% were diagnosed before week 15.Although the purpose of the first trimester scan is to screen for Down syndrome and not for malformations, the introduction of the 11-14 week scan has resulted in the detection of approximately 26% of fetal malformations.Impact of smoking on maternal serum markers and prenatal screening in the first and second trimesters.To examine the effects of smoking on first and second trimester screening markers and to determine the overall impact of these effects on Down syndrome and trisomy 18 risks in first trimester combined, second trimester quadruple and integrated tests.Examination of screening records at Women and Infants Hospital during 2006-2008. First trimester pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and nuchal translucency and second trimester alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated estriol (uE3), hCG and inhibin A (inhA) multiple of the median (MoM) values were extracted from the database along with risk results, smoking status and relevant demographic information.Smoking led to significantly reduced median levels of first trimester PAPP-A (0.89 MoM) and hCG (0.80 MoM), reduced second trimester uE3 (0.96 MoM) and hCG (0.84 MoM), and increased AFP (1.03 MoM) and inhA (1.39 MoM). After accounting for the differences in age between groups, smokers had higher Down syndrome screen positive rates for the second trimester quadruple test, but not for first trimester combined or integrated tests. Screen positive rates for trisomy 18 were markedly increased in smokers relative to age-matched non-smokers when using first trimester combined or integrated tests.Smoking leads to increased screen positive rates, especially for trisomy 18 using combined or integrated tests.The genetic sonogram: comparing the use of likelihood ratios versus logistic regression coefficients for Down syndrome screening.The purpose of this study was to compare the screening efficiency for Down syndrome using likelihood ratios versus logistic regression coefficients.We conducted a retrospective study of women at increased risk for Down syndrome referred for a second-trimester genetic sonogram. Likelihood ratios were calculated by multiplying the risk ratio from maternal serum screening by the likelihood ratios of sonographic markers. Logistic regression coefficients were calculated using a formula derived from β coefficients generated from a multivariable logistic regression model. The screening efficiency of both methods was tested in an independent population of patients. The McNemar test was used to compare the predictive ability of the two methods.In the validation population, the use of likelihood ratios had an area under the receiver operator characteristic curve of 0.90 for Down syndrome detection, whereas the use of logistic regression coefficients had an area under the curve of 0.86. Adopting a risk cutoff point of 1/270, the sensitivity of likelihood ratios was 77.4% (95% confidence interval [CI], 58.9%-90.4%) with a false-positive rate of 17.9% (95% CI, 15.0%-21.1%), whereas the sensitivity of logistic regression coefficients was 93.5% (95% CI, 78.6%-99.2%) with a false-positive rate of 34.6% (95% CI, 30.9%-38.4%). There was significant difference in screening efficiency for Down syndrome detection between the two methods (exact McNemar χ(2), P < .001 ).With a slight reduction in the Down syndrome detection rate, the use of the likelihood ratio approach was associated with a significantly lower false-positive rate compared with the logistic regression approach.Use of ethnic-specific medians for Hispanic patients reduces ethnic disparities in multiple marker screening.To estimate whether midtrimester maternal serum analyte concentrations differ between Caucasian and Hispanic women and whether using ethnic-specific medians affects quad screen performance.Caucasian and Hispanic patients with singletons who underwent maternal serum screening in our laboratory were identified. Alfa-fetoprotein (AFP), estriol, human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and inhibin-A medians were derived separately for Caucasians, Hispanics, and for the composite group. Using composite medians, intergroup mean multiples of the medians (MoMs) for each analyte were compared. Using ethnic-specific medians, new MoMs were calculated and utilized in a risk estimation algorithm.A total of 5478 Caucasian and 2246 Hispanic pregnancies were evaluated. Intergroup MoMs were significantly different for all analytes. AFP, hCG, and inhibin-A were lower in Hispanics, while estriol was higher (P < 0.0001). Using composite medians, the screen-positive rate (SPR) for trisomy 21 was 5.39% in Caucasians and 3.29% in Hispanics. Ethnic-specific medians reduced this disparity: 4.76% in Caucasians and 4.05% in Hispanics. The SPR for neural tube defects with composite medians was 1.44% for Caucasians and 0.89% for Hispanics; with ethnic-specific medians, the SPR was 1.42% for Caucasians and 1.07% for Hispanics.Serum analyte concentrations differ between Caucasian and Hispanic gravidas. Use of ethnic-specific medians reduces the disparity in SPR for trisomy 21 and neural tube defects.Prospective validation of quantitative fluorescent polymerase chain reaction for rapid detection of common aneuploidies.To prospectively validate a quantitative fluorescent polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assay as a method of rapid prenatal aneuploidy detection for chromosomes 13, 18, 21, X, and Y.A commercial quantitative fluorescent PCR kit was validated on 200 known, blinded, prenatal DNA specimens. The kit was then validated prospectively on 1069 amniotic fluid specimens, and the results were compared with the karyotype results and the results of interphase fluorescence in situ hybridization testing, when performed in the course of standard care. Turnaround time was monitored in a subset of the prospective specimens.The analytical sensitivity and specificity of testing in the validation specimens were 98.9% and 100%, respectively. There were no false positives and a single false negative, a mosaic sex chromosome aneuploidy interpreted as normal. In the prospective study, the analytical sensitivity and specificity were 98% and 100%, respectively. No false positives and a single false negative, again a sex chromosome mosaic, were detected. Overall, 72.5% of all chromosomal anomalies and 87.7% of clinically significant chromosome anomalies were detected by quantitative fluorescent PCR. The average and median turnaround times were 30.5 and 25.1 hours, respectively.Quantitative fluorescent PCR is a robust and accurate method of rapid prenatal aneuploidy detection.Non-invasive prenatal assessment of trisomy 21 by multiplexed maternal plasma DNA sequencing: large scale validity study.To validate the clinical efficacy and practical feasibility of massively parallel maternal plasma DNA sequencing to screen for fetal trisomy 21 among high risk pregnancies clinically indicated for amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling.Diagnostic accuracy validated against full karyotyping, using prospectively collected or archived maternal plasma samples.Prenatal diagnostic units in Hong Kong, United Kingdom, and the Netherlands.753 pregnant women at high risk for fetal trisomy 21 who underwent definitive diagnosis by full karyotyping, of whom 86 had a fetus with trisomy 21. Intervention Multiplexed massively parallel sequencing of DNA molecules in maternal plasma according to two protocols with different levels of sample throughput: 2-plex and 8-plex sequencing.Proportion of DNA molecules that originated from chromosome 21. A trisomy 21 fetus was diagnosed when the z score for the proportion of chromosome 21 DNA molecules was >3. Diagnostic sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were calculated for trisomy 21 detection.Results were available from 753 pregnancies with the 8-plex sequencing protocol and from 314 pregnancies with the 2-plex protocol. The performance of the 2-plex protocol was superior to that of the 8-plex protocol. With the 2-plex protocol, trisomy 21 fetuses were detected at 100% sensitivity and 97.9% specificity, which resulted in a positive predictive value of 96.6% and negative predictive value of 100%. The 8-plex protocol detected 79.1% of the trisomy 21 fetuses and 98.9% specificity, giving a positive predictive value of 91.9% and negative predictive value of 96.9%.Multiplexed maternal plasma DNA sequencing analysis could be used to rule out fetal trisomy 21 among high risk pregnancies. If referrals for amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling were based on the sequencing test results, about 98% of the invasive diagnostic procedures could be avoided.Cost-effectiveness and accuracy of prenatal Down syndrome screening strategies: should the combined test continue to be widely used?We analyzed the cost-effectiveness (CE) and performances of commonly used prenatal Down syndrome (DS) screening strategies.We performed computer simulations to compare 8 screening options by applying empirical data from Serum, Urine, and Ultrasound Screening Study trials on the population of 110,948 pregnancies. Screening strategies outcomes, CE ratios, and incremental CE ratios were measured.The most CE DS screening strategy was the contingent screening method (CE ratio of Can$26,833 per DS case). Its incremental CE ratio compared to the second-most CE strategy (serum integrated screening) was Can$3815 per DS birth detected. Among the procedures respecting guidelines, our results identified the combined test as the screening strategy with the highest CE ratio (Can$47,358) and the highest number of procedure-related euploid miscarriages (n = 71).In regard to CE, contingent screening is the best choice. The combined test, which is the most popular screening strategy, shows many limitations.Rapid testing versus karyotyping in Down's syndrome screening: cost-effectiveness and detection of clinically significant chromosome abnormalities.In all, 80% of antenatal karyotypes are generated by Down's syndrome screening programmes (DSSP). After a positive screening, women are offered prenatal foetus karyotyping, the gold standard. Reliable molecular methods for rapid aneuploidy diagnosis (RAD: fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) and quantitative fluorescence PCR (QF-PCR)) can detect common aneuploidies, and are faster and less expensive than karyotyping.In the UK, RAD is recommended as a standalone approach in DSSP, whereas the US guidelines recommend that RAD be followed up by karyotyping. A cost-effectiveness (CE) analysis of RAD in various DSSP is lacking. There is a debate over the significance of chromosome abnormalities (CA) detected with karyotyping but not using RAD. Our objectives were to compare the CE of RAD versus karyotyping, to evaluate the clinically significant missed CA and to determine the impact of detecting the missed CA. We performed computer simulations to compare six screening options followed by FISH, PCR or karyotyping using a population of 110948 pregnancies. Among the safer screening strategies, the most cost-effective strategy was contingent screening with QF-PCR (CE ratio of $24084 per Down's syndrome (DS) detected). Using karyotyping, the CE ratio increased to $27898. QF-PCR missed only six clinically significant CA of which only one was expected to confer a high risk of an abnormal outcome. The incremental CE ratio (ICER) to find the CA missed by RAD was $66608 per CA. These costs are much higher than those involved for detecting DS cases. As the DSSP are mainly designed for DS detection, it may be relevant to question the additional costs of karyotyping.[Combined screening for Down syndrome in Marseille multidisciplinary prenatal centers].Combined screening for trisomy 21 (CS) is established since January 2010 in multidisciplinary centers for prenatal screening in Marseille. Our work investigates its implementation. To date, the false positive rate is 3.5% and the coverage of the SC after six months is 5.7% in our low-risk population.Role of first-trimester sonography in the diagnosis of aneuploidy and structural fetal anomalies.We sought to determine the sensitivity of the first-trimester scan in the early diagnosis of aneuploidy and structural fetal anomalies in an unselected low-risk population.This was a retrospective chart review of all patients having first-trimester scans between 2002 and 2009. At our center, a survey of fetal anatomy is performed at the time of nuchal translucency assessment at 11 weeks to 13 weeks 6 days. A second-trimester scan is done at 20 to 23 weeks and a third-trimester scan at 32 to 35 weeks. Isolated sonographic findings of choroid plexus cysts and echogenic intracardiac foci were excluded. Lethal anomalies and those requiring immediate surgical intervention at birth were considered major structural anomalies. All scans were performed by a single sonologist certified by the Fetal Medicine Foundation. All neonates were examined at birth by a pediatrician.Our study included 1370 fetuses. Six cases of aneuploidy (0.4%) were detected. The first-trimester scan detected 5 of 6 cases of aneuploidy (83%), confirmed by karyotype. There were 36 cases of structural fetal anomalies (2.6%); 20 (1.5%) were major anomalies. The first-trimester scan detected 16 of 36 (44%); 20 (56%) were identified by second- or third-trimester scans. The first-trimester scan detection rate for major structural anomalies was 14 of 20 (70%). The 5 that were missed by the first-trimester scan were detected by a second-trimester scan.Our study emphasizes the importance of the first-trimester scan in the early detection of aneuploidy and structural fetal anomalies. In this small unselected low-risk population, the first-trimester scan detected 83% of aneuploidies and 70% of major structural anomalies. Our results are comparable to previously published studies from other centers and further exemplify the invaluable role of the first-trimester scan in the early detection of aneuploidy and structural anomalies in an unselected low-risk population.FlashFISH: "same day" prenatal diagnosis of common chromosomal aneuploidies.Fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) and quantitative fluorescence (QF)-PCR are rapid molecular methods that test for common chromosomal aneuploidies in prenatal diagnosis. While cytogenetic analysis requires approximately 7-14 days before fetal karyotypes are available, these molecular methods release results of sex chromosome aneuploidies, Down syndrome, Edward's syndrome, and Patau's syndrome within 24-48 h of fetal sampling, alleviating parental anxiety. However, specific diagnosis or exclusion of aneuploidy should be available within the same day of amniocentesis. We developed "FlashFISH," a low cost FISH method that allows accurate results to be reported within 2 h of fetal sampling. Here, we report our experience of using FlashFISH in prenatal diagnosis, and we illustrate in detail the protocols used for the purpose in our laboratory.The effect of fetal gender in predicting Down syndrome using long bone ultrasonographic measurements.To determine if fetal gender affects the screening efficiency of short femur and humerus lengths in the prediction of trisomy 21.Retrospective cohort study of 62 111 patients presenting for ultrasound from 1990 to 2006. Short humerus and femur lengths were defined using (1) biparietal diameter (BPD) to femur/humerus length (FL/HL) ratios > 1.5 standard deviations above the mean, (2) the observed to expected (O/E) ratio of femur length ≤ 0.91 or humerus length ≤ 0.89, and (3) femur and humerus lengths < 5th percentile. The sensitivity, specificity, and likelihood ratios were calculated for the association of short FL/HL and trisomy 21 stratified by gender.Both BPD/long bone ratios as well as O/E ratios demonstrated a statistically significant higher specificity for the detection of trisomy 21 in female fetuses. This difference was most clinically significant when using the O/E ratio, which yielded a specificity of 82.6% in males and 90.6% in females for short femur, and 69.7% in males and 77.9% in females for short humerus, when these markers were evaluated as isolated findings.Gender-specific differences in the effectiveness of both short femur and humerus lengths for the prediction of trisomy 21 may exist, but their presence and magnitude are largely dependent on the formula used.Complete trisomy 21 vs translocation Down syndrome: a comparison of modes of ascertainment.To compare the indications for invasive prenatal testing resulting in the detection of translocation Down syndrome and complete trisomy 21.This case control study was based on a large amniocentesis and chorionic villi samples database (n = 534,795). All specimens with translocation Down syndrome (n = 203) comprised the translocation group and were compared with a maternal age-matched group (4 to 1, n = 812) in which complete trisomy 21 was detected. Women with a normal karyotype were randomly selected (n = 812) and served as controls. Indications for invasive testing were compared among the 3 paired groups using χ(2) analysis.There were no differences in the incidence of abnormal first- and second-trimester screening tests between the translocation Down syndrome and the complete trisomy 21 groups. History of prior aneuploidy was significantly more frequent in the translocation Down syndrome group, as compared with either complete trisomy 21 fetuses or normal controls.Fetuses with translocation Down syndrome present with the same screening abnormalities as fetuses with complete trisomy 21.Are second-trimester minor sonographic markers for Down syndrome useful in patients who have undergone first-trimester combined screening?We sought to determine efficacy of minor markers for detection of Down syndrome (DS) in a population prescreened with first-trimester combined screening (FTS).FTS was modified using established likelihood ratios to generate a new composite risk (NCR).Of 3845 women, 390 had ≥1 marker. There were 10/3845 cases of DS; 3 were among patients with low-risk FTS (n = 3727). In 55 patients, NCR adjusted the risk from low to high without increasing detection rate. NCR did not modify risk to allow for detection of the 3 DS among patients with low-risk FTS even though 2 of these fetuses had 1 minor marker each. There were 7 DS among patients with high-risk FTS (n = 118). Use of NCR increased positive predictive value from 7/118 (5.1%) to 7/53 (13.2%).Screening for minor markers is useful in patients with high-risk FTS. It is of questionable benefit in patients with low-risk FTS.Simultaneous detection of trisomies 13, 18, and 21 with multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification-based real-time PCR.Trisomies 13, 18, and 21 account for the majority of chromosomal aneuploidies detected in prenatal diagnosis. Diagnosis of these trisomies relies mainly on karyotype analysis. Several molecular methods have been developed for trisomy detection, but performance or throughput limitations of these methods currently constrain their use in routine testing.We developed multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification-based real-time PCR (MLPA/rtPCR) to simultaneously detect these 3 trisomy conditions with a single reaction. We applied the method to DNA isolated from 144 blinded clinical samples that included 32 cases of trisomy 21, 11 cases of trisomy 18, 1 case of trisomy 13, and 100 unaffected control samples; results were compared with karyotype analysis.As judged by the results of the karyotype analysis, MLPA/rtPCR correctly detected all 44 cases of trisomy in the analysis of the blinded clinical samples. The method was able to detect a change in chromosome dosage as low as 1.2-fold.This novel PCR-based technology simultaneously identified 3 types of trisomy in a single reaction and accurately detected trisomy with mosaicism, while reducing assay times and costs compared with conventional methods. The MLPA/rtPCR approach may have applicability in noninvasive prenatal diagnosis with maternal blood samples.Gradual implementation of first trimester screening in a population with a prior screening strategy: population based cohort study.To evaluate the implementation of first trimester screening in the Czech Republic during 1996-2007 on the number of infants born with numerical chromosomal anomalies, the gestational age at diagnosis and the number of invasive procedures.A population based cohort study.National Registry of Congenital Anomalies, 53 Czech Republic Genetic Departments.About 100,000 pregnancies per year.Primary outcomes were the rates of fetuses and newborns with diagnosed numerical chromosomal anomalies and the gestational age at diagnosis. Secondary outcomes were the rates of chorion villus sampling (CVS) and amniocenteses and the contribution of age groups on the detection rate of trisomy 21.The number of newborns with Down's syndrome decreased from 5.42/10,000 in 1996 to 3.66/10,000 newborns in the 2007. The total incidence of Down's syndrome increased from 13.42 to 20.66/10,000. The detection rate in women <35 years increased from 35.59 in 1996 to 45.08 in 2007; in women >35 years from 23.73 to 38.52. The number of amniocenteses/detected case of Down's syndrome was 124 in 1996 and 123 in 2007. The corresponding number of CVS decreased dramatically from 83 in 1996 to 10 in 2007.Despite the increase of maternal age and the corresponding increase of Down's syndrome, the number of newborns with Down's syndrome decreased. Implementation of the first trimester combined screening leads to a shift towards earlier diagnosis of all major chromosomal abnormalities.First- and second-trimester ADAM12s in Down syndrome screening.QF-PCR as a stand-alone test for prenatal samples: the first 2 years' experience in the London region.To analyse the results of the first 2 years of a QF-PCR stand-alone testing strategy for the prenatal diagnosis of aneuploidy in the London region and to determine the advantages and disadvantages of this policy.A review of the results of 9737 prenatal samples received for exclusion of chromosome abnormalities. All samples were subjected to QF-PCR testing for common aneuploidies but only samples fulfilling specific criteria subsequently had a full karyotype analysis.Of the 9737 samples received, 10.3% had a chromosome abnormality detected by QF-PCR testing. Of the 7284 samples received with no indication for karyotype analysis, 25 (0.3%) received a normal QF-PCR result but subsequently had an abnormal karyotype detected either prenatally as a privately funded test or postnatally. Of these samples, without subsequent abnormal ultrasound findings, five had a chromosome abnormality associated with a poor prognosis, representing 0.069% of samples referred for Down syndrome testing.While back-up karyotyping is required for some samples, using QF-PCR as a stand-alone prenatal test for pregnancies without ultrasound abnormalities reduces costs, provides rapid delivery of results, and avoids ambiguous and uncertain karyotype results, reducing parental anxiety.Second and first trimester estimation of risk for Down syndrome: implementation and performance in the SAFER study.Document patient choices and screening performance (false positive and detection rates) when three improved Down syndrome screening protocols were introduced coincidentally.Second-trimester 'triple marker' screening was expanded by adding second-trimester dimeric inhibin-A (four-marker), with or without first-trimester pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (five-marker). Nuchal translucency (NT) measurements were included when available from accredited sonographers (six-marker). For assigning risk, two sets of marker distribution parameters were evaluated.Over 3.5 years, 8571 women enrolled (median age 30.6 years). Uptake of the four-, five- and six-marker protocols was 18%, 46% and 36%, respectively. Of those selecting an integrated test (five or six markers), 9.7% did not provide the second trimester serum sample. False positive rates decreased with added markers (5.2%, 5.1% and 2.5%, respectively) and varied between the two parameter sets, while detection remained high. Overall, 21 of 23 cases were detected (91%, 95% CI 73-98%) at a 4.2% false positive rate (95% CI 3.3-5.1%).Integrated screening protocols were chosen 4.6 times more often than four-marker screening (82% vs. 18% uptake). Overall detection was higher and false positives lower, consistent with recent guidelines. Important performance factors include gestational dating method, risk cut-off, and the parameter set used to assign risk.[Analysis of Down syndrome screening by maternal serum detection in mid-pregnancy].To study the clinical value of screening chromosomal diseases and abnormal pregnancy by maternal serum examination in mid-pregnancy.Maternal serum AFP and F-beta hCG were detected in the mid-pregnancy (16-20 weeks) using commercially available detection kits, and the risk of Down syndrome was calculated taking into account of such factors as the maternal age, gestational age, and body weight. Those at high risk underwent amino fluid or cordocentesis for fetal karyotpying. The pregnant women were divided into >or=35 years and <35 years groups, and high and low risk for Down syndrome groups for test results and pregnancy outcome analysis.Of the 6000 pregnant women undergoing antenatal screening, 552 were identified to be at high risk of Down syndrome (9.2%) with one missing case of detection, and 463 of the high-risk cases underwent amino fluid or cordocentesis examination. Twenty-seven cases were found to have abnormal chromosomes, and abortion was suggested in 14 cases but not in the other 13 cases where other chromosomal abnormalities such as polymorphic mutations were found. The screening positive rate in >or=35 years and <35 years group was 95.5% and 8.2% (P<0.0001), with fetal chromosomal abnormality rate of 4.5% and 2.9%, respectively (P>0.5). The rate of abnormal pregnant outcomes for high and low risk groups was 5.6% and 0.05% (P<0.0001), with pregnancy complication rate of 11.8% and 3.7% (P<0.0001) and fetal chromosomal polymorphic mutation rate of 2.8% and 1.1% (P>0.5), respectively.Maternal serum AFP and F-beta hCG levels in second trimester have important values in predicting fetal chromosomal diseases, and their detection may help reduce the birth defect rate and prevent abnormal pregnancy outcomes and complications.First trimester maternal serum placental growth factor in trisomy 21 pregnancies.To examine placental growth factor (PlGF) levels in first trimester maternal serum in trisomy 21 pregnancies and to investigate the potential value of PlGF in a first trimester screening test.First trimester maternal serum from 70 trisomy 21 cases and 375 euploid controls were retrospectively analyzed for PlGF using a DELFIA Xpress immunoassay platform. Results were expressed as multiples of medians (MoM) for comparison.PlGF levels were significantly decreased in pregnancies with trisomy 21, 0.76 MoM versus 0.98 MoM in controls. Inclusion of PlGF into the first trimester combined test [maternal age, pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), free-beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) and nuchal translucency] would increase the detection rate by 0.5% at a 5% false positive rate.PlGF at 11 weeks to 13 weeks 6 days has the potential to be included as a marker for the detection of pregnancies with trisomy 21.Using population-based data to predict the impact of introducing noninvasive prenatal diagnosis for Down syndrome.To compare the number and types of chromosome abnormalities prenatally diagnosed and the number of invasive procedures between current prenatal testing pathways and a pathway where noninvasive prenatal diagnosis for Down syndrome replaces Down syndrome screening tests.Numbers and types of chromosome abnormalities for each referral category were extracted from prenatal diagnostic testing reports routinely collected in Victoria, Australia, in 2006 and 2007. These data were then applied to the proposed implementation strategy.If noninvasive prenatal diagnosis for Down syndrome had replaced Down syndrome screening tests in 2006 and 2007, in Victoria, there would have been 25 (7%) additional Down syndrome diagnosed, 6896 (84%) fewer invasive procedures, and 231 (56%) non-Down syndrome chromosome abnormalities no longer detected. These include trisomy 13, trisomy 18, sex chromosome abnormalities, balanced and unbalanced rearrangements, polyploidy, and mosaic results.The potential loss of information about chromosome abnormalities other than Down syndrome with noninvasive prenatal diagnosis compared with full karyotyping with traditional prenatal diagnosis should be considered when planning for the implementation of new technologies.Maternal serum anti-Mullerian hormone level is not superior to chronological age in predicting Down syndrome pregnancies.To compare the difference in maternal serum anti-Mullerian hormone (AMH) level between Down syndrome pregnancies and unaffected pregnancies, and to evaluate its performance as a screening marker for Down syndrome pregnancy.A total of 145 pregnancies affected by foetal Down syndrome and 290 unaffected controls matched with maternal age and gestational age were selected, and their archived first or second trimester serum retrieved for AMH assay.There was no significant difference in maternal serum AMH level between pregnancies affected and unaffected by foetal Down syndrome. Our first trimester serum samples had higher AMH concentration compared to second trimester samples.Maternal serum AMH level, as a marker of ovarian age, is not superior to chronological age in predicting Down syndrome pregnancies. Despite the cross-sectional nature of our study, the variation of maternal serum AMH concentration with gestational age warrants further investigation.Do race-specific definitions of short long bones improve the detection of down syndrome on second-trimester genetic sonograms?The purpose of this study was to determine whether the use of race-specific definitions of short femur and humerus lengths improves Down syndrome detection.This was a retrospective cohort study over 16 years. For each self-reported maternal race (white, African American, Hispanic, and Asian), we evaluated the efficiency of Down syndrome detection using published race-specific formulas compared with a standard formula for short femur and humerus lengths (observed versus expected lengths < or =0.91 and < or =0.89, respectively). The sensitivity, specificity, and 95% confidence intervals for each parameter were compared. Screening performance was compared by areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves.Of 58,710 women, 209 (0.3%) had a diagnosis of a fetus with Down syndrome. Although the race-based formula increased sensitivity in each population, the increase was statistically significant only in the white population, whereas a decrease in specificity was statistically significant in all 4 populations, as denoted by nonoverlapping confidence intervals. The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve for the model using the race-specific definition of short femur length was 0.67 versus 0.65 compared with the standard definition, and for humerus length it was 0.70 versus 0.71.The use of race-based formulas for the determination of short femur and humerus lengths did not significantly improve the detection rates for Down syndrome.Comparison of multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification and karyotyping in prenatal diagnosis.To estimate whether multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification (MLPA), a molecular technique used for detecting the most common chromosomal aneuploidies, is comparable with karyotyping for the detection of aneuploidies of chromosomes X, Y, 13, 18, and 21 in routine clinical practice and to estimate the costs differences of both techniques.In this prospective, nationwide cohort study, we consecutively included 4,585 women who had an amniocentesis because of their age (36 years or older), increased risk after prenatal screening, or maternal anxiety. Amniotic fluid samples were tested independently with both MLPA and karyotyping. The primary outcome was diagnostic accuracy of MLPA to detect aneuploidies of chromosomes X, Y, 13, 18, and 21. Secondary outcome measures were turnaround time for test results and costs. A sample size was calculated using a critical noninferiority margin of 0.002; therefore, at least 4,497 paired test results were needed (one-sided alpha 0.05, power 0.90).Diagnostic accuracy of MLPA was 1.0 (95% confidence interval [CI] 0.99-1.0), sensitivity was 100% (95% CI 0.96-1.0) and specificity was 100% (95% CI 0.999-1.0). Diagnostic accuracy of MLPA was statistically similar (noninferior) to that of karyotyping (P<.001). In 75 cases, MLPA failed (1.6%); karyotyping failed once (0.02%). Compared with karyotyping, MLPA shortened the waiting time by 14.5 days (P<.001, 95% CI 14.3-14.6) and cost less (-47, P<.001).In routine clinical practice, diagnostic accuracy of MLPA for detection of trisomies X, Y, 13, 18, and 21 is comparable with that of karyotyping, and it reduces waiting time at lower costs.II.Maternal plasma levels of follistatin-related gene protein in the first trimester of pregnancies with Down syndrome.To determine maternal plasma levels of follistatin-related gene protein (FLRG) in the first trimester of pregnancy and assess its potential role as a marker for prenatal screening of Down syndrome.Maternal plasma levels of FLRG were determined in 100 pregnant women with normal fetuses in their first trimester of pregnancy (i.e. 11th to 15th weeks). These results were compared with 20 cases with Down syndrome fetuses, taking into consideration clinical and demographic variables, such as maternal age, maternal weight, gestational age, smoking status and ethnicity.Maternal plasma median of FLRG in the normal population was 1.41 ng/mL with 95% confidence interval (CI) of 1.37-1.70 and interquartile range (IQR) of 0.88, during the 11th to 15th weeks of pregnancy. Maternal age and weight were the only variables significantly related to FLRG levels (p = 0.030 and 0.020, respectively). Only maternal and gestational ages were related to Down syndrome (p = 0.039 and 0.006, respectively). Maternal plasma levels of FLRG were not significantly different in the presence of Down syndrome fetuses compared to normal population (p = 0.63).FLRG can be successfully detected in maternal plasma in the first trimester of pregnancy. However, its levels are not significantly altered in the presence of Down syndrome fetuses.ADAM 12 may be used to reduce the false positive rate of first trimester combined screening for Down syndrome.ADAM12 has been shown to be an efficient maternal serum marker for Down syndrome (DS) in the first trimester; but recent studies, using a second generation assay, have not confirmed these findings. We examined the efficiency of a second generation assay for ADAM12.ADAM12 concentrations were determined in 28 first trimester DS and 503 control pregnancies using a novel Research Delfia ADAM12 kit. Log10MoM distributions of ADAM12 and correlations with other markers were established. Population performance of screening was estimated by Monte Carlo simulation.ADAM12 was significantly reduced in the first trimester in DS pregnancies with a log10MoM of -0.1621 (equivalent to 0.68 MoM) (p < 0.001). The reduction decreased with advancing gestational age. ADAM12 used with PAPP-A + hCG beta + NT (CUB screening) increased the detection rate (DR) from 86% to 89% for a false positive rate (FPR) of 5%. When used for a fixed DR of 90%, the addition of ADAM12 resulted in a 25% reduction of the FPR.ADAM12 is a moderately effective DS marker. It is not a cost-effective addition to CUB screening, but may be used to reduce the FPR in selected high-risk cases.Contingent triple-screening for Down syndrome in the second trimester: a feasibility study in Mainland Chinese population.To explore the efficacy of contingent triple-screening for Down syndrome (DS), that is, performing triple-screening in pregnant women with DS risks between 1/270 and 1/1000 at routine double-screening, in a Mainland Chinese population.Maternal serum concentrations of alpha fetoprotein (AFP), free-beta human chorionic gonadotropin (free beta-hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE3) were measured by time-resolved fluoroimmunoassay in 24 double-screening false-negative (DSFN) and 322 double-screening true-negative (DSTN) pregnancies with DS risks between 1/270 and 1/1000 at routine double-screening performed at 15-20 weeks' gestation. DS risk of each pregnancy was calculated by computer software. The detection rate (DR), false-positive rate (FPR), and costs of contingent triple-screening were calculated and compared with routine double-screening methods.Six of 24 DSFN and 3 of 322 DSTN were contingent triple-screening positive. Compared with routine double-screening, DR of contingent triple-screening increased by 10% (from 50% to 60%) without a significant increase of FPR (p > 0.05). When compared with routine triple-screening, uE3 costs in contingent triple-screening were reduced by more than 84.3%.Second-trimester maternal serum contingent triple-screening could be effective and suitable for prenatal care in Mainland China. Governments and Health Agencies of other developing countries may also find this strategy cost-effective.Influence of maternal BMI on genetic sonography in the FaSTER trial.We sought to evaluate the influence of maternal body mass index (BMI) on sonographic detection employing data from the FaSTER trial.Unselected singleton pregnancies underwent detailed genetic sonogram to evaluate for structural fetal anomalies and soft markers for aneuploidy. BMI (kg/m(2)) were calculated from reported initial visit values. Sensitivity, specificity, false positive and false negative rates (FPR and FNR), likelihood ratio, detection rates, and a missed diagnosis rate (MDR: FNR + marker recorded as 'missing'/N) were calculated.Eight thousand five hundred and fifty-five patients with complete BMI information had detailed genetic sonography. A lower sensitivity with an elevated FNR and MDR was observed in obese women for multiple aneuploid markers (e.g. > or =2 markers 32% sensitivity with 68% FNR among BMI <25 vs 22% and 78% among BMI >30). Similarly, the detection rate for cardiac anomalies among women at BMI <25 was higher (21.6%) at a significantly lower FPR (78.4%; 95% CI 77.3-79.5%) in comparison to obese women (8.3% with FPR 91.7%; 95% CI 90.1-93.2%). In a logistic regression model, maternal obesity significantly decreased the likelihood of sonographic detection of common anomalies (adjusted OR 0.7; 95% CI 0.6-0.9; p = 0.001).The performance of second trimester genetic sonography is influenced by obesity, with a significantly higher MDR for multiple minor markers and lower likelihood for detecting common anomalies.[Noninvasive prenatal test in the first trimester of pregnancy (NT and estimation of beta-hCG and PAPP-A) in the diagnosis of fetal abnormalities in Polish population--comparison of the biochemistry own normal ranges and literature reported data].Estimation of Polish population standards of the concentrations of pregnancy-associated plasma protein--A (PAPP-A) and free beta--human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-HCG) in the maternal blood between 10.0 and 13.6 week of pregnancy and comparison of the biochemistry own normal ranges and literature reported data. Estimation the sensitivity of the fetal nuchal translucency measurement, biochemical concentrations of PAPP-A and free beta-HCG in detection of the fetal chromosomal abnormalities.582 women in the age 14 to 46 years old with singleton pregnancies were included to the study The screening was performed between 10.0 and 13.6 week of gestation. The fetal nuchal translucency serum concentrations of PAPP-A and free beta-HCG were measured. The specific risk was calculated using the Fetal Medicine Foundation software (FTS) by accredited sonographers.Standards for serum concentrations of PAPP-A and free beta-HCG in normal pregnancies were determined. The measurement sensitivity of the fetal nuchal translucency in detection of the fetal chromosomal abnormalities was 80% and sensitivity of serum concentrations of PAPP-A and free beta-HCG was 40% and 80%.There is no significant differences between estimated biochemistry standards (PAPP-A and free beta-HCG) for Polish population and literature reported data. Observed differences in measurements of fetal NT, serum concentrations of PAPP-A and free beta-HCG in a control group and the group with the aneuploidies confirmed usefulness of these methods for the first trimester prenatal screening.Measurement of nuchal translucency and the prenatal diagnosis of Down syndrome.To estimate the sensitivity of nuchal-translucency measurement and compare it with that of second-trimester serum screening using population-based data and to evaluate the effect of nuchal-translucency measurement on the gestational age at prenatal diagnosis of Down syndrome and pregnancy termination.We used The Paris Registry of Congenital Malformation data on 594 cases of Down syndrome (live births, fetal deaths, and pregnancy terminations) from 2001-2006. Analyses were done separately for women younger than 38 years and women aged 38 years or older. Analyses included binomial regression and fractional polynomials to model time trends in gestational age at diagnosis and at pregnancy termination.Ninety percent of the fetuses had undergone nuchal-translucency measurement as compared with only 22% that underwent second-trimester serum screening. This was principally because half of the pregnant women were given a diagnosis of Down syndrome during the first trimester after an abnormal result of nuchal-translucency measurement. Second-trimester serum screening had a higher sensitivity than did nuchal-translucency measurement (72% compared with 56%). The increasing use of nuchal-translucency measurement led to an increase in early diagnosis of Down syndrome in women younger than 38 years of age; diagnosis before 15 weeks of gestation increased from 21.7% in 2001 to 51.6% in 2006 (P=.016). Pregnancy termination before 15 weeks also increased from 18.8% in 2001 to 47.5% in 2006 (P=.02).The main effect of the increased use of nuchal-translucency measurement was a substantial increase in the early detection of Down syndrome, principally in younger women. This is an important advantage because several studies have shown that women prefer early diagnosis of Down syndrome.III.[Share with women. Prenatal tests for Down syndrome].Placental growth hormone and growth hormone binding protein are first trimester maternal serum markers of Down syndrome.Placental growth hormone (PGH) is synthesised by the placenta, and its function is modulated by growth hormone binding protein (GHBP). The potential of PGH and GHBP as maternal serum screening markers for Down syndrome (DS) was examined.Maternal serum concentrations of PGH and GHBP were determined by ELISA in 74 DS and 261 control pregnancies in gestational week 8(+0) to 13(+4). Log(10) MoM distributions of the markers were established. The performance of DS screening was estimated by Monte Carlo simulation.PGH log(10) MoM (SD) was decreased (p < 0.001) to -0.201 (0.373) and GHBP log(10) MoM to -0.116 (0.265) (p = 0.04), in DS pregnancies (n = 34) in week 8(+0) to 10(+0). In week 10(+1) to 13(+4), neither PGH (p = 0.16) nor GHBP (p = 0.13) was reduced in DS pregnancies. The detection rate (DR) for PGH in screening for DS in week 8(+0) to 10(+0) was 39% for a false positive rate (FPR) of 5%; increasing to 72% in combination with PAPP-A + hCGbeta. PGH + GHBP in combination with PAPP-A + hCGbeta + nuchal translucency (NT) (CUB test) had a DR of 91% compared with 80% for the CUB test.PGH and GHBP are early first trimester maternal serum markers for DS [Correction made here after initial online publication].First-trimester Down syndrome screening in women younger than 35 years old and cost-effectiveness analysis in Taiwan population.Outcome of the first-trimester Down syndrome screening in younger population was less reported before. We present the outcome of this screening in Taiwanese women younger than 35 years old. We also test whether or not the first-trimester Down syndrome screening of women <35 years of age and women >35 years old routinely receiving amniocentesis is cost-effective compared with all pregnant women screened with this test in the setting of increased maternal age.From 1999 to 2007, the first-trimester Down syndrome screening including nuchal thickness, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A and free beta-hCG are provided to 10 811 singleton women <35 years of age with the cut-off of 1/270. A cost-effectiveness analysis of young women receiving this screening and older women undergo amniocentesis versus all women undergo this screening was performed in Taiwan population from 1987 to 2006, in which advanced age pregnancies increased from 2.8% to 11.6% of total pregnancies.Detection rates of trisomy 21, trisomy 18, Turner syndrome and other chromosome anormalies in women <35 years of age are 87.5% (14/16), 50% (2/4), 80% (8/10) and 63% (12/19), respectively, with a false-positive rate of 5.5% (590/10 811). As advanced age pregnancies reached 11.6%, the average cost per one case averted for all women screened ranged from $77 204 to $98 421, while the cost ranged from $99 647 to $116 433 for only women <35 years of age receiving this screening.In an aging population, the first-trimester Down syndrome screening should be implemented for all pregnant women when it is available.Reevaluating humeral length for the detection of fetal trisomy 21.The purpose of this study was to analyze humeral length (HL) in a normal population and to compare that with HL in a population of fetuses with trisomy 21 to determine the most efficient discriminating parameters for diagnostic accuracy.A nested case-control study comparing HLs from a normal population and a population of fetuses with trisomy 21 was conducted. Humeral length was regressed against gestational age for a consecutive well-dated population of normal singleton gestations presenting to the Washington University School of Medicine prenatal diagnosis units over a 5-year period. A second population of well-dated pregnancies with trisomy 21 diagnosed either prenatally or postnatally was also selected on the basis of the same criteria, except that anomalous fetuses were included. Various discriminating thresholds for a short HL were compared for efficiency in the detection of trisomy 21. These included the following: observed/expected HL (<or= 0.89), biparietal diameter/HL greater than 1.3, 1.4, 1.5, 1.6, 1.7, 1.75, 1.8, and 1.85 SD above the mean for gestation, HL less than 0.8 or less than 0.9 multiple of the median, and HL less than the fifth percentile for gestation.A total of 620 normal pregnancies and 32 with trisomy 21 were extracted from the database. A receiver operating characteristic curve revealed HL less than the fifth percentile as the optimal discriminator for trisomy 21 detection (area under the receiver operating characteristic curve = 0.80). The positive likelihood ratio (LR+) was greatest (25.0) with HL less than the fifth percentile. When HL was considered in isolation without other sonographic markers of trisomy 21, the LR+ was 6.3.Humeral length less than the fifth percentile was the most effective discriminator among the many studied.First-trimester uterine artery Doppler and serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein-a in preeclampsia and chromosomal defects.We examined the potential value of the uterine artery pulsatility index (PI) in pregnancies with fetal aneuploidies and in those that developed preeclampsia (PE) with the aim of distinguishing between these complications in pregnancies with low pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).Uterine artery PI and serum PAPP-A at 11-13 weeks were measured in 165 cases of PE, including 33 that required delivery before 34 weeks (early PE) and 132 with late PE, and in 301 cases with aneuploidies, including 200 with trisomy 21. Each case of aneuploidy and PE was matched with 4 unaffected controls.Serum PAPP-A was lower in early PE (0.58 multiples of the normal median, MoM) and in trisomy 21 (0.54 MoM), trisomy 18 (0.22 MoM) and Turner syndrome (0.51 MoM) - but not in late PE (0.90 MoM) - than in controls (1.01 MoM). Uterine artery PI was higher in early PE (1.52 MoM), late PE (1.20 MoM), trisomy 18 (1.20 MoM) and Turner syndrome (1.29 MoM) - but not in trisomy 21 (1.02 MoM) - than in controls (1.0 MoM).The uterine artery PI at 11-13 weeks may be useful in distinguishing between low PAPP-A due to trisomy 21 and early PE.Specificity of fetal tricuspid regurgitation in prediction of Down syndrome in Thai fetuses at 17-23 weeks of gestation.To assess the specificity of tricuspid regurgitation (TR) in prediction of Down syndrome in Thai fetuses at 17-23 weeks' gestation and to determine the prevalence of TR among normal chromosome fetuses in a high-risk population.A prospective study was performed in 395 high-risk pregnant women who underwent amniocentesis or cordocentesis for fetal karyotyping at 17-23 weeks. The presence or absence of TR was determined by pulsed wave Doppler at the time of prenatal diagnosis. TR was diagnosed when the regurgitation flow was observed for at least half of systole or > or = 70 milliseconds with maximum velocity of > or = 100 cm/sec. The diagnostic values of TR for detection of Down syndrome were calculated.The prevalence of TR was 3.8% (14/370) in normal chromosome fetuses and 40% (2/5) in Down syndrome fetuses. Fetuses with TR had a higher chance to be Down syndrome (11.1%) than those without TR (0.8%) (95% CI of the difference, 0.09-32.9, p = 0.036). Specificity, sensitivity, NPV and PPV of TR in prediction of Down syndrome were 95.9%, 40%, 99.2% and 11.1%, respectively. Among normal chromosome fetuses with TR, 14.3% (2/14) had congenital cardiac abnormalities.TR is not only a high specificity secondary ultrasound marker at 17-23 weeks to identify fetuses with Down syndrome in high-risk pregnant women but also associates with the risk of cardiac defects in normal chromosome fetuses.[Screening for trisomy 21 in France].Does the combination of fronto-maxillary facial angle and nasal bone evaluation improve the detection of Down syndrome in the second trimester?To determine if the combination of fronto-maxillary facial (FMF) angle and nasal bone (NB) evaluation improves the detection of Down syndrome (DS) in the second trimester.We compared the FMF angle measurements in euploid and DS fetuses seen between 2005 and 2008. The FMF angles were measured from stored two-dimensional (2-D) images by investigators blinded to the DS status of the fetus. All NB measurements were obtained prospectively. Receiver operator characteristic curve plot was used to determine the optimal definition for abnormal FMF angle. The detection and false positive rates and likelihood ratios positive and negative for the DS markers and their combinations were compared.Of 22 fetuses with DS seen between 16 and 22 weeks over the study period, NB and FMF angle evaluation was available for 21. These were compared with a control group of 201 fetuses seen at similar gestational age ranges without DS. NB alone identified 10/21 (47.6%) of Down syndrome while FMF angle identified 2/21 (9.5%). The combination of FMF angle and NB identified only one additional case of Down syndrome.While FMF angle and NB are independent markers for DS, their combination resulted in a minimal but nonsignificant improvement in DS detection.Triple-marker prenatal screening program for chromosomal defects.To examine screening performance of California's triple-marker screening program, using data from a statewide registry for chromosomal defects.This study included 752,686 women who received a screening risk and had an expected date of delivery between July 2005 and the end of June 2007. Follow-up diagnostic services for screen-positive women were performed at state-approved centers. Data on diagnostic outcomes from these visits were entered into the California Chromosomal Defect Registry (CCDR). Other CCDR sources include mandatory reporting by all cytogenetic laboratories and hospitals and outcome data forms submitted by prenatal care providers.The observed detection rate for Down syndrome (N=1,217) was 77.4%. It varied significantly by gestational dating method and maternal age. The rates for women aged younger than 35 years and 35 years and older were 62.4% and 94.0%, respectively. The detection rates were 81.3% for ultrasound-dated pregnancies and 67.5% for last menstrual period-dated pregnancies. For Turner syndrome, trisomy 18, triploidy, and trisomy 13, the detection rates were 79.4%, 82.5%, 98.1%, and 36.0%, respectively. The positive rate for Down syndrome was 5.4%. Of women with a Down syndrome fetus who were screen positive, only 49.5% opted for amniocentesis. Of women who obtained results from amniocentesis indicating a Down syndrome fetus, 61.4% had an elective termination, 26.2% had a live birth, 4.5% had a death or miscarriage, and 7.9% had an unknown outcome.The observed performance of this large triple-marker screening program exceeds generally predicted detection rates for Down syndrome. This study methodology will be used to measure the performance of subsequent screening enhancements.III.Performance of first-trimester screening between gestational weeks 7 and 13.Screening for fetal chromosome abnormalities in the first trimester includes analysis of the serological markers pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and free beta human choriogonadotropin (free beta hCG). The blood sample is traditionally taken around week 12 of gestation, but the performance of earlier blood sampling is not well documented.We studied 44,537 singleton pregnancies. Complete first-trimester screening took place between November 2003 and March 2009, and blood samples were taken between 7 weeks + 5 days and 13 weeks + 6 days.Of 120 cases of trisomy 21, 108 were diagnosed in the first-trimester screening (detection rate 90%). When the blood sample was taken before gestational week 10, the detection rate of trisomy 21 was 97% (70 of 72), whereas 80% were detected (38 of 48) after week 10 (chi(2) = 0.0035). For trisomy 18, trisomy 13, and triploidy, 65% (13 of 20) were detected before gestational week 10, and 73% (11 of 15) after (not significant). All 6 cases of triploidy before and after gestational week 10 were detected. The screen positive rate and the maternal age were similar before and after week 10 of gestation.Screening for fetal aneuploidy can be performed with good results with the blood sample taken as early as week 7 of gestation. Blood samples taken before gestational week 10 showed a high detection rate of fetal trisomy 21, with no difference in the detection of fetal trisomy 18, trisomy 13, or triploidy.Prospective validation of first-trimester combined screening for trisomy 21.To examine the performance of the new algorithm in screening for trisomy 21 by a combination of maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency (NT) and maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).This was a prospective screening study for trisomy 21 in singleton pregnancies at 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks of gestation using an algorithm combining maternal age, fetal NT thickness based on the mixture model for the assessment of NT, and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A based on a multiple regression model for the assessment of serum biochemistry. The NT measurements were performed by 60 operators who had obtained The Fetal Medicine Foundation certificate of competence in the 11-13-week scan.The study population consisted of 19 614 pregnancies with a normal karyotype or delivery of a phenotypically normal baby (euploid group) and 122 cases of trisomy 21. In the euploid fetuses the NT was above the previously defined 50(th), 95(th) and 99(th) centiles in 10 033 (51.2%), 618 (3.2%) and 123 (0.6%) cases and the respective values for trisomy 21 were 117 (95.9%), 94 (77.0%) and 57 (46.7%). The median fetal NT was within 0.1 mm of the expected in 47 (78.3%) of the 60 sonographers and within 0.2 mm in all. In the euploid fetuses the median free beta-hCG was 1.0 (range, 0.1-29.4) multiples of the median (MoM) and the median PAPP-A was 1.0 (range, 0.2-3.3) MoM. The median MoM values were 1.0 or close to 1.0 MoM for each subgroup of pregnancy characteristics, including gestations of 11, 12 and 13 weeks, maternal weight of < 60 kg, 60-80 kg and > 80 kg, different ethnic origins, cigarette smokers and non-smokers, natural conception and in vitro fertilization. For a false-positive rate of 3%, the detection rate of trisomy 21 in screening by maternal age and fetal NT was 81% (95% CI, 73-89%), by maternal age and maternal serum biochemistry it was 63% (95% CI, 56-72%) and by combined screening based on maternal age, fetal NT and maternal serum biochemistry it was 90% (95% CI, 84-96%).This study has validated the new risk algorithm and demonstrated that in combined screening for trisomy 21 based on maternal age, fetal NT and free beta-hCG and PAPP-A the detection rate is about 90% for a 3% false-positive rate.Is rapid aneuploidy screening used alone acceptable in prenatal diagnosis? An evaluation of the possible role of ultrasound examination.The objectives of this study were to use a factual basis to: (1) determine the number, nature, and probable phenotypic consequences of karyotype anomalies that would probably be missed (structural anomalies, uncommon aneuploidies and mosaic aneuploidies) by rapid aneuploidy screening (RAS), and (2) appraise whether RAS can replace traditional karyotyping when amniocenteses are performed for increased risk of Down's syndrome by maternal serum screening or advanced maternal age in the absence of ultrasound abnormality.This retrospective cohort study analysed the indications, results and outcomes of 5,713 consecutive amniocenteses over a 5-year period at a single prenatal diagnosis centre in Paris.Advanced maternal age and increased Down's risk with maternal serum marker were the most common indications. Chromosome abnormalities were detected in 3.64% of the pregnancies tested, and unexpected structural anomalies in 0.63% (n = 36). Translocations were more likely to be reciprocal, balanced and of parental origin. There were 6 mosaic gonosomal aneuploidies. Overall, 4 mosaic autosomal aneuploidies and 36 structural aberrations would not have been recognised by RAS alone. Of the 4 mosaic autosomal aneuploidies, all were terminated, one had major malformations and the others had discrete signs that a good quality ultrasound examination would probably not detect. Of the 36 structural aberrations, 24 would be undetected by ultrasound scan, from which 6 would be associated with a significant risk of an abnormal phenotype outcome.In conclusion, our data do not provide evidence that RAS can replace the traditional karyotype. It is probably impossible to arrive in a universal conclusion of which approach (karyotype or RAS) is definitely better than the other. Each prenatal centre could have its own approach depending on the local data analysis, including quality control of ultrasounds.First-trimester fetal nasal bone length in an ethnic Chinese population.To determine reference ranges of fetal nasal bone length (NBL) in a Chinese population and to assess the value of NBL measurement in screening for chromosomal defects in the first trimester.In this prospective study the fetal profile was examined and the fetal NBL and crown-rump length (CRL) were measured in Chinese women presenting with singleton pregnancies for first-trimester screening for aneuploidy between January 2004 and June 2007. Screening was performed on the basis of nuchal translucency (NT) measurement and maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A levels.NBL was measured in 7543 fetuses, of which 7517 were euploid. The best fit equation for median NBL in euploid fetuses in relation to CRL was: NBL (mm) = 0.4593 + (0.0186 x CRL(mm)). The NBL for gestational age (GA, in days) was given by the equation NBL(mm) = 0.2392 + (0.0027 x GA). There was no correlation between log(10)(NBL multiples of the median (MoM)) and log(10)(NT MoM) in unaffected pregnancies (r = - 0.009; P = 0.43). Only two of the 11 cases with trisomy 21 had an NBL outside the 5(th) or 95(th) centiles of the reference range for euploid fetuses.Reference ranges for NBL in a Chinese population suitable for screening for aneuploidy between 11 and 13 + 6 weeks' gestation have been derived. The NBL in Chinese fetuses is similar to that of other ethnic groups. However, unlike the determination of presence vs. absence of the nasal bone, NBL measurement is unlikely to further improve screening for aneuploidy.Nuchal translucency thresholds in prenatal screening for Down syndrome and trisomy 18.To determine if nuchal translucency (NT) can be used as a first trimester triage marker in prenatal screening for Down syndrome and trisomy 18.Data from first trimester prenatal screening in 77 443 women were stratified by maternal and gestational ages. They were then analyzed to identify NT thresholds above or below which only positive (high-risk) or negative (low-risk) results were reported by a first trimester prenatal screening test combining PAPP-A, free beta-hCG and NT.Combined prenatal screening was always positive for Down syndrome when NT thickness exceeded 4.0 mm. As women aged, this upper NT threshold value changed according to gestational age. In women aged 35 to 37 years, combined prenatal screening was always positive when NT exceeded 2.8 mm, 3.0 mm, and 3.4 mm at 11, 12, and 13 weeks of gestation, respectively. In women over 42 years of age, the upper threshold value for NT was 1.8 mm, 2.4 mm, and 2.7 mm at 11, 12, and 13 weeks of gestation, respectively. In women less than 35 years of age, we identified lower threshold values below which combined prenatal screening for Down syndrome was always negative.In prenatal screening for Down syndrome and trisomy 18, it is possible to identify NT threshold values above which biochemical screening provides no additional benefit. In pregnancies in which NT is above the established upper cut-offs, invasive prenatal screening can be offered without delay.[Prenatal diagnostics of chromosomal aberrations Czech Republic: 1994-2007].An analysis of prenatal diagnostics efficiency of selected types of chromosomal aberrations in the Czech Republic in 2007. Update of 1994-2007 data according to particular selected diagnoses.Retrospective epidemiological analysis of pre- and postnatal chromosomal aberrations diagnostics and its efficiency.Data on pre- and postnatally diagnosed birth defects in the Czech Republic during 1994-2007 were used. Data on prenatally diagnosed birth defects (and for terminated pregnancies) were collected from particular departments of prenatal diagnostics, medical genetics and ultrasound diagnostics in the Czech Republic, data on birth defects in births from the National Birth Defects Register (Institute for Health Information and Statistics). Total numbers over the period under the study, mean incidences of selected types of chromosomal aberrations and mean prenatal diagnostics efficiencies were analyzed. Following chromosomal aberrations were studied: Down, Edwards, Patau, Turner and Klinefelter syndromes and syndromes 47,XXX and 47,XYY.A relative proportion of Down, Edwards and Patau syndromes as well as other autosomal and gonosomal aberration is presented in figures. Recently, trisomies 13, 18 and 21 present around 70% of all chromosomal aberrations in selectively aborted fetuses, in other pregnancies, "other chromosomal aberrations" category (mostly balanced reciprocal translocations and inversions) present more than 2/3 of all diagnoses. During the period under the study, following total numbers, mean relative incidences (per 10,000 live births, in brackets) and mean prenatal diagnostics efficiency (in %) were found in following chromosomal syndromes: Down syndrome 2,244 (16.58) and 63.37%, Edwards syndrome 521 (3.85) and 79.93%, Patau syndrome 201 (1.49) and 68.87%, Turner syndrome 380 (2.81) and 79.89%, 47,XXX syndrome 61 (0.45) and 59.74%, Klinefelter syndrome 163 (1.20) and 73.65% and 47,XYY syndrome 22 (0.16) and 54.76%.The study gives updated results of incidences analysis of both pre- and postnatally diagnosed chromosomal birth defects in the Czech Republic during the 1994-2007 period. Incidences found in our study correspond (in case of trisomies 13, 18 and 21) with those published widely in literature as well as with those found in large-scale international studies (ICBDSR, EUROCAT). In case of gonosomal aberrations, incidences found in this study are lower that those published, most probably due to a later registration (over 15 years of age of the child) of these diagnoses.[Prenatal genetic screening: biochemical markers of the first and second quarter].Examination of a first-trimester Down syndrome screening concept on a mix of 11,107 high- and low-risk patients at a private center for prenatal medicine in Germany.To assess the performance of a combined first-trimester screening concept for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 applied to a low- and high-risk patient sample in a specialized private center for prenatal medicine.The quality of different first-trimester screening algorithms (risk calculation based on maternal age and nuchal translucency alone, maternal age and serum parameters (free beta-hCG and PAPP-A) alone and a combination of both) was evaluated in a study population of low- and high-risk cases for fetal aneuploidies. All measurements were performed between the 11th+0 and 13th+6 weeks of gestation during the study period from November 2000 to December 2006, in accordance with the guidelines of the Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF), London.Of 11,107 women included in the study, we had a complete follow-up on 10,668. The difference between the detection rate was insignificant for both the low-risk and the high-risk groups. In the overall study population, 52 of 59 cases of trisomy 21 were detected when a pre-defined cut-off of 1:300 was applied (detection rate (DR) 88.1%; 95% confidence interval (CI): 79.8-96.4 and false-positive rate (FPR) 4.9%; 95% CI: 4.5-5.3). For trisomies 13 and 18 with a pre-defined cut-off of 1:150, 26 of 32 cases were detected (DR 81.3%; 95% CI: 67.8-94.8 and FPR 0.7%; 95% CI: 0.5-0.9). The highest sensitivity was between 11+0 and 11+6 weeks of gestation with all cases of trisomy 21 detected with a FPR 5.1%; 95% CI: 3.7-6.5.In our study population of different risk categories, the detection rate using the combined risk calculation based on maternal age, fetal NT, maternal PAPP-A and free beta-hCG levels was superior to the application of either parameter alone.Comparison of modes of ascertainment for mosaic vs complete trisomy 21.We sought to compare the indications for amniocentesis leading to the detection of either mosaicism of trisomy 21 (mosaic-T21) or complete trisomy 21 (T21).A retrospective review of a large amniocentesis database (n = 494,163) was conducted. All specimens with mosaic-T21 (n = 124) were compared with a maternal age-matched group of T21 fetuses (n = 496). Samples with normal karyotypes were matched for maternal age and served as normal controls (n = 496). The chi(2) testing was used for statistical analysis.The presence of an abnormal first-trimester screen, abnormal sonographic findings, and specifically the single sonographic abnormalities of either a cystic hygroma or a cardiac anomaly were significantly less common in the mosaic-T21 as compared with the T21 group. There were no such differences between the mosaic-T21 and the normal control group.Fetuses with mosaic-T21, similar to those with normal karyotype, do not present with the same abnormal screening tests as fetuses with T21.Maternal serum ADAM12 (A disintegrin and metalloprotease) in chromosomally abnormal pregnancy at 11-13 weeks.The objective of this study was to investigate the potential value of ADAM12 (A disintegrin and metalloprotease) in first-trimester screening for trisomy 21 and other major chromosomal abnormalities.The concentration of ADAM12 was measured at 11-13 weeks in cases of trisomy 21 (n = 49), trisomy 18 (n = 28), trisomy 13 (n = 20), Turner syndrome (n = 29), triploidy (n = 10), and euploid pregnancies (n = 272). The levels of ADAM12, expressed as multiples of median (MoM), were compared in cases and controls and were assessed for association with free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A).The median ADAM12 value in trisomy 21 (0.961 MoM) was not significantly different from the euploid fetuses (1.013 MoM), but in trisomy 18 (0.697 MoM), trisomy 13 (0.577 MoM), triploidy (0.426 MoM), and Turner syndrome (0.747 MoM), the levels were significantly lower. In both the euploid and aneuploid pregnancies, there was a significant association between ADAM12 and free beta-hCG and PAPP-A.Maternal serum ADAM12 concentration at 11-13 weeks of gestation is unlikely to be useful in first-trimester screening for chromosomal abnormalities because in trisomy 21 the levels are not significantly different from normal, and in the other chromosomal defects, there is a significant association between ADAM12 and the traditional biochemical markers of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A.Maternal serum placental growth factor at 11-13 weeks in chromosomally abnormal pregnancies.To investigate the potential value of maternal serum placental growth factor (PlGF) in first-trimester screening for trisomy 21 and other major chromosomal abnormalities.The maternal serum concentration of PlGF at 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks was measured in 609 euploid and 175 chromosomally abnormal pregnancies, including 90 with trisomy 21, 28 with trisomy 18, 19 with trisomy 13, 28 with Turner syndrome and 10 with triploidy. The levels of PlGF were compared in cases and controls, and were assessed for association with free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).Logistic regression analysis demonstrated in the euploid group that significant independent contributions for log PlGF were provided by fetal crown-rump length, maternal weight, cigarette smoking and ethnic origin; after correction for these variables the median multiple of the median (MoM) PlGF was 0.991. Significantly lower values were observed in pregnancies with trisomy 21 (0.707 MoM), trisomy 18 (0.483 MoM), trisomy 13 (0.404 MoM), triploidy (0.531 MoM) and Turner syndrome (0.534 MoM). Significant contributions in the prediction of trisomy 21 were provided by maternal age, serum PlGF, PAPP-A and free beta-hCG, and the detection rates of screening with the combination of these variables were 70% and 80% at respective false-positive rates of 3% and 5%.Maternal serum PlGF concentration at 11-13 weeks of gestation is potentially useful in first-trimester screening for trisomy 21 and other major chromosomal abnormalities.[Trisomy 21, after a half century].Should the first-trimester aneuploidy screen be maternal age adjusted? Screening by absolute risk versus risk adjusted to maternal age.To compare the absolute risk (AR) screening approach to the current approach of risk adjusted to maternal age in patients undergoing first-trimester screening (FTS).Three-stage retrospective analysis of 3073 pregnancies that had FTS during 2006-2007. (1) Distribution analysis of AR as defined by (final FTS risk)/(risk by age). (2) Analysis of the screen-positive group by the AR method. (3) Analysis of the screen-positive advanced maternal age (AMA) patients.(1) AR > 1 was found in 151 (4.9%) patients, and AR > 1.2, 2 and 3 was found in 4, 3.1 and 2%, respectively. (2) 145 (4.7%) of the 3073 patients screened positive. Twelve were diagnosed with chromosomal abnormalities and 3 with major anomalies. All had AR > 1.2. Of the 145 (55.8%) screen positives, 81 had AR > 1.2. AR was significantly higher in the chromosomally abnormal as compared to normal gestations (t-test, p < 0.01). (3)Of the 145 screen positives, 103 were AMA. Only 39 (28%) had an AR > 1.2.The AR screening approach, using AR > 1.2 as a cut-off, captured all abnormal pregnancies diagnosed by the current screening method. This method offers lower false positive (FP) rates to AMA women and has the potential for higher detection rates in younger women.Fetal nasal bone in screening for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 and Turner syndrome at 11-13 weeks of gestation.To investigate the performance of first-trimester screening for aneuploidies by including assessment of the fetal nasal bone in the combined test of maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness, fetal heart rate (FHR) and serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).Screening by the combined test was performed in singleton pregnancies, including 19,614 with euploid fetuses, 122 with trisomy 21, 36 with trisomy 18, 20 with trisomy 13 and eight with Turner syndrome. In all cases the fetal nasal bone was assessed and classified as present or absent. We examined the performance of two screening strategies: firstly, assessment of the nasal bone in all patients and secondly, first-stage screening using the combined test in all patients followed by second-stage assessment of the nasal bone only in those with an intermediate risk of 1 in 51 to 1 in 1000 after the first stage. To validate the new risk algorithm we used a second independent dataset of 19 651 fetuses, including 139 with trisomy 21.The nasal bone was absent in 2.6% of the euploid fetuses, 59.8% with trisomy 21, 52.8% with trisomy 18, 45.0% with trisomy 13 and in none of the fetuses with Turner syndrome. Respective figures for an absent nasal bone in the validation population, which contained fewer Black women, were 0.6%, 62.6%, 55.3%, 35.3% and 41.7%. In a screening policy based on maternal age, fetal NT, FHR, serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A, for a fixed risk cut-off of 1 : 100, the false-positive rate was 3.0%. The standardized detection rates were 91% for trisomy 21 and 100% for trisomy 18, trisomy 13 and Turner syndrome, respectively. Assessment of the nasal bone in all pregnancies reduced the false-positive rate to 2.5% without changing the detection rate. A detection rate of 93% was achieved with the two-stage strategy at a false-positive rate of 2.4% in which it was necessary to assess the nasal bone in only 15% of the total population. In the validation dataset, screening by the combined test and using a risk cut-off of 1 : 100 detected 90% of the cases with trisomy 21 for a false-positive rate of 4%. Inclusion of the nasal bone increased the detection rate to 92% for a false-positive rate of 2.9%. Contingent screening detected 92% of cases for a false-positive rate of 2.9%.Assessment of the fetal nasal bone improves the performance of first-trimester screening for trisomy 21.Comparison of different strategies in prenatal screening for Down's syndrome: cost effectiveness analysis of computer simulation.To assess and compare the cost effectiveness of three different strategies for prenatal screening for Down's syndrome (integrated test, sequential screening, and contingent screenings) and to determine the most useful cut-off values for risk.Computer simulations to study integrated, sequential, and contingent screening strategies with various cut-offs leading to 19 potential screening algorithms.The computer simulation was populated with data from the Serum Urine and Ultrasound Screening Study (SURUSS), real unit costs for healthcare interventions, and a population of 110 948 pregnancies from the province of Québec for the year 2001.Cost effectiveness ratios, incremental cost effectiveness ratios, and screening options' outcomes.The contingent screening strategy dominated all other screening options: it had the best cost effectiveness ratio ($C26,833 per case of Down's syndrome) with fewer procedure related euploid miscarriages and unnecessary terminations (respectively, 6 and 16 per 100,000 pregnancies). It also outperformed serum screening at the second trimester. In terms of the incremental cost effectiveness ratio, contingent screening was still dominant: compared with screening based on maternal age alone, the savings were $C30,963 per additional birth with Down's syndrome averted. Contingent screening was the only screening strategy that offered early reassurance to the majority of women (77.81%) in first trimester and minimised costs by limiting retesting during the second trimester (21.05%). For the contingent and sequential screening strategies, the choice of cut-off value for risk in the first trimester test significantly affected the cost effectiveness ratios (respectively, from $C26,833 to $C37,260 and from $C35,215 to $C45,314 per case of Down's syndrome), the number of procedure related euploid miscarriages (from 6 to 46 and from 6 to 45 per 100,000 pregnancies), and the number of unnecessary terminations (from 16 to 26 and from 16 to 25 per 100,000 pregnancies).Contingent screening, with a first trimester cut-off value for high risk of 1 in 9, is the preferred option for prenatal screening of women for pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome.Down syndrome screening: determining the cutoff level of risk for invasive testing.Second-trimester genetic sonogram for detection of fetal chromosomal abnormalities in a community-based antenatal testing unit.To evaluate the efficacy of the second-trimester genetic sonogram for the detection of Down syndrome and other chromosomal abnormalities in a community-based antenatal testing unit.This was a retrospective study using data from two community hospital antenatal ultrasound units. Six hundred and sixty fetal ultrasound examinations in both at-risk (n = 581) and low-risk (n = 79) pregnancies were performed from 15 + 0 to 22 + 6 weeks' gestation and all cases were verified for outcome data. The sonographic detection of a major congenital anomaly or a sonographic marker (increased nuchal skinfold, short humerus, short femur, echogenic bowel, pyelectasis, echogenic intracardiac focus, absence or hypoplasia of fifth mid phalanx or choroid plexus cyst) was recorded. The entire group of 660 ultrasound examinations as well as subgroups with and without non-ultrasound risk factors for a fetal chromosomal abnormality were analyzed to determine the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values and positive likelihood ratio for the detection of Down syndrome and other fetal chromosomal abnormalities.There were 32 (4.85%) chromosomal abnormalities in our study population. Twelve (3.75%) of these were Down syndrome, of which eight (66.6%) had a positive ultrasound examination in the second trimester. Six of seven (85.7%) of the trisomy 18 fetuses, 2/2 of the trisomy 13 fetuses and 2/3 of the non-mosaic 45,X fetuses had positive sonograms. The overall detection rate for chromosomal abnormalities was 20/32 (sensitivity, 62.5%; specificity, 80.7%; negative predictive value, 97.7%; positive predictive value, 14.2%; positive likelihood ratio, 3.24). Major structural defects and sonographic markers, excluding hypoplastic fifth digit and choroid plexus cyst, occurred significantly more frequently in Down syndrome cases compared with normal ones.In a community-based antenatal testing unit we have demonstrated a detection rate for fetal Down syndrome with the second-trimester genetic sonogram that is comparable to the range of sensitivities reported by larger centers involving primarily high-risk patients. However, only 12 of the 32 fetal chromosomal abnormalities that we encountered were Down syndrome.Validation of QF-PCR in a Korean population.Quantitative fluorescence polymerase chain reaction (QF-PCR) is a rapid and reliable method for screening common aneuploidies, but it is not an accustomed way of testing in Korea. Our objectives were to investigate QF-PCR as a means for prenatal aneuploidy screening and to evaluate the short tandem repeat (STR) markers in a Korean population.Three formats of QF-PCR assays that utilize an Elucigene kit (Tepnel Diagnostics), which contains 7 primer pairs located on chromosome 21, 16 primers on chromosomes 21, 18, and 13, or 26 primers on chromosomes 21, 18, 13, X, and Y were performed.Eight hundred of prenatal samples were screened and the results were compared to that of the results obtained with conventional cytogenetics. The 31 of 33 (93%) autosomal and sex chromosome aneuploidies were detected excluding one case of maternal cell contamination and one case of mosaicism respectively; there were no false positives. Interestingly, submicroscopic duplication of the D13S634 marker was observed in 1.6% of cases.For prenatal aneuploidy screening, QF-PCR was proved to be efficient and reliable. However, considering the high frequency of triallelic patterns of one STR marker that has not been found in other populations, careful evaluation is recommended in each STR marker when it is applied to different populations.Tricuspid regurgitation in screening for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 and Turner syndrome at 11+0 to 13+6 weeks of gestation.To investigate the performance of first-trimester screening for aneuploidies by including assessment of tricuspid blood flow in the combined test of maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness, fetal heart rate (FHR) and serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A).Screening by the combined test was performed in singleton pregnancies, including 19 614 with chromosomally normal fetuses or the delivery of a phenotypically normal baby (euploid group), 122 with trisomy 21, 36 with trisomy 18, 20 with trisomy 13 and eight with Turner syndrome. In all cases tricuspid flow was assessed to determine if there was tricuspid regurgitation. We examined the performance of two screening strategies: firstly, assessment of tricuspid flow in all patients and secondly, first-stage screening using the combined test in all patients followed by second-stage assessment of tricuspid flow only in those with an intermediate risk of 1 in 51 to 1 in 1000 after the first stage.Tricuspid regurgitation was observed in 0.9% of the euploid fetuses and 55.7%, 33.3% and 30% of the fetuses with trisomies 21, 18 and 13, respectively, and in 37.5% of those with Turner syndrome. In a screening policy based on maternal age, fetal NT, FHR, serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A, for a fixed false positive rate of 3% the standardized detection rates were 91% for trisomy 21 and 100% for trisomy 18, trisomy 13 and Turner syndrome. Assessment of tricuspid flow in all pregnancies would increase the detection rate of trisomy 21 to 96%, and the detection rates of trisomy 18, trisomy 13 and Turner syndrome would be 92%, 100% and 100%, respectively. The same detection rates were achieved with the two-stage strategy-in which it was necessary to assess tricuspid flow in only 15% of the total population-at a false positive rate of 2.4%.Assessment of tricuspid flow improves the performance of first-trimester screening for trisomy 21.Advanced maternal age as a sole indication for genetic amniocentesis; risk-benefit analysis based on a large database reflecting the current common practice.Recent advances in prenatal screening, including first and second trimester genetic screening as well as targeted sonography, have significantly improved the detection of trisomy 21. Therefore, several investigators have questioned the validity of recommending genetic amniocentesis to all women who are 35 years or older at delivery. Thus, we sought to investigate the risks and benefits associated with performing genetic amniocentesis in women whose sole indication for testing was advanced maternal age (AMA).A retrospective review of a Genzyme Genetics amniocentesis database (January 2006-December 2006) was performed. All specimens obtained from women of AMA as the sole indication were eligible for analysis. The amniocentesis-related potential fetal loss was calculated based on the traditional fetal loss rate of 1/200 as well as the recently published loss rate of 1/1600 procedures. Risk-benefit analysis was performed by comparing the number of trisomy 21 fetuses identified within the AMA group to the potential number of amniocentesis-related fetal losses within this group.A total of 87,241 amniocentesis specimens were processed during the study period. AMA was the sole indication for genetic amniocentesis in 43,303 cases which formed the study group. In 399 (0.92%) of these cases, a trisomy 21 was identified. Assuming an amniocentesis related fetal loss rates of 1/200 or 1/1600; 217 or 27 fetal losses would have been expected, respectively.Our analysis suggests that the benefit of genetic amniocentesis for the sole indication of AMA far outweighs the potential amniocentesis-related fetal loss rate, regardless of the actual rate one considers.[Prenatal diagnosis of trisomy 21: the Tunisian experience].Down syndrome (Trisomy 21) is the most common fetal chromosomal abnormality in humans. Its clinical signs are now well known. Methods for prenatal screening have advanced substantially in the past two decades.To describe our experience with prenatal diagnosis of Down syndrome, including the indications, methods and results.This retrospective study examined cases over a 4-year period. We adopted a sequential screening strategy for patients followed in our department since the beginning of their pregnancies after informed consent. We proposed first trimester ultrasound that measured nuchal translucency thickness and followed it with maternal serum screening. Some patients underwent screening during the second trimester or third trimester ultrasound. To assess the results, we studied the mothers' epidemiological characteristics and analysed the circumstances of prenatal diagnosis of trisomy 21 (T21).We identified 22 cases of T21 during the study period, for a total prevalence of 0.98 per thousand. The diagnosis was prenatal in 13 cases, mainly due to ultrasound signs. Of the 14 patients seen prenatally, only 8 were followed from early pregnancy. Five had enlarged nuchal translucency (> 95th percentile). Three had positive second trimester serum screening tests. One patient had amniocentesis planned because of her age (table 1). T21 was diagnosed in the second trimester in two cases and in the third trimester in three. The major morphological abnormalities observed were cardiac. We found an atrioventricular canal defect in four cases, and fetal hydrops in two cases (Table 2). The median gestational age at diagnosis of T21 in this study was 21 weeks. The diagnosis was missed in one patient followed throughout pregnancy in our unit. The median gestational age at termination of pregnancy was 22 weeks. Only one patient chose not to terminate the pregnancy. Her fetus, delivered at term, had no major pathologies.The establishment of a screening strategy for trisomy 21 in Tunisia is necessary to reduce handicaps. It should begin by expanding first-trimester ultrasound with nuchal translucency measurement. At the same time, serum marker testing should be offered to all patients. Routine amniocentesis for advanced maternal age should be avoided.[Predictive value for fetal outcome of Doppler velocimetry of the ductus venosus between the 11th and the 14th gestation week].to study the value of Doppler velocimetry of the ductus venosus, between the 11th and 14th weeks of pregnancy, associated to the nuchal translucency thickness measurement, in the detection of adverse fetal outcome.a transversal and prospective study in which a total of 1,268 fetuses were studied consecutively. In 56 cases, a cytogenetic study was performed on material obtained from a biopsy of the chorionic villus and, in 1,181 cases, the postnatal phenotype was used as a basis for the result. In addition to the routine ultrasonographic examination, all the fetuses were submitted to measurement of the nuchal translucency thickness and to Doppler velocimetry of the ductus venosus. Aiming at prevalence and accuracy indices, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, probability of false-positive, probability of false-negative, reason of positive probability and reason of negative probability were calculated and analyzed.from the total of 1,268 fetuses, 1,183 cases were selected for analysis. From this number, 1,170 fetuses were normal (98.9%) and 13 fetuses presented adverse outcome at birth (1.1%), including fetal death (trisomy 21 and 22) in two cases; genetic syndrome (Nooman) in one case; two cases of polymalformed fetuses; cardiopathy in three cases; and other structural defects in five cases. The prevalence of the modified ductus venosus (wave A zero/reverse) in the studied population was of 14 cases (1.2%), with a false-positive rate of 0.7%.there is a significant correlation between the alteration of the ductus venosus Doppler velocimetry and the thickness of the nuchal translucency as an ultrasonographic marker for the first trimester of gestation, in the detection of adverse fetal outcome, especially serious malformations. The ductus venosus was able to diminish the false-positive result in comparison to the isolated use of the nuchal translucency thickness, improving considerably the positive predictive value of the test.First trimester predictors of adverse pregnancy outcomes.To identify first trimester indicators of adverse pregnancy outcomes.Data were obtained from the statewide evaluation of first trimester screening for Down syndrome in Western Australia which included 22,695 pregnancies screened between August 2001 and October 2003. Screening data were linked with pregnancy outcome information from the Hospital Morbidity Database and the Birth Defects Registry. The odds ratios (OR) of adverse outcomes were analysed for combined risk incorporating maternal age, nuchal translucency (NT) and biochemical parameters and then separately for each parameter (pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), free beta human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and NT).Risk assessments for first trimester combined screening are derived from maternal age, ultrasound measurement of fetal NT, maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A. Increased combined risk for Down syndrome was significantly (P < 0.01) associated with spontaneous loss at or before 24 weeks gestation (OR 13.51), birth defects (OR 6.58) and preterm birth at or before 32 weeks gestation (OR 3.2). Maternal serum PAPP-A below the 5th centile was associated with Down syndrome (OR 8.43), spontaneous loss before 24 weeks (OR 5.04) and later than 24 weeks (OR 4.50), preterm delivery before 32 weeks (OR 3.11) and before 37 weeks (OR 2.24). NT above the 95th centile was associated with Down syndrome (OR 43.91), birth defects (OR 4.02) and spontaneous loss before 24 weeks (OR 6.24). Low levels of free beta-hCG and increased NT were less consistently associated with adverse outcomes and high levels of free beta-hCG showed limited use as an indicator. The detection rates for all outcomes other than Down syndrome were less than 40%.Biochemical indicators and NT that are measured during first trimester screening for Down syndrome show a number of associations with adverse outcomes, but do not show appropriate performance characteristics for screening tests. These data are consistent with the view that the individual components, specifically low PAPP-A levels alone, do not provide an effective screening tool for adverse pregnancy outcomes.First trimester Down's syndrome screening marker values and cigarette smoking: new data and a meta-analysis on free beta human chorionic gonadotophin, pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A and nuchal translucency.To examine the effect of smoking on three first trimester screening markers for Down's syndrome that constitute the Combined test, namely nuchal translucency (NT), pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and free beta human chorionic gonadotophin (free beta-hCG) and to use the results to determine which of these markers need to be adjusted for smoking and by how much.The difference in the median multiple of the median (MoM) values in smokers compared to non-smokers was determined for NT, PAPP-A and free beta-hCG in 12,517 unaffected pregnancies that had routine first trimester Combined test screening. These results were then included in a meta-analysis of published studies and the effect of adjusting for smoking on screening performance of the Combined test was estimated.The results using the routine screening data were similar to the summary estimates from the meta-analysis of all studies. The results from the meta-analysis were; median MoM in smokers compared to non-smokers: 1.06 NT (95% confidence interval 1.03 to 1.10), 0.81 PAPP-A (0.80 to 0.83) and 0.94 free beta-hCG (0.89 to 0.99). The effect of adjusting for smoking on the Combined test is small, with an estimated less than half percentage point increase in the detection rate (the proportion of affected pregnancies with a positive result) for a 3% false-positive rate (the proportion of unaffected pregnancies with a positive result) and less than 0.2 percentage point decrease in the false-positive rate for an 85% detection rate.Adjusting first trimester screening markers for smoking has a minimal favourable effect on screening performance, but it is simple to implement and this paper provides the adjustment factors needed if a decision is made to make such an adjustment.A new approach to calculating the risk of chromosomal abnormalities with first-trimester screening data.First-trimester screening at 11 - 14 weeks has been proven to be very useful in the early detection of chromosomal defects. The aim of this project was to develop a CE-certified new risk calculation program (PRC = Prenatal Risk Calculation) using a nationwide database.The database underlying the new risk calculation procedure was established in Germany from 2003 through 2006. Overall, the database includes measurements from 70,030 pregnant women having given birth to healthy children. Following consideration of all pregnancies associated with a chromosomally abnormal outcome, the sample size was 451. The algorithm used for calculating the risk of a chromosomally abnormal outcome comprises the following variables: maternal age, crown-rump length (CRL) (restricted to a range from 45 - 84 mm or, equivalently, 11 + 1 - 14 + 0 weeks of gestation), nuchal translucency (NT), as well as the maternal serum parameters PAPP-A (pregnancy associated plasma protein A) and free beta-hCG (free human chorionic gonadotropin). In a preliminary cross-validation study, we applied both the new algorithm and the FMF UK program to an independent sample containing n = 40,568 pregnancies with negative outcome, n = 187 cases of trisomy 21, n = 34 trisomies 18 and n = 13 trisomies 13.Using the primary sample of 70,030 pregnancies with a negative outcome, reference bands were constructed for the sonographic parameter fetal nuchal translucency and the biochemical parameters PAPP-A and free beta-HCG. Instead of MoM values we used "degree of extremeness" (DoE) values. This statistical parameter has been proven to give more precise results than the MoM measure because it assesses the deviation of the actual measurement value from the centre of the reference band expressed as a multiple of the width of the respective band section. The result of the risk calculation is visualized by means of a traffic light graph which allows the patient to comprehend her individual risk at first glance. The red color indicates a high risk, green a low risk, and yellow represents a moderate risk. In our preliminary cross-validation study the detection rate obtained for the German algorithm was 86.6 % for trisomy 21, 94.1 % for trisomy 18 and 92.4 for trisomy 13. The corresponding detection rates obtained with the same data by the FMF UK program were 86.1 %, 82.3 % and 69.2 % throughout. The false-positive rate was 5.0 % throughout.The new risk calculation procedure of the FMF Germany (PRC) has been made available as a CE-certified computer program. In screening for trisomy 21 it yields results comparable to those of the program used by the FMF UK. Regarding the diagnosis of trisomy 13 and 18, even higher detection rates are currently achieved with the German algorithm. Program, data base and license key are available free of charge to registered members of the FMF Germany.[Evaluation of plasmatic A protein as only marker during first trimester of pregnancy].One of main targets of prenatal diagnosis is Down's syndrome. Biochemical and sonographic markers together are efficient. The use of a single marker has not shown the same efficiency, although it has not been sufficient evaluated.To shown results of PAPP-A as a single marker in first pregnancy trimester.Prospective, cross-sectional and random study, which evaluated 400 women with biochemical marker PAPP-A in the first pregnancy trimester.PAPP-A detected a true positive case (0.3%), 28 false positive cases (7.0%) and 371 true negative cases (92.8%), there were no false negative cases. Between 9 to 11 weeks, rate of false positives fluctuated between 5.5 and 6.7%, in 12th week it was 1.2% and in 13th week 18.2%. PAPP-A has 95.1% of specificity (weeks 9 to 12) and 82.2% of maternal age.A 5% of false positive rate is acceptable for prenatal diagnosis markers. It has been reported that PAPP-A is less discriminatory at 10 weeks of gestation. In this study the rate fluctuated between 6 and 7% (weeks 9 to 11), which increased at 13th week. Markers with low false positive rate stimulate the use of prenatal screening.The use of combined markers: biochemical (free fraction of beta-hGC, PAPP-A) and sonographic, are most recommendable in the first trimester of the pregnancy because of them low rate of false positives. PAPP-A can be used as a single marker between 9 to 11 weeks; false positive cases must be studied with combined markers.Screening for triploidy by the risk algorithms for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 at 11 weeks to 13 weeks and 6 days of gestation.To examine the effectiveness in screening for triploidy at 11 weeks to 13 weeks and 6 days of gestation by the combined use of the risk algorithms for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 based on maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness, fetal heart rate (FHR) and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A.Prospective screening for trisomy 21, including 56 376 normal singleton pregnancies and 31 cases with triploidy (24 digynic and 7 diandric). Patient-specific risks for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 were calculated by multiplying the age related risk for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 with the likelihood ratio (LR) for fetal NT and with a combined LR for FHR, free beta-hCG and PAPP-A, respectively. Detection rates (DRs) and false positive rates (FPRs) for triploidy were calculated by taking the proportion with risks above a given risk threshold and standardized for maternal age according to the distribution of pregnancies in England and Wales in 2000 to 2002.In digynic triploidy, free beta-hCG was 0.16 (range 0.02-0.95) MoM and PAPP-A was 0.06 (range 0.02-0.47) MoM and the respective values for diandric triploidy were 8.74 (range 2.83-47.0) and 0.74 (range 0.32-1.51) MoM. Use of the trisomy 21 algorithm identified 5 of the 7 diandric cases and 3 of the 24 digynic ones at a 3% FPR. Combined use of the risk algorithms for trisomies 18 and 13 identified 20 of the 24 cases with the digynic triploidy at the FPR of 0.2%. When screen positivity was defined by a 3% FPR using the algorithm for trisomy 21 and an additional 0.2% FPR using the algorithms for trisomies 18 and 13, the total FPR was 3.1% and the DR was 84%.A beneficial side-effect of first trimester combined screening for trisomies is the detection of a high proportion of fetuses with triploidy.Risk assessment for Down syndrome with genetic sonogram in women at risk.To evaluate the algorithms of risk assessment for Down syndrome (DS).Cohort study conducted in women at risk undergoing midtrimester genetic sonogram. Univariate and logistic regression analysis were used to relate findings to the occurrence of DS. The resulting model was validated in an independent population of patients.In a multivariable model adjusted for gestational age and maternal age, nuchal fold thickness (NFT) >or= 5 mm (OR = 4.6, 95% CI 0.9-23.9), presence of renal pelvic dilation (OR = 18.0, 95% CI 2.9-110.5), absent mid-phalanx of the 5th finger (OR = 29.9, 95% CI 6.1-145.8), presence of noncardiac malformations (OR = 20.1, 95% CI 2.6-154.7) or isolated heart defects (OR = 60.2, 95% CI 9.5-382.8), the interactions of gestational age with NFT >or= 5 mm (P = 0.04) and malformations with heart defects (P = 0.03) were significantly associated with DS. Utilizing this model and a risk cutoff point of 1/270, the sensitivity was 83.3% (5/6) with a false positive rate (FPR) of 28.5% (159/558).Genetic sonogram has adequate accuracy to be incorporated into management algorithms for risk assessment of DS in women at risk.First trimester intact hCG as an early marker of trisomy 21: a promise unrecognised?An initial study of trisomy 21 cases showed that prior to 10 weeks, maternal serum levels of intact hCG in the early first trimester are lower than normal. Here we further study the levels prior to and after 10 weeks of gestation to further establish whether or not the intact hCG is effective as a very early screening marker.Fifty-nine samples from pregnancies with trisomy 21 were identified, 31 were collected between the sixth and ninth weeks of gestation and 28 after the tenth week. A series of 629 gestational age-matched samples collected during the same period formed the control group. Intact hCG was measured by a DELFIA assay.The multiples of the median (MoM) in cases (n = 31) collected prior to 10 weeks were 0.79 (CI 0.62-0.98) at a median gestation of 9.1 weeks. Prior to 9 weeks (n = 14) the median was 0.774 (CI 0.54-1.09) at a median gestation of 8.5 weeks. Modelling the detection rate for a 3 or 5% false-positive rate when screening using intact hCG, free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 8-10 weeks of gestation indicated that 71 or 77% of cases would be detected.More data are needed to establish a secure MoM for intact hCG in pregnancies prior to 10 weeks, before it could be considered a suitable screening marker.Clinical and cytogenetic findings on 31,615 mid-trimester amniocenteses.Since amniocentesis made prenatal diagnosis feasible in 1967, the method has become a popular tool in obstetric practices. In Korea, the demand for genetic counseling and prenatal tests has increased markedly because the number and proportion of pregnancies in women aged 35 yr and older have increased over a 20-yr period. Here we report clinical and cytogenetic findings on 31,615 mid-trimester amniocenteses.To investigate the changes in the annual number of amniocentesis, distribution of indications and age, and cytogenetic findings and abnormality rate according to indications, this study retrospectively analyzed 31,615 cases of mid-trimester amniocentesis performed at Seoul Clinical Laboratories, an independent medical laboratory center, during the past 13 yr (1994-2007).The annual number of amniocenteses has increased substantially since 1994. Among the 31,615 amniocentesis cases, the maternal age between 30 and 34 yr was the most common age group (35.4%). Among clinical indications, abnormal maternal serum screening results have been the most common indication for amniocentesis since 1994. Chromosomal abnormalities were detected in 973 cases (3.1%). Down syndrome was the most common abnormality found (36.9%, 359/973). In sex chromosomal abnormalities, 53 cases of Turner syndromes, 32 cases of Klinefelter syndromes, 20 cases of triple X syndromes, and 15 cases of 47,XYY were diagnosed. Of structural rearrangements, reciprocal translocations between two autosomes were the most common (15.5%, 151/973). Abnormal ltrasonographic findings showed the highest positive predictive value (5.9%) among the clinical indications.The present study could be used for the establishment of a database for genetic counseling. The discovery of an abnormality provides the option of termination or continuation in the pregnancy, a more suitable obstetric management in Korea.Fetal nasal bone length and Down syndrome during the second trimester in a Chinese population.The purpose of the present study was to build a database of reference ranges of fetal nasal bone length (NBL) in a Chinese population. The accuracy rate of detecting Down syndrome was also analyzed using fetal NBL as a marker.The control group of fetuses included 342 normal singleton pregnancies with no chromosomal or congenital anomalies. The present study was a cross-section study and the control group was used to construct percentile values of NBL from 13 to 29 gestational weeks of age. Two-dimensional ultrasonography was used for the nasal bone studies. Measurements of NBL were collected and each fetus contributed a single value to the reference sample. During the study period, 14 fetuses with Down syndrome were examined. Measurement of fetal NBL was made during amniocentesis, with gestational age ranging from 13 to 19 weeks.From 342 normal fetuses with gestational age ranging from 13 to 29 weeks, reference ranges of NBL were constructed. The reference ranges were constructed from the 100(1 - p)% reference range: Y +/- Zp x square root sigma 2, where Y = 25 - exp(3.58 - 0.044 x t + 0.0006 x t2), with Y being the fitted mean of regression model and t being gestational age (weeks). Using fetal NBL, the regression model was Pr(Down syndrome) = exp(W)/ [1 + exp(W)], where W = 0.62-4.80 x NBL (multiples of the median) in predicting Down syndrome. Fetal NBL was found to have a sensitivity and specificity of 0.78 and 0.78, respectively, in predicting Down syndrome in the second trimester of pregnancy.Fetal NBL measurement can provide a simple and useful algorithm to predict Down syndrome during the second trimester of pregnancy.Comparison of the new PRC software with the established algorithm of the FMF UK for the detection of trisomy 21 and 18/13.The aim of this study was to compare the newly developed Prenatal Risk Calculation (PRC) software and the established Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF) UK algorithm for their detection and false-positive rates in prenatal screening of trisomy 21 or 18/13.Nuchal translucency was measured by FMF-certified sonographers in 39,004 pregnancies. Risks for trisomy 21 and 18/13 were calculated together with serum PAPPA and free beta-hCG in all cases. Overall, 109 cases of trisomy 21 and 39 cases of trisomy 18 or 13 occurred. The detection rates were calculated for all 109 trisomy 21 cases using both PRC and ASTRAIA, software based on the official algorithm of the FMF UK. The false-positive rate was calculated on the basis of all 39,004 cases for ASTRAIA and on the basis of 3,620 additional cases for PRC. The comparison of the algorithms was performed by the calculation of receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) curves.The detection rates for trisomy 21 for a 5% false-positive rate were 91% (99/109) for PRC and 90% (98/109) for ASTRAIA. The difference was not significant. ROC curve analysis showed an area under the curve (AUC) of 0.976 for PRC and 0.975 for ASTRAIA (p = 0.80). At a cutoff of 1:300, PRC showed a slightly (nonsignificantly) higher, but nonsignificant false-positive rate (3.8% for ASTRAIA, version since 2005, 5.1% for PRC) associated with a slightly (nonsignificantly) higher, but nonsignificant detection rate of 91% (PRC) versus 88% (ASTRAIA). The false-positive rate of the biochemical risk (without NT) in PRC was significantly higher (17.7%) than with the FMF UK algorithm (9.0%) at a common risk cutoff of 1:300. A reason for the higher false-positive rates in PRC may be the missing correction for maternal weight, smoking status, and ethnicity. The detection rates for trisomy 18/13 at a risk cutoff of 1:150 were 79% for PRC and 77% for ASTRAIA. False-positive rates for trisomy 18/13 at a cutoff of 1:150 were 1.5% for PRC and 0.6% for ASTRAIA (differences were nonsignificant).For a 5% false-positive rate, the new PRC software detects as many trisomy 21 and trisomy 18/13 cases as the established algorithms of the FMF UK. In order to reduce the false-positive rate for the biochemical risk, the algorithm of the PRC software should be redesigned to include the maternal weight, smoking status of the mother, and the ethnicity.How imprecise may the measurement of fetal nuchal translucency be without worsening first-trimester screening?First-trimester screening (FTS) has a trisomy 21 detection rate of about 90%. Despite profound training, the practically reached measurement quality of nuchal translucency (NT) is probably not optimal. This study investigated the impact of measurement errors on FTS.The data on 10,116 combined FTSs were obtained in a multicenter study. Risk assessment was performed by the JOY software following the Nicolaides risk calculation principles. To investigate the impact of measurement errors, the NT values were artificially altered and the adjusted risks were recalculated. Test performance parameters were obtained and compared with the correct measurements.In this study 85 fetuses were genetically affected. The screening was wrongly inconspicuous in 12 cases and in 479 cases the FTS offered false-positive results. An assumed NT error of +/-0.1 mm already causes a highly significant change in the false-positive rate. A difference of -0.2 mm leads to a visible change in false negatives.This study demonstrates that even the smallest deviations will significantly affect the false-negative rate. The detection of really diseased fetuses is influenced at a -0.2-mm measurement error. Therefore the NT measurement has to be as precise as possible.Prediction of patient-specific risk for fetal loss using maternal characteristics and first- and second-trimester maternal serum Down syndrome markers.To develop and evaluate a method of estimating patient-specific risk for fetal loss by combining maternal characteristics with serum markers.Data were obtained on 36,014 women from the FaSTER trial. Separate likelihood ratios were estimated for significant maternal characteristics and serum markers. Patient-specific risk was calculated by multiplying the incidence of fetal loss by the likelihood ratios for each maternal characteristic and for different serum marker combinations.Three hundred eighteen women had fetal loss < 24 weeks (early) and 103 > 24 weeks (late). Clinical characteristics evaluated included maternal age, body mass index, race, parity, threatened abortion, previous preterm delivery, and previous early loss. Serum markers studied as possible predictors of early loss included first-trimester pregnancy-associated plasma protein A and second-trimester alpha-fetoprotein, and unconjugated estriol. A risk assessment for early loss based on all of these factors yielded a 46% detection rate, for a fixed 10% false-positive rate, 39% for 5% and 28% for 1%. The only significant marker for late loss was inhibin A. The detection rate was 27% for a fixed 10% false-positive rate and only increased slightly when clinical characteristics were added to the model.Patient-specific risk assessment for early fetal loss using serum markers, with or without maternal characteristics, has a moderately high detection. Patient-specific risk assessment for late fetal loss has low detection rates.Comparison of the efficiency of second-trimester nasal bone hypoplasia and increased nuchal fold in Down syndrome screening.The purpose of this study was to compare the efficiency of second-trimester nasal bone hypoplasia (NB) and increased nuchal fold (NF) in Down syndrome screening.This was a prospective multicenter cohort study of women who underwent an anatomic survey between 16 and 22 weeks of gestation. The fetal NB and other markers of fetal aneuploidy that included NF were evaluated. NB was defined either as an absent NB or length of <0.75 multiples of the median for the gestational age. Two definitions of increased NF (>5 mm and >6 mm) were evaluated. Fetuses or infants with Down syndrome were compared with those fetuses without for the presence of NB and increased NF.Among 4373 pregnancies that were evaluated over a 5-year period, there were 50 pregnancies with Down syndrome. NB evaluation was obtained in 3936 of 4373 pregnancies (90%); NF was evaluated in all of the fetuses. Absent NB was seen in 14/49 cases (29%), and NF of >6 mm was seen in 6 of 50 cases (12%) with Down syndrome.Nasal bone and nuchal fold are efficient markers for Down syndrome. Absent nasal bone was a better predictor of Down syndrome, compared with nuchal fold, and should be a standard marker when a second-trimester genetic sonogram is performed.Median parameters for Down's syndrome screening should be calculated using a moving time-window method.In Down's syndrome screening, the change in analyte concentrations in maternal serum with advancing gestational age is compensated for by converting concentration to multiples of the median (MoM) by using a mathematical equation describing the expected relationship. However, owing to assay drifts and shift, the equation may be incorrect, leading to deviation of the observed MoM distribution from the ideal MoM distribution. The NHS Fetal Anomaly Screening Programme has produced standards limiting acceptable deviation, and has provided the Down's Syndrome Screening Quality Assurance Service (DQASS) to monitor it. DQASS recommends monitoring by cumulative sum plot.Down's screening data for 61,368 consecutive samples (12 October 2004 to 31 December 2007) was evaluated using different median assignment techniques.A change in the paradigm for median equation derivation is described, which significantly improves the probability that medians will be correct at any point in time.Software developers need to change the way medians are derived in their programmes.[Quality control of prenatal screening].In 2004 the Danish National Board of Health (DNBH) published new guidelines for the prenatal risk assessment and diagnostic service. The new guidelines are nationally implemented. DNBH has pointed out the importance of quality control, but has not given any specific guidelines concerning this. We demonstrate the feasibility of a quality assessment of a considerable part of the screening programme.The quality assessment is conducted on a cohort from Holbaek Hospital during 12 months by merging data from one local hospital database to data from the Danish Cytogenetic Centralregistry and the Danish National Newborn Screening Registry.The study included 1796 singleton pregnancies and 47 twin pregnancies. 46 invasive procedures were carried out among the singleton pregnancies, which corresponds to an invasive rate of 2.6%. Two fetuses with Down's syndrome (DS) and one with trisomy 18 were found and the pregnancies were terminated. One fetus with Turners syndrome was diagnosed prenatally, but ended as a missed abortion. One child with DS was not diagnosed prenatally. The detection rate for DS was 2/3 (67%).We suggest that the outlined quality program is implemented as a national programme.[Three-dimensional scatter plot analysis to estimate the risk of foetal aneuloidy].First trimester screening (FTS) according to Nicolaides is now a worldwide established method for prenatal aneuloidy screening. An improvement was achieved by the "Advanced First Trimester Screening" (AFS). It was the aim of the current study to set up scatter plots from nuchal translucency (NT), Papp-A and fbeta-hCG, to derive likelihood ratios therefrom and to apply them to a test collective. We wanted to examine whether or nor the test performance of FTS could further be improved.In a multicentre study 10 136 singleton pregnancies were recruited. Risk assessment for the presence of aneuploidies was performed by the Pia Fetal Database (PIA). In addition, all data were recalculated by the AFS module of the online platform www.firsttrimester.net . In a third step, a newly developed algorithm was utilised, in which the foetal parameters DeltaNT, Papp-A and fbeta-hCG were put into a three-dimensional scatter plot. The surrounding volume was segmentally divided and for each space the relation of the healthy to the affected foetuses found therein was determined. Furthermore, for all participiants of this study, the likelihood ratios were examinied at the segment according to the currently measured values. This method is designated as AFS-3D.Within the observed fetuses, 86 cases with aneuploidy were detected. By appropriate choice of the cut-off the sensitivities were found to be 83 % (PIA and AFS) and 82 % (AFS-3D), respectively, and do not differ significantly from each other. The specificity could be improved from 94 % (PIA) to 96 % (AFS) and was further advanced to 98 % by the AFS-3D method. At the same time the false positive rate was lowered from 654 (PIA) to 397 (AFS) and 228 (AFS-3D) cases, respectively.By means of the new AFS-3D method the same count of diseased fetuses was detected compared with prior screening tests. Simultaneously, expectant mothers were spared from unnecessary invasive diagnostics in 65 % of the cases. The choice of an altered cut-off or other volume shapes are feasible and should be examined in further studies.Costs and effects of prenatal screening methods for Down syndrome and neural tube defects.To evaluate prenatal screening methods for Down syndrome and neural tube defects (NTD) with regard to costs per detected case and the number of screening-related miscarriages.The screening methods compared were risk assessment tests, i.e. serum tests and nuchal translucency measurement (NT), and invasive testing through chorionic villus sampling (CVS) or amniocentesis. Costs, the number of cases detected and screening-related miscarriages were calculated using a decision tree model.The costs per detected case of Down syndrome ranged from EUR 98,000 for the first-trimester (serum) double test to EUR 191,000 for invasive testing. If NTD detection was included, the (serum) triple test had the lowest costs, EUR 73,000, per detected case of Down syndrome or NTD. The number of screening-related miscarriages due to invasive diagnostic tests varied from 13 per 100,000 women for the (serum) first- and second-trimester combined test to 914 per 100,000 women for invasive testing.Considering screening for both Down syndrome and NTD favors the triple test in terms of costs per detected case. Compared to invasive testing, risk assessment tests in general substantially lower screening-related miscarriages, which raises the question of whether invasive testing should still be offered in a screening program for Down syndrome.Prenatal detection of trisomy 21 by second-trimester ultrasound examination and maternal age in a non-selected population of 49 314 births in Norway.To assess the contribution of the second-trimester routine ultrasound examination and maternal age (>or= 38 years) to the prenatal detection of trisomy 21 in a large non-selected population in which no other screening methods were carried out.A prospective follow-up study was carried out in a non-selected Norwegian population from 1987 to 2004, including a total of 49 314 births. Data from all cases of trisomy 21, detected prenatally by karyotyping following amniocentesis performed for abnormal ultrasound findings or because of maternal age >or= 38 years, or postnatally after delivery, were registered. The study period was divided into three 6-year periods.Eighty-eight cases of trisomy 21 were registered. The prenatal detection rate was 43% (38/88). No significant change in the detection rate was observed over the 18 years. Fourteen percent (12/88) of cases were detected as a result of advanced maternal age and 30% (26/88) by prenatal ultrasound examination. Of all women with a trisomy 21 fetus, 72% (63/88) were under 38 years of age. The percentage of women >or= 38 years opting for karyotyping during the three time periods decreased significantly from 51% to 50% and 36%, respectively. The termination rate of trisomy 21 fetuses was 84%, with no significant change over time.Our data can be considered as a reference standard for population screening for trisomy 21 based solely on maternal age and second-trimester ultrasound imaging. The prenatal detection rate of trisomy 21 cases was poor and remained unchanged throughout the 18-year study period. If improvement in detection rates is desired, additional programs are necessary.Improved performance of first-trimester combined screening for trisomy 21 with the double test taken before a gestational age of 10 weeks.To evaluate if there is a performance difference in the combined screening for trisomy 21 between the double tests performed before and after 10 + 0 weeks of gestation.The study included all 97 trisomy 21 cases from January 2004 to December 2007, in a screening program where the double test was measured in week 8 + 0 to 13 + 6 and the nuchal translucency in week 11 + 3 to 13 + 6.As many as 87 of the 97 cases were diagnosed in the screening program (detection rate = 90%). Among the 53 cases having the double test taken before 10 + 0 weeks, no cases were missed [detection rate (DR) = 100%, CI = 0.94-1.00] and among the 44 having the double test taken after 10 + 0 weeks, 10 cases were missed (DR = 77%, CI = 0.65-0.90). This difference in DR was highly significant (P = 0.0009). No difference was observed between false positive rates or median maternal age of the two groups.A significantly higher DR was obtained when the double test was taken early in pregnancy (<10 + 0 weeks), than when it was taken later (>or=10 + 0 weeks). The results could not be explained by a difference in either the false positive rate or the maternal age between the two groups.Prenasal thickness in trisomy-21 fetuses at 16-24 weeks of gestation.To construct a reference range for fetal prenasal thickness between 16 and 24 weeks of gestation and to evaluate the thickness in fetuses with trisomy 21.We acquired three-dimensional (3D) volumes of the fetal profile from 135 normal fetuses and 26 fetuses with trisomy 21 at 16-24 weeks' gestation. We used the multiplanar mode to obtain the exact mid-sagittal plane and measured the prenasal thickness as the shortest distance between the anterior edge of the lowest part of the frontal bone (at the junction with the nasal bone when present) and the skin anteriorly.In the normal group prenasal thickness increased with gestation from a mean of 2.4 mm at 16 weeks to 4.6 mm at 24 weeks. Repeatability studies demonstrated that in 95% of the cases the difference between two measurements of prenasal thickness by the same operator and by different operators was less than 1 mm. In the trisomy-21 fetuses the mean prenasal thickness was significantly larger than in normal fetuses and in 19 (73.1%) cases it was above the 95(th) centile of the normal range. There was no significant difference in prenasal thickness between the trisomic fetuses with and without ventriculomegaly, nuchal edema, absent nasal bone or a cardiac defect.The fetal profile is routinely examined during the second-trimester scan and therefore the skill needed to obtain the view necessary for the measurement of prenasal thickness is widely available. If the finding of our study--that in more than 70% of fetuses with trisomy 21 prenasal thickness is above the 95(th) centile--is confirmed in prospective screening studies this measurement alone could prove a highly sensitive method of second-trimester screening for trisomy 21.[Ultrasound screening for chromosomal anomalies by assessment of the fetal nasal bone during 11-14 weeks of gestation--a pilot study].To assess the feasibility of ultrasound screening for chromosomal anomalies by verification of the fetal nasal bone at 11-14 weeks gestation.A prospective longitudinal pilot study was performed in State University Hospital "Maichin dom" from September 2006 till September 2007. Thirty-six high-risk singleton pregnancies were examined between 11+0 and 14+0 weeks gestation with high-resolution ultrasound equipment. The first trimester scan included assessment of fetal number, viability and biometry, nuchal translucency measurement and fetal anatomy survey In each case the presence or absence of the fetal nasal bone was documented. The exam was performed in the mid-sagittal plane according to standardized published protocols. Increased NT > or = 95th centile and/or absence of the fetal nasal bone was considered as indication for invasive prenatal diagnosis. Pregnancy outcome was ascertained from hospital records, referring physicians or the patients themselves.Absence of the fetal nasal bone was verified in 11.1% (4/36) of cases. In all four cases an invasive prenatal procedure was performed. Chromosomal anomalies were found in three cases with absent fetal nasal bone (1--trisomy 21, 1--trisomy 18, 1--triplody), while the fourth case had normal fetal karyotype. In all three cases with chromosomal fetal anomalies termination of pregnancy was performed. The remaining 33 pregnancies had normal perinatal outcome.Absence of the nasal bone at 11-14 weeks gestation is a new potential marker for chromosomal fetal anomalies in the first trimester of pregnancy.Improved prenatal aneuploidy screening using the novel advanced first-trimester screening algorithm: a multicenter study of 10,017 pregnancies.: It has been postulated that the maternal age component should be completely excluded from first-trimester screening (FTS) for fetal aneuploidies. In this study, we tested a new algorithm known as advanced first-trimester screening (AFS), which disregards maternal age.: In a multicenter study, FTS findings were retrieved from 10,017 pregnancies. FTS risk assessment was performed using the Nicolaides method, and the AFS score was calculated. The results of both methods were compared.: Within this population, 81 fetuses had an abnormal karyotype. The sensitivity of the 2 algorithms was 86.4%. When the AFS method was used, the positive predictive value rose from 9.6% (FTS) to 12.4% (AFS). Using AFS, the test positive rate could be decreased by 161 cases (-22.2%) (p < 0.0001), due to a reduction of false positive cases. As a result, the false positive rate of AFS was 24.5% lower than that of FTS, while the same number of aneuploidies was detected.: AFS can markedly reduce the rate of false positive test results. If these results are confirmed by larger multicenter studies, the new AFS will represent a great improvement in fetal aneuploidy screening. (c) 2008 Wiley Periodicals, Inc. J Clin Ultrasound, 2008.Maternal serum screening in cases of mosaic and translocation Down syndrome.To determine if the second-trimester maternal serum markers (MSM) screening for Down syndrome (DS) is efficient in DS mosaicism or structural rearrangement cases.DS mosaic or translocation cases were reviewed from databases of routine MSM DS screening. The control group consisted of 977 trisomy 21 cases included in a series of 854 902 patients (routine screening). DS risk was calculated by combination of maternal age and MSM [alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and human choriogonadotrophin (hCG) or free beta-hCG and/or uE3] expressed in multiples of median (MoM). Mosaic DS cases were divided into three groups, < 10%, 10-49%, and >or= 50% trisomy 21 cells. Translocation DS cases were divided into three groups, isochromosome, Robertsonian, or reciprocal translocation. Detection rate (DR) and MoMs were evaluated in each group.As many as 76 cases of nonstandard trisomy 21 were collected. For mosaic DS cases (n = 43) DR was 69.8% (not significantly different from the 70.8% of control group). When mosaicism was less than 10%, the DR dropped to 25%. For translocation DS cases (n = 33) DR was 75.7% (not significantly different from control group) whatever the types of translocation.In the nonstandard DS cases, second-trimester MSMs gave the same detection rate as for standard trisomy 21, except the cases with low-level mosaicism (<10%).Screening for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 by maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency, fetal heart rate, free beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A.A beneficial consequence of screening for trisomy 21 is the early diagnosis of trisomies 18 and 13. Our objective was to examine the performance of first-trimester screening for trisomies 21, 18 and 13 by maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness, fetal heart rate (FHR) and maternal serum-free beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).Prospective screening for trisomy 21 by maternal age, fetal NT, free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 11(+0)-13(+6) weeks in singleton pregnancies, including 56 376 normal cases, 395 with trisomy 21, 122 with trisomy 18 and 61 with trisomy 13. Risk algorithms were developed for the calculation of patient-specific risks for each of the three trisomies based on maternal age, NT, FHR, free beta-hCG and PAPP-A. Detection (DR) and false positive rates (FPR) were calculated and adjusted according to the maternal age distribution of pregnancies in England and Wales in 2000-2002.The DR and FPR were 90% and 3%, respectively, for trisomy 21, 91% and 0.2% for trisomy 18 and 87% and 0.2% for trisomy 13. When screen positivity was defined by an FPR of 3% on the risk for trisomy 21 in conjunction with an FPR of 0.2% on the maximum of the risks for trisomies 13 and 18, the overall FPR was 3.1% and the DRs of trisomies 21, 18 and 13 were 91%, 97% and 94%, respectively.As a side effect of first-trimester screening for trisomy 21, approximately 95% of trisomy 13 and 18 fetuses can be detected with an 0.1% increase in the FPR.Screening for trisomy 21 by maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency thickness, free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A.To derive a model and examine the performance of first-trimester combined screening by maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness and maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).Prospective combined screening for trisomy 21 was carried out at 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks in 56,771 singleton pregnancies, including 56,376 cases with a normal karyotype or delivery of a phenotypically normal baby (unaffected group) and 395 cases with trisomy 21. The blood test and ultrasound scan were carried out in the same visit. In each case the maternal age-related risk for trisomy 21 at term was calculated and adjusted according to the gestational age at the time of screening to derive the a-priori risk. The measured NT was transformed into a likelihood ratio using the mixture model of NT distributions. The measured free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were converted into a multiple of the median (MoM) for gestational age, adjusted for maternal weight, ethnicity, smoking status, method of conception and parity, and a likelihood ratio was subsequently calculated. The likelihood ratios for NT and for the biochemical markers were multiplied by the a-priori risk to derive the patient-specific risk. Detection rates and false-positive rates were calculated by taking the proportions with risks above a given risk threshold after adjustment for maternal age according to the distribution of pregnancies in England and Wales in 2000-2002. These standardized rates were compared with detection and false-positive rates estimated using Monte Carlo methods to sample from the modeled Gaussian distributions.The performance of screening based on the model was in good agreement with that observed in our population. In a strategy for first-trimester combined screening where the blood test and scan are carried out in the same visit it was estimated that, for false-positive rates of 3% and 5%, the detection rates were 92% and 94%, respectively, at 11 weeks, 85% and 90% at 12 weeks, and 79% and 83% at 13 weeks. In an alternative strategy, with the blood taken at 10 weeks and the measurement of NT performed at 12 weeks, the estimated detection rates were 94% and 96% for false-positive rates of 3% and 5%, respectively.The aim of the first-trimester scan is not just to screen for trisomy 21 but also to diagnose an increasing number of fetal malformations. In this respect the ability to visualize fetal anatomy is better at 12-13 weeks than at 11 weeks. Consequently, the ideal gestation for combined testing in the same visit would be 12 weeks. An alternative strategy, with the blood taken at 10 weeks and the measurement of NT performed at 12 weeks, is associated with higher detection rates of trisomy 21. However, the cost of two-stage screening would be higher and, in addition, the potential advantage in terms of detection rate may be eroded by the likely increased non-compliance with the additional step.First-trimester screening for trisomy 21 by free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A: impact of maternal and pregnancy characteristics.To use multiple regression analysis to define the contribution of maternal variables that influence the measured concentration of free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), and the interaction between these covariates, in first-trimester biochemical screening for trisomy 21.This was a multicenter study of prospective screening for trisomy 21 by a combination of fetal nuchal translucency thickness, and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks of gestation. In the pregnancies subsequently found to have trisomy 21 and in those with no obvious chromosomal abnormality, we used multiple regression analysis to account for pregnancy characteristics that influence the measured concentrations of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A. We fitted Gaussian distributions to the distribution of log multiples of the median (MoM) values in trisomy 21 and in unaffected pregnancies.There were 491 cases of trisomy 21 and 96 803 chromosomally normal pregnancies. Compared with values in Caucasian women, those who were parous, non-smokers and those who conceived spontaneously, PAPP-A was 57% higher in women of Afro-Caribbean origin, 3% higher in South Asians, 9% higher in East Asians, 2% higher in nulliparous women, 17% lower in smokers and 10% lower in those conceiving by in-vitro fertilization (IVF). Free beta-hCG was 12% higher in women of Afro-Caribbean origin, 9% lower in South Asians, 8% higher in East Asians, 2% higher in nulliparous women, 4% lower in smokers and 9% higher in those conceiving by IVF. In screening for trisomy 21 by maternal age and serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A the estimated detection rate was 65% for a false-positive rate of 5%.In first-trimester biochemical screening for trisomy 21 it is essential to adjust the measured values of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A for maternal and pregnancy characteristics.Human placental growth hormone is increased in maternal serum in pregnancies affected by Down syndrome.To evaluate the relationship between maternal serum levels of human placental growth hormone (hPGH) and fetal Down syndrome at gestational midtrimester.We retrospectively analyzed samples of serum from 21 women with Down syndrome pregnancies detected at gestational midtrimester. The samples were obtained at 16-23 weeks' gestation during amniocentesis for fetal karyotyping. Sixty-two serum samples were used as controls, which were obtained at 16-23 weeks' gestation from women with singleton, uncomplicated pregnancies, who gave birth to healthy neonates with a birth weight appropriate for gestational age. The hPGH levels were measured by a solid-phase immunoradiometric assay using 2 different epitopes.The median hPGH values in the serum of the Down-syndrome-affected pregnancies were significantly higher (p < 0.05) than those of the normal pregnancies at 16-23 weeks' gestation: the median value in the serum was 9.4 ng/ml (5th to 95th percentiles = 1.49-39.03) versus 4.7 ng/ml (0.53-7.88).The hPGH levels in maternal serum were found to be higher at 16-23 weeks' gestation in pregnancies affected by fetal Down syndrome. Further investigation is needed to examine if maternal serum hPGH could be used as an additional marker in prenatal screening of Down syndrome at gestational midtrimester.Risk of chromosome abnormalities in the presence of bilateral or unilateral choroid plexus cysts.To evaluate the rate of chromosome abnormalities in cases of uni- and bilateral choroid plexus cysts (CPCs).A total of 10,875 ultrasound (US) examinations were performed in the second trimester, and 435 cases with CPC (4%) were found. After genetic counseling, 45 patients decided not to undergo karyotyping. The authors performed a chromosome analysis in 390 cases of CPCs.The total risk of chromosome abnormalities was 3.59% (n = 14) and risk of trisomies was 2.05% (n = 8). Trisomy 18 was found in 6 cases (1.54%), trisomy 21 in 1 case (0.26%), and trisomy 9 in 1 case (0.26%). The risk of 45,X karyotype was 0.77% (n = 3). One case of 47,XXY karyotype and 2 cases with other chromosome abnormalities were found. In 212 unilateral cases there were 7 with chromosome abnormalities (3.3%). In 178 bilateral cases there were 7 with abnormal karyotypes (3.93%). The CPC was associated with additional fetal US anomalies (with or without polyhydramnios/oligohydramnios) in 112 cases; chromosome abnormalities were detected in 4 cases (3.57%). 66 cases were associated with polyhydramnios/oligohydramnios but not with other fetal US anomalies; 3 cases of abnormal karyotypes were found (4.55%). The CPC was isolated in 212 cases and 7 cases were associated with chromosome disorders (3.3%).US plays an important role in prenatal diagnostics. Further genetic counseling is recommended in cases with CPCs.[Prenatal diagnosis of chromosome aberrations after implementation of screening for Down's syndrome].First trimester screening for Down's syndrome was evaluated by the National Board of Health in 2004, and recommended to all pregnant women in the form of an informed choice. We have reviewed prenatal and postnatal chromosome aberrations in 3 counties in Denmark during the years of implementation in 2004, 2005 and 2006.Risk evaluation based on combined screening (fetal nuchal translucency measurement and serum screening of the pregnant woman) was introduced in the counties of Copenhagen, Roskilde and Storstrom, covering approximately 1.1 million inhabitants. We registered the number of chorionic villus biopsies (CVS) and amniocenteses (AC), as well as the number of cases with trisomy, triploidy and sex chromosome aberrations found prenatally. We also registered the number of children born with Down's syndrome during the period.The number of CVS/AC decreased from 1382 to 790, or 40%. There was an increase in the number of foetuses diagnosed with trisomy 21: in 2004 trisomy 21 was diagnosed in 12 foetuses, in 2006 the number was 30. The number of children born with Down's syndrome was 10 and 5 in 2004 and 2006, respectively. National figures from the Danish central cytogenetic registry confirm a decrease in children born with Down's syndrome.The implementation of combined screening in 3 counties resulted in a reduction in invasive procedures (chorionic villus samples and amniocenteses) by 40%, which is in accordance with the aims of the National Board of Health. As expected, a significant increase in the number of prenatally diagnosed foetuses with trisomy 21 was observed. The number of children born with Down's syndrome decreased, but the numbers are small. The investigation does not review aspects of organisation or counselling and psychosocial issues.Sonographical integrated test for detection of chromosomal aberrations.Different sonographical and biochemical methods for the detection of an elevated risk of chromosomal abnormality are used. The aim of our study was to establish a diagnostic scheme with the highest sensitivity by means of an algorithm incorporating all parameters.In a group of 1490 pregnant women, ultrasound examination including nuchal translucency and nasal bone measurement was performed in the first trimester. Then, in the early second trimester, a second ultrasound examination combined with measuring nuchal thickness and nasal bone was carried out.The combination of the NT and NB measurement showed the highest sensitivity (94.7%), specificity (99.21%), PPV (85.7%) and NPV (99.73%).The proposed integrated test is characterised by a high predictive value for the detection of chromosomal abnormalities, low cost of performance and absolute safety for the foetus and could be offered to all pregnant women. The combination of two ultrasound examinations and biochemistry greatly increased the value of the test.Combining 'nasal bone length assessment as MoM' with other markers for trisomy 21 screening: could it be more effective?Pregnancy outcome in fetuses with increased nuchal translucency.The aim of this study was to examine fetal and neonatal outcomes in the setting of nuchal translucency (NT) > or =3 mm at routine first-trimester screening.A nested case-series study within a retrospective cohort of women screened for Down syndrome at 11-14 weeks of gestation. Crown-rump length, NT values and additional anomalies at first and early second trimesters were recorded. Follow-up information was obtained by a review of medical records and self-report from patients. Adverse outcomes included fetal death and termination of pregnancy due to structural or chromosomal anomalies.A total of 1930 pregnant women were screened between 11 and 14 weeks of gestation. The prevalence of increased fetal NT (> or =3 mm) was 1.4% (n=27). Among these, 12 showed increased fetal NT as an isolated finding. In this group, 2 women experienced fetal demise (16%) and 10 delivered healthy babies. In the group with additional abnormalities (n=15), 9 (60%) were found to have chromosomal abnormalities, all of which were terminated. For all cases with increased fetal NT, total incidence of adverse outcome was 62%.At first-trimester ultrasonography, a fetal NT > or =3 mm was associated with a high incidence of chromosomal abnormalities in the presence of associated abnormalities. For cases with the increased fetal NT at first-trimester fetal assessment and follow-up is necessary to detect possible adverse outcomes.First trimester screening for Down syndrome in rhesus negative women.To explore the effect of maternal rhesus status on first-trimester screening markers for Down syndrome.We accessed a database of singleton pregnancies undergoing first-trimester genetic screen with maternal Rh status documented and pregnancy outcome information available. Excluded were cases of fetal chromosomal or structural abnormalities, or maternal systemic disease. Results of maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) adjusted for gestational age were compared between Rh-negative and Rh-positive women with p < 0.05 considered significant.Two thousand two hundred and two pregnancies fulfilled the study criteria, and 160 of them (7%) were Rh negative. Only free beta-hCG corrected multiples of the median (MoM) values were statistically increased in Rh-negative women (p < 0.009). Using a cut-off of 1:300, screen-positive rates of maternal serum biochemistry were not significantly different between Rh-negative and Rh-positive women (12.5 vs 10.4%, p = 0.41).The present study focused on measurements of beta-hCG and PAPP-A in the sera of women with Rh-negative blood group. Women with Rh-negative blood type have similar first-trimester serum PAPP-A MoM values as Rh-positive women, but significantly higher beta-hCG MoM values. However, there was no significant difference in the screen-positive rate for Down syndrome between the two groups.First-trimester maternal serum progesterone in aneuploid pregnancies.First-trimester maternal serum screening for Down syndrome (DS) can be improved by the use of additional serum markers. We examined whether progesterone (P), synthesized by placenta, might be a first-trimester maternal serum marker for fetal DS.P was quantified in first-trimester maternal serum from 42 DS, six trisomy 18 and two trisomy 13 pregnancies and 115 controls. Log-regression of P versus gestational age in days was used to convert P concentrations into multiples of the median (MoM).The P concentrations in controls increased with gestational age (p = 9.5 x 10(-7)). The log10MoM P distribution in DS pregnancies was not significantly different from that in controls. However, from day 58-67, the log10MoM P was elevated in DS pregnancies (n = 10) with a mean (SD) of 0.1040 (0.0956), compared to a mean (SD) of - 0.0109 (0.1661) in controls (n = 24) (p = 0.05). Five out of six trisomy 18 and both trisomy 13 pregnancies had a P MoM < 1.P is not a useful marker for DS in first trimester, except perhaps in a narrow gestational age window from day 58 to 67. P is a trisomy 18/13 marker.Effect of maternal smoking on prenatal screening for Down syndrome and trisomy 18 in the first trimester of pregnancy.To assess the impact of maternal smoking on first-trimester prenatal screening results for Down syndrome and trisomy 18.Data on maternal smoking status, maternal age, gestational dating, levels of free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) in maternal blood and fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness were analyzed from a cohort of 53 114 women. Statistical analyses were carried out for crude and adjusted comparisons between smoking and nonsmoking groups.In women who smoked during the first trimester of pregnancy, PAPP-A and free beta-hCG levels from dried blood were significantly decreased (p < 0.001) and fetal NT thickness was significantly increased (p < 0.001). For an overall risk assessment combining maternal age and biochemical and ultrasound markers, no significant changes for Down syndrome were found with smoking, but significant increases in average risk as well as in positive rates were found for trisomy 18 (p < 0.001). A potential association between maternal smoking and trisomy 18 remains to be clarified.Adjustment for smoking is recommended in first-trimester prenatal screening for trisomy 18 and probably not warranted for Down syndrome because of the cancelling effects of decreased free beta-hCG and increased NT. Further research is required to demonstrate a biological association between maternal smoking and trisomy 18.Comparison of nuchal and detailed morphology ultrasound examinations in early pregnancy for fetal structural abnormality screening: a randomized controlled trial.To compare the effectiveness of a nuchal scan at 10 to 14 + 6 weeks and a detailed morphology scan at 12 to 14 + 6 weeks in screening for fetal structural abnormalities.From March 2001 to November 2004, 8811 pregnant women were randomized into either the control group (10 to 14 + 6-week nuchal scan followed by routine 16-23-week scan) or the study group (10 to 14 + 6-week nuchal scan and 12 to 14 + 6-week detailed scan followed by routine 16-23-week scan).We analyzed 7642 cases of singleton pregnancies with viable fetuses at first-trimester ultrasound examination and with known pregnancy outcome. In the control group, the detection rate of structural abnormalities in the first trimester was 32.8% (21/64; 95% CI, 21.6-45.7%) and the overall detection rate was 64.1% (41/64; 95% CI, 51.1-75.7%). In the study group, the detection rate in the first trimester was 47.6% (30/63; 95% CI, 34.9-60.6) and the overall detection rate was 66.7% (42/63; 95% CI, 53.7-78.0%). The overall detection rate in the control group did not differ significantly from that in the study group (P > 0.05).When the nuchal scan is offered, a basic anatomical survey can be done in conjunction with nuchal translucency thickness measurement. A detailed ultrasound examination at this early gestational age may not be superior to the nuchal scan in screening for fetal abnormalities in the low-risk population. Though a wide range of abnormalities can be detected at 10 to 14 + 6 weeks, the routine 16-23-week scan cannot be abandoned.Fetal aberrant right subclavian artery in normal and Down syndrome fetuses.To evaluate the prevalence of fetal aberrant right subclavian artery (ARSA) in a low-risk population and compare it with that among Down syndrome fetuses, in order to estimate its potential as a marker in Down syndrome screening.Women undergoing routine fetal sonographic examination between 13 and 26 weeks of gestation were evaluated once for the presence of ARSA using either a transvaginal multifrequency 5-9-MHz probe or a transabdominal 4-8-MHz probe as appropriate. Early pregnancy outcome was obtained in all cases.Nine hundred and twenty-four fetuses were recruited. An ARSA was detected in 13 fetuses (1.4%) with normal karyotype. During the study period, eight fetuses with Down syndrome referred either with known karyotype or with signs suspicious for Down syndrome were evaluated by the same protocol. Three of eight fetuses (37.5%) were found to have an ARSA. In none of these cases was ARSA an isolated finding. The odds ratio for ARSA in Down syndrome compared with normal fetuses was 42.04 (95% CI, 9.08-194.6).An ARSA was found in 1.4% of the normal population. In the small group of Down syndrome fetuses we observed a trend towards a higher rate of ARSA than in normal fetuses. In none of the Down syndrome fetuses was ARSA an isolated finding. Larger prospective studies are needed to examine the significance of ARSA as an isolated finding and the potential of ARSA as a marker in Down syndrome screening.[Specificity of biochemical markers of pregnancy second trimester].During the second trimester of 21 trisomy pregnancies, median of maternal serum concentrations of alpha-fetoprotein, not conjugated estriol, beta fraction, and inhibin A differ from normal values, and it can be used to select high risk patients.To evaluate specificity of different forms of second trimester biochemical markers association in a group of healthy pregnant women and determine levels considered as low risk.Random and cross-sectional study in 363 pregnant women with prenatal diagnosis to evaluate specificity of different combinations of biochemical markers. Down's syndrome and defects of neural tube rates of detection were defined as the percentage of pregnancies with tests of detection of true negatives and false positives.Total beta fraction has differences during weeks 13 to 14, with 70% of cases between 23,000 to 70,000 units, with 1.38% of false positives; alpha-fetoprotein fluctuated between 22 to 30 units, with 5.2% of false positives; conjugated estriol increases between 1.2 to 2.2 units during 2nd quarterly, with 6.3% of false positives; and inhibin has an increase, with 70% of cases located between 125 to 486.5 units, with 10.44% of false positives.Marker formula with greater specificity was type IV, included alpha-fetoprotein, not conjugated estriol and beta fraction. In the isolated form, alpha-fetoprotein marker demonstrates greater specificity.[FISH technique in aneuplodies prenatal diagnosis].Chromosomal disorders are severe and affect 0.9% of the newborns. In these conditions, prenatal diagnosis should be compulsory in every public medical system.Our study is a retrospective analysis of pregnant women investigated by amniocentesis and FISH technique.We analyzed 233 samples collected between 2004 and 2007 at Iaşi "Cuza-Vodă" Obstetrics and Gynecology Hospital. The majority of cases were investigated between 16 and 24 weeks of pregnancy. Thirty-eight abnormal cases (16.30%) were identified: 17 cases with 21 trisomy, 16 cases with 18 trisomy, 3 cases with X monosomy, and 2 cases with 13 trisomy. The main reasons for amniocentesis were: advanced maternal age (12.5% abnormal cases) ultrasound abnormalities (26.15% abnormal cases), and biochemical abnormalities (7.14% abnormal cases).Our data are in agreement with other studies, and support our results.[Abnormal second trimester screening for fetal chromosomal abnormalities as a predictor of adverse pregnancy outcome].Second-trimester maternal serum markers (triple test) is common used to estimate of the fetal risk of genetic abnormalities and open neural tube defects. Positive results of the triple test concomitant with the normal fetus karyotype pattern can also predict the adverse pregnancy outcome. Many authors have been indicated such false positive results of the triple test in the cases of the uterine myomas, PIH, IUGR, and IUD.The purpose of this study was to determine the association between abnormal second trimester Down syndrome screening markers and adverse pregnancy outcome.A total of 775 pregnant women underwent maternal serum screening. Pregnancy complications were studied in the groups of pregnancies with structurally and chromosomally normal fetuses--with: elevated AFP > 1,89MoM, elevated beta-hCG > 1,69MoM or low beta-hCG < 0,48MoM.Increased maternal serum AFP > 1,89MoM were found to be significantly associated with IUGR, PIH and placental pathology. Increased beta-hCG > 1,69MoM were significantly associated with PIH and IUGR. Finally decreased beta-hCG < 0,48MoM were found to be significantly associated with IUGR, PIH and IUD.Triple test can be used not only for the detection of fetal chromosomal and NTD abnormalities but also for the detection of high-risk pregnancies.[Serum screening of fetal chromosome abnormality during second pregnancy trimester: results of 26,803 pregnant women in Jiangsu Province].To evaluate the efficiency of the second trimester screening for fetal chromosomal anomaly using maternal serum marker.27,313 pregnant women with the gestational age of 15 - 20 weeks were selected by stratified combined with cluster sampling from 13 counties over Jiangsu province and 5 townships, towns, or subdistricts from 6 randomly selected cities from southern, central, and northern Jiangsu, totally 95 communities, between July 2002 and November 2006. Questionnaire survey was conducted. Body weight was taken. Ultrasonography was used to confirm the gestational age. Peripheral blood samples were collected to detect the maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (f-betaHCG). The risk values of Down syndrome and Edwards syndrome were calculated. The women at high risk of Down syndrome and Edwards syndrome for their fetuses were recommended to receive genetic counseling and amniocentesis. All babies were followed up until six months to four years of age after birth.26,803 of the 27,313 women (98%) were screened. The average was 25.1, and 1.7% of them were over 35. Serum screening showed that 1,244 (5%) were Down syndrome positive and 105 (0.4%) were Edwards syndrome positive. The final pregnant outcomes showed that 20 cases presented chromosomal abnormalities, of which 9 cases suffered from Down syndrome, 5 cases Edwards syndrome, and 6 cases other chromosomal abnormalities. The detection rate of Down syndrome and Edwards syndrome were 56% and 80% respectively.Under good quality control high prenatal detection rate of fetal chromosomal abnormalities can be reached by screening of maternal serum AFP and f-betaHCG during the second pregnancy trimester. Good cost-effectiveness depends on the incidence of targeted birth defects.Combining fetal nuchal fold thickness with second-trimester biochemistry to screen for trisomy 21.To assess second-trimester screening for trisomy 21 by combining ultrasound nuchal fold (NF) measurement with maternal serum biochemistry.NF, maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) were determined concurrently at 14-19 weeks' gestation in a study population comprising 1813 women with singleton pregnancies, including 1257 unselected women undergoing serum screening for trisomy 21 (1999-2002), and 556 high-risk pregnancies prior to amniocentesis (2003-2005), 402 of whom had positive serum screening tests. The results were expressed in multiples of the gestation-specific normal median (MoMs).There were 1799 unaffected singleton pregnancies, and their NF values approximately fitted a log Gaussian distribution over a wide range. There was a weak but statistically significant correlation between log NF and log AFP (r = - 0.069, P < 0.005) and the correlation coefficient between log NF and log free beta-hCG was even smaller and not statistically significant (r = 0.038, P = 0.11). Among the seven trisomy 21 pregnancies, the median NF level was 1.53 MoM (geometric mean 1.75 MoM), a highly statistically significant increase compared with unaffected pregnancies (P < 0.0001, one-tail Wilcoxon Rank Sum Test). In pregnancies referred because of positive serum screening tests (391 unaffected, seven cases of trisomy 21, one of monosomy X and three other chromosomal anomalies) the use of NF to modify the serum screening risk would have reduced the invasive procedures in unaffected pregnancies by 46% without affecting the detection rate of trisomy 21 or other anomalies. Statistical modeling predicted that adding NF to AFP and free beta-hCG would increase detection more than would adding unconjugated estriol as well as inhibin-A, an analyte that is difficult to measure with precision.The addition of NF measurement to second-trimester biochemical markers improves screening performance, and could overcome drawbacks in the implementation of inhibin-A assay in clinical practice.[Birth defects in the Czech Republic--the prenatal diagnostic].An analysis of the efficiency of prenatal diagnostic of selected birth defects in the Czech Republic and its dynamics in past 30 years according to birth defect type and prenatal diagnostic methods.Retrospective epidemiological analysis of selected birth defects, prenatal diagnostics efficiency.Data from the National Birth Defect Register (Institute for Health Information and Statistics) in the Czech Republic in the 1975 - 2005 period were used along with data on prenatally diagnosed and terminated pregnancies from the same period. Mean prenatal diagnostic efficiency values of selected types of defects were analyzed in 5-year periods and minimal/maximal values were assessed.During 1975 - 2005 period, totally 3,935,209 children were born, out of which 83,970 were with a birth defect. Mean incidence was 213.38 per 10,000 live births (with the highest value of 414.58 in 2003). In 1985 - 2005, 7,398 cases of prenatally detected birth defects (resulting in pregnancy terminations) were registered, which made (in relative numbers) a span from 4.9 defects per 10,000 live births in 1985 to 65.2 per 10,000 live births in the year 2005. During this period, an important increase of diagnostics of prenatally detectable defects occurred.The study gives results of relative efficiency of prenatal diagnostics of particular birth defects. The highest efficiency was in anencephaly and encephalocele (100%), the other defects showed the following numbers: spina bifida 81%, congenital hydrocephalus 67%, omfalocele 67%, gastroschisis 92%, cystic kidney 59%, renal agenesis 50%, diaphragmatic hernia 35% and Down syndrome 74%.Second trimester prenatal screening for Down syndrome: the associations between the levels of serum markers in successive pregnancies.To investigate the association of Down syndrome screening results in successive pregnancies, and assess the impacts of including previous screening results in the current risk estimation on screening performance.The study was based on 56,951 women who had triple marker screening in two or more singleton pregnancies in the Ontario Maternal Serum Screening (MSS) program between October 1993 and September 2000. The problem of recurrent false positive results was examined by comparing screening results from different pregnancies in the same individuals. Between-pregnancy associations in the levels of serum markers were estimated using correlation analysis. A published method was used to adjust current risk estimation for previous screening results. The effect of this adjustment was assessed by comparing screening performances prior and subsequent to the adjustment.The observed false positive rate (FPR) in subsequent pregnancies was 2.5 times higher than that expected (26.4% vs 10.7%) among women who screened positive in one previous pregnancy, and 3.9 times higher (47.4% vs 12.1%) among women who screened positive in two previous pregnancies. Adjusting for a previous screening result will significantly reduce the recurrent FPR without compromising detection.Risk estimation for Down syndrome may be adjusted using the screening result from a previous pregnancy.Racial differences in first trimester nuchal translucency.First trimester screening for Down syndrome using free beta hCG, total hCG and PAPP-A: an exploratory study.To investigate the potential utility of first trimester screening for Down syndrome using Free beta-hCG, total hCG and PAPP-A.Using estimates from the literature, a simulation study was undertaken to estimate the performance of tests incorporating, Free beta-hCG, total hCG and PAPP-A at gestations of 8-12 weeks. We used sensitivity analysis to assess the effect of departures from the assumed model.We estimate that detection rates in excess of 75% for a false positive rate (FPR) of 3% can be achieved with first trimester measures of PAPP-A, total hCG and Free beta-hCG at 8 weeks-the addition of total hCG adding 11%. Detection rates of around 90% for a FPR of 3% can be achieved through the inclusion of nuchal translucency (NT) at 12 weeks to these early first trimester biochemical markers. Our analysis indicates that the marginal benefit of adding total hCG diminishes rapidly with gestational age and that there is little benefit from adding total hCG later than 10 weeks of gestation.The performance of first trimester screening using early combinations of total hCG, Free beta-hCG and PAPP-A should be assessed in further studies.Defining nasal bone hypoplasia in second-trimester Down syndrome screening: does the use of multiples of the median improve screening efficacy?The purpose of this study was to compare the efficacy of the use of nasal bone (NB) multiples of the median (MoM) with the biparietal diameter (BPD)/NB ratio as definitions of NB hypoplasia that is associated with Down syndrome in the second trimester.We conducted a prospective cohort study of women who underwent an anatomic survey between 16 and 22 weeks of gestation. The fetal NB and other markers of fetal aneuploidy were evaluated. MoMs for the NB length at each gestational age category were calculated and adjusted for maternal race. NB hypoplasia was defined either as an absent NB or by a ratio of the BPD/NB >11 or by NB lengths <0.75, 0.5, and 0.25 MoM for the gestational age, respectively. Fetuses or infants with Down syndrome were compared with those without for the presence of NB hypoplasia.Among 3634 women whose condition was evaluated, NB assessment was obtained in 3197 women (88%). There were 23 cases of Down syndrome that were detected. Receiver operating characteristic curve comparison revealed NB MoM <0.75 to be the best definition of NB hypoplasia (area under receiver operating characteristic curve, 0.75). NB <0.75 MoM had a sensitivity and specificity of 49% (95% CI, 26-69) and 92% (95% CI, 91%-93%), respectively, compared with 61% (95% CI, 38%-80%) and 84% (95% CI, 82%-85%), respectively for BPD/NB >11. The difference in the sensitivity of 12% (95% CI, -5-31) with the BPD/NB ratio >11 vs with an NB MoM <0.75 was not significant (P < .25). The difference in the specificity of 8% (95% CI, 7.5-9.5) with the BPD/NB ratio >11 vs an NB MoM <0.75 was significant (P < .0001).In the second trimester of pregnancy, the use of nasal bone length <0.75 MoM for the gestational age was the best definition for Down syndrome detection and resulted in improved specificity.[Evaluation of pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and free beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin (beta hCG) levels and sonographic assesement of fetal nuchal translucency (NT) in singleton pregnancies between 11 and 14 weeks of gestation--Polish multi-centre research].Evaluation of pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and free beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin (beta hCG) levels and sonographic assessment of fetal nuchal translucency (NT) in singleton pregnancies between 11 and 14 weeks of gestation--Poland's multi-centers research.Pregnancy-associated plasma protein A has been reported to be low in Down syndrome affected pregnancies during the first trimester of pregnancy. Enlarged nuchal translucency (NT) is observed in about 80% of fetuses affected with chromosomal abnormalities and congenital heart defects (CHD).The aim of this study were to determine value and the medians of free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and nuchal translucency thickness in the first trimester in a prospective study of a non-selected Polish population.All examinations have been performed according to the Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF) rules. We have included 800 women between 11 weeks 0 days and 13 weeks 6 days gestation into a biochemical examination. Women booked into the clinic were offered screening, using a combination of maternal serum free beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and fetal nuchal translucency thickness. The maternal serum were measured using the Kryptor analyzer (Brahms Diagnostica). All pregnant women have been divided into 2 groups younger than (first group) and older than (second group) 35 years of age.Nomogrames for free beta-hCG and PAPP-A levels in physiological pregnancy between 11(+0) and 13(6) weeks were determined in the examined population. A positive correlation between PAPP-A and CRL levels, as well as a weak negative correlation between free beta-hCG and CRL, were demonstrated.[Ultrasound screening program for chromosomal abnormalities--the first 2000 women].Screening for chromosomal abnormalities identifies the group of women at higher risk for having a fetus with chromosomal abnormalities and the need for fetal karyotyping. In order to provide high quality screening, strict criteria Jbo certification of operators are introduced, issued by the Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF), which enables annual external control of results. The aim of this study was to review the results of five-year prenatal screening for chromosomal abnormalities in Novi Sad, Serbia.Ultrasound screening at 11-15 weeks gestation was performed, assessing fetal morphology, crownr-rump length and nuchal translucency (NT) according to the FMF guidelines. Risk for chromosomal abnormalities included the initial risk, based on maternal age, gestational age and anamnestic data, and corrected risk, which took into account the initial risk and the value of the nuchal translucency. The corrected risk was issued by the computer program issued by the FMF.During the period 1999-2004, 4580 pregnant women were scanned. The risk for chromosomal abnormality was calculated using the FMF program in 2245 cases and the outcome was known in 1406 cases. The majority ojf women were between 25 and 29 years of age (37%), and 12% were older than 35 years. NT was below the median in 43% of cases and above in 57%, 3.7% of cases were above the 95th centile. 89% of women iwere younger than 35, and the risk was reduced in 97% of cases. There were three false negative cases. In 3% of women from this group the risk was increased, out cf which there were five cases of trisomy 21 and two terminations were done due to major anomalies. In the group of women over 35 years, the risk was reduced in 95% of cases and in all of them but two the karyotype was normal. In one of the two cases there was a large omphalocele and the karyotype was trisomy 18, and in the other fetus appeared normal, but after amniocentesis due to maternal anxiety, karyotype was 47, XYY. In 5% of women at higher risk there was one trisomy 21, bilateral multicystic kidneys were fund in one case as well as one hydrocephalus.Combined screening by maternal age and nuchal translucency is superior to screening by maternal age only--(sensitivity 66% vs. 20%, false postive results 3% vs. 15%, area under ROC 0.90 vs. 0.69).Stepwise sequential screening for fetal aneuploidy.The purpose of this study was to evaluate stepwise sequential screening for fetal aneuploidy.Women who received first-trimester screening were also offered second-trimester tests with second-trimester risks that were based on both sets of markers. Screen-positive rates, use of second-trimester testing and invasive testing, sensitivity, and changes in risks were evaluated.Of 1528 women who received first-trimester screening, 133 women (8.7%) had an indication for invasive testing that was based on first-trimester results alone; 1173 women (76.8%) received second-trimester tests, which reduced the net number of women with an indication for invasive testing to 105 (6.9%). In unaffected pregnancies, the addition of the second-trimester testing reduced the median Down syndrome risk from 1:2368 to 1:10,301. Six of 10 chromosome abnormalities (60%) were identified by first-trimester screening, and 9 of 10 chromosome abnormalities (90%) were identified by sequential screening.Sequential screening can be introduced successfully into clinical practice, is effective, and can reduce the number of invasive tests that are performed.Fetuses with Down syndrome have an enlarged anterior fontanelle in the second trimester of pregnancy.Neonates with Down syndrome are known to have an enlarged anterior fontanelle. The aim of this study was to assess whether fetuses diagnosed with Down syndrome in the second trimester have larger anterior fontanelles in comparison with normal euploid fetuses.The study population included 13 fetuses with trisomy 21 and 26 normal euploid fetuses analyzed between the 19(th) and the 23(rd) weeks of gestation. The anterior fontanelle was assessed by three-dimensional ultrasound, with the midsagittal plane of the fetal head being the reference view for acquisition of the volume. Anteroposterior and laterolateral diameters, perimeter and area of the fontanelle were then measured offline; the diameters were normalized for biparietal diameter and the perimeter and area were normalized for head circumference. Non-parametric statistical analysis was used to compare the mean values of all variables in the two groups of fetuses. Intra- and interobserver variability were also assessed.All variables except the fontanelle laterolateral diameter were significantly greater in Down syndrome fetuses than in controls, with anterior fontanelle perimeter/head circumference and fontanelle area/head circumference ratios showing the highest sensitivity for the detection of Down syndrome. Using a cut-off of 2.1 for the fontanelle area/head circumference ratio, the sensitivity and specificity for the detection of Down syndrome were 77% and 96%, respectively.During the mid-trimester the dimensions of the anterior fontanelle are significantly increased in fetuses with Down syndrome in comparison with normal euploid fetuses. This finding may be of help in the detection of trisomy 21 at the time of the anomaly scan.Likelihood ratios for fetal trisomy 21 based on nasal bone length in the second trimester: how best to define hypoplasia?To determine the best measure of fetal nasal bone hypoplasia for trisomy 21 risk assessment in the second trimester.This was a prospective, observational study performed at a single institution between February 2003 and December 2005. Fetuses with nasal bone length recorded sonographically between 16 and 20.9 weeks and known karyotype were included. Definitions of nasal bone hypoplasia assessed included: non-visualized nasal bone, nasal bone < 10th percentile, nasal bone < 2.5th percentile, biparietal diameter/nasal bone ratio >or= 10 and >or= 11 and nasal bone multiples of the median (MoM) <or= 0.5, <or= 0.6, and <or= 0.7.A total of 371 chromosomally normal and 11 trisomy 21 fetuses were included. Nasal bone hypoplasia based on MoM was superior to the other measures of hypoplasia for trisomy 21 risk assessment as reflected by a higher positive likelihood ratio. The risk for fetal trisomy 21 was higher with greater degrees of nasal bone hypoplasia.Hypoplasia, as defined by MoM, is the superior approach when incorporating nasal bone evaluation into fetal trisomy 21 risk assessment in the second trimester.Frontomaxillary facial angles in screening for trisomy 21 at 14-23 weeks' gestation.The objective of the study was to investigate the potential value of the frontomaxillary facial (FMF) angle in second-trimester ultrasound screening for trisomy 21.We examined stored images of fetal profiles taken before amniocentesis at 14-24 weeks from 100 euploid fetuses and 34 with trisomy 21. The FMF angles between the upper surface of the upper palate and the frontal bone (FMF(bone)) and the skin over the forehead (FMF(skin)) were measured.In the euploid group the FMF angles decreased with gestation. In the fetuses with trisomy 21, the FMF(bone) and FMF(skin) angles were 79.4% and 87.9% above the 95th percentile for gestation of the respective values from the euploid group. In trisomy 21 fetuses, there was no significant difference in FMF angles between those with nasal bone hypoplasia (n = 19) and those without (n = 15).The FMF angle is substantially higher in trisomy 21 than euploid fetuses. Measurement of the FMF angles is likely to prove a useful method in prenatal screening for trisomy 21 in the second trimester.[First trimester ultrasound screening of chromosomal abnormalities].A retrocervical subcutaneous collection of fluid at 11-14 weeks of gestation, can be visualized by ultrasound as nuchal translucency (NT).To examine the distribution of fetal nuchal translucency in low risk population, to determine the detection rate of chromosomal abnormalities in the population of interest based on maternal age and NT measurement.Screening for chromosomal defects, advocated by The Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF), was performed in 1341 pregnancies in the period January 2000-April 2004. Initial risk for chromosomal defects (based on maternal and gestational age) and corrected risk, after the NT measurement, were calculated. Complete data were collected from 1048 patients.Out of 1048 pregnancies followed, 8 cases of Down's syndrome were observed, 7 were detected antenatally and 6 out of 7 were detected due to screening that combines maternal age and NT measurement. According to our results, sensitivity of the screening for aneuploidies based on maternal age alone was 12.5% and false positive rate 13.1%, showing that screening based on NT measurement is of great importance. Screening by a combination of maternal age and NT, and selecting a screening-positive group for invasive testing enabled detection of 75% of fetuses with trisomy 21.In screening for chromosomal abnormalities, an approach which combines maternal age and NT is effective and increases the detection rate compared to the use of any single test.[Non invasive prenatal diagnosis of trisomy 21: dream or reality?].[Rapid diagnosis of fetal chromosomal abnormalities by fluorescence in situ hybridization].In the course of the Down-screening protocol there are possibilities today for rapid diagnosis of aneuploidies among high-risk pregnancies identified by non-invasive screening tests, however, the diagnostic value of these molecular genetic tests are debated.In this prospective study, data about the reliability of one of the rapid tests, namely; interphase fluorescence in situ hybridization (int-FISH) was to be gathered by the authors.For the period between May 2002 and September 2006 all of the 1279 fetal sample were examined both with int-FISH and full karyotyping.Extra or absent signal was detected in 47 cases (3.7%) (trisomy 21 in 32, various other numerical abnormalities in 15 cases). All of these numerical aberrations were confirmed by metaphase analysis without false positivity or negativity. In 19 cases the finding of int-FISH was negative, however, full karyotyping disclosed abnormalities (in 12 of these 19 cases, the abnormality was balanced). Only 4 of the 1279 fetuses (0.3%) (3 small extra marker chromosomes, 1 de novo unbalanced translocation) were to be found, who would have been born with phenotypical abnormalities without metaphase analysis (2 of them had suspect ultrasound signs).Although more analysis are needed, based on the results of this study it is to be concluded that rapid molecular genetic methods like int-FISH might be accepted as a diagnostic tests of fetal aneuploidy, if its use were restricted to high risk pregnancies identified by advanced maternal age and non-invasive maternal screening only. However, full karyotyping is needed in cases with familial translocation and abnormal 2nd trimester ultrasound signs.Humerus length measurement in Down syndrome screening.To compare the predictive values of different humeral shortness assessment methods in Down syndrome screening.674 high-risk singleton pregnancies with a valid last menstrual period (LMP) date were studied. Nomogram and formulas were derived from a subset of the studied group. Sensitivities of fifth percentile and cut-off values of 0.9 for observed-to-expected (obs/exp) humerus length (HL) ratio according to biparietal diameter (BPD) and gestational age (GA) were compared.Sensitivities were 20%, 46.7% and 60% for the 5th percentile, a cut-off value of 0.9 for obs/exp HL by BPD and a cut-off value of 0.9 for obs/exp HL by GA, respectively.Using gestational age instead of BPD when calculating expected humeral length may increase the predictive role of humeral shortness in Down syndrome screening of pregnant women with valid and correct LMP.[Advanced maternal age as an indication for invasive prenatal diagnostics?].To investigate the effectivity of the first trimester screening (FTS), age and other factors as an indication for invasive testing.A retrospective analysis of indications for invasive procedures and their effectivity in the group of women who underwent screening in the first trimester of pregnancy in our center. Women were offered the combined screening program by ultrasound and biochemical markers. Women with risk more than 1 : 300 for chromosome 21, 18 or 13 trisomies, or those over the age of 35 as this is still and indication for invasive tests in the Czech Republic were offered genetic counseling and invasive testing. Chorionic villous sampling (CVS) or amniocentesis (AMC) was than performed.Of the 1700 women who underwent FTS, 291 were over 35 in which only 24 had a risk higher than 1 : 300. Detection rate of trisomy 21, 18 and 13 were 100%, (16 cases) for a false positive rate of 4.6%. In the whole screened population 79 had a risk more than 1 : 300. The total number of invasive tests was 150. Amniocentesis was performed in 88 cases, only 27 were done on the basis of screening with 3 aneuploidy detected. 36 amniocenteses were done for age and 25 for other indications-- all had normal karyotype. The CVS was performed in 62, 52 on the basis of screening with 13 aneuploidy detected. In the other ten cases 5 for age and 5 for family history the karyotype was normal.Altogether 79 invasive procedures based on screening detected all 16 aneuploidies. Remaining 71 invasive tests (n = 41) for age and (n = 30) for other indications had a complete normal karyotype.First- and second-trimester evaluation of risk for Down syndrome.To investigate the differences in costs and outcomes of Down syndrome screening using data from the First and Second Trimester Evaluation of Risk (FASTER) Trial.Seven possible screening options for Down syndrome were compared: 1) Triple Screen-maternal serum alpha fetoprotein, estriol, and hCG; 2) Quad-maternal serum alpha fetoprotein, estriol, hCG, and Inhibin A; 3) Combined First-nuchal translucency, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A), free beta-hCG; 4) Integrated-nuchal translucency, PAPP-A, plus Quad; 5) Serum Integrated-PAPP-A, plus Quad; 6) Stepwise Sequential-Combined First plus Quad with results given after each test; and 7) Contingent Sequential-Combined First and only those with risk between 1:30 and 1:1,500 have Quad screen. The detection rates for each option were used given a 5% false-positive rate except for Contingent Sequential with a 4.3% false-positive rate. Outcomes included societal costs of each screening regimen (screening tests, amniocentesis, management of complications, and cost of care of Down syndrome live births), Down syndrome fetuses identified and born, the associated quality-adjusted life years, and the incremental cost-utility ratio.Based on the screening results derived from the 38,033 women evaluated in the FASTER trial, the Contingent Sequential screen dominated (lower costs with better outcomes) all other screens. For example, the Contingent Sequential cost 32.3 million dollars whereas the other screens ranged from 32.8 to 37.5 million dollars. The Sequential strategy led to the identification of the most Down syndrome fetuses of all of the screens, but at a higher cost per Down syndrome case diagnosed ($719,675 compared with $690,427) as compared with the Contingent Sequential. Because of the lower overall false-positive rate leading to fewer procedure-related miscarriages, the Contingent Sequential resulted in the highest quality-adjusted life years as well. The Contingent Sequential remained the most cost-effective option throughout sensitivity analysis of inputs, including amniocentesis rate after positive screen, rate of therapeutic abortion after Down syndrome diagnosis, and rate of procedure-related miscarriages.Analysis of this actual data from the FASTER Trial demonstrates that the Contingent Sequential test is the most cost-effective. This information can help shape future policy regarding Down syndrome screening.Dose dependency between cigarette consumption and reduced maternal serum PAPP-A levels at 11-13+6 weeks of gestation.To examine whether in smokers there is a significant dose dependency between the number of cigarettes per day and levels of free ss-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) at 11-13(+6) weeks of gestation.This was a retrospective analysis of the maternal serum free ss-hCG and PAPP-A levels in relation to the maternal smoking status in 109 263 chromosomally normal singleton pregnancies that had undergone first-trimester screening for Down syndrome by a combination of fetal nuchal translucency thickness and maternal serum biochemistry.There were 95 287 nonsmokers and 13 976 cigarette smokers. The overall median PAPP-A MoM among cigarette smokers was 0.827, which was 19.6% lower than the value of 1.029 in nonsmokers (p < 0.0001 for log(10) MoM). The respective values for beta-hCG MoM were 1.003 for smokers and 1.035 for nonsmokers (p < 0.0001 for log(10) MoM) which corresponds to a reduction of 3.1%. There was a significant inverse relationship between the number of cigarettes per day and the level of PAPP-A MoM (r = 0.989, p < 0.0001) but not the level of free beta-hCG MoM (r = 0.733; p = 0.098). Using a statistical modeling approach we found that the screen-positive rate when correcting the PAPP-A MoM by an all or nil smoking factor was reduced by only 0.1% (3.75 vs 3.85%) when compared to correcting with a factor related to the smoking dose per day.In first-trimester screening for Down syndrome by maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG the impact of correcting for the dose dependant rather than the all or nil effect of smoking is marginal. However, a dose dependent correction improves the accuracy of the individual patient-specific risk.Hyperglycosylated-hCG (h-hCG) and Down syndrome screening in the first and second trimesters of pregnancy.To validate Down syndrome screening protocols that include hyperglycosylated-hCG (h-hCG) measurements.Measuring h-hCG in 21 641 fresh first- and second-trimester maternal serum samples, but not for clinical interpretation. Nuchal translucency (NT) and pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) measurements were available in the first trimester; alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated estriol (uE3), and human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) measurements in the second trimester.Of the 23 first- and 26 second-trimester Down syndrome pregnancies identified, 52 and 65% of h-hCG measurements were above the 95th centile, respectively. At a 3% false positive rate, maternal age, NT, PAPP-A and h-hCG detected 78% of cases (95% CI, 56-93%). Other combinations were consistent with previous modeling utilizing stored samples. A literature summary indicates h-hCG is as strong a marker as free-beta between 10 and 13 weeks' gestation.Down syndrome screening performance of h-hCG using fresh samples meets published expectations based on stored samples. h-hCG could replace free beta measurements, at gestational ages as early as 10 weeks.Elevated levels of total (maternal and fetal) beta-globin DNA in maternal blood from first trimester pregnancies with trisomy 21.Elevated levels of circulating fetal DNA have been observed in maternal plasma when a trisomy 21 fetus is confirmed. However, these studies have been limited to pregnancies carrying a male fetus. We sought to quantify total (fetal and maternal) DNA from dried blood spots (DBS) for use as an additional factor in multi-parameter prenatal screening for aneuploidy.Maternal DBS were obtained from the NICHD-sponsored multi-center cohort (BUN) study. Seventeen confirmed trisomy 21 (mean gestational age 12.23 +/- 0.77 weeks) cases were each matched by gestational age to euploid controls (n = 30). DNA was extracted and quantitative PCR was performed to measure four non-chromosome 21 loci, including glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate dehydrogenase (GAPDH) (12p13), beta-globin (11p15.5), beta-actin (7p15-12) and p53 (17p13.1).Beta-globin DNA levels were significantly elevated (P = 0.003) in 13 of 17 trisomy 21 cases (4.08 +/- 1.78 Geq/ml x 10(5)) compared with matched controls (2.35 +/- 1.84 Geq/ml x 10(5)). Following conversion of beta-globin concentrations into multiples of the median (MoM), MoM for trisomy 21 cases was 2.8 compared with 1.0 in euploid cases. No significant differences in levels of circulating GAPDH, beta-actin and p53 sequences were detected.This work demonstrates differential levels of circulating beta-globin DNA in maternal blood of euploid and trisomy 21 cases. Sequence-specific quantification could provide an additional measure to improve non-invasive methods of prenatal screening to detect trisomy 21 using dried blood. Beta-globin in particular is an attractive biomarker that could contribute to enhance multiple serum parameter testing in the first trimester.Clinical impact of systematic genetic sonogram screening in a low-risk population.To determine the clinical impact of a genetic sonogram (GS) on a population at low risk for trisomy 21 (T21).A GS evaluating common major and minor markers was created and prospectively applied to consecutive women at 15-20 weeks' gestation presenting for routine ultrasound and at low T21 risk. Prenatal diagnosis (PND) referral occurred if 1 major marker, 2 minor markers, major malformation or choroid plexus cysts (CPCs) were seen. Neonatal outcomes were determined by chart review for neonates born at our institution and by letter for those born elsewhere. Using an ultrasound database, a similar population was identified prior to study inception and the GS retrospectively applied. PND referrals in both periods were confirmed by chart review. The rates of isolated minor marker (IMM), positive GS and PND referrals were compared using chi2 analysis.IMM detection was unchanged (43 of 434, 10.1%) in the study vs. (23 of 243, 9.5%) control group. Excluding CPCs, 6 of 18 (33.3%) subjects of vs. 2 of 28 (7.1%) controls with IMM were referred for prenatal diagnosis (p < 0.03). The frequency of positive GS was unchanged: 14 of 434 (3.2%) subjects vs. 5 of 243 (2.1%) controls.Currently no prospectively studied, effective ultrasound models exist for screening low-risk populations at 15-20 weeks. A GS with clear criteria for counseling on an increased T21 risk decreased inappropriate referrals without increasing positive screens.Maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in patients with habitual abortion-influence on first-trimester screening for chromosomal abnormalities.To explore if maternal serum free beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) levels in the first-trimester of pregnancy are altered in patients with habitual abortions and if there is an effect on first-trimester screening for Down syndrome.A retrospective study was conducted on 913 normal singleton fetuses that underwent first-trimester combined screening for Down syndrome. Maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG were compared between patients with (n = 64) and without habitual abortions (n = 849).The medians +/- SD log(10) MoM of PAPP-A and free beta-hCG +/- SD in patients with and without habitual abortions were 0.063 +/- 0.28 versus - 0.014 +/- 0.27 and - 0.001 +/- 0.27 versus - 0.018 +/- 0.31, with a p value of 0.042 and 0.87, respectively. The screen positive rate setting the cut off at 1:350 looking at the background risk for trisomy 21 was 71.4% in women with and 81.2% in women without habitual abortion, after combined first-trimester screening it was 7.8% in women with and 10.1% in women without recurrent abortion.Patients with habitual abortions have slightly increased maternal serum PAPP-A levels in the first-trimester. This marginal difference seems not to effect risk calculation in combined first-trimester screening for trisomy 21.The impact of maternal serum screening programs for Down syndrome in southeast Michigan, 1988-2003.Abnormal first-trimester ductus venosus blood flow: a risk factor for adverse outcome in fetuses with normal nuchal translucency.First-trimester nuchal translucency thickness (NT) is a potent tool for assessment of fetal risks of aneuploidy and other adverse outcomes. When NT is increased, Doppler assessment of the ductus venosus (DV) enhances the prediction specificity for Down syndrome. This study assessed abnormal Doppler DV waveform as a predictor of adverse outcome when the NT is normal.This was a case-control study of 2,505 consecutive patients undergoing NT screening in our certified first-trimester screening program. First-trimester Doppler assessment of DV was performed and atrial systolic velocity was rated as antegrade (normal) or absent/reversed (DV-RAV; abnormal). Each case with normal NT (< 95(th) percentile) and DV-RAV was matched with two controls with respect to maternal age within 1 year, NT within 0.2 mm, crown-rump length within 3 mm, and closest calculated aneuploidy risk. Outcomes for paired variables were compared using t-test and Chi-square test.Forty-seven (1.9%) patients had normal NT and DV-RAV. After exclusion of three cases with obvious first-trimester anomalies and two with incomplete outcome data, 42 remained for analysis. Adverse outcome included cardiovascular defects (n = 6), fetal growth restriction (n = 3), renal anomaly (n = 2), aneuploidy (n = 3) and multiple defects (n = 3), in a total of 11/42 cases (26.2%). Cardiac abnormalities, renal abnormalities and perinatal death were all significantly more common in the study group (all P < 0.05).Abnormal first-trimester DV Doppler findings appear to predict adverse outcome independently of a normal NT. These patients need detailed mid-trimester assessment of fetal anatomy with formal echocardiography, and subsequent follow-up.Genetic sonography after first-trimester Down syndrome screening.Approximately 90% of Down syndrome cases are detected during first-trimester screening. We aimed to determine the potential effectiveness of second-trimester genetic sonography as a sequential screen for Down syndrome.In this simulation study, published statistical parameters for first-trimester free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin, pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A and nuchal translucency thickness, and second-trimester ultrasound markers (nuchal fold, hyperechoic bowel, short humerus, short femur, echogenic intracardiac focus, pyelectasis and major abnormality) were used to model the effectiveness of second-trimester genetic sonography combined with first-trimester screening.First-trimester combined screening alone resulted in a detection rate of 88.5% with a 4.2% false-positive rate. A follow-up genetic ultrasound examination in which only one sonographic marker was found and previous results were not taken into account would detect an additional 8% of Down syndrome cases for an additional false-positive rate of 13.2%. Using individual marker likelihood ratios to modify the first-trimester risk for screen-negative patients, genetic sonography detected an additional 6.1% of Down syndrome cases for an additional 1.2% false-positive rate, giving a total detection rate of 94.6% and a total false-positive rate of 5.4%. In a contingent protocol, in which genetic sonography would be performed only for patients with a first-trimester risk of between 1/300 and 1/2500, the detection rate was 4.8% and the false-positive rate was 0.7%, giving a total detection rate of 93.3% and a total false-positive rate of 4.9%.Second-trimester genetic sonography, if used properly, can be an effective sequential screen following first-trimester Down syndrome screening. Further studies on the role of the genetic sonogram as a follow-up to first-trimester combined screening are warranted.Optimal crown-rump length for measuring the nuchal translucency.To determine the optimal crown-rump length (CRL) for obtaining nuchal translucency (NT) measurements.Women undergoing NT measurements by NT-certified sonographers within a combined screening program over an 18-month period were included in the study if they had a living fetus with a CRL of 45-84 mm. NT measurement success and screen-positive rates, transvaginal sonography (TVUS) use, and reasons for failed NT measurements were compared in 3 groups by CRL corresponding to 11-0/7 to 11-6/7 weeks (45-54 mm), 12-0/7 to 12-6/7 weeks (55-66 mm), and 13-0/7 to 13-6/7 weeks (67-84 mm).Eight hundred thirty-seven women aged 34.9 +/- 4.9 years underwent 1 to 3 NT measurements at a mean CRL of 59.8 +/- 25.0 mm. NT measurements were more successful at 11 and 12 weeks (81.8% and 84.4%) than at 13 weeks (66.9%) (p < 0.001). Screen-positive and TVUS rates, and reasons for failed NT measurements did not vary by CRL.NT measurements are most successful at CRL 45-66 mm corresponding to sonographically determined gestational ages of 11-0/7 to 12-6/7 weeks.ADAM 12 as a second-trimester maternal serum marker in screening for Down syndrome.ADAM 12 is a placenta-derived glycoprotein that is involved in growth and differentiation. The maternal serum concentration of ADAM 12 is a potential first-trimester maternal serum marker of Down syndrome (DS). Here we examine the potential of ADAM 12 as a second-trimester maternal serum marker of DS.The concentration of ADAM 12 was determined in gestational week 14-19 in 88 DS pregnancies and 341 matched control pregnancies. Medians of normal pregnancies were established by polynomial regression and the distribution of log(10) MoM ADAM 12 values in DS pregnancies and controls determined. Correlations with alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (free beta-hCG) were established and used to model the performance of maternal serum screening with ADAM 12 in combination with other second-trimester serum markers.The ADAM 12 maternal serum concentration was significantly increased with a median MoM of 1.85 and a mean log(10) MoM (SD) of 0.268 (0.2678) compared to a mean log(10) MoM (SD) of 0.013 (0.4318) in controls. ADAM 12 correlated with maternal weight and ethnicity (with the serum concentration increased in Afro-Caribbeans), but neither with maternal age nor gestational age, and only marginally with AFP (r(DS) = 0.078, r(controls) = 0.093) and free beta-hCG (r(DS) = 0.073, r(controls) = 0.144. The increase in detection rate-for a false positive rate of 5%--by adding ADAM 12 to the double test (AFP + free beta-hCG) was 4%, similar to that of adding uE3 to the double test.ADAM 12 is an efficient second-trimester marker for DS. Further studies should be conducted to determine whether it may be a useful additional or alternative marker to those currently used in the second-trimester.[Efficiency of measuring nasal bone as an ultrasound marker of Down syndrome in 11th to 13th+6 week of pregnancy].The aim of this study is to evaluate the significance of nasal bone as a marker for trisomy 21 in the group of women that underwent invasive procedures in our center at 11 to 14 weeks' gestation.The data of 181 women who had undergone the invasive procedures were evaluated for the presence or absence of nasal bone retrospectively and were correlated with fetal karyotype.A successful view of the fetal profile was obtained in 135 fetuses. The nasal bone was absent in 5 of 8 fetuses with trisomy 21 and in 3 of 4 fetuses with trisomy 18. In the group of chromosomally normal fetuses the nasal bone was absent in 4 of the 123 cases. The false positive rate of our screening program dropped from 4.5% to 2.5% after the introduction of the nasal bone evaluation into our risk calculation model for trisomy 21.Nasal bone evaluation improved the detection of trisomy 21 in the first trimester in our screening program and reduced the need for invasive procedures in our department. Absence of the nasal bone showed a sensitivity of 63% for a 5% false positive rate for trisomy 21 in our study. It is rarely observed in chromosomally normal fetuses (2.5%). An appropriate training is mandatory in order to achieve acceptable results.Clinical first-trimester routine screening for Down syndrome in singleton pregnancies in northern Finland.The purpose of this study was to compare the efficacy of both separate and combined maternal serum testing and fetal nuchal translucency measurement in the first trimester screening for Down syndrome in northern Finland.The following screening tests were evaluated: measurement of nuchal translucency (NT) alone; serum screening (pregnancy-associated plasma protein A [PAPP-A] and free beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin [beta-hCG]) alone; and combined screening (NT plus PAPP-A and free beta-hCG).The participants comprised 7534 pregnant women during the 10+0-12+6 weeks of pregnancy. All 7534 women participated in serum screening, and 4765 women participated in combined screening. In the serum screening-alone group, there were 30 cases of trisomy 21, of which 23 (76%) were detected. In the combined-screening group, there were 24 cases of trisomy 21 and 21 (87.5%) were detected. In the combined-screening group NT alone detected 15 cases of Down syndrome (62%).Combined screening is the method of choice for Down syndrome screening.Advanced first trimester screening (AFS): an improved test strategy for the individual risk assessment of fetal aneuploidies and malformations.First trimester risk assessment for fetal aneuploidies is computed on the base of a general background risk, which is depending on the maternal age. Thereby, the adjusted risk tends to rise with increasing age. Obversely, more unsuspicious fetal parameters [measurement of the nuchal translucency (NT) and biochemical parameters, free beta human chorionic gonadotropine (fbetaB-Hcg) and pregnancy associated plasma protein A (Papp-A)] have to be observed to result in an unsuspicious test at higher age. It was the aim of this study to investigate the potential value of a novel risk assessment algorithm explicitly disregarding the maternal age.This was an ultrasound cohort study of 1,463 singleton pregnancies at 11-14 weeks of gestation undergoing a first trimester screening for fetal aneuploidies by measuring the (NT), Papp-A and fbeta-hCG. In each case, the pregnancy outcome was obtained. Regarding either the detection of genetic affections or the combined detection of genetic or somatic anomalies, the test performance parameters (sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values) were calculated and compared with each other. For risk calculation the standard Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF)-Software and an alternative software with a similar algorithm (JOY-Software) were utilized. Compared to this, the risk assessment had been modified by implementing a novel calculation algorithm (advanced first trimester screening algorithm, AFS) purposely disregarding the maternal age and again, the test performance parameters had been computed and were compared with the first ones.At the mere genetic analysis, all four test-strategies revealed to have identical sensitivity and negative predictive values. Compared to the standard FMF-Software, the JOY-Software showed a reduced false positive rate. In addition, in both softwares, the false positive rate is highly significant-reduced by implementing the AFS-algorithm. At combined genetic and somatic analysis, analogous results on different counts could be found.In the effort to create an algorithm characterising somatic and fetal conditions of the fetus most properly, the inclusion of maternal age is not a helpful value and excluding the age from risk calculation leads to a high significant reduction of the false positive rate. Further, a comparable marked increase of both, specificity and positive predictive values, can be achieved for the FMF- and JOY-Software on the background of the generally more favourable JOY test performance.Are nuchal translucency, pregnancy associated plasma protein-A or free-beta-human chorionic gonadotropin depending on maternal age? A multicenter study of 8,116 pregnancies.First-trimester screening according to Nicolaides uses maternal age to obtain a common background risk for trisomy 21. The likelihood ratios by nuchal translucency, free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A are not with respect to maternal age. It was the aim of this study to investigate if likelihood ratios should better take care of it.Pearson's correlation and different models of regression analysis had been performed on the results of 8,116 first-trimester screenings. The total number of pregnancies was subdivided into three subgroups of healthy fetuses (n = 8,038); fetuses with Down's syndrome (n = 46) and fetuses with other genetic abnormalities (n = 32). Statistical testing was applied to each of the three groups.Strong independence from maternal age could be found for each of the first-trimester screening measurement parameter, as well for healthy and as for affected fetuses. Neither Pearson's test nor nonlinear regression models could detect a correlation. Accordingly significance of Pearson's test is not given.First-trimester screening would not be improved by considering the maternal age in the calculation of the likelihood ratios. Therefore the currently used algorithm is adequate. According, to the results, it seems to be proper as well to disregard the maternal age in newer test strategies advanced first-trimester screening (AFS) at all.Comparison of Nicolaides' risk evaluation for Down's syndrome with a novel software: an analysis of 1,463 cases.The individual risk assessment of fetal Down's syndrome based on measurement of nuchal translucency (NT) according to Nicolaides, optionally complemented by the determination of PAPP-A and free beta HCG has progressively supplanted other search strategies for fetal aneuploidies. It could be shown that this diagnostic strategy equally detects other numeric aneuploidies at a comparable rate. A positive test result is also predictive for the presence of a fetal malformation. In this field, several computer programs are available for clinical use. The objective of our study was to re-evaluate the first consecutive 1463 NT-risk calculations determined by Nicolaides' method and to compare the risk calculation to the JOY software (NT-risk calculation module, JOY Patient Database) introduced in 2002.At the Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology, Hannover Medical School, 1463 consecutive complete data sets comprising first trimester screening performed between May 2, 2000 and June 26, 2003 and corresponding fetal outcome were analysed using risk assessment based on the Nicolaides method (PIA Fetal Database NT-Module) and compared with the risk evaluation as determined by the JOY software (JOY Patient Database NT module). A risk exceeding 1:300 was considered to indicate the need for further invasive testing. In a first step, only cytogenetically detectable chromosomal aberrations were analysed. Then, a second evaluation including fetal malformations was performed.Among the 1463 cases, 1445 (98.77%) fetuses revealed to be cytogenetically healthy. Both softwares showed identical detection rates at the genetic and somatic level:13 cases of Down-Syndrome (0.89%), 2 cases of trisomy 18 (0.14%), one case of triploidy, one Turner-Syndrome, one Klinefelter-Syndrome (0.07% each) were detected. A positive test result was found in 15 cases ending in a spontaneous abortion, intrauterine death or peripartum death (1.03%) and in 22 cases of fetal malformation (1.50%). At the level of genetic detection the test positive rate dropped from 92 (PIA) to 71 (JOY) (-22.8%). At the level of combined adverse outcome the test positive rate was reduced from 100 (PIA) to 76 (JOY) (-22.0%), thus yielding in a marked improvement of the characteristic test performance parameters.The novel, recently developed JOY software package allowed reliable evaluation of the risk for aneuploidy with increased specificity whereas sensitivity was unchanged. Our data suggest an improvement of the screening for aneuploidy when using this novel software: With an identical detection rate, the number of unnecessary invasive measures may be reduced.Comparison of serum markers in first-trimester down syndrome screening.Comparing first trimester screening performance: routine care gynaecologists' practices vs. prenatal centre.To evaluate and compare the screening performance for fetal trisomy 21 in the first trimester of pregnancy in general gynaecologists' practices and specialised centres for prenatal care in Germany.This study included 15,026 serum samples analysed in our laboratory for free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) at 11-14 weeks of gestation between 1.1.2000 and 31.12.2003. Fetal risk for trisomy 21 was calculated using nuchal translucency (NT) values and crown-rump-lengths (CRL), measured either in general gynaecologists' practices or in a tertiary level prenatal centre. The detection rate for a fixed risk cut-off (1:300) and a fixed false-positive rate (5 %) was calculated for NT, serum biochemistry, maternal age and the combination of these components.The estimated risk for trisomy 21 based on maternal age, fetal NT and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A was 1 in 300 or greater in 5.1 % (362 of 6897) and 8 % (329 of 3840) of normal pregnancies, and in 78.9 % (15 of 19) and 88.5 % (23 of 26) of those with trisomy 21. For a fixed false-positive rate of 5 %, the respective detection rates of screening for fetal Down's syndrome by maternal age and serum free beta-hCG and PAAP-A, maternal age and fetal NT and by maternal age, fetal NT and maternal serum biochemistry were (general gynaecologists' practices/prenatal centre) 68.4/69.2 %, 42.1/65.4 % and 78.9/88.5 %, respectively.The screening results are satisfactory in both general gynaecologists' practices and a prenatal centre.Practical issues drawn from the implementation of the integrated test for Down syndrome screening into routine clinical practice.We have evaluated a cohort of women booked for antenatal care at University College London Hospitals. The uptake of screening was 64.4% and was significantly higher (73 versus 46%) in women who booked before 14 weeks. Of the women who booked before 14 weeks, 96.8% opted for the integrated test (IT). Overall, 5.3% failed to attend for the second blood test. The false-positive rate in the women who had the IT was 2.9%. All 11 cases of Down syndrome were detected prenatally. Our study is the first to evaluate implementation of the IT into routine clinical practice.A non-invasive test for prenatal diagnosis based on fetal DNA present in maternal blood: a preliminary study.Use of free fetal DNA to diagnose fetal chromosomal abnormalities has been hindered by the inability to distinguish fetal DNA from maternal DNA. Our aim was to establish whether single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs) can be used to distinguish fetal DNA from maternal DNA-and to determine the number of fetal chromosomes-in maternal blood samples.Formaldehyde-treated blood samples from 60 pregnant women and the stated biological fathers were analysed. Maternal plasma fractions were quantified at multiple SNPs, and the ratio of the unique fetal allele signal to the combined maternal and fetal allele signal calculated. The mean ratios of SNPs on chromosomes 13 and 21 were compared to test for potential fetal chromosomal abnormalities.The mean proportion of free fetal DNA was 34.0% (median 32.5%, range 17.0-93.8). We identified three samples with significant differences in the fetal DNA ratios for chromosome 13 and chromosome 21, indicative of trisomy 21; the remaining 57 samples were deemed to be normal. Amniocentesis or newborn reports from the clinical sites confirmed that the copy number of fetal chromosomes 13 and 21 was established correctly for 58 of the 60 samples, identifying 56 of the 57 normal samples, and two of the three trisomy 21 samples. Of the incorrectly identified samples, one was a false negative and one was a false positive. The sensitivity and positive predictive value were both 66.7% (95% CI 12.5-98.2) and the specificity and negative predictive values were both 98.2% (89.4-99.9).The copy number of chromosomes of interest can be directly established from maternal plasma. Such a non-invasive prenatal test could provide a useful complement to currently used screening tests.Ultrasonographic measurement of fetal nasal bone length in the second trimester in Korean population.To establish the reference range of fetal nasal bone length (NBL) in the second trimester in the Korean population and to determine its clinical value in screening for trisomy 21.A total of 3019 consecutive fetuses at 16-28 weeks of gestation underwent ultrasonographic measurement of NBL at Asan Medical Center from October 2003 to August 2005.Fetal profile was successfully examined in 95.6% (2885/3019) of the fetuses. NBL increased linearly with advanced gestation (R(2) = 0.4337, p < 0.001). During this period, 23 fetuses with chromosomal abnormalities (including nine with trisomy 21, two with trisomy 18, and three with Turner syndrome) were detected. In trisomy 21, hypoplastic nasal bone (<2.5th percentile) was seen in 3/9 fetuses, and the NBL of one fetus was between the 2.5th and 5th percentile. Hypoplastic nasal bone was seen in 3.1% (89/2833) of fetuses with normal chromosomal or postnatal examination findings.We present the normal range of NBL in the second trimester in the Korean population and also their linear relationship with gestational age (GA). The NBL appears to be shorter in Korean fetuses than Caucasian and Chinese fetuses. This indicates that the normal range would vary between races and that a relative percentile is a more reliable screening criterion than an absolute value.Human placental lactogen is a first-trimester maternal serum marker of Down syndrome.Human placental lactogen (hPL) is synthesised by the placenta and found in maternal serum. We analysed the potential of hPL as a first-trimester maternal serum-screening marker for fetal Down syndrome (DS).hPL was quantified by ELISA in 47 DS pregnancies and 136 controls in gestational weeks 8-13. Distributions of log multiples of the median (MoMs) were established. The quantity of hPL in DS screening was estimated using Monte Carlo simulation methods.The mean log10 MoM hPL was - 0.1995 (SD: 0.1993) in affected and 0.0026 (SD: 0.2129) in control pregnancies. This corresponds to a MoM of 0.63 in DS pregnancies. hPL correlated significantly with log10 MoM values of hCGbeta (r = 0.320) and PAPP-A (r = 0.590) in controls, but not with hCGbeta (r = 0.228) or PAPP-A (r = 0.090) in DS pregnancies. The inclusion of hPL in the double test (PAPP-A + hCGbeta) increased the detection rate from 67 to 75% for a false-positive rate of 5%.hPL is a DS screening marker that is applicable at weeks 9-13 and could be included in multiple marker first-trimester screening for DS.Free fetal DNA in maternal circulation: a potential prognostic marker for chromosomal abnormalities?Previous studies on the association of fetal cell-free (cf)DNA levels in maternal circulation have produced conflicting results but the sample sizes were small and based on archived material. We aimed to quantify the levels of fetal and total cfDNA on prospectively collected samples, to understand their correlation with other variables and to clarify their diagnostic value.DNA from pre-CVS maternal plasma was extracted from 264 controls, 72 trisomy 21, 24 trisomy 18, 12 trisomy 13, 16 Turner's syndrome and 8 triploidy first-trimester pregnancies and quantified using real-time PCR. beta-globin was used to determine total cfDNA levels and DYS14 and SRY assays to determine fetal cfDNA levels.Fetal cfDNA levels (DYS14) showed correlation with crown rump length (CRL) (p = 0.004), BMI (p = 0.01) and storage time (p = 0.007) while there was an inverse correlation of total cfDNA levels with nuchal translucency (NT) (p = 0.001). No significant difference was observed between the levels of fetal cfDNA in controls and aneuploidy cases.Quantification of fetal and total cfDNA in maternal circulation showed inverse correlation between NT and total cfDNA levels. Our results also suggest that fetal cfDNA is not an ideal prognostic marker for chromosomal abnormalities in first-trimester pregnancies.Nuchal translucency screening: how do women actually utilize the results?To examine how women use the nuchal translucency (NT) risk adjustment in decision-making for invasive prenatal diagnosis.Retrospective cohort study of 1083 consecutive NT screening exams. A screen-positive test was defined as a risk > or = 1/300. Primary outcome was what proportion of screen-positive or screen-negative women chose to undergo chorionic villus sampling or amniocentesis.Of the women tested, 79% (858/1083) were > or = 35-years-old and 88% (756/858) of these women had a decrease in age-related risk after NT. Of the screen-negative women, 31% (238/756) > or = 35 years of age chose to have invasive testing as compared to only 11.2% (25/223) of those < 35 years of age (p < 0.001). Of the screen-positive women, 71% (72/102) > or = 35 years of age and 100% (2/2) < 35 years of age chose to obtain invasive testing (p = 0.368).First-trimester NT screening for Down syndrome (DS) enables a significant number of women over age 35 to lower the risk for DS several fold and avoid the risks of invasive testing. However, despite significant reductions in age-specific mid-trimester DS risks, a relatively high proportion of women > or = 35 years of age still opted for invasive testing.The "Consecutive Combined Test"--using double test from week 8 + 0 and nuchal translucency scan, for first trimester screening for Down syndrome.To test the performance of the "Consecutive Combined Test", applied on a high-risk population. The classic "Combined Test" (Double test (DT) and Nuchal Translucency (NT) measurement on the same day at app. week 12) gives detection rates (DR) for Down syndrome (DS) of 80-90% for false positive rates (FPR) of 5%. In affected pregnancies, however, the low PAPP-A level is more pronounced, the earlier in pregnancy. Thus, we hypothesized that the Double Test could be taken as early as from week 8 + 0, without compromising the excellent performance of the Combined Test. This "Consecutive Combined Test" allows for a centralised laboratory function.Inclusion criteria were maternal age > 35 years (80%) or a family history (20%). Double test was taken at a median gestational age (GA) = 10 weeks. NT was measured at GA = 11 + 0 - 13 + 6. A combined risk estimate of > 1:400 at birth was used as cut-off.881 had the full test. Screen positive = 34. CVS with aneuploidy = 11 (6 trisomy-21, 5 others). FPR = 3.2%. Positive Predictive Value (PPV) = 17.6% for T-21.The "Consecutive Combined Test" applied on a high-risk population seems to be highly efficient with a remarkably high PPV.Is there a nuchal translucency millimeter measurement above which there is no added benefit from first trimester serum screening?The purpose of this study was to evaluate whether there is a nuchal translucency (NT) measurement, independent of gestational age, above which immediate diagnostic testing should be offered without waiting for first trimester serum markers.Thirty-six thousand one hundred twenty patients had successful measurement of simple NT at 10 3/7 to 13 6/7 weeks and had first trimester serum screening. No risks were reported until second trimester serum screening was completed.Thirty-two patients (0.09%) had NT > or = 4.0 mm; the lowest combined first trimester trisomy 21 risk assessment in euploid cases was 1 in 8 and among aneuploidy cases was 7 in 8. One hundred twenty-eight patients (0.3%) had simple NT > or = 3.0 mm: the lowest combined first trimester trisomy 21 risk assessment of any patient in this group was 1 in 1479 and the lowest risk assessment among aneuploid cases was 1 in 2. Ten patients (8%) had first trimester trisomy 21 risk assessments lowered to less that 1:200 and none of these 10 cases had an abnormal outcome.During first trimester Down syndrome screening, whenever an NT measurement of 3.0 mm or greater is obtained there is minimal benefit in waiting for serum screening results, and no benefit for NT of 4.0 mm or greater. Differentiation between cystic hygroma and enlarged simple NT (> or = 3.0 mm) is now a moot point as both are sufficiently high risk situations to warrant immediate CVS.ADAM 12 as a first-trimester maternal serum marker in screening for Down syndrome.A Disintegrin And Metalloprotease 12 (ADAM 12) is a glycoprotein synthesised by placenta and it has been shown to be a potential first-trimester maternal serum marker for Down syndrome (DS) in two small series. Here we analyse further, the potential of ADAM 12 as a marker for DS in a large collection of first-trimester serum samples.The concentration of ADAM 12 was determined in 10-14-week pregnancy sera from 218 DS pregnancies and 389 gestational age-matched control pregnancies, which had been collected as part of routine prospective first-trimester screening programs (DS = 105) or as part of previous research studies (DS = 113). ADAM 12 was measured using a semi-automated time resolved immunofluorometric assay and median values for normal pregnancies were established by polynomial regression. These medians were then used to determine population distribution parameters for DS and normal pregnancy groups. Correlation with previously established PAPP-A and free beta-hCG multiple of the medians (MoMs) and delta nuchal translucency (NT) were determined and used to model the performance of first-trimester screening with ADAM 12 in combination with other first-trimester markers at various time periods across the first trimester. The benefits of a contingent testing model incorporating early measurement of PAPP-A and ADAM 12 were also explored.The maternal serum concentration of ADAM 12 was significantly reduced (p = 0.0049) with an overall median MoM of 0.79 in the DS cases and a log(10) MoM SD of 0.3734 in the DS cases and 0.3353 in the controls. There was a significant correlation of ADAM 12 MoM in DS cases with gestational age (r = 0.375) and the median MoM increased from 0.50 at 10-11 weeks to 1.38 at 13 weeks. ADAM 12 was correlated with maternal weight (r(controls) = 0.283), PAPP-A (r(controls) = 0.324, r(DS) = 0.251) but less so with free beta-hCG (r(controls) = 0.062, r(DS) = 0.049) and delta NT (r(controls) = 0.110, r(DS) = 0.151). ADAM 12 was significantly (p = 0.026) lower in smokers (0.87 vs 1.00) and elevated in Afro-Caribbean women compared to Caucasian women (1.34 vs 1.00). Population modelling using parameters from this and an earlier study showed that a combination of ADAM 12 and PAPP-A measured at 8-9 weeks and combined with NT and free beta-hCG measured at 12 weeks could achieve a detection rate of 97% at a 5% false-positive rate or 89% at a 1% false-positive rate. PAPP-A and ADAM 12 alone at 8-9 weeks could identify 91% of cases at a 5% false-positive rate. Using this as part of a contingent-screening model to select an intermediate risk group of women for NT and free beta-hCG at 11-12 weeks would enable the detection of 92% of cases with a 1% false-positive rate at a cost of providing NT and free beta-hCG for 6% of women with 94% of women having completed screening by the 10th week of pregnancy.ADAM 12 in early first trimester is a very efficient marker of DS. In combination with existing markers, it offers enhanced screening efficiency in a two-stage sequential first-trimester screening program or in a contingent-screening model, which may have benefits in health economies where universal access to high quality ultrasound is difficult. More data on early first-trimester cases with DS are required to establish more secure population parameters by which to assess further the validity of these models.Sequential and contingent prenatal screening for Down syndrome.To compare the Integrated test in three policies for prenatal Down syndrome screening: Integrated screening for all women, sequential screening (first-trimester tests allowing early completion of screening for high-risk pregnancies), and Contingent screening (early completion of screening for high- and low-risk pregnancies).Estimation of detection rates (DRs) and false-positive rates (FPRs) using Monte Carlo simulation and cost effectiveness for each method.Down syndrome affected and unaffected pregnancies studied in the Serum Urine and Ultrasound Screening Study (SURUSS). RESULTS AND MAIN OUTCOMES: Integrated screening has the best screening performance. The performance of the other two policies approached that of Integrated screening as the first-trimester test FPR decreased. If the first-trimester FPR is set to 0.5% (risk >or= 1 in 30) with an overall DR of 90%, sequential and contingent screening yield overall FPRs of 2.25% and 2.42%, respectively, and 66% of the affected pregnancies are detected by the first-trimester test. The Integrated test on all women yields an FPR of 2.15%. With sequential screening, 99.5% of women would proceed to an Integrated test, or 30% with contingent screening if those with first-trimester test risks of <or=1 in 2000 are classified screen-negative and receive no further testing. About 20% of affected pregnancies identified in the first trimester using sequential or contingent screening would have unnecessary terminations (they would miscarry before the early second trimester). Contingent screening is the most cost-effective if there is no alphafetoprotein screening for neural tube defects, otherwise Integrated screening is more cost-effective.Integrated screening for all women is the simplest, most effective, and the safest policy. Contingent screening is the most complex with the lowest screening performance. Making an earlier diagnosis with sequential and contingent screening has adverse consequences that are sufficient to discourage their use.Umbilical cord diameter at 11-14 weeks of gestation: relationship to nuchal translucency, ductus venous blood flow and chromosomal defects.To compare the umbilical cord diameter (UCD) in euploid and aneuploid fetuses at 11-14 weeks of gestation.In 299 fetuses at 11-14 weeks of gestation the UCD, the nuchal translucency and the a-wave of the ductus venosus were measured. Reference ranges for the UCD according to the gestational age and to the crown-rump-length (CRL) were obtained by measuring the UCD by outer-to-outer border of 244 singleton pregnancies with normal karyotype. The fetal karyotype was established by chorionic villus sampling, amniocentesis or in case of suspected chromosomal abnormalities in the newborn. Linear regression was used to determine the significance of the association between the UCD and CRL or gestational age.Two hundred and ninety-nine fetuses were examined. The median fetal CRL was 64.5 mm (range 45-84) and the median gestational age was 13 (range 11-14) weeks. In the chromosomally normal group the UCD significantly increased with the CRL (r=0.620; p<0.001) and the gestational age (r=0.555; p<0.001). The regression equation for the mean UCD (y) according to the gestational days (x) was: y=-0.604+0.051*x. The regression equation for the mean UCD (y) according to the CRL (x) was: y=1.962+0.029*x. There were no significant differences in the mean UCD in fetuses without and with chromosomal abnormalities. The proportion of fetuses with an UCD above the 95th centile for CRL was higher in aneuploid compared to euploid fetuses (5/14 vs. 13/285, p<0.005). In 5/14 (35.7%) fetuses with chromosomal defects the NT and the UCD were above the 95th centile, whereas none of the fetuses with normal karyotype showed this combination. The proportion of fetuses with increased UCD and abnormal DV blood flow was increased in the cases with chromosomal abnormalities (33.3 vs. 1.8%, p<0.005).Umbilical cord diameter at 11-14 weeks increases with fetal CRL. Fetuses with chromosomal abnormalities are more likely to have an UCD above the 95th centile. Therefore, sonographic evaluation of the umbilical cord during first trimester ultrasound might be of additional value in the assessment of fetuses at risk for aneuploidies.Maternal serum ADAM12 levels in Down and Edwards' syndrome pregnancies at 9-12 weeks' gestation.Maternal serum ADAM12 is reduced, on average, in early first-trimester Down and Edwards' syndrome pregnancies but the extent of reduction declines with gestation. Here we study levels at 9-12 weeks when the marker might be used concurrently with other established markers.Samples from 16 Down and 2 Edwards' syndrome cases were retrieved from storage and tested together with 313 unaffected singleton pregnancies using a semi-automated time-resolved immuno-fluorometric assay. Results were expressed in multiples of the gestation-specific median (MoM) based on regression.The median in Down syndrome was 0.94 MoM with a 10th-90th centile range of 0.22-1.63 MoM compared with 1.00 and 0.33-2.24 MoM in unaffected controls (P = 0.21, one-side Wilcoxon Rank Sum Test). The two Edwards' syndrome cases had values 0.31 and 2.17 MoM.ADAM12 cannot be used concurrently with other markers in the late first trimester. However, it does have the potential to be used earlier in pregnancy either concurrently with other early markers or in a sequential or contingent protocol. More data will be required to reliably predict the performance of either approach.Screening for Down syndrome using first-trimester combined screening followed by second-trimester ultrasound examination in an unselected population.Recent studies have reported the efficacy of first-trimester combined screening for Down syndrome based on maternal age, serum markers (human chorionic gonadotropin, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A), and ultrasound measurement of fetal nuchal translucency. However, those do not incorporate the value of the widely accepted routine 20-22 weeks' anomaly scan.We carried out a multicenter, interventional study in the unselected population of a single health authority in order to assess the performance of first-trimester combined screening, followed by routine second trimester ultrasound examination and/or screening by maternal serum markers (free beta-hCG and alpha-fetoprotein measurement or total hCG, alpha-fetoprotein, and unconjugated estriol measurement) when incidentally performed. Detection and screen positive rates were estimated using a correction method for nonverified issues. A cost analysis was also performed.During the study period, 14,934 women were included. Fifty-one cases of Down syndrome were observed, giving a prevalence of 3.4 per 1000 pregnancies. Of these, 46 were diagnosed through first (n = 41) or second (n = 5) trimester screening. Among the 5 screen-negative Down syndrome cases, all were diagnosed postnatally after an uneventful pregnancy. Detection and screen positive rates of first-trimester combined screening were 79.6% and 2.7%, respectively. These features reached 89.7%, and 4.2%, respectively, when combined with second-trimester ultrasound screening. The average cost of the full screening procedure was 108 euros (120 dollars) per woman and the cost per diagnosed Down syndrome pregnancy was 7,118 euros (7909 dollars).Our findings suggest that 1 pragmatic interventional 2-step approach using first-trimester combined screening followed by second-trimester detailed ultrasound examination is a suitable and acceptable option for Down syndrome screening in pregnancy.Sequential triage in the first trimester may enhance advanced ultrasound scanning in population screening for trisomy 21.To design a trisomy 21 screening protocol for sequential triage in the first trimester, and to evaluate whether it reduces the need for advanced ultrasound scanning to such an extent that this could be dealt with by a limited number of well-trained sonographers only.Screening results of 31 trisomy 21 affected pregnancies and 16 096 unaffected pregnancies from the first trimester screening program of Algemeen Medisch Laboratorium in Antwerp, Belgium, were used to define high-risk, intermediate-risk and low-risk groups. A serum screening result (age, pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG)) of >or=1 : 30 and/or a nuchal translucency thickness (NT) measurement of >or= 3.5 mm were classified as high risk. A serum screening result of < 1 : 1000 together with an NT of < 3.5 mm were classified as low risk. Other results were considered intermediate risk, for which further advanced ultrasound screening would be indicated. This protocol was then evaluated prospectively in another population of 13 493 first-trimester pregnancies.Of the total population, 1.9% was identified as being high risk (14 trisomy 21 pregnancies and 222 unaffected pregnancies; prevalence, 1 : 17), 59.6% was identified as being low risk (three trisomy 21 pregnancies and 9615 unaffected pregnancies; prevalence, 1 : 3206) and 38.4% was identified as being intermediate risk (10 trisomy 21 pregnancies and 6190 unaffected pregnancies; prevalence, 1 : 620). A similar distribution was found in the prospective arm of the study. There was no reduction of overall screening performance compared with our current first-trimester combined screening program. The number of intermediate-risk pregnancies was sufficiently low as to enable advanced ultrasound scanning by well-trained sonographers only.In population screening for fetal trisomy 21, sequential triage in the first trimester can be achieved using very simple methods. Pregnancies at high or at low risk can be identified easily and the number of pregnancies at intermediate risk can be reduced sufficiently to enable advanced ultrasound scanning by well-trained sonographers only. A prospective study is needed to evaluate the performance of this approach and to compare its results with current combined or integrated screening algorithms.Nuchal translucency and first-trimester screening.Three-stage contingent screening for Down syndrome.To demonstrate the potential value of three-stage sequential screening for Down syndrome.Protocols were considered in which maternal serum pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) measurements were taken on all women in the first trimester. Those women with very low Down syndrome risks were screened negative at that stage and nuchal translucency (NT) was measured on the remainder and the risk reassessed. Those with very low risk were then screened negative and those with very high risk were offered early diagnostic testing. Those with intermediate risks received second-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, free beta-hCG, unconjugated estriol and inhibin-A. Risk was then reassessed and those with high risk were offered diagnosis. Detection rates and false-positive rates were estimated by multivariate Gaussian modelling using Monte-Carlo simulation.The modelling suggests that, with full adherence to a three-stage policy, overall detection rates of nearly 90% and false-positive rates below 2.0% can be achieved. Approximately two-thirds of pregnancies are screened on the basis of first-trimester biochemistry alone, five out of six women complete their screening in the first trimester, and the first-trimester detection rate is over 60%.Three-stage contingent sequential screening is potentially highly effective for Down syndrome screening. The acceptability of this protocol and its performance in practice, should be tested in prospective studies.First-trimester screening: lessons from clinical trials and implementation.Screening for trisomy 21 with maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency and maternal serum biochemistry at 11-14 weeks: a regional experience from Germany.To examine the efficacy of first trimester screening for trisomy 21 using a combination of maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency (NT), maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (free beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) in a regional setting [maternity unit of the Women's University Hospital, Hannover Medical School (study center); two regional private centers for prenatal diagnosis and human genetics; laboratory for prenatal diagnosis and human genetics].Fetal NT, crown-rump length, maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were measured at 11-14 weeks of gestation. Risk calculation was carried out using the FMF computer algorithm. The patients were informed and counseled about possible invasive test options if the risk was 1 in 300 or greater. Fetal outcome was obtained by questionnaires given to the patients or sent to their gynecologists. The detection and false-positive rates for the different screening strategies were calculated.Pregnancy outcome was obtained in 2,497 cases, of which 2,196 cases had completed first trimester screening with NT and maternal serum biochemistry and 301 additional cases had NT measurement only. The median age was 32.5 years. In our population 11 affected fetuses were found. The estimated risk for trisomy 21 was 1 in 300 or greater in 64, 82, 88 and 88% of affected fetuses using maternal age alone, in combination with nuchal translucency, with maternal serum biochemical markers or with both NT and biochemical markers for a false-positive rate of 28.2, 5.1, 15.3 and 4.0%.First trimester screening using maternal age, NT, free beta-hCG and PAPP-A is highly effective for the detection of trisomy 21 and is associated with a sensitivity of about 90% for 5% false-positive patients.First-trimester combined screening for Down syndrome and other fetal anomalies.This study assessed fetal outcomes for pregnancies identified at increased risk for Down syndrome by first-trimester combined ultrasound examination and maternal serum biochemistry screening.First-trimester combined screening data were obtained from ultrasound clinics across Western Australia between August 2001 and October 2003. Prenatal screening data were linked with pregnancy outcome information held in state health database registers using probabilistic record-linkage techniques.In 50 of the 60 pregnancies affected by Down syndrome, the adjusted risk was greater than 1 in 300, providing a detection rate of 83% (95% confidence interval [CI] 74-93%). Among all women screened (n = 22,280), 827 had increased risk results but did not have a Down syndrome pregnancy, representing a false-positive rate of 3.7% (95% CI 3.5-3.9%). Ten cases of Down syndrome were detected among women considered not at increased risk, consistent with a false-negative rate of 1 in 2,227. First-trimester combined screening reduced the number of Down syndrome births by 50 in 22,280 (2.24 cases per 1,000 births), which represents the detection of one case of fetal Down syndrome for every 446 women screened. Furthermore, 25% of pregnancies with other birth defects occurred among those identified at increased risk of Down syndrome, and 1 in 8 pregnancies at increased risk were found to have a significant chromosomal or structural defect.First-trimester combined screening in Western Australia detected 83% (95% CI 74-93%) of Down syndrome pregnancies at a 3.7% (95% CI 3.5-3.9%) false-positive rate.II-2.Nuchal translucency thickness measurements for fetal aneuploidy screening: Log NT-MoM or Delta-NT, performer-specific medians and ultrasound training.To evaluate in fetal aneuploidy screening the desirability of using Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF) normal medians of nuchal translucency thickness (NT) measurements or performer-specific medians, and whether the NT measurements should be expressed as Delta-NT or Log NT-MoM values.First trimester-combined screening programme in a low risk population in Flanders, Belgium (Algemeen Medisch Laboratorium, Antwerp).Pregnancies unaffected by trisomy 21 (T21) were screened by FMF-trained or other ultrasonographers. Performer-specific NT medians were established for FMF-trained and other ultrasonographers. NCSS Statistical Software was used to establish probability plots for Log NT-MoM and Delta-NT values, relative to performer-specific references or to the FMF-reference.A total of 16,096 pregnancies were evaluated. Six FMF-trainees and five other ultrasonographers each performed between 83 and 658 NT measurements. For the FMF-trainees, FMF-specific NT-MoM medians were close to one at a crown-rump length (CRL) between 50 and 80 mm, whereas the population-specific NT-MoM medians of the other ultrasonographers were close to one at a CRL between 40 and 80 mm. Performer-specific Delta-NT values fitted a Gaussian distribution between the 5th and 90th percentiles, while for the Log NT-MoM values this was between the 10th and 95th percentiles.We conclude that (i) the use of screening would benefit from performer-specific NT-medians based on Log NT-MoM values; (ii) the use of Log NT-MoM values is marginally better than the use of delta-NT MoMs; and (iii) NT measurements are valid at about 10 weeks (crown-rump length 40-45 mm) as well as at 11-13 weeks.Fetal tricuspid regurgitation at the 11 + 0 to 13 + 6-week scan: association with chromosomal defects and reproducibility of the method.To determine the reproducibility of diagnosing tricuspid regurgitation (TR) at 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks' gestation, to examine further the relationship between TR and the presence of chromosomal defects and to calculate the likelihood ratios for trisomy 21 and trisomy 18 in fetuses with TR.Pulsed wave Doppler of flow across the tricuspid valve was carried out by 12 obstetricians, trained in fetal echocardiography, to ascertain the presence or absence of TR in 1557 fetuses at 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks. The assessment was carried out immediately before chorionic villus sampling for fetal karyotyping. In 128 cases, assessment of tricuspid flow was also performed by experienced fetal cardiologists to examine the reproducibility of the method.Tricuspid flow was successfully assessed in 1538 (98.8%) cases and TR was present in 58 (4.4%) of the 1323 chromosomally normal fetuses, 77 (67.5%) of the 114 cases with trisomy 21, and 14 (33.3%) of the 42 cases with trisomy 18. The kappa coefficient of agreement between obstetricians and cardiologists was 0.872 (P < 0.0001). Logistic regression analysis demonstrated that, in chromosomally normal fetuses, significant prediction of the likelihood of TR was provided by delta nuchal translucency (NT). The likelihood ratio for trisomy 21 and trisomy 18 for TR, derived by dividing the likelihood (%) of TR in trisomy 21 by the likelihood (%) in normal fetuses, decreased with delta NT.At 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks, TR is a common finding in fetuses with trisomies 21 and 18. Assessment of the tricuspid flow can be performed by sonographers trained in fetal echocardiography.Combined first trimester screening for trisomy 21: lack of agreement between risk calculation methods.To call attention to differences in first trimester risk estimates for trisomy 21, as calculated by two different software packages.A total of ninety-four pregnant women who had a first trimester risk assessment for trisomy 21 that was based on maternal age, biochemical analysis and a nuchal translucency (NT) measurement. Two commonly used software packages were used for the estimation of individual risks (i.e. Wallac-Perkin-Elmer software and Fetal Medicine Foundation software).Risk estimates derived from each software programme were strikingly different. In each case the discrepancy in reported magnitude of risk resulted from disparities between the two calculation methods for the assessment of the individual risk for trisomy 21. The disparities in risk estimates can be explained by significant differences in reported likelihood ratios for biochemical analyses (P = 0.01), NT measurements (P < 0.0001) and both screening parameters combined P = 0.003).It is illustrated that the lack of agreement between these risk calculation methods could give rise to major counselling problems. In order to avoid confusion, there is a need for estimating individual risks of trisomy 21 in a standardized way. It is proposed to select a set of parameters that have a proven track record as judged by detection and false positive rates and then use that set exclusively, while simultaneously monitoring its performance.Relation between increased fetal nuchal translucency thickness and chromosomal defects.To examine the prevalence and distribution of all chromosomal defects in fetuses with increased nuchal translucency thickness.Assessment of risk for trisomy 21 was carried out by a combination of maternal age and fetal nuchal translucency thickness at 11-13 + 6 weeks. A search of the database was made to identify, first, all singleton pregnancies in which fetal karyotyping was carried out and, second, the cases where the fetal nuchal translucency was equal to or above the 95th centile for fetal crown-rump length. The prevalence and distribution of chromosomal defects were determined for each nuchal translucency category: between the 95th centile for crown-rump length and 3.4 mm, 3.5-4.4 mm, 4.5-5.4 mm, 5.5-6.4 mm, 6.5-7.4 mm, 7.5-8.4 mm, 8.5-9.4 mm, 9.5-10.4 mm, 10.5-11.4 mm, and 11.5 mm or more.The search identified 11,315 pregnancies. The median maternal age was 34.5 (range 15-50) years, and the median fetal crown-rump length was 64 (range 45-84) mm. The fetal karyotype was abnormal in 2,168 (19.2%) pregnancies, and the incidence of chromosomal defects increased with nuchal translucency thickness from approximately 7% for those with nuchal translucency between the 95th centile for crown-rump length and 3.4 mm to 75% for nuchal translucency of 8.5 mm or more. In the majority of fetuses with trisomy 21, the nuchal translucency thickness was less then 4.5 mm, whereas in the majority of fetuses with trisomies 13 or 18 it was 4.5-8.4 mm, and in those with Turner syndrome it was 8.5 mm or more.In fetuses with increased nuchal translucency, approximately one half of the chromosomally abnormal group is affected by defects other than trisomy 21. The distribution of nuchal translucency is different for each type of chromosomal defect.II-3.Second-trimester Down's syndrome serum screening: double, triple or quadruple marker testing?The recommendations of the UK National Screening Committee (NSC) are based on the findings of the Serum, Urine and Ultrasound Screening Study (SURUSS). Our study sought to establish if the SURUSS findings, in terms of detection rates (DR) and false-positive rates (FPR) for various second-trimester marker combinations, could be replicated in a local setting.We investigated the effects of adding inhibin-A and unconjugated oestriol to our existing double test protocol. This retrospective study examined 1000 control pregnancies and 128 affected pregnancies.The inhibin-A method was associated with considerable assay drift and very marked within-batch imprecision (intrabatch percent coefficient of variation [CV] = 17%). At a cut-off of 1 in 250, the quadruple test showed a DR of 72%, the triple test 70% and the double test 63%. There were no significant differences between the FPRs for any of the combinations, which were all between 6.6% and 7.0% for a 1 in 250 cut-off.In our view, the current inhibin-A assay is unacceptable as a screening marker due to poor assay performance. We have reviewed the NSC benchmark programme outcomes, and would suggest that the 2005 target of a DR of at least 60% with an FPR of less than 5% is achievable using triple testing in the second trimester in conjunction with universal scan dating. Our results suggest that the April 2007 target of a DR of 75% with an FPR of less than 3% is unachievable using current second-trimester maternal serum screening.Higher median levels of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in the first trimester of pregnancy in a Chinese ethnic group. Implication for first trimester combined screening for Down's syndrome in the Chinese population.To study the effect of ethnic Chinese on the medians of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in the first trimester of pregnancy.The data of 943 women undergoing first trimester combined screening for fetal Down syndrome were analysed to derive the Chinese-specific medians. The calculated risk of Down syndrome based on these Chinese-specific medians was compared with that based on the original algorithm of the Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF).The maternal serum levels of multiples of median of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were significantly higher among the Chinese than among the Caucasians. The weight-adjusted gestation-specific medians were developed. Without adjustment for ethnicity, the original FMF algorithm underestimated the risk of Down syndrome by a median of 1%. Adjustment by ethnicity increased the false-positive rate by 10% (from 5.3 to 5.9%).Ethnic Chinese have a significantly higher maternal serum level of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in the first trimester, which could not be explained by differences in maternal weight. Adjustment for ethnicity may be necessary for these biochemical markers in a first trimester screening program.Sequential Down syndrome screening: the importance of first and second trimester test correlations when calculating risk.Down syndrome screening can be particularly effective when both first and second trimester tests are performed. However, the counseling of women who have received sequential first and second trimester screening can be problematic. We evaluated an approximation where the post-test risk from the first trimester screening is used as the new a priori risk for the second trimester screening. The approximation disregards between-trimester test correlations. The Down syndrome detection rate based on the approximation (90.2%) would be close to that obtained when all correlations were considered (90.8%) but the false positive rate would be 26% higher (3.9% versus 3.1%, respectively). For any particular woman, the use of the approximation could result in highly inaccurate risks. We conclude that the correlations that exist between first and second trimester screening tests preclude the use of second trimester risks derived from the direct product of separate first and second trimester screening. Counseling issues in the delivery of sequential screening are discussed.[Increased nuchal translucency with normal karyotype].Increased fetal NT thickness is a common phenotypic expression of trisomy 21 and other chromosomal abnormalities, but it is also associated with fetal death and a wide range of fetal malformations, deformations, dysgenesis, and genetic syndromes. This paper reviews the outcome of chromosomally normal fetuses with increased NT On the basis of these data it is possible to estimate, for each NT group, the chances of intrauterine survival and delivery of a healthy baby with no major abnormalities. These data are useful in counselling parents of pregnancies with increased fetal NT and in planning the appropriate follow-up investigations. In normal fetuses NT thickness increases with fetal crown-rump length (CRL). The median and 95th centile of NT at a CRL of 45 mm are 1.2, and 2.1mm and the respective values at CRL of 84mm are 1.9 and 2.7 mm. The 99th centile does not change significantly with CRL and it is about 3.5 mm. Increased NT, refers to a measurement above the 95th centile and the term is used irrespective of whether the collection of fluid is septated or not and whether it is confined to the neck or envelopes the whole fetus. After 14 weeks, increased NT usually resolves but in some cases it evolves into nuchal edema or cystic hygromas.Population screening for fetal trisomy 21: easy access to screening should be balanced against a uniform ultrasound protocol.To evaluate the performance of a first-trimester fetal aneuploidy screening program, with a documented underestimation of nuchal translucency thickness measurements (NT) compared to the Fetal Medicine Foundation (FMF) reference range.We analysed the data of Algemeen Medisch Laboratorium (AML) in Antwerp, Belgium, on combined screening with pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (FB-hCG) and NT. NT-multiples of the median (MoM), relative to the FMF reference range, were used for risk calculations.The proportion of first-trimester screening tests in the total of serum screening tests increased from 1.3% (125/9424) in 2000 to 53.1% (6577/12 377) in 2003. Only 11.4% (1514/13 267) of NT measurements were performed according to FMF criteria. The 80.8% (21/26) trisomy 21 (T21) detection rate (DR) at cut off 1:300 resulted from maternal serum screening. NT measurements did not add to this DR, but reduced the false-positive rate from 16.8% (2212/13181) to 8.6% (1130/13181). Only 23.8% (5/21) of T21 detections were by FMF trainees.Easy access to screening and maternal serum parameters accounted for the majority of T21 detections in our first-trimester combined screening program.Variation of fetal nasal bone length in second-trimester fetuses according to race and ethnicity.The purpose of this study was to determine the influence of race and ethnicity on the expected nasal bone length (NBL) based on biparietal diameter (BPD) measured in second-trimester fetuses.We searched our ultrasound, obstetric, and cytogenetic databases for all second-trimester fetuses with measured NBLs. Fetuses with Down syndrome were identified and excluded from the analysis. Linear regression curves were generated for NBL by BPD according to race and ethnicity. Categories used were African American, Hispanic, Asian, and white. Analysis of variance was used to compare mean variation of observed from expected NBL by BPD according to race and ethnicity.There were 717 fetuses with NBL-by-BPD pairs who were available for analysis in our population, including 139 African American, 58 Hispanic, 22 Asian, and 498 white fetuses. Nasal bone length was highly correlated with BPD for each race (P < .001). Mean variances of observed from expected NBL by BPD were statistically different according to race or ethnicity (P = .0092).Race and ethnicity significantly affect the mean regression line of expected NBL by BPD among fetuses in the second trimester. Genetic sonographic norms, therefore, appear to require race- and ethnicity-specific formulas for NBL.Integrated serum screening for Down syndrome in primary obstetric practice.Integrated serum screening for Down syndrome is potentially more effective than current second-trimester screening. We report results of an intervention trial of integrated serum screening that involved 229 primary prenatal care practitioners throughout Maine.Women provided a first-trimester serum (for PAPP-A) followed by a second-trimester serum (for AFP, uE3, hCG, and DIA). These five marker measurements were used to calculate a Down syndrome risk in the second trimester. Screen-positive women (risk > or = 1:100) were managed according to standard practice.During 24 months' enrollment, 11 159 women provided a first-trimester sample (61% of women receiving screening services). Nine thousand seven hundred twenty-three women also provided a second-trimester sample; 8773 women satisfied gestational age criteria for testing in both trimesters. Integrated serum screening detected 14 of 16 Down syndrome cases (87%) and 79% after adjustment for trimester-of-ascertainment bias. The initial false-positive rate was 3.2% and was 2.7% when restricted to ultrasound-dated pregnancies. Performance was better than any combination of second-trimester markers. Implementation challenges included initial samples being collected too early and sample matching.Integrated serum screening for Down syndrome was successfully implemented in primary care settings; screening performance was consistent with predictions. It provides an accessible and acceptable alternative to screening protocols that require nuchal translucency measurements.Predicting the result of additional second-trimester markers from a woman's first-trimester marker profile: a new concept in Down syndrome screening.To describe a method for deciding whether an individual's first-trimester Down syndrome screening test result justifies further testing in the second trimester.Statistical modelling was used to estimate the distribution of second-trimester marker profiles for a given first-trimester profile and hence the probability of a final positive result, using a 1 in 250 term cut-off. A multi-variate log Gaussian model was used with published parameters. Markers were maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) at 10 weeks, nuchal translucency at 11 weeks, and second-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, total hCG, unconjugated estriol and inhibin-A. To illustrate the method, the model was applied to a published series of 24 Down syndrome and 367 unaffected pregnancies.Modelling predicts that for 63% Down syndrome and 0.4% unaffected pregnancies having first-trimester tests, there is a 50% or more probability of a final positive result. A step-wise sequential screening policy based on immediate prenatal diagnosis for those with high probability and second-trimester testing for the remainder would have a 90% detection rate and 1.7% false-positive rate. Modelling also predicts 8.0% Down syndrome and 89% unaffected pregnancies with probabilities below 3%. A contingent screening policy restricting second-trimester testing to those with 3-49% probabilities would have an 88% detection rate and 1.4% false-positive rate.Predicting the probability of a positive final result from the first-trimester marker profile has potential utility, either as a decision aide for individual women or as a formal part of screening policy in selecting a subset of women for second-trimester testing.Fetal head-to-trunk volume ratio in chromosomally abnormal fetuses at 11 + 0 to 13 + 6 weeks of gestation.To determine the pattern of early growth disturbance in chromosomally abnormal fetuses by comparing the volume of the fetal head to that of the trunk.The fetal trunk and head volume was measured using three-dimensional (3D) ultrasound in 145 chromosomally abnormal fetuses at a median gestational age of 12 (range, 11 + 0 to 13 + 6) weeks. The head volume was measured separately and then subtracted from the total head and trunk volume to obtain the volume of the fetal trunk. The head-to-trunk ratios were then calculated and the Mann-Whitney U-test was used to determine the significance of differences from 500 chromosomally normal fetuses.The fetal head volume for crown-rump length (CRL) was significantly smaller than normal in trisomy 21, trisomy 13 and Turner syndrome (P < 0.001, P < 0.001 and P = 0.001, respectively), whereas no significant differences were found in trisomy 18 and triploidy (P = 0.139 and P = 0.070, respectively). The fetal trunk volume for CRL was significantly smaller in all chromosomal abnormalities (P < 0.001) except Turner syndrome (P = 0.134). The head-to-trunk ratio for CRL was significantly larger in trisomy 18, trisomy 13 and triploidy (P < 0.001), but normal in trisomy 21 (P = 0.221) and Turner syndrome (P = 0.768).In trisomy 21 and Turner syndrome, the growth deficit was symmetrical with the head and trunk being equally affected, whereas in triploidy and trisomies 18 and 13 there was asymmetrical growth restriction with the trunk being more severely compromised than the head.[Sonographic features of chromosomal defects at 11(+0) to 13(+6) weeks of gestation].Each chromosomal defect has its own syndromal pattern of detectable abnormalities. The authors describe the sonographic features of trisomy 21 and other major chromosomal defects in the first trimesters of pregnancy. At 11(+0) - 13(+6) weeks, all major chromosomal defects are associated with increased NT thickness. In trisomies 21, 18 and 13 the pattern of increase in NT is similar and the average NT in these defects is about 2.5 mm above the normal median for crown-rump length. In Turner syndrome, the median NT is about 8 mm above the normal median. In addition to increased NT there are sonographic features that are often seen in some affected fetuses at 11(+0) - 13(+6) weeks. In trisomy 21 fetuses have absent nasal bone, short maxilla and abnormal Doppler waveforms in the ductus venosus. In trisomy 18, there is early onset fetal growth restriction, a tendency for bradycardia, exomphalos, absent nasal bone and single umbilical artery. In trisomy 13, there is tachycardia, early onset fetal growth restriction, megacystis, holoprosencephaly and exomphalos. In Turner syndrome, there is tachycardia and early onset fetal growth restriction. In triploidy, there is early onset asymmetrical fetal growth restriction, bradycardia, holoprosencephaly, exomphalos, posterior fossa cyst and molar changes in the placenta.First trimester screening: the BUN study.First trimester risk assessment for trisomies 21 and 18 is rapidly transitioning from an investigational procedure performed at a few major centers to the clinical arena. The BUN study (Biochemistry, Ultrasound, Nuchal translucency) was conceived to evaluate the performance of first trimester screening using PAPP-A, free beta HCG, and ultrasound measurement of the nuchal translucency when introduced into practice. Over a 4-year period, 13 prenatal diagnostic centers evaluated over 8500 patients and reported an 85.2% trisomy 21 detection rate with a 9.4% false positive rate. Further evaluation of the data revealed that, once training and experience were accomplished, sonographers could perform NT measurements consistent with reported standards. In approximately half of the patients enrolled in the study, second trimester serum analytes were obtained leading to additional trisomy 21 detection but with an unacceptably high false positive rate. A "sequential contingency" screening approach using both first and second trimester values in some patients may provide the additional detection afforded by measuring second trimester analytes with a limited invasive procedure rate.SURUSS in perspective.Until the publication of the Serum Urine and Ultrasound Screening Study (SURUSS) report, it was difficult to compare the different antenatal screening tests for Down's Syndrome because of variations in study designs. We here present the main results from SURUSS, updated to take account of recent information on nuchal translucency in Down's Syndrome pregnancies, and discuss their implications.SURUSS was a prospective study of 47,053 singleton pregnancies (including 101 pregnancies with Down's Syndrome) conducted in 25 maternity units. Nuchal translucency measurements were taken. Serum and urine samples collected between 9 and 13 weeks, and again between 14 and 20 weeks of pregnancy were stored. Samples from each affected pregnancy and five matched controls were tested for currently used or suggested biochemical Down's Syndrome screening markers. Pregnancies were followed up to determine the presence or absence of Down's Syndrome. For an 85% Down's Syndrome detection rate, the false-positive rate for the Integrated test (nuchal translucency and pregnancy associated plasma protein-A [PAPP-A] at 11 completed weeks of pregnancy, and alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol [uE3], free beta or total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and inhibin-A in the early second trimester) was 0.9%, the Serum integrated test (without nuchal translucency) 2.7%, the Combined test (nuchal translucency with free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 11 weeks) 4.3%, the Quadruple test (alpha-fetoprotein, uE3, free beta or total hCG and inhibin-A) 6.2%, and nuchal translucency at 11 weeks, 15.2%. All tests included maternal age. Using the Integrated test at an 85% detection rate, there would be six diagnostic procedure-related unaffected fetal losses following amniocentesis per 100,000 women screened compared with 35 using the Combined test or 45 with the Quadruple test.The Integrated test offers the most effective and safe method of screening for women who attend in the first trimester. The next best test is the Serum integrated test. The Quadruple test is the best test for women who first attend in the second trimester. There is no justification for retaining the Double (alpha-fetoprotein and hCG) or Triple (alpha-fetoprotein, uE3, and hCG) tests, or nuchal translucency alone (with or without maternal age) in antenatal screening for Down's Syndrome.The influence of maternal insulin-dependent diabetes on fetal nuchal translucency thickness and first-trimester maternal serum biochemical markers of aneuploidy.To evaluate the influence of maternal insulin dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM) on maternal serum free beta-hCG, PAPP-A and fetal nuchal translucency (NT), thickness at 11 to 13(+6) weeks of gestation in a large cohort of women screened prospectively for chromosomal anomalies.Information on maternal IDDM status, maternal serum biochemical marker levels and fetal NT were collected from the prenatal screening computer records in two first-trimester screening centres. In total the control group included 33 301 pregnancies of which 16 366 had NT and maternal serum biochemistry results and 16 305 with NT only. The IDDM group included 195 pregnancies of which 79 had NT and maternal serum biochemistry results and 127 with NT only. The median maternal weight corrected free beta-hCG and PAPP-A, expressed as multiple of the median (MoM), and fetal NT, expressed as delta values, in the IDDM and non-IDDM groups were compared.There were no significant differences between the IDDM and non-IDDM groups in median maternal weight corrected free beta-hCG (IDDM 0.87 MoM, 95% Confidence Interval 0.75 to 1.16 MoM, non-IDDM 1.00 MoM), median maternal weight corrected PAPP-A (IDDM 1.02 MoM, 95% Confidence Interval 0.83 to 1.05 MoM, non-IDDM 1.01 MoM), or mean delta NT (IDDM 0.0358 mm, non-IDDM 0.0002 mm).In pregnancies with maternal IDDM, first-trimester screening for chromosomal defects does not require adjustments for the measured fetal NT. However, more data are required before the possible reduction in maternal serum free beta-hCG and the reduction of PAPP-A suggested by the published world series can be considered sufficiently important to take into account in the calculation of risks for chromosomal defects.Variability of nuchal translucency measurement: a multicenter study in Thailand.To evaluate intra- and inter-observer variations of nuchal translucency (NT) measurements and study the duration of measurements.One hundred and forty-seven singleton pregnant women with 10-14 weeks of gestation who had attended antenatal clinic during January 1st, 2000-August 31st, 2001 were included.Crown-rump length and NT were measured three times for each woman. Then, another examiner who was unaware of the previous results did the other three measurements. The duration of measurements was recorded. Intra-observer and inter-observer variations were analyzed by repeated ANOVA and paired t test, respectively. The correlation of NT measurements within each observer and between paired observers was evaluated by intraclass correlation coefficients (ICC). Kappa statistic was calculated for agreement.Intra-observer variation of all 10 examiners at three institutes was varied from 0.20 +/- 0.27 to 0.33 +/- 0.41 mm. Inter-observer variation at Chiang Mai University was 0.40 +/- 0.37 mm which was the highest value compared with those at Prince of Songkla and Khon Kaen University (p < 0.05). The mean duration of measurements was in range of 8-12 min. The intra-observer repeatability of the first two measurements showed ICCs varying from 0.61 to 0.94. The inter-observer repeatability of paired examiners showed a variation in ICC from 0.28-0.90. The kappa value expressing the intra- and inter-observer repeatability as being >95th or < or = 95th percentile was 0.73 and 0.72, respectively.NT measurement was reproducible for small variation and good agreement. The duration of measurements was acceptable.Practical strategies in contingent sequential screening for Down syndrome.To design and assess the performance of protocols for contingent sequential Down syndrome screening that can be implemented in practice.Protocols were designed in which all women received first-trimester measurement of nuchal translucency (NT) together with maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and either free beta- or total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG). Those women with borderline Down syndrome risks received follow-up second-trimester maternal serum involving double, triple, or quadruple serum screening markers: alpha-fetoprotein, free beta-hCG or total hCG, unconjugated estriol and inhibin-A. Specific ranges of risks were used to define the borderline group. Separate protocols were developed for the United Kingdom and the United States to reflect differences in commonly used tests, cut-offs, and the gestational age at testing. Detection rates and false-positive rates were estimated by multivariate Gaussian modelling with Monte Carlo simulation.Proposed protocols based on first-trimester NT, PAPP-A and free beta-hCG or total hCG, followed by selective use of second-trimester quadruple markers can result in a 91% detection rate and 2.1% false-positive rate for the United Kingdom and a detection rate of 89% and false-positive rate of 3.1% for the United States. For both countries, over 60% of affected pregnancies would be detected in the first trimester and less than 20% of women would require a second-trimester Down syndrome risk assessment. Use of alternative cut-offs to define those with borderline risks or different combinations of second-trimester markers also yielded high detection rates and low false-positive rates.With appropriate patient counselling, it should be possible to provide highly effective Down syndrome screening using contingent sequential protocols.Maternal weight and ethnic adjustment within a first-trimester Down syndrome and trisomy 18 screening program.To estimate weight and ethnic group correction factors for first-trimester screening markers.Ethnic-specific median MoM free beta hCG and pregnancy associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and delta nuchal translucency values were calculated for cohorts of maternal weight (20 lb each) using data from 51,206 patients undergoing first-trimester screening. False-positive rates for Down syndrome and trisomy 18 were evaluated both prior to and after weight and ethnicity adjustment.Free beta hCG and PAPP-A significantly decreased with increasing maternal weight while nuchal translucency increased by a clinically insignificant amount. For free beta hCG the regression formula indicated that after accounting for maternal weight MoM values were 16% higher for African Americans, 6% higher for Asians and 9% lower for Hispanics compared to Caucasians (p < 0.001, p = 0.001, p < 0.001, respectively) but there was no significant difference for Asian Indians. For PAPP-A, MoM values were 35% higher for African Americans (p < 0.001) but were not significantly different for the other ethnic groups compared to Caucasians. Down syndrome false-positive rates did not vary with maternal weight prior to (p = 0.291) or after weight adjustment of biochemistry (p = 0.054). Trisomy 18 false-positive rates varied significantly with weight both before (OR = 1.455 per 20-pound increase, p < 0.001) and after (OR = 1.066 per 20-pound increase, p = 0.01) weight adjustment of biochemistry; however, the odds ratio was greatly reduced after weight adjustment.The first-trimester screening markers, free beta hCG, PAPP-A and nuchal translucency vary with maternal weight and ethnicity. Adjustment of free beta hCG and PAPP-A is indicated but adjustment of nuchal translucency results may not be necessary.[Fetal nuchal translucency].In addition to its role in the assessment of risk for trisomy 21, increased nuchal translucency (NT) thickness can also identify a high proportion of other chromosomal defects and is associated with major abnormalities of the heart and great arteries, and a wide range of genetic syndromes. In the first trimester, the term translucency is used to describe the accumulation of fluid behind the fetal neck, irrespective of whether it is septated or not and whether it is confined to the neck or envelopes the whole fetus. During the second trimester, the translucency usually resolves and, in a few cases, it evolves into either nuchal edema or cystic hygromas with or without generalized hydrops. Increased NT is associated with trisomy 21, Turner syndrome and other chromosomal defects as well as many fetal malformations and genetic syndromes. The incidence of these abnormalities is related to the thickness, rather than the appearance, of NT The ability to achieve a reliable measurement of NT is dependent on appropriate training and adherence to a standard technique in order to achieve uniformity of results among different operators. Furthermore, the success of a screening program necessitates the presence of a system for regular audit of results and continuous assessment of the quality of images.[Fetal nuchal translucency thickness and risk for chromosomal defects].In normal pregnancy fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness increases with gestation, in trisomy 21 and other major chromosomal defects fetal NT is increased. The risk for trisomies can be derived by multiplying the a priori maternal age and gestation related risk by a likelihood ratio, which depends on the degree of deviation in fetal NT measurement from the normal median for that crown-rump length. In a pregnant population with a mean maternal age of 28 years, using the risk cut-off of 1 in 300 to define the screen positive group would detect about 80% of trisomy 21 fetuses for a false positive rate of 5%. It was estimated that, for a 5.4% false positive rate, 90% of trisomy 21 fetuses could be detected. Prospective studies have demonstrated that such results are achievable by screening with fetal NT and maternal serum free b-hCG and PAPP-A in the first-trimester. It is therefore essential that, in screening, attention is paid to the provision of high quality sonographic and biochemical services for early diagnosis of chromosomal defects.Invasive trophoblast antigen (hyperglycosylated human chorionic gonadotropin) as a first-trimester serum marker for Down syndrome.Maternal serum invasive trophoblast antigen and first-trimester Down syndrome screening.In the United States, Down syndrome screening is still performed mainly in the second trimester, using 3 or 4 markers. Moving screening into the first trimester has the advantage of earlier diagnosis. Currently, first-trimester screening typically includes maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), the free beta-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin (free beta), and ultrasound measurement of nuchal translucency thickness (NT). The current report describes a case-control study of serum invasive trophoblast antigen (ITA) and its possible inclusion in first-trimester screening for Down syndrome.As part of an earlier observational study, serum samples from 54 Down syndrome and 276 matched unaffected pregnancies were collected between 9 and 15 weeks of gestation. Samples had been aliquoted and stored at -20 degrees C for 8 years. ITA was measured and converted to weight-adjusted multiples of the median (MoM). The distributions of other first-trimester markers are from a single published study.Median ITA MoM in Down syndrome pregnancies increase as gestational age increases (2.02 MoM at 11 and 2.44 MoM at 13 completed weeks). At 75% detection, maternal age in combination with ITA and PAPP-A measurements have an 8.0% false-positive rate, slightly lower than the 8.8% found for the free beta and PAPP-A combination; adding NT measurements reduces false positives for the 2 combinations to 2.0% and 1.8%, respectively.Serum ITA appears to be a useful first-trimester Down syndrome marker that could replace free beta measurements while maintaining performance.Inhibin A is a maternal serum marker for Down's syndrome early in the first trimester.Inhibin A is a maternal serum marker for fetal Down's syndrome (DS) in the second trimester. We examined whether inhibin A could be used early in the first trimester. Maternal serum concentrations of inhibin A were determined in 81 controls and 27 cases of fetal trisomy 21 in gestational week 5-11. The log MoM (Multiple of the Median of normal pregnancies) inhibin A concentration in DS pregnancies increased with gestational age (p = 0.001) from a mean log MoM (standard deviation) of -0.1754 (0.3712) (n = 11) in week 7-8 to a mean log MoM (standard deviation) of 0.1842 (0.2145) (n = 12) in week 9-11. This corresponded to an increase in inhibin median MoM from 0.67 to 1.53. When inhibin A was used together with pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A, free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin and nuchal translucency as DS markers, the estimated detection rates were 81.4 and 82.6% in weeks 7-8 and 9-11, respectively, for false-positive rates of 0.9 and 1.0%. The performance of the latter combination early in the first trimester is nearly as good as that of integrated first- and second-trimester screening, with the further advantage that the risk can be reported to the pregnant woman in first trimester.Screening for Down syndrome based on maternal age or fetal nuchal translucency: a randomized controlled trial in 39,572 pregnancies.Nuchal translucency (NT) screening increases antenatal detection of Down syndrome (DS) compared to maternal age-based screening. We wanted to determine if a change in policy for prenatal diagnosis would result in fewer babies born with DS.A total of 39,572 pregnant women were randomized to a scan at 12-14 gestational weeks including NT screening for DS (12-week group) or to a scan at 15-20 weeks with screening for DS based on maternal age (18-week group). Fetal karyotyping was offered if risk according to NT was > or = 1:250 in the 12-week group and if maternal age was > or = 35 years in the 18-week group. Both policies included the offer of karyotyping in cases of fetal anomaly detected at any scan during pregnancy or when there was a history of fetal chromosomal anomaly. The number of babies born with DS and the number of invasive tests for fetal karyotyping were compared.Ten babies with DS were born alive with the 12-week policy vs. 16 with the 18-week policy (P = 0.25). More fetuses with DS were spontaneously lost or terminated in the 12-week group (45/19,796) than in the 18-week group (27/19 776; P = 0.04). All women except one with an antenatal diagnosis of DS at < 22 weeks terminated the pregnancy. For each case of DS detected at < 22 weeks in a living fetus there were 16 invasive tests in the 12-week group vs. 89 in the 18-week group. NT screening detected 71% of cases of DS for a 3.5% test-positive rate whereas maternal age had the potential of detecting 58% for a test-positive rate of 18%.The number of newborns with DS differed less than expected between pregnancies that had been screened at 12-14 weeks' gestation by NT compared with those screened at 15-20 weeks by maternal age. One explanation could be that NT screening--because it is performed early in pregnancy--results in the detection and termination of many pregnancies with a fetus with DS that would have resulted in miscarriage without intervention, and also by many cases of DS being detected because of a fetal anomaly seen on an 18-week scan. The major advantage of the 12-week scan policy is that many fewer invasive tests for fetal karyotyping are needed per antenatally detected case of DS.Ethnicity and the need for correction of biochemical and ultrasound markers of chromosomal anomalies in the first trimester: a study of Oriental, Asian and Afro-Caribbean populations.To assess whether there is a need to correct first-trimester biochemical markers (free beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A)) or first-trimester fetal nuchal translucency thickness (NT) in different ethnic groups, when screening for Downs syndrome at 11-14 weeks of gestation.Free beta-hCG, PAPP-A and fetal NT were measured at 11-14 weeks of gestation in a group of women presenting for first-trimester screening in two OSCAR centres. The group comprised 61 219 sets of data from Caucasian women (the reference group); 4835 sets of data from South Asian women; 3450 sets of data from Oriental women and 2727 sets of data from Afro-Caribbean women. The Oriental data set was supplemented with a further 480 cases collected in Hong Kong and the Afro-Caribbean data set was supplemented with 216 cases collected from Kings College. The difference in marker values between the reference group and the other ethnic groups was compared before and after weight correction for the biochemical markers using standard statistical techniques. A correction factor for ethnic origin was applied for all three markers and the screen-positive rate before and after correction was assessed for the various groups.After maternal weight correction, in Afro-Caribbean women, the median PAPP-A was increased by 55% and the free beta-hCG increased by 11%. In south Asian women, the PAPP-A was increased by 8% and the free beta-hCG decreased by 7.5%. In Oriental women, the PAPP-A was increased by 9% and the free beta-hCG by 6%. For delta NT in Afro-Caribbean women, the values were 0.064 mm lower on average than in Caucasian women and for south Asian women 0.045 mm lower. The difference of -0.012 for Oriental women was not significant. Before correcting for ethnic origin, these changes resulted in the screen-positive rates being lower in the Afro-Caribbean group (3.7% vs 5.6%), the south Asian group (4.3% vs 5.6%) and Oriental group (4.9% vs 5.6%). After correction, the screen-positive rates were largely similar in the four groups.Differences in median PAPP-A, free beta-hCG and, to a lesser extent, in NT exist in Afro-Caribbean, South Asian and Oriental women. In populations where the medians and delta NT reference ranges are established in predominantly Caucasian populations, some correction for ethnicity is appropriate and can redress differences in screen-positive rates between these different groups.First trimester biochemical screening for Down's syndrome in singleton pregnancies conceived by assisted reproduction.Serum biochemical markers [free betahCG (fbetahCG); pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A)] used in first trimester Down's syndrome screening have not been fully investigated in pregnancies achieved by assisted reproduction techniques. We present data on pregnancies conceived by all types of assisted reproduction techniques, including pregnancies following ovum donation (OD) and a large sample by ICSI.First trimester Down's syndrome screening was performed in 1054 normal singleton pregnancies: natural conception (n = 498), ovulation induction (OS, n = 97), IVF (n = 47), ICSI (n = 222) and OD (n = 190).No differences in maternal levels of fbetahCG and PAPP-A, measured by the Kryptor system, appeared between naturally conceived pregnancies (n = 498) and those obtained with assisted reproduction techniques (n = 556). Several differences were apparent when comparing fbetahCG levels between different technologies but PAPP-A levels only differed between OS and IVF pregnancies (P < 0.05). In a further small study, no differences were observed using frozen embryos (n = 37), preimplantation genetic diagnosis (n = 53) or sperm from testicular biopsy (n = 21).Data accumulated so far suggest that first trimester biochemical markers either do not need any adjustments (e.g. in pregnancies obtained after OS and ICSI), or have very little impact (e.g. IVF pregnancies) or no impact (e.g. OD pregnancies) on the false positive rates.[First trimester diagnosis of chromosomal defects].Fetal nuchal translucency thickness at the 11(+0) - 13(+6) weeks scan has been combined with maternal age to provide an effective method of screening for trisomy 21; for an invasive testing rate of 5%, about 75% of trisomic pregnancies can be identified. When maternal serum free B-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A at 11(+0) - 13(+6) weeks are also taken into account, the detection rate of chromosomal defects is about 85-90%. In 60-70% of fetuses with trisomy 21 the nasal bone is not visible at the 11(+0) - 13(+6) weeks scan and examination of the nasal bone can increase the detection rate of screening by the first trimester scan and serum biochemistry to more than 95%.2nd-trimester maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin and alpha-fetoprotein levels in male and female fetuses with Down syndrome.Several studies have shown that the 2nd-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) level is significantly lower and that the maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) level is significantly higher in the presence of a female fetus. This may potentially affect Down syndrome (DS) screening such that a higher false-positive rate may occur in women carrying a female fetus, whereas a lower detection rate may result in those carrying males. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the gender impact on marker levels in DS pregnancies and its effect on DS screening.The study included 62 DS pregnancies with a single fetus of known gender (31 male and 31 female). Only pregnancies with chromosomal analysis showing trisomy 21 were included. The maternal serum levels of hCG, AFP, and unconjugated estriol were measured at 16-20 weeks of pregnancy. These levels were expressed as gestational-age-corrected multiples of the median.No statistically significant differences were noted in maternal serum levels of hCG or AFP in DS pregnancies between women carrying a female and those carrying a male DS fetus. No statistically significant differences in 'screen-negative' rates were noted among male and female fetuses.In normal pregnancies, the maternal serum hCG level is higher, and the AFP level is lower in the presence of a female fetus. However, this gender-related difference is not apparent in DS pregnancies. Therefore, the gender-related differences in serum marker levels would not result in a lower detection rate of DS in male fetuses.Assessment of the gap between the fetal nasal bones at 11 to 13 + 6 weeks of gestation by three-dimensional ultrasound.To detect the presence of a gap between the fetal nasal bones at 11 to 13 + 6 weeks of gestation and to verify if this gap could lead to the erroneous diagnosis of absent nasal bone.Three-dimensional (3D) ultrasound was used to assess the fetal nose in 450 singleton pregnancies, immediately after two-dimensional (2D) evaluation of the nasal bones and screening for chromosomal defects by a combination of maternal age and the measurement of fetal nuchal translucency at 11 to 13 + 6 (median, 12) weeks of gestation. A 3D volume of the fetal face was acquired and then analyzed using the multiplanar mode. A sequence of transverse views was used to confirm the presence or absence of the nasal bones and when they were present any visible gap between them was measured. A perfectly mid-sagittal plane was then examined to determine if the nasal bone was visible or not.In 421/450 (93.6%) cases the nasal bone was present during 2D ultrasound. Using the multiplanar mode of 3D ultrasound, in 83/421 (19.7%) fetuses a gap between the nasal bones could be demonstrated and in 36/83 (43.4%) cases the nasal bone was found to be absent in the perfect mid-sagittal view. In 29/450 (6.4%) cases the nasal bones were absent during the 2D scan. In the 3D assessment there was absence of both bones in 25/29 (86.2%) cases and absence of one of the two bones in 4/29 (13.8%) cases. Chorionic villus sampling demonstrated that the fetal karyotype was normal in 404 and abnormal in 46 cases, including 31 cases of trisomy 21. There was absence of one or both nasal bones in three (0.7%) of the chromosomally normal fetuses, in 19 (61.3%) with trisomy 21 and in seven (46.7%) with other chromosomal defects.At 11 to 13 + 6 weeks of gestation there is a gap between the nasal bones in about 20% of fetuses, and in about 40% of these cases in the perfect mid-sagittal plane the nasal bone may erroneously be considered to be absent.First trimester maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome: an evaluation of the DPC Immulite 2000 free beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A assays.Recent NICE Guidelines have emphasized the need to have in place by 2007 the capability of offering screening to all women in the first trimester using a combination of maternal age with the ultrasound marker nuchal translucency thickness (NT) and the maternal serum biochemical markers free beta-hCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A). Laboratories will therefore need to consider how to introduce the biochemical component of screening. With the recent launch of these assays on the DPC Immulite 2000 platform, it is appropriate and timely to investigate their clinical and analytical performance on a high throughput immunoassay analyser.Within-run and between-day precision was assessed in the normal way. Bias was assessed by comparing samples from normal pregnancies (n=813) and pregnancies with Down's syndrome (n=60) run on both the DPC system and our routine Kryptor system. Gestational day-specific medians for each marker were calculated from the unaffected population. Mathematical modelling was used to predict the clinical performance of the two markers.The within-run coefficient of variation (CV) was around 3.5% and between-day CV was around 6-8% for both assays. Comparison with EQA samples showed a 2% positive bias against the ALTM for free beta-hCG and a 21% positive bias for PAPP-A, which reduced to 11% when compared with the Kryptor method mean. When compared with the Kryptor, the DPC free beta-hCG showed a significant concentration-related negative bias above concentrations of 50 IU/L in both unaffected and affected pregnancy samples. After conversion to MoM in the Down's syndrome group, the DPC free beta-hCG assay showed a MoM-related bias at higher MoM values. For PAPP-A a positive MoM-related bias was also evident. In cases with Down's syndrome, the median free beta-hCG MoM was 1.703 for DPC and 1.698 by the Kryptor, which was not significantly different. For PAPP-A, the median MoM was 0.62 for DPC and 0.47 by the Kryptor, which was significantly (P=0.025) different. This difference, if real, is likely to result in a lower detection of cases with Down's syndrome. Statistical modelling techniques suggest that this would be 58% compared with the expected 67% when combined with maternal age and free beta-hCG. When combined with NT, however, this would be reduced to 85% compared with the 90% expected.While laboratories may find some organizational benefit from running first trimester Down's syndrome screening on such routine high-throughput immunoassay analysers, better clinical performance is likely to be achieved with alternative platforms to the DPC Immulite 2000.Second-trimester maternal serum screening for Down syndrome in in vitro fertilization pregnancies.To examine whether second-trimester maternal serum triple marker screening results differ between in vitro fertilization (IVF) pregnancies and naturally conceived pregnancies.Second-trimester maternal serum triple marker screening results from 88 IVF pregnancies were compared with 596 naturally conceived pregnancies (controls). Controls were matched to each IVF pregnancy by maternal age, gestational age and date of blood collection. All pregnancies in the study were known to have normal outcome. Multiple of the median (MoM) levels of human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), unconjugated estriol (uE3) and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), and the false-positive rate for Down syndrome were compared between the two groups.No statistically significant differences in analyte levels or in Down syndrome false-positive rate were observed between the IVF and naturally conceived pregnancies.IVF patients can be counselled about maternal serum triple marker screening in the same manner as patients with naturally conceived pregnancies. There is no evidence to support the general use of analyte correction factors in the interpretation of second-trimester maternal serum screen results in IVF pregnancies.Nuchal translucency in pregnancies conceived after assisted reproduction technology.Levels of maternal serum markers of fetal Down syndrome in pregnancies conceived after assisted reproduction are different from those of normal spontaneous pregnancies. The present study examined the effects of conventional in-vitro fertilization (IVF), intracytoplasmic sperm injection (ICSI) and embryo cryopreservation on nuchal translucency (NT) thickness.A retrospective analysis on 16 673 spontaneous pregnancies, 119 pregnancies with fresh embryos from IVF, 62 pregnancies with frozen-thawed embryos from IVF, 81 pregnancies with fresh embryos from ICSI and 39 frozen-thawed embryos from ICSI was performed. All were singletons with known normal outcomes. Multiples of the median (MoM) of NT were compared.The median NT MoM of spontaneous pregnancies was 1.01. In the assisted reproduction pregnancies, the median NT MoM were significantly increased to 1.07 (P = 0.003), 1.09 (P = 0.009) and 1.09 (P = 0.001) in pregnancies conceived with fresh embryos from IVF, frozen-thawed embryos from IVF and fresh embryos from ICSI, respectively. A non-significant increase in median NT MoM (1.04; P = 0.489) was also observed in pregnancies with frozen-thawed embryos from ICSI.Increased NT in assisted reproduction pregnancies is postulated to be due to some delay in fetal development. Another possible reason might be related to adverse antenatal course in these pregnancies.Maternal serum alpha fetoprotein among pregnant females in Alexandria.Maternal serum alpha fetoprotein (MSAFP) was introduced as a screening test for congenital malformations especially neural tube defects (NTDs) two decades ago. However, many factors were known to affect its level. From these are racial differences and maternal weight. The aim of the present work is to illustrate the normal distribution of MSAFP among working pregnant women in Alexandria in gestational age 16-18 weeks, to identify some of its determinants, and to determine the specificity and sensitivity of MSAFP for the detection of congenital anomalies and adverse pregnancy outcome.A sample of 608 pregnant working women who were 16-18 week gestation was recruited for the study from the antenatal clinic affiliated to Gamal Abdel Nasser Health Insurance Hospital in Alexandria. The enrolled women were interviewed using a structured questionnaire and a blood sample was collected from each of them to measure the level of MSAFP. At the expected time of delivery, Gamal Abd el Nasser Health Insurance Hospital was visited to collect data about the outcome of pregnancy of the enrolled women.The median of MSAFP level for deliveries with no congenital anomalies were 25.5, 33.5, and 53.2 IU/ml, at gestational weeks 16, 17 and 18 respectively. The significant variables related positively to MSAFP level included abortion or stillbirth, congenital anomalies in the index pregnancy, gestational age, bleeding during pregnancy, gestational diabetes, twin pregnancy, consanguinity between maternal parents, history of congenital or genetic diseases in maternal family, and caesarian section deliveries. Fatigue score was negatively correlated to MSAFP level. Using MSAFP multiples of median (MOM), 42.9 % of abortions and stillbirths, 57.1 % of twin pregnancies, 31.25 % of preterm deliveries and 27.3 % of low birth weight had levels of 3 MOM or more. One fourth of the congenital anomalies were below 0.5 MOM and 41.7 % were at or above 3 MOM. The sensitivity of MSAFP test for the detection of NTDs (cutoff point 2.5+ MOM) or Down syndrome (cutoff point <0.5 MOM) among the study sample was 100% (CI: 19.8-100%). Specificity for NTDs was 92.7% (CI: 90.3-94.6%), while the specificity for Down syndrome was 89.1% (86.3-91.4%). The sensitivity for adverse pregnancy outcome (cutoff point <0.5 or 2.5+ MOM) was 41.6, and the specificity was 85.8%. In conclusion, the cutoff points of MSAFP of the study sample are different from those for other populations. Different factors affect the level of MSAFP including adverse pregnancy outcomes. It is recommended to introduce antenatal screening for congenital anomalies as a routine screening test during pregnancy using levels adapted from the local population for cutoff point determination.Placental growth hormone in Down's syndrome screening.A number of serum markers have been proposed to improve the sensitivity (and specificity) of the triple test, which, until now, has been the gold standard in second-trimester serum screening for Down's syndrome. Among them, human placental growth hormone (hPGH) has been proposed because of its significantly elevated serum levels in pregnancies affected by chromosomal aneuploidies. Our experience, on maternal serum stored from 32 Down's syndrome-affected pregnancies, confirms a slight but significant increase in hPGH levels compared with controls. These data summarized to that of the previous screening could give a calculated detection rate of 71.9%, better than that of the standard triple test alone (65.6%).The association between fetal nasal bone hypoplasia and aneuploidy.To determine the association between fetal nasal bone hypoplasia and aneuploidy in women undergoing prenatal diagnosis.A prospective cohort study involving women undergoing chorionic villus sampling and amniocentesis for an increased risk of aneuploidy. Fetal biometric and nasal bone measurements were obtained at the time of prenatal diagnosis and compared with karyotypes. Nasal bone hypoplasia was defined as nasal bone less than 2.5th percentile for the gestational age.A total of 632 fetuses were evaluated. Twenty-nine (4.6%) had an aneuploidy (18 trisomy 21, 5 trisomy 18, 1 Turner's syndrome, one Marker chromosome 1, 2 sex chromosome anomalies, and 2 triploidy). Nasal bone measurements were documented in 29 aneuploid fetuses. The nasal bone was either absent or hypoplastic in 12 of 29 (41%) fetuses with aneuploidy and in 8 of 18 (44%) with trisomy 21. By using receiver operating characteristics curves, the optimal threshold of nasal bone hypoplasia associated with fetal aneuploidy was a biparietal diameter/nasal bone ratio of 11 or greater. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for the detection of fetal aneuploidy were 50%, 93%, 24%, and 98%, respectively.Absent or hypoplastic nasal bone is a marker for fetal aneuploidy in a high-risk population. However, this marker needs to be evaluated by larger prospective studies in low-risk populations before adoption for clinical use.Phenotypic characteristics of absent and hypoplastic nasal bones in fetuses with Down syndrome: description by 3-dimensional ultrasonography and clinical significance.To determine the frequency and clinical significance of bilateral and unilateral hypoplastic nasal bones for the detection of Down syndrome by 3-dimensional ultrasonography.Thirty-seven volumes of the fetal skull from fetuses with Down syndrome and 37 from fetuses without abnormalities were analyzed by 1 investigator blinded to fetal karyotype. The maximum intensity projection algorithm was used to reconstruct nasal bones. Ossification patterns were identified in anteroposterior and profile views. Sensitivity, false-positive rates (FPRs), and likelihood ratios (LRs) for detection of Down syndrome were calculated.After exclusions (coronal acquisition [n = 11], hand in front of the face [n = 4], poor imaging [n = 2], incomplete follow-up [n = 2], and anomalies detected after delivery [n = 2]), 53 volumes were analyzed (26 fetuses with Down syndrome and 27 without abnormalities; median gestational age, 21 6/7 weeks [interquartile range, 19 6/7-25 2/7 weeks]). Rendered profile views revealed absent nasal bones in 18.9% (10 of 53) of the fetuses, and, among these, 90% (9 of 10) had Down syndrome (sensitivity, 34.6% [9 of 26]; FPR, 3.7% [1 of 27]; LR, 9.3 [95% confidence interval (CI), 1.3-68.7]). Three ossification patterns were identified in anteroposterior views: (1) normally developed, (2) delayed ossification, and (3) absent nasal bones. Sensitivity, FPR, and LR of absent nasal bones for detecting Down syndrome were 34.6% (9 of 26), 3.7% (1 of 27), and 9.0 (95% CI, 1.3-68.7), respectively. Sensitivity, FPR, and LR of delayed ossification for detecting Down syndrome were 42.3% (11 of 26), 22% (6 of 27), and 1.83 (95% CI, 0.8-4.4).Absence of nasal bones is associated with the highest risk of Down syndrome. Delayed ossification is associated with a lower risk of Down syndrome than absent nasal bones. These ossification patterns may be indistinguishable on 2-dimensional ultrasonography.Second-trimester prenatal screening markers for Down syndrome in women with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.Published studies have shown that some serum markers used in screening for Down syndrome tend to be lower among women with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM). On this basis, many screening programmes adjust the marker levels to take account of this difference. Recent studies suggested that the marker levels were not different, and so adjustment may no longer be needed, possibly because of better diabetic control. Data from a prenatal screening programme for Down syndrome were examined to see whether the median values of second-trimester screening markers were still reduced in pregnant women with IDDM. A total of 366 women with IDDM singleton pregnancies without Down syndrome were identified from the screening programme at Barts from 1989 to 2002. After allowing for maternal weight, the median multiples of the median (MoM) for IDDM-unaffected singleton pregnancies were as follows: 0.88 (95% confidence interval 0.84-0.93) for alphafetoprotein (AFP), 0.95 (0.91-0.99) for unconjugated oestriol (uE3), 0.90 (0.80-1.01) for total human chorionic gonadotrophin (total hCG), 0.98 (0.88-1.08) for free beta-hCG, and 0.99 (0.89-1.10) for inhibin-A. The median levels for AFP and uE3 were statistically significantly lower in pregnant women with IDDM. The other markers were not significantly different in women with and without IDDM. There remains a case for adjusting AFP and uE3 levels in women with IDDM in prenatal screening programmes for Down syndrome.Evaluation of second trimester maternal serum screening for Down's Syndrome using the Spiegelhalter-Knill-Jones (S-KJ) approach.Risk estimation for Down's syndrome in antenatal serum screening with maternal age and multiple serum biomarkers is usually complicated and computationally intensive. We have developed a simple scoring system using the Spiegelhalter-Knill-Jones approach, which was based on Bayesian theorem and the logistic regression model.A prospective data set with 3842 singleton pregnancies including 6 affected pregnancies served as "trained data". Maternal age, maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotrophin levels of each pregnant woman were adopted as the predictors to establish the scoring model using the S-KJ approach. Model validation was undertaken using a receiver operating characteristics (ROC) curve with another 3050 singleton pregnancies including 4 affected pregnancies ("validated data").For the trained data the sensitivity and specificity of the scoring system at cut-off value of 1:250 was 66.7% and 92.6%, respectively. For the validated data the sensitivity and specificity at the same cut-off point was 75% and 92.2%, respectively. The area under the ROC curve of the trained and validated data was 76.96% (95% CI: 51.80-100%), and 94.07% (95% CI: 84.47-100%), respectively.The S-KJ scoring system has been demonstrated to be a simple, and efficient method for the risk estimation of Down's syndrome. This system can be applied to other antenatal serum screening systems.Sequential pathways of testing after first-trimester screening for trisomy 21.To evaluate the performance and use of second-trimester multiple-marker maternal serum screening for trisomy 21 by women who had previously undergone first-trimester combined screening (nuchal translucency, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A, and free beta-hCG), with disclosure of risk estimates.In a multicenter, first-trimester screening study sponsored by the National Institute of Child Health and Human Development, multiple-marker maternal serum screening with alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, and total hCG was performed in 4,145 (7 with trisomy 21) of 7,392 (9 with trisomy 21) women who were first-trimester screen-negative and 180 (7 with trisomy 21) of 813 (52 with trisomy 21) who were first-trimester screen-positive. Second-trimester risks were calculated using multiples of the median and a standardized risk algorithm with a cutoff risk of 1:270.Among the first-trimester screen-negative cohort, 6 of 7 (86%) trisomy 21 cases were detected by second-trimester multiple-marker maternal serum screening with a false-positive rate of 8.9%. Among the first-trimester screen-positive cohort, all 7 trisomy 21 cases were also detected in the second trimester, albeit with a 38.7% false-positive rate.Our data demonstrate that a sequential screening program that provides patients with first-trimester results and offers the option for early invasive testing or additional serum screening in the second trimester can detect 98% of trisomy 21-affected pregnancies. However, such an approach will result in 17% of patients being considered at risk and, hence, potentially having an invasive test.II-2Fetal nasal bone length in euploid and aneuploid fetuses between 11 and 20 weeks' gestation: a prospective study.To develop normative data for nasal bone length between 11 and 20 weeks' gestation and to assess the utility of nasal bone hypoplasia in the detection of fetal aneuploidy in the second trimester.Well-dated, nonanomalous fetuses were examined between 11 and 20.9 weeks' gestation. The nasal bone was assessed and measured, and normative data from 11 to 20 weeks' gestation were determined. The nasal bone lengths in fetuses with confirmed aneuploidy were compared with the normative data.The fetal nasal bone length increased linearly with advancing gestational age. Nomograms including the 10th, 50th, and 90th percentiles were created. Nasal bone hypoplasia was seen in 6 of 6 cases of fetal trisomy in the second trimester.Nasal bone hypoplasia in the early second trimester identifies a cohort of fetuses at high risk for aneuploidy.Doppler assessment of cardiac function at 11-14 weeks' gestation in fetuses with normal and increased nuchal translucency.To investigate cardiac dysfunction as a potential underlying mechanism for increased nuchal translucency (NT) in fetuses with chromosomal abnormality or heart defects.Myocardial performance index (MPI) and atrioventricular valve E/A ratios for both sides of the heart were measured by Doppler echocardiography in fetuses at 11-14 weeks' gestation. The study groups consisted of 159 normal control fetuses, 199 otherwise normal fetuses but with increased NT > or = 4 mm, 142 fetuses with trisomy 21, 58 with trisomy 18, 19 with trisomy 13, 37 with Turner's syndrome and 24 with isolated heart defects. Groups were compared using Student's t-test and confidence intervals for differences between groups were calculated.Otherwise normal fetuses with increased NT showed no difference in any of the cardiac Doppler parameters from normal controls. Mean E/A ratio was slightly but significantly increased in trisomy 21 fetuses compared with normal controls (0.604 vs. 0.578 on the right, P = 0.011; 0.581 vs. 0.542 on the left, P = 0.0001). E/A ratio was not significantly different between any of the other groups and the normals but there was a small increase in absolute E-wave velocity in trisomy 18 fetuses. MPI was significantly decreased in trisomy 21 fetuses, (0.330 vs. 0.378, P = 0.002 on the left) and also in Turner's syndrome fetuses (0.301 vs. 0.352 on the right, P = 0.04; 0.320 vs. 0.378 on the left, P = 0.034) implying better performance, but not in the other groups.The magnitude and/or direction of the differences shown do not support a major role for cardiac functional abnormality in the development of NT. Important cardiac dysfunction could not be demonstrated in association with increased NT in normal or abnormal fetuses.Single-step maternal serum screening for trisomy 21 in the era of combined or integrated screening.Single-step maternal serum screening (MSS) in the first (1MSS) or second (2MSS) trimester at maternal age > or =35 years was evaluated in the North Belgian region Flanders, where difficulties are encountered in the general introduction of combined or integrated screening algorithms. The fetal aneuploidy screening database of General Medical Laboratory AML in Antwerp was searched for 2MSS tests between 1992 and 1999 (alpha-fetoprotein, beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-HCG) and unconjugated estriol, cut-off 1:300) and for 1MSS tests between 1999 and 2003 (free beta-HCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A, cut-off 1:85). At > or =35 years, the detection rate for trisomy 21 (DR) was 93.8% (15/16) for 2MSS and the screen-positive rate (SPR) was 24.5% (504/2061). For 1MSS, these figures were 85.7% (6/7) and 17.7% (109/615) respectively. To detect one trisomy 21, missed by MSS at > or =35 years of age, an additional number of 1,557 and 506 primary invasive procedures would be needed for 2MMS and 1MSS respectively. We conclude that the performance of both single-step 1MSS and 2MSS at maternal age > or =35 years in Flanders is excellent, even without the combination with ultrasound parameters or integration of first and second trimester parameters. The simplicity of both methods allows to consider them valuable options for fetal aneuploidy screening at advanced maternal age, until high quality combined or integrated screening is accessible to all pregnant women in Belgium.Nuchal translucency and other first-trimester sonographic markers of chromosomal abnormalities.There is extensive evidence that effective screening for major chromosomal abnormalities can be provided in the first trimester of pregnancy. Prospective studies in a total of 200,868 pregnancies, including 871 fetuses with trisomy 21, have demonstrated that increased nuchal translucency can identify 76.8% of fetuses with trisomy 21, which represents a false-positive rate of 4.2%. When fetal nuchal translucency was combined with maternal serum free-beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A in prospective studies in a total of 44,613 pregnancies, including 215 fetuses with trisomy 21, the detection rate was 87.0% for a false-positive rate of 5.0%. Studies from specialist centers with 15,822 pregnancies, which included 397 fetuses with trisomy 21, have demonstrated that the absence of the nasal bone can identify 69.0% of trisomy 21 fetuses, which represents a false-positive rate of 1.4%. It has been estimated that first-trimester screening by a combination of sonography and maternal serum testing can identify 97% of trisomy 21 fetuses, which represents a false-positive rate of 5%, or that the detection rate can be 91%, which represents a false-positive rate of 0.5%. In addition to increased nuchal translucency, important sonographic markers for chromosomal abnormalities, include fetal growth restriction, tachycardia, abnormal flow in the ductus venosus, megacystis, exomphalos and single umbilical artery. Most pregnant women prefer screening in the first, rather than in the second, trimester. As with all aspects of good clinical practice, those care givers who perform first-trimester screening should be trained appropriately, and their results should be subjected to external quality assurance.Screening for trisomy 21 in Flanders: a 10 years review of 40.490 pregnancies screened by maternal serum.To evaluate maternal serum screening for trisomy 21 (MSS) in Flanders between 1992 and 2002.Data of a large database on the results of MSS, nuchal translucency (NT) and pregnancy outcome were analysed retrospectively.Despite an excellent performance of second trimester MSS at a maternal age > or = 35 years (94.4% detection rate (DR) of trisomy 21 at a false positive rate (FPR) of 22.4%), the proportion of patients above 35 years of age in the study population was significantly lower than in the Flemish general pregnant population (5.5% versus 8.9%, P < 0.001). In the population screened by MSS and NT, the DR of second trimester MSS at a 5% FPR was 44.4%, which was lower than 66.6% in the population screened by MSS without NT. When nine trisomy 21-affected pregnancies were compared to 3265 normal pregnancies, the mean NT-MoM values were not significantly different (1.16 +/- 0.89 versus 1.00 +/- 0.46, P > 0.05). Both the findings comply to a sequential screening practice where second trimester MSS is only performed after a normal measurement of NT in the first trimester.In Flanders, the uptake of second trimester maternal serum screening is low in women aged 35 years or more. Its screening performance decreased after the introduction of sequential screening.Maternal serum levels of placental proteins after in vitro fertilisation and their implications for prenatal screening.To determine whether the serum levels of pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A), pregnancy-specific beta(1)-glycoprotein (SP1), placental lactogen (hPL) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) are different in pregnancies obtained after in vitro fertilisation (IVF) and embryo transfer (ET) in comparison to spontaneous pregnancies. Assessment of the need to establish normal medians for biochemical trisomy screening in IVF pregnancies.The population comprised 96 IVF-ET pregnancies, of which 79 came from fresh gonadotrophin-stimulated cycles and 17 from embryo transfers without gonadotrophin stimulation (natural cycle IVF, frozen embryo transfers), and 156 spontaneous pregnancies. A single blood sample was obtained between 7 + 0 and 16 + 3 weeks. PAPP-A, SP1, hPL and hCG were quantified and the levels compared between gonadotrophin-stimulated IVF, steroid-only- or non-stimulated IVF, and controls with respect to gestational age using non-parametric statistical analysis.PAPP-A and hPL levels were reduced after stimulated IVF in early gestation (before 10 pregnancy weeks); SP1 followed the same trend without reaching statistical significance. hCG tended to be increased after IVF treatment including non-gonadotrophin-stimulation cycles, and also beyond 10 pregnancy weeks.Reduced PAPP-A with increased hCG yields an increased risk in screening for foetal trisomy 21. We confirm recently published observations but do not recommend the establishment of normal medians for IVF pregnancies since the extent of the deviations is varying according to the different stimulation protocols and dosages of gonadotrophins used.Maternal serum screening for trisomy 21 in women with a false positive result in last pregnancy.Maternal serum screening for Down syndrome is a common practice in the United Kingdom. A number of factors have been shown to influence the chance of a false positive test result. Analysis of routinely collated information stored on an electronic database in a district general hospital has shown that women with a previous false positive maternal screen are at much greater chance of having a false positive result in their next pregnancy. Overall, there was a fivefold increased risk attributed to biological variation in their serum concentrations of alpha-feto protein (AFP) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG). The potential effect of this was to increase the chance of such women having an unnecessary amniocentesis. Women should be advised of this effect in subsequent pregnancies. Ideally a correction factor should be applied which would reduce the false positive rate without affecting adversely the sensitivity of the test.SURUSS in perspective.Until the publication of the Serum Urine and Ultrasound Screening Study (SURUSS) report, it was difficult to compare the different antenatal screening tests for Down's Syndrome because of variations in study designs. We here present the main results from SURUSS, updated to take account of recent information on nuchal translucency in Down's Syndrome pregnancies, and discuss their implications.SURUSS was a prospective study of 47,053 singleton pregnancies (including 101 pregnancies with Down's Syndrome) conducted in 25 maternity units. Nuchal translucency measurements were taken. Serum and urine samples collected between 9 and 13 weeks, and again between 14 and 20 weeks of pregnancy were stored. Samples from each affected pregnancy and five matched controls were tested for currently used or suggested biochemical Down's Syndrome screening markers. Pregnancies were followed up to determine the presence or absence of Down's Syndrome. For an 85% Down's Syndrome detection rate, the false-positive rate for the Integrated test (nuchal translucency and pregnancy associated plasma protein-A [PAPP-A] at 11 completed weeks of pregnancy, and alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol [uE(3)], free beta or total human chorionic gondaotrophin (hCG) and inhibin-A in the early second trimester) was 0.9%, the Serum integrated test (without nuchal translucency) 2.7%, the Combined test (nuchal translucency with free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 11 weeks) 4.3%, the Quadruple test (alpha-fetoprotein, uE(3), free beta or total hCG and inhibin-A) 6.2%, and nuchal translucency at 11 weeks, 15.2%. All tests included maternal age. Using the Integrated test at an 85% detection rate, there would be six diagnostic procedure-related unaffected fetal losses following amniocentesis per 100,000 women screened compared with 35 using the Combined test or 45 with the Quadruple test.The Integrated test offers the most effective and safe method of screening for women who attend in the first trimester. The next best test is the Serum integrated test. The Quadruple test is the best test for women who first attend in the second trimester. There is no justification for retaining the Double (alpha-fetoprotein and hCG) or Triple (alpha-fetoprotein, uE(3), and hCG) tests, or nuchal translucency alone (with or without maternal age) in antenatal screening for Down's Syndrome.Prospective evaluation of a first trimester screening program for Down syndrome and other chromosomal abnormalities using maternal age, nuchal translucency and biochemistry in an Australian population.A combination of maternal age and ultrasound assessment of the nuchal translucency (NT) has been used in the first trimester to screen for chromosomal abnormality. In the United Kingdom, the addition of NT screening was shown to be beneficial.To report the sensitivity of combined first trimester biochemistry and ultrasound screening for Down syndrome in an Australian private practice specialising in obstetric ultrasound.A prospective study in a private obstetric ultrasound practice. Over 22 months, 2121 patients were screened and data was analysed for sensitivity (detection) and false positive rates for all chromosome abnormalities.There were 17 chromosomal abnormalities, five of which were Down syndrome. Using maternal age alone or age and biochemistry, four of the Down syndrome cases were detected for a 29 and 19% false positive rate, respectively. Using age and NT or age, NT and biochemistry, all the Down syndrome cases were detected, for a false positive rate of 5.7 and 7.2%, respectively. The difference in detection rates for Down syndrome or other chromosomal abnormalities, using the four screening methods, did not reach statistical significance. However, the false positive rates in screening methods without ultrasound to assess the NT was significantly higher (P < 0.01).A combination of maternal age, NT and maternal serum biochemistry gives a high detection rate for both trisomy 21 and other chromosomal abnormalities. Down syndrome screening using either maternal age alone or age in combination with first trimester biochemistry conferred screen positive rates significantly higher than when combined with NT.A comparison of the impact of screen-positive results obtained from ultrasound and biochemical screening for Down syndrome in the first trimester: a pilot study.To compare the experiences of women who received a screen-positive test result for Down syndrome after nuchal translucency screening or after biochemical screening in the first trimester of pregnancy in the Netherlands.Semi-quantitative questionnaires were sent to 40 women with a screen-positive test result for Down syndrome in the first trimester of pregnancy: 20 had undergone nuchal translucency screening (NT group) and 20 had undergone serum screening (PAPP-A and free beta-hCG) (SS group). In all the cases, chorionic villus sampling (CVS) had not revealed any chromosomal abnormalities.The major reason for undergoing the screening test in both groups of women was to be more reassured about the health of the baby. In the NT group, 5 out of the 20 women stated that they had suddenly been confronted with the NT measurement during the ultrasound examination without even being asked, or had been caught by surprise about the possibility. Together with two other women, they felt that at that stage they had been insufficiently informed about what the test meant. In the SS group, two women also held this opinion. In 10 out of the 20 women in the SS group, the positive-screening result had caused (a great deal of) anxiety. In the NT group, this proportion was as high as 18 out of the 20. Six of the women in the NT group mentioned that 'seeing the baby' had been an important factor in their decision to undergo CVS. Even after a favourable result of CVS, a proportion of the pregnant women were still feeling anxious about the health of their baby (5 women in the SS group and 12 in the NT group). Nevertheless, a large proportion of the women in both groups was pleased that they had undergone the screening test. Only a few of them stated that they would not choose the same screening test again in a future pregnancy.An unfavourable screening result after NT screening appeared to have a greater impact than an unfavourable result after serum screening. This might partly be explained by the ultrasound examination visualising the increased risk during NT screening. An additional important role may have been played by the fact that an abnormal NT screening result implies an increased risk of other disorders besides Down syndrome, which the women should be informed about beforehand. Several factors place special demands on the counselling prior to NT screening.Evaluation of human chorionic gonadotropin beta-subunit mRNA concentrations in maternal serum in aneuploid pregnancies: a feasibility study.Nasal bone measurement during the 1st trimester: is it useful?The aim of this study was to present our preliminary data about nasal bone measurements at 11-14 weeks of pregnancy. This study was conducted in our prenatal unit between 2000 and 2003. A total of 642 pregnant women (single pregnancies) were enrolled into the study. During the first trimester of pregnancy, crown-rump length, nuchal translucency thickness, and fetal nasal bone length measurements and ductus venosus Doppler images were evaluated. The distribution of absent or small nasal bones in both normal fetuses and in those having some pathological conditions was compared by statistical analysis. p < 0.05 was considered significant. Nasal bone evaluation was successful in 600 of 642 (93.4%) ultrasound examinations. The linear regression line showed a significant positive slope with increasing crown-rump length (r=0.54, p < 0.001). Absent or small nasal bones were more common in abnormal than in normal fetuses (p=0.007). It is clear that the fetal nasal bone is becoming a powerful tool in prenatal screening for aneuploidy. Larger studies to be performed in a low-risk population are needed to assess whether the measurement of the nasal bone length provides additional benefits beyond the assessment of the presence or absence of the nasal bone.Sialic acid-deficient invasive trophoblast antigen (sd-ITA): a new urinary variant for gestational Down syndrome screening.Invasive trophoblast antigen (ITA), also known as hyperglycosylated hCG, is a glycosylation variant of hCG produced by invasive cytotrophoblast cells. Publications show that ITA is potentially a sensitive test for Down syndrome screening, reportedly detecting 38 and 80% of cases at a 5% false-positive rate in the first and second trimesters of pregnancy respectively. ITA has six oligosaccharides varying greatly in terminal sialic acid content (0-19 residues), leading to wide-charge heterogeneity. With the objective of developing an improved Down syndrome screening test, we examined the charge, or sialic acid variants, of ITA.Twenty urine samples were collected from the 16th to 18th week of gestation from 10 patients with trisomy 21 fetuses, demonstrated by karyotype analysis, and from 10 patients with normal karyotype pregnancies. Proteins in each sample were separated by preparative isoelectric focusing. Fractions were collected, pooled into the pl ranges of 3.0 to 4.0, 4.1 to 5.0, 5.1 to 6.0 and 6.1 to 7.0 and assayed for ITA.A difference in the distribution of ITA charge variants was demonstrated between cases and controls, most apparent in the less acidic (pl 5.1-7.0) range. The controls and Down syndrome samples contained 26.7 +/- 14% versus 45.6 +/- 20%, respectively, of the less acidic form of ITA (P = 0.02).The ITA in Down syndrome cases is composed of a much higher proportion of less acidic ITA. This could be the major source of elevated levels of ITA in Down syndrome pregnancies. It is postulated that the development of a new assay specifically measuring ITA that is deficient in sialic acid might enhance the utility of the already highly sensitive screening tests for Down syndrome.The impact of correcting for smoking status when screening for chromosomal anomalies using maternal serum biochemistry and fetal nuchal translucency thickness in the first trimester of pregnancy.To evaluate the influence of cigarette smoking status on maternal serum free beta-hCG, PAPP-A and fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness at 11 to 14 weeks of gestation in a large cohort of women screened prospectively for chromosomal anomalies.Information on maternal cigarette smoking status, maternal age, maternal serum biochemical marker levels and fetal NT were collected from the prenatal screening computer records in two OSCAR screening centres. Data was available from 32,730 unaffected pregnancies and from 124 with Down syndrome. Statistical analysis of the marker levels in the smoking and non-smoking group were carried out. The impact on false-positive rate of correcting for smoking status was assessed from a modelling exercise.Prevalence of smoking was significantly affected by maternal age with an overall incidence of 11.5%, which varied from 35% in women under 20 to 7% in women over 35. In the unaffected population, the median free beta-hCG MoM was significantly lower in the smoking group (0.97 vs 1.00) as was that for PAPP-A (0.84 vs 1.02). The standard deviation of the log(10) MoM free beta-hCG was lower in the smoking group and that for PAPP-A was higher in the smoking group. The difference in median marker levels did not seem to be related to the number of cigarettes smoked per day. In the group with Down syndrome, the median MoM free beta-hCG was not significantly different in the smokers (1.69 vs 1.86) as was that for PAPP-A (0.53 vs 0.57). Fetal delta NT was not significantly different in the unaffected smokers (0.11 vs 0.0 mm) or in those with Down syndrome (1.96 vs 2.25 mm). In the smoking group, when screening using maternal serum biochemistry and age alone, the false-positive rate was 6.17%, compared to 4.67% in an age-matched group of non-smokers. Correcting for smoking status by dividing the measured MoM by the median found in the smoking group resulted in the false-positive rate falling to 4.40%. When screening using NT, maternal serum biochemistry and age, the false-positive rate in smokers was 4.48%, which reduced to 3.46% after correction-in line with the 3.76% in the non-smoking group. The impact on detection rate was too small to be accurately measured.The impact of smoking on first-trimester biochemical marker levels does not seem to be dose related. Whilst correcting first-trimester biochemical markers for maternal smoking status has little impact at the population level for detection rates, a considerable reduction in false-positive rate can be achieved, reducing the level to that seen in non-smokers. However, the effect on the individual patient-specific risk can be substantial and could certainly make a difference to the patient's decision on whether to have an invasive test.Evaluation of a dimeric inhibin-A assay for assessing fetal Down syndrome: establishment, comparison, and monitoring of median concentrations for normal pregnancies.Several studies report the role of dimeric inhibin-A in assessing risk for fetal Down syndrome. The majority, however, use the Serotec inhibin-A assay and not the newer Diagnostic Systems Laboratories inhibin-A enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA).To establish normal gestational age day-specific medians, to compare our results against previous studies pertaining to the inhibin-A ELISA, and to evaluate long-term assay performance.Using the inhibin-A ELISA, 100 specimens were assayed for each completed week of gestation for weeks 15 to 20, 50 specimens for 14 weeks, and 54 specimens for 21 weeks or older. Regressed inhibin-A medians were calculated employing a second-degree polynomial fit of the arithmetic medians. Thereafter, inhibin-A ELISA lot comparisons were performed to evaluate consistency.Regressed values of 182, 174, 175, 184, 201, and 226 pg/mL resulted for weeks 15 to 20, respectively [pg/mL inhibin-A = 4.1528(gestational age)2 - 136.49(gestational age) + 1294.9]. A comparison with 2 other studies shows our values to be lower overall by 15 +/- 11.4% and 16 +/- 2.6%. However, variability between kit lots was as high as 30%.The equation derived provides for the calculation of gestational age day-specific inhibin-A medians for integration into maternal serum screening programs with a subsequent decrease in false-positives expected and observed. Our medians differ considerably from those of other studies, with limited data, using the Diagnostic Systems assay. However, lot changes since the initial analysis have exhibited similar inconsistencies. Therefore, we recommend that others incorporating the assay into their screening programs carefully establish, monitor, and adjust their medians accordingly as a result of potential variations.An outcomes analysis of five prenatal screening strategies for trisomy 21 in women younger than 35 years.This study was undertaken to examine the cost-effectiveness and procedural-related losses associated with 5 prenatal screening strategies for fetal aneuploidy in women under 35 years old.Five prenatal screening strategies were compared in a decision analysis model: triple screen: maternal age and midtrimester serum alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol; quad screen: triple screen plus serum dimeric inhibin A; first-trimester screen: maternal age, serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A and free beta-hCG and fetal nuchal translucency at 10 to 14 weeks' gestation; integrated screen: first-trimester screen plus quad screen, but first-trimester results are withheld until the quad screen is completed when a composite result is provided; sequential screen: first-trimester screen plus quad screen, but the first-trimester screen results are provided immediately and prenatal diagnosis offered if positive; later prenatal diagnosis is available if the quad screen is positive. Model estimates were literature derived, and cost estimates also included local sources. The 5 strategies were compared for cost, the numbers of Down syndrome fetuses detected and live births averted, and the number of procedure-related euploid losses. Sensitivity analyses were performed for parameters with imprecise point estimates.In the baseline analysis, sequential screening was the least expensive strategy ($455 million). It detected the most Down syndrome fetuses (n=1213), averted the most Down syndrome live births (n=678), but led to the highest number of procedure-related euploid losses (n=859). The integrated screen had the fewest euploid losses (n=62) and averted the second most Down syndrome live births (n=520). If fewer than 70% of women diagnosed with fetal Down syndrome elect to abort, the quad screen became the least expensive strategy.Although sequential screening was the most cost-effective prenatal screening strategy for fetal trisomy 21, it had the highest procedure-related euploid loss rate. The patient's perspective on detection versus fetal safety may help define the optimal screening strategy.Screening for Down's syndrome in early and late first and second trimester using six maternal serum markers.The efficiency of six maternal serum markers for Down's syndrome (DS), alpha fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), free beta-hCG, pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), the proform of eosinophil major basic protein (ProMBP), pregnancy-specific-beta-1-glycoprotein (SP(1)), and combinations thereof, was examined. Discriminant analysis in 156 DS pregnancies and 546 controls defined three effective combinations of serum marker logMoMs (multiples of the median in control samples) in three gestational age windows, i.e. Index I (weeks 7-9) = 0.52 logMoM ProMBP + 0.28 logMoM PAPP-A - logMoM SP(1); Index II (weeks 10-12) = 1.94 logMoM free beta-hCG - logMoM SP(1), and Index III (weeks 15-19) = 0.78 logMoM free beta-hCG + 1.12 logMoM ProMBP - logMoM AFP. The estimated detection rates of indices and age for a false-positive rate (FPR) of 5% were 73% for Index I, 69% for Index II, and 60% for Index III. Including the ultrasound marker nuchal translucency, using a DS at term risk of 1 : 400 as cut-off, the detection rates of the indices increased to 86, 83, and 82% for FPRs of 4.3, 4.1, and 5.8%, respectively. The indices are promising markers for screening for DS.Assessment of the fetal nasal bone at 11-14 weeks of gestation by three-dimensional ultrasound.To evaluate the benefit of three-dimensional (3D) ultrasound in the examination of the fetal nasal bone at 11-14 weeks of gestation.We examined the fetal nasal bone in 120 stored volumes acquired transabdominally with a 3D scanner from singleton pregnancies at 11-14 weeks of gestation. The volume acquisition had been performed following conventional ultrasound examination that had demonstrated presence of the fetal nasal bone. The volumes were obtained with two-dimensional (2D) start images in transverse, coronal mid-sagittal, parasagittal and oblique longitudinal sections of the fetal head.In the transverse and coronal sections, a satisfactory image demonstrating presence of the nasal bone was achieved in only three and one, respectively, of the 20 volumes that we obtained. In mid-sagittal sections, the nasal bone was always visible when the angle was within a range of 30-60 degrees, without the need for sectional image analysis. None of the images with an angle >60 degrees or <30 degrees was satisfactory. In the parasagittal sections with the fetal profile at 45 degrees, a good-quality image of the nasal bone was possible in all cases that were examined, irrespective of the distance from the mid-sagittal plane. In the oblique longitudinal sections with the fetal profile at 45 degrees, there were 10 volumes where the 2D start section was at 0-25 degrees from the midline and in all these cases the nasal bone was successfully visualized. In contrast, only 5/20 cases where the 2D start section was at 25-90 degrees from the midline provided a satisfactory image demonstrating the nasal bone. In 5/10 volumes obtained with the fetus facing downwards the nasal bone was visible in both the 2D and 3D images.In a 3D volume the extent to which the nasal bone can be demonstrated to be present in a given reconstructed section is entirely dependent on obtaining a good initial 2D view.Elevated maternal midtrimester serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin levels in vegetarian pregnancies that cause increased false-positive Down syndrome screening results.The aim of this study was to examine whether midtrimester maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and alpha-fetoprotein levels for Down syndrome screening differed in vegetarian pregnancies and omnivore pregnancies and to evaluate whether maternal serum vitamin B(12) concentration affected these maker levels.Ninety-eight vegetarian and 122 omnivore singleton pregnancies were studied. Reference levels of free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and alpha-fetoprotein were based on a population of 6312 singleton euploid pregnancies that had been surveyed previously. Serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and alpha-fetoprotein levels were measured by enzyme immunoassay or radioimmunoassay. Multiples of the median values were calculated to determine whether different diet habits affected serum biomarker levels. Maternal serum vitamin B(12) levels were determined with radioimmunoassay.The free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin multiples of the median values were elevated significantly in the vegetarian pregnancies group (1.28 multiples of the median) compared with that of the reference population (1.00 multiples of the median) (P<.001). A negative association between the serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin multiples of the median values and the concentration of maternal serum vitamin B(12) was observed in the vegetarian pregnancies. No correlation was found between the alpha-fetoprotein multiples of the median values and the maternal serum vitamin B(12) concentration.The current data showed that the midtrimester maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin levels increased in vegetarian pregnancies and led to an elevated false-positive rate in screening for Down syndrome compared with pregnant women with regular diet and resulted in unnecessary invasive procedures. It is necessary to establish vegetarian pregnancy alpha-fetoprotein and beta-human chorionic gonadotropin reference levels to correct increased false-positive screening results.Integrated first- and second-trimester Down syndrome screening test among unaffected IVF pregnancies.The aim of the current study was to assess the profile of markers that constitute the integrated test and to measure its false-positive rates (FPR) among a preselected group of unaffected IVF pregnancies. These results were compared with the reference laboratory values that reflect the general obstetric population, which underwent the same investigative protocol.Ninety-nine unaffected singletons from IVF-pregnant women and 1781 controls, all evaluated by the same laboratory, underwent a nondisclosure integrated Down syndrome screening test. This test comprised first-trimester nuchal translucency (NT) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) assessment, followed by a midgestation quadruple test. Only upon completion of the integrated screening test, the parturient women were informed of its results.The mean maternal age of the study and the control group was 32.2 +/- 4 and 30.4 +/- 4 years respectively (t-test <0.005). The marker levels were expressed as multiples of the gestation-specific normal medians. The IVF group had lower PAPP-A (0.78 vs 1.03, t-test P < 0.05) and higher NT (1.14 vs 1.01, t-test P < 0.05) values, respectively. All the other markers were similar for both groups. On the basis of the integrated test, a higher rate of IVF pregnancies were defined as being screen-positive (6.1% vs 3.7%), although the values did not reach a level of statistical significance.Since NT alone yielded the same FPR as the integrated test, the option of various sonographic screening combinations in this group warrants further investigation.Maternal ethnic origin and fetal nasal bones at 11-14 weeks of gestation.Failure to visualise the fetal nasal bones at 11-14 weeks of gestation is associated with a significant increase in the risk for trisomy 21. However, it is not known whether the ethnic origin of the mother has any effect on the fetal profile and the prevalence of this marker.Prospective study.London Teaching Hospital.Four thousand and four hundred and ninety-two consecutive fetuses undergoing routine first trimester ultrasound scanning at 11-14 weeks of gestation in a multiethnic population.Examination of the nasal bones was attempted in the fetuses.Rate of visualisation of the fetal nasal bones.Five hundred fetuses were excluded from the analysis because of chromosomal abnormalities or a technically unsatisfactory examination. In the remaining 3992 fetuses, the maternal ethnic origin was African in 13.0%, Asian in 15.3% and Caucasian in 66.0%. Compared with Caucasians, the failure to visualise the fetal nasal bones was significantly higher in women of African (P= 0.0001) but not Asian origin (P= 0.24). A multivariable logistic regression model showed that having a mother of African origin is still significantly associated with an increased likelihood of absent fetal nasal bones compared with Caucasians (odds ratio 2.33), even after correcting for maternal age, parity and crown-rump length.There is a significant difference in the rate of visualisation of the fetal nasal bones in the first trimester in mothers of different ethnic origin. This suggest that corrections for maternal ethnicity will be required to ensure equity of fetal nasal bone screening in multiracial populations. Whether corrections are required for the father's ethnic origin remains to be determined.First and second trimester antenatal screening for Down's syndrome: the results of the Serum, Urine and Ultrasound Screening Study (SURUSS).Nuchal translucence incorporated into a one-stage multifactorial screening model for Down syndrome prediction at second-trimester pregnancy.The aim of this study was to achieve one-stage screening for trisomy 21 using a combination of nuchal translucency (NuT) measurement and maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) biochemistry levels in the second trimester among a high-risk study population. From January 1998 to June 2001, 45 cases of trisomy 21 were prenatally found and confirmed in the hospital-based cytogenetic diagnosis laboratory. A total of 867 normal singleton pregnancies were enrolled as controls from the antenatal care clinics in the hospital. All study and control subjects between 13 weeks and 18 weeks of gestation with a mean age of 15.2 +/- 1.3 weeks underwent one-stage nuchal translucence measurements and maternal serum biochemical screening for Down syndrome. The final logistic model contained beta-hCG (multiples of the gestational median or MoM), maternal age (matA), nuchal translucence (NuT MoM) and AFP (MoM) as covariates. Also, the estimated coefficients of the regression were highly significant. This model provided the estimated probability of Down syndrome as follows: Pr (Down syndrome) = exp (Z)/ [1 + exp (Z)], where Z = -11.18 + 0.64 x (beta-hCG MoM) + 0.25 x matA + 1.32 x NuT MoM -2.23 x AFP MoM. The logistic regression with estimated coefficients was installed in a Palm digital assistant (PDA) equipped with Excel (Microsoft). The risk probability of Down syndrome could be readily calculated after inputting data for all four predictor variables.ADAM12: a novel first-trimester maternal serum marker for Down syndrome.The concentration of bioavailable insulin-like growth factor (IGF) I and II is important to foetal growth. It is regulated by insulin-like growth factor binding proteins (IGFBP) 1 through 6. Proteolytic cleavage of IGFBP-3 takes place in human pregnancy serum; accordingly, IGFBP-3 serum levels decrease markedly during pregnancy. ADAM12 (A disintegrin and metalloprotease) is an IGFBP-3 and IGFBP-5 protease and is present in human pregnancy serum. The goal of this study was to determine whether ADAM12 concentration in maternal serum is a useful indicator of foetal health.We developed an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for the quantification of ADAM12 in serum. The assay range was 42 to 667 micro g/L. Recombinant ADAM12 was used as the standard for calibration.We found that ADAM12 was highly stable in serum. Serum concentration increased from 180 micro g/L at week 8 of pregnancy to 670 micro g/L at 16 weeks, and reached 12 000 micro g/L at term. In 18 first-trimester Down syndrome pregnancies, the concentration of ADAM12 was decreased, thus the median multiple of mean (MoM) value was 0.14 (0.01-0.76). A detection rate for foetal Down syndrome of 82% for a screen-positive rate of 3.2% and a 1:400 risk cut-off was found by Monte Carlo estimation using ADAM12 and maternal age as screening markers.ADAM12 is a promising marker for Down syndrome.Medically assisted reproduction and second-trimester maternal serum marker screening for Down syndrome.To evaluate the effect of in vitro fertilization (IVF) and intracytoplasmic sperm injection (ICSI) on total hCG, free ss-hCG, AFP and unconjugated estriol (uE3) used as markers for second-trimester Down syndrome maternal serum screening.Second-trimester maternal sera from 1515 singleton pregnancies (970 by IVF, 545 by ICSI) were compared with control sera (21 014 cases). Free ss-hCG, total hCG, AFP and uE3 were compared between the control group and the medically assisted reproduction groups. The percentages of at-risk patients (>/=1/250) were also compared.No differences in values of the maternal serum markers were observed between the medically assisted and control groups. When maternal age was taken into account, the screen-positive rate for Down syndrome screening did not differ between the two groups.Patients undergoing assisted reproduction techniques can be counseled for maternal serum Down syndrome screening with the same efficacy as patients with naturally conceived pregnancies.First-trimester sonographic screening for Down syndrome.Screening for Down syndrome is an important part of routine antenatal care. The most common screening method in the United States involves the assessment of a combination of factors: maternal age, multiple second-trimester serum markers, and second-trimester ultrasonography (as a so-called "genetic sonogram"). More recently, however, there has been significant interest in first-trimester methods of screening, including screening for first-trimester serum markers and the sonographic measurement of fetal nuchal translucency. Multiple studies have demonstrated that fetal nuchal translucency has the potential of being a very powerful predictor of fetal aneuploidy. However, for clinicians a large void remains between this knowledge and the practical issues that must be addressed prior to endorsing this form of screening for widespread use. This article provides an objective assessment of the literature describing nuchal translucency, as well as some adjunct first-trimester sonographic techniques, such as ductus venosus flow and nasal bone studies. Additionally, a detailed description of practical problems that might limit the implementation of this form of screening is presented.Combined sonographic and biochemical markers for Down syndrome screening.To evaluate the efficacy of fetal nuchal fold thickness and proximal long bone biometric measurements in modifying Down syndrome serum screening risk in a population of women referred for second-trimester sonography.Sonographic biometric measurements and biochemical markers were combined retrospectively for 2533 women with known pregnancy outcomes. Four different screening methods were compared: (1) advanced maternal age; (2) biochemical serum screening markers; (3) modification of serum screening risks on the basis of categorical cutoffs for nuchal fold and femur and humerus length; and (4) a combined approach in which the sonographic measurements were treated as multiples of the medians and entered, together with the serum screening results, into a multivariable algorithm. The efficacy was compared at second-trimester risk cutoffs of 1:270 and 1:100.Down syndrome was present in 30 of the 2533 pregnancies (1 in 84). With the use of the 1:270 cutoff, biochemical screening had 93% sensitivity and a 40% false-positive rate. With application of the categorical method of fixed cutoffs to incorporate fetal biometry, the false-positive rate was reduced to 33% with no loss of sensitivity. The combined model had 83% sensitivity and a 19% false-positive rate. The combined method had the highest positive predictive value (1 in 20). Similar gains in efficacy could be shown with the 1:100 cutoff.For this high-risk group, the multivariate model that combines serum screening and sonography can result in a substantial reduction in the number of amniocenteses. Although the addition of the sonographic biometric measurements resulted in some Down syndrome cases being missed, the net effect was a large improvement in the overall positive predictive value of the screening.Ear length in trisomy 21 fetuses at 11-14 weeks of gestation.To determine the value of measuring fetal ear length at 11-14 weeks of gestation in screening for chromosomal defects.The fetal ear length was measured in 450 fetuses immediately before chorionic villus sampling for karyotyping at 11-14 weeks of gestation.The median gestational age was 12 (range, 11-14) weeks. The fetal ear was successfully examined in all cases. The fetal karyotype was normal in 409 cases and abnormal in 41, including 32 cases of trisomy 21. In the chromosomally normal group the fetal ear length increased significantly with crown-rump length from a mean of 3.7 mm at 45 mm to 6.9 mm at 84 mm. In the trisomy 21 fetuses the median ear length was significantly below the normal mean for crown-rump length by 0.45 mm (P = 0.013) but it was below the 5(th) centile of the normal range in only two (6.3%) of the cases. There was no significant association between the delta score of ear length and delta nuchal translucency in either the chromosomally normal (r = - 0.015, P = 0.753) or the trisomy 21 fetuses (r = - 0.014, P = 0.94).At 11-14 weeks of gestation the ear length in trisomy 21 fetuses is significantly reduced but the degree of deviation from normal is too small for this measurement to be useful in screening for trisomy 21.Maternal serum screening in Ontario using the triple marker test.To summarise the experience and evaluate the performance of the Ontario maternal serum screening (MSS) programme.The Ontario MSS programme between October 1993 and September 2000.This study used information collected in the Ontario MSS database, which contains data on each screened pregnancy. In the Ontario MSS programme, women are screened between 15 and 20 weeks of gestation. The risk cut-off for Down's syndrome was >or= 1 in 385 at term and women with a serum alpha-fetoprotein >or= 2.2 multiples of the unaffected population median were defined as screen-positive for open neural tube defects.Between 1 October 1993 and 30 September 2000, 428410 women residing in Ontario were screened for open neural tube defects, and 423895 women were screened for Down's syndrome and trisomy 18. Approximately 48% of all pregnant women in the province had MSS. The uptake rate of amniocentesis following a positive Down's syndrome screening was 67%. Of 717 cases of Down's syndrome ascertained in the screened population, 531 were detected by MSS, giving a term detection rate (DR) of 70.6%, with a false-positive rate (FPR) of 7.2%. For neural tube defects, the DR was 72.7%, with a FPR of 2.0%. The screen also detected 50% of cases of trisomy 18 at term, with a FPR of 0.2%. Coincidentally, 113 cases of chromosome aneuploidies other than Down's syndrome and trisomy 18 were detected.In the Ontario MSS programme, MSS performed as expected in the detection of Down's syndrome, open neural tube defects and trisomy 18. MSS is an effective and practical method for large-scale second trimester screening for Down's syndrome, open neural tube defects and trisomy 18, and the MSS database is an extremely useful tool in monitoring the performance of this screen.Maternal weight correction of maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG MoM when screening for trisomy 21 in the first trimester of pregnancy.To assess the suitability of either the log-linear or reciprocal-linear regression procedure for maternal weight correction of biochemical marker MoMs in the first trimester.Data from two prospective first-trimester OSCAR screening programmes including 32,010 women with first-trimester maternal serum-free beta-hCG and PAPP-A measured by the Kryptor analyser was analysed by regression analysis to provide parameters for the log-linear and reciprocal-linear MoM correction procedures. Assessment was made by goodness of fit to the data. The impact on detection rate and false-positive rate of the different correction procedures was assessed using statistical modelling with biochemical markers alone.Both log-linear and reciprocal-linear correction were shown to fit the data well. For free beta-hCG, the log-linear procedure was marginally superior to the reciprocal-linear procedure (r2=0.986 v 0.980), whilst for PAPP-A the reciprocal-linear procedure was marginally better (r2=0.991 v 0.985). Log-linear correction reduced the variance for both markers more than did the reciprocal-linear procedure. For free beta-hCG, the sd was reduced from 0.2675 to 0.2605 and for PAPP-A, it was reduced from 0.2545 to 0.2336. Correcting for maternal weight was shown to reduce the population false-positive rate from 7.0 to 6.5%, whilst maintaining the same detection rate at a risk cut-off of 1 in a 100. At individual levels, a two-fold variation in risk was demonstrated depending upon the individual's weight.To provide accurate individual patient-specific risks for trisomy 21, maternal weight must be taken into account and should be a mandatory data item for screening programmes. Maternal weight correction in the first trimester using free beta-hCG and PAPP-A can be best achieved using the log-linear procedure.First-trimester screening for Down syndrome in France combining fetal nuchal translucency measurement and biochemical markers.In France, there is a strictly regulated National Screening Programme for Down syndrome, based on second-trimester maternal serum markers. A prospective study of nuchal translucency together with retrospective evaluation of maternal serum markers was carried out to inform decisions on whether to move the programme to the first trimester.Between January 1998 and June 2001, all women who presented for their prenatal care at 12 participating maternity units were, regardless of age, invited to provide a blood sample and to attend for an NT scan at 11 to 13 weeks. The results were used to derive Gaussian distribution parameters. Detection and false-positive rates were computed in two ways: statistical modelling and directly. The cut-off risk was 1 in 250 at term.A total of 5694 women with singleton pregnancies were screened including 26 with Down syndrome and 24 with other aneuploidies. The model-predicted detection and false-positive rates for combined ultrasound and serum screening were 81 and 4.5% compared to 64 and 6.0% for ultrasound alone. The directly observed rates were 73 and 4.7%, compared to 62 and 5.0% respectively.In France, first-trimester screening with nuchal translucency and maternal serum markers is likely to achieve a high screening efficiency. This has important implications for the national screening policy.First-trimester screening for trisomies 21 and 18.Screening for aneuploid pregnancies is routinely performed after 15 weeks of gestation and has a sensitivity of approximately 65 percent, with a false positive rate of 5 percent. First-trimester markers of aneuploidy have been developed, but their use in combination has not been adequately evaluated in clinical practice.We conducted a multicenter study of screening for trisomies 21 and 18 among patients with pregnancies between 74 and 97 days of gestation, based on maternal age, maternal levels of free beta human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A, and ultrasonographic measurement of fetal nuchal translucency. A screening result was considered to be positive for trisomy 21 if the calculated risk was at least 1 in 270 pregnancies and positive for trisomy 18 if the risk was at least 1 in 150.Screening was completed in 8514 patients with singleton pregnancies. This approach to screening identified 85.2 percent of the 61 cases of Down's syndrome (95 percent confidence interval, 73.8 to 93.0), with a false positive rate of 9.4 percent (95 percent confidence interval, 8.8 to 10.1). At a false positive rate of 5 percent, the detection rate was 78.7 percent (95 percent confidence interval, 66.3 to 88.1). Screening identified 90.9 percent of the 11 cases of trisomy 18 (95 percent confidence interval, 58.7 to 99.8), with a 2 percent false positive rate. Among women 35 years of age or older, screening identified 89.8 percent of fetuses with trisomy 21, with a false positive rate of 15.2 percent, and 100 percent of fetuses with trisomy 18.First-trimester screening for trisomies 21 and 18 on the basis of maternal age, maternal levels of free beta human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A, and measurement of fetal nuchal translucency has good sensitivity at an acceptable false positive rate.First-trimester screening for Down syndrome in singleton pregnancies achieved by intrauterine insemination.To evaluate whether achieving a singleton pregnancy by IUI affects the results of first-trimester screening for Down syndrome compared to naturally conceived pregnancy.Forty-nine IUI and 3059 naturally conceived singleton pregnancies were included in the study. Ovulation in IUI pregnancies was induced by clomiphene and human menopausal gonadotropin. Progesterone was given after insemination for 2 weeks. Down syndrome screening was performed using a combination of maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency, and maternal serum concentrations of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A during the period of 10-14 weeks' gestation.In IUI pregnancies, nuchal translucency thickness and the levels of PAPP-A were significantly higher. The values of free beta-hCG were not statistically different between the two groups. The screen-positive rate in IUI pregnancies was significantly higher (14.3% vs. 7.1%).Singleton pregnancies achieved by IUI have a higher screen-positive rate. Not only elder maternal age but also exogenous hormones given during the process of ovulation induction and after conception may play an important factor influencing positive screening results.Nasal bone hypoplasia: is it a common finding amongst chromosomally normal fetuses of southern Chinese women?To assess the incidence of nasal hypoplasia among fetuses of southern Chinese women.This prospective observational study was conducted at Princess Margaret Hospital, Hong Kong. All pregnant women referred for chromosomal studies before 14 weeks were assessed. The crown-rump length, nuchal translucency thickness, and nasal bone were assessed between 11 and 14 weeks.A total of 143 women were recruited. In 119 fetuses, facial profiles were successfully obtained and the presence or absence of nasal bones was assessed. One hundred and fourteen fetuses had normal karyotypes. The rate of absence nasal bone when assessed between 11-14 weeks was 0.88% in the fetuses with a normal karyotype. During the same period, 2 out of 3 fetuses with Down syndrome had absence of nasal bones. A nasal bone was visualized in one fetus with Edward syndrome and the other with Turner syndrome (45 X).The incidence of nasal hypoplasia is not increased among fetuses of southern Chinese women. Assessment of ossification of the nasal bone can be used to supplement first-trimester screening in Chinese women.Mid-gestation Down syndrome screening test and pregnancy outcome among unstimulated assisted-conception pregnancies.Alteration of mid-gestation serum markers in assisted-conception pregnancies is believed to be attributable to ovarian superovulation treatment modalities. We compared alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE(3)) in two groups of unstimulated assisted-conception pregnancies, that is, own-oocyte frozen embryos (own-FET) versus oocyte-donated (OD) embryos.Forty-three OD-conceived and 31 own-FET-conceived singleton parturient women (aged 29 +/- 4 years and 31 +/- 4 years respectively, P < 0.05) were followed from embryo transfer throughout pregnancy.The daily pattern of first-trimester serum beta-hCG was similar in both groups. The OD group had only significantly increased AFP concentrations compared to the own-FET group (1.38 vs 0.99 median MoM respectively, P = 0.002). Although there were no chromosomal abnormalities and no fetal or neonatal deaths in either group, 12% OD women and 6.5% own-FET women were found screen-positive. Eight OD women and 11 FET women had an adverse obstetric outcome (P = NS).OD embryos are a unique clinical model for evaluating the uterine compartment and its contribution to mid-gestation serum marker secretion.[Screening by maternal serum markers for Down's syndrome].To investigate the optimal method of screening for Down's syndrome (DS) with maternal serum mankers.Screening by maternal serum markers for Down's syndrome was offered to all 2886 pregnant women in Peking Union Medical Hospital during 1996.11-2001.3. Alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotrophin (free beta-HCG) were used as markers during the first year of pregnancy. Alpha-fetoprotein, free human chorionic gonadotrophin (HCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) were used as mid pregnancy and first-trimester markers in next three years. Amniocentesis and (CVS) were done in those defined as risk cases.The detection rate of Down's syndrome by maternal serum markers was 3.8% (11/2886). The proportion of false positive results in group of triple markers (alpha FP, free beta-HCG, PAPP-A) was 5%.The PAPP-A was a good marker to detect Down's syndrome in early pregnancy and may be used to predict the outcome during mid trimester of pregnancy. The AFP and free beta-HCG can be useful markers to detect Down's syndrome and fetal abnormality. While prenatal diagnostics can be shifted to an early pregnant period.Combined first- and second-trimester screening for Down syndrome: an evaluation of proMBP as a marker.To estimate the screening performance of different combinations of first- and second-trimester markers, including a new marker, the proform of eosinophil major basic protein (proMBP).The population comprised 195 singleton pregnancies with a normal outcome enrolled in the Copenhagen First Trimester Study, in which a serum sample was available from both the first and the second trimester. The performance of different marker combinations was estimated by receiver-operator-characteristics (ROC) analysis using a Monte Carlo simulation and distributions of log(10)MoM markers and their correlations, derived from our normal material and Down syndrome cases from the literature.Using a fixed screen-positive rate (SPR) of 5%, the first-trimester combined test [nuchal translucency (NT), PAPP-A and free beta-hCG] yielded a detection rate (DR) of 76%, and the integrated test (NT, PAPP-A, AFP, hCG, uE3 and inhibin A) yielded a DR of 86%. With a DR of 90%, the best combination was the first-trimester beta-hCG and NT with the second-trimester proMBP and AFP. ProMBP combined with the triple test increased the DR from 62 to 83%, whereas the addition of inhibin A only increased the DR to 69%.These results suggest that proMBP may be an important new marker in Down syndrome screening and, in particular, a good substitute for inhibin A.Combining nuchal translucency and serum markers in prenatal screening for Down syndrome in twin pregnancies.A method is described to combine the ultrasound marker nuchal translucency (NT) with serum markers so that they can be used together in prenatal screening for Down syndrome in twin pregnancies. For monochorionic twin pregnancies (taken as monozygous), the two fetus-specific NT measurements are averaged before risk is calculated and before the contribution of the serum markers is incorporated. For dichorionic twin pregnancies (taken as dizygous), the risk for each fetus based on the individual NT measurements is calculated, the two fetus-specific risks are added together, and then the contribution of the serum markers is incorporated. In this way, all the screening markers can be used in combination to produce a pregnancy-specific "pseudo-risk", rather than a fetus-specific pseudo-risk. We refer to pseudo-risk because in the absence of sufficient data on the screening markers in affected twin pregnancies, a true risk estimate cannot be calculated. Tentative estimates are given of screening performance in twins using NT, the combined test (NT with first-trimester serum markers), and the integrated test (NT with first- and second-trimester serum markers), all interpreted with maternal age.Nasal bone evaluation with ultrasonography: a marker for fetal aneuploidy.The influence of smoking on the pregnancy-associated plasma protein A, free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin and nuchal translucency.To analyse the effects of smoking on first trimester parameters used in prenatal screening for Down's Syndrome.A chart study.Primary care centres and maternity clinics of the participating universities' and central hospitals.Three thousand and one hundred fifteen women screened by nuchal translucency measurement and 4436 women screened by maternal serum samples. Only normal singleton pregnancies were included.The mean multiples of median of pregnancy associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A), free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) and nuchal translucency were compared by independent samples t test after logarithmic transformation of the data between smokers and non-smokers.PAPP-A and free beta-hCG concentrations and nuchal translucency measurements.PAPP-A was significantly reduced and nuchal translucency increased if the mother smoked. The smokers were more frequently considered as being at high risk for Down's Syndrome.Correcting PAPP-A median for smokers down by 20% might improve the accuracy of the risk evaluations given to individual women. If the association between increased nuchal translucency and smoking can be confirmed, it poses interesting questions as to the reasons for increased nuchal translucency among normal pregnancies.The effect of temporal variation in biochemical markers of trisomy 21 across the first and second trimesters of pregnancy on the estimation of individual patient-specific risks and detection rates for Down's syndrome.In a previous study we examined the changes in the median multiple of the median (MoM) with gestation of free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (F beta-hCG), total human chorionic gonadotrophin (ThCG), alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) in a large series of Down's syndrome pregnancies. Results showed that there was a significant temporal variation of the MoM for each marker. In this paper, we assess the impact of this temporal shift on the estimation of patient-specific risks and the detection rates (DRs) for Down's syndrome pregnancies.Individual patient-specific risks, DRs and false positive rates were estimated using statistical modelling techniques and computer simulations. The data for these simulations were the regressed mean log(10) analyte MoMs, marker standard deviations (as log(10) MoM) and correlation coefficients derived from the analysis of over 1000 cases of Down's syndrome and 150,000 unaffected pregnancies between 6 and 20 weeks of gestation reported in our previous study. Two models were compared: the classical constant median separation model, which assumes no variation in median shift with gestation (model 1), and a variable median separation model (model 2), which takes account of the changes in median shift with gestation as described in our previous study.When individual patient-specific risks calculated for various MoM values using model 1 were compared with those derived from model 2, considerable differences in risk estimates were observed for all marker combinations, particularly in the first trimester. Using a 1 in 250 cut-off risk, DRs at each gestation in the second trimester for the AFP+F beta-hCG combination were maximized at 14-17 weeks of gestation and were virtually identical at 63-65% for model 1 and model 2. A similar trend was observed for the AFP+ThCG combination, with an optimum gestational range of 15-18 weeks and DRs of 66-68%. In the first trimester, using a 1 in 250 cut-off risk, DRs were more variable with gestation for the prime marker combination of F beta-hCG+PAPP-A, varying from 73% at 8 weeks to 65% at 13 weeks with model 1 and from 75% to 66% with model 2.Risk algorithms should take into account temporal variation in marker MoMs in order to produce accurate patient-specific risks. This also helps to maximize DRs, particularly when samples are taken out with the optimal gestational range.The implications of a false positive second-trimester serum screen for Down syndrome.To investigate the genetic and obstetric implications of false positive Down syndrome serum screening results.The study population comprised 162774 women underwent triple marker screening in the Ontario Maternal Serum Screening program between October 1995 and September 1998, with outcomes obtained from the Canadian Institute of Health Information. The study compares the incidence of chromosomal abnormalities other than Down syndrome in screen positive women with background incidence from the literature. It also compares the risks of having a fetus with congenital abnormalities or of developing obstetric complications in 11549 screen positive women with their matched controls.A higher incidence of trisomy 13 (12.4 per 10000) was seen in screen positive women; the incidence of other chromosomal abnormalities in screen positive women was not increased relative to the general population. The higher incidence of trisomy 13 may have been biased by the selective uptake of amniocentesis in women who had high risks for Down syndrome or abnormal ultrasound findings. Incidences of fetal congenital abnormality in screen positive and negative women were similar. Women who screened positive for Down syndrome had increased risk of spontaneous fetal loss (odds ratio 1.80; 95% confidence interval 1.54, 2.07) but no other obstetric complications.Among women who screened positive for Down syndrome, we found a higher number of spontaneous fetal losses and a possibly higher risk of having a fetus with trisomy 13. We did not find an increased risk for other chromosomal abnormalities, congenital abnormalities, or other adverse obstetric outcomes.Changes in nuchal translucency thickness in normal and abnormal karyotype fetuses.To investigate the dynamic trend of the nuchal translucency thickness between fetuses with normal and abnormal karyotype.Prospective observational study.Ospedale Microcitemico, Cagliari, Italy.A cohort of 305 first trimester fetuses.Fetuses with a nuchal translucency greater than or equal to the 95th centile were invited for a second nuchal translucency measurement. The finding of an 'increased or unchanged' or 'diminished' thickness was compared in fetuses with normal and abnormal karyotype.Nuchal translucency and karyotype. Median maternal age was 35 years (min 17, max 44) and median crown-rump length at first visit was 50 mm (min 38, max 80). A second nuchal translucency measurement was carried out in 292 fetuses, resulting in increased or unchanged values in 95 cases and decreased nuchal translucency in 197 cases. Two hundred and twenty-six (77.4%) fetuses had normal karyotype and 66 (22.6%) had abnormal karyotype (44 trisomies 21, 10 trisomies 18, 5 trisomies 13, 4 cases of 45 X0, 1 case of 47,XXY, 1 case of 47,XXX and 1 translocation). In the 66 chromosomally abnormal fetuses, the second nuchal translucency measurement was enlarged or unchanged in 37 (56%), and diminished in 29 (44%), while in the 226 normal fetuses the second nuchal translucency measurement was enlarged or unchanged in 58 cases (25%) and diminished in 168 (75%) (relative risk 2.6, 95% confidence interval 1.7-4.0).In fetuses with abnormal karyotype, the second nuchal translucency measurement tends to be increased or unchanged, while in normal cases the size of nuchal translucency is generally reduced.Combined serum and ultrasound screening for detection of fetal aneuploidy.Experience gathered over the last decade from high-risk centers provide strong evidence that mid-trimester sonographic markers are sensitive for Down syndrome prediction. More recent data indicate that combining mid trimester sonography with traditional serum markers significantly improves diagnostic accuracy over either group of markers by themselves.Absent nasal bone in the prenatal detection of fetuses with trisomy 21 in a high-risk population.To estimate the usefulness of absent nasal bone by ultrasound in the prenatal detection of second-trimester fetuses with trisomy 21.This was a matched case-control study of sonograms from January 1, 1997 to April 30, 2002. Genetic sonograms and facial profile pictures of all fetuses that were subsequently proven to have trisomy 21 were reviewed (study group). A control group was identified during the same study period by using a 4-to-1 ratio matching for gestational age at the time of the ultrasound examination. The sensitivity and specificity of absent fetal nasal bone for trisomy 21 were determined, and overlap with other ultrasound aneuploidy markers was assessed.Forty fetuses were identified with trisomy 21; in 29 (72.5%) a facial profile had been obtained. Of the 160 controls, 102 (64%) had facial profiles documented. Of the 29 fetuses with trisomy 21 with facial profile available, 12 had absent nasal bone (sensitivity 41%). None of the 102 control fetuses with facial profiles available had absent nasal bone (specificity 100%). The sensitivity of genetic ultrasound was increased from 83% (24 of 29) to 90% (26 of 29) by adding absent nasal bone to the other ultrasound aneuploidy markers.In the second trimester of pregnancy, absent nasal bone has a sensitivity of 41% and a specificity of 100% in detecting fetal trisomy 21. Absent fetal nasal bone may be added to the list of ultrasound aneuploidy markers evaluated during a genetic sonogram.Correlation and overlapping between nuchal translucency and triple test among Down syndrome-affected pregnancies.To examine the correlation and extent of overlapping between first-trimester nuchal translucency (NT) and second-trimester triple test (TT) results in Down syndrome (DS)-affected pregnancies.Results of both tests were obtained in 28 cases with DS. Inter-test correlation was performed by comparing the likelihood ratios (LRs). Screen-positive rates (risk >1:380) were calculated for different age groups by adjusting age-dependent background risk and tests' LRs. Overlapping referred to ratio between screen-positive cases by both tests simultaneously and total screen-positive cases by either one or both tests.No correlation was found between the tests' LRs (Pearson correlation test, r = 0.0487). The overlapping between the tests was 25% and 38.5% among young patients of 20 and 35 years of age, respectively. The average overlapping among patients between 25 and 35 years of age was approximately 33%. Only 3 of the 28 DS cases demonstrated LRs <1 by both tests and moreover none exhibited LRs <0.2 by both tests.The degree of overlapping of one third, between NT and TT, confirms the assumption that both tests utilized together improves DS detection. Screen- negative result, by both tests simultaneously, may reassure low-risk population and aid to reduce the number of non-indicated invasive tests.First and second trimester antenatal screening for Down's syndrome: the results of the Serum, Urine and Ultrasound Screening Study (SURUSS).The influence of different sample collection types on the levels of markers used for Down's syndrome screening as measured by the Kryptor Immunosassay system.In a rapid point-of-care screening programme for chromosomal anomalies, analysis of biochemical markers in maternal blood can now be accomplished in a rapid time frame (less than 20 min). The need to leave whole blood samples some 10 min for coagulation and a further 5 min for centrifugation adds additional processing time.The possibilities for reducing this processing time were investigated using various anticoagulated blood collection systems and the Kryptor analytical platform. Plasma levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and free human chronic gonadotrophin beta-subunit (beta-hCG) were compared with those in maternal serum.From the mean results from ten patients it was shown that use of heparin plasma resulted in a statistically significant reduction in levels of PAPP-A and that EDTA plasma reduced the levels of PAPP-A dramatically. For AFP, levels in citrated plasma and EDTA plasma were also significantly reduced, whereas levels of free beta-hCG were not affected.Use of alternative sample types for PAPP-A is not possible. The sample of choice for first trimester screening using the Kryptor platform is maternal serum.Antenatal screening for Down's syndrome with the quadruple test.Second trimester screening for Down's syndrome is widely practised throughout the world. We assessed the performance of antenatal serum screening for Down's syndrome with the quadruple test in 46193 pregnancies from 14 hospitals over 5 years. Women who screened positive (risk > or =1 in 300) were offered diagnostic amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling. Of 88 observed Down's syndrome pregnancies, 71 (81%) had a positive screening result (81% detection rate, 95% CI 72-89), and of 46105 unaffected pregnancies, 3200 tested positive (7% false-positive rate). These results show that the quadruple test is a better method of screening for Down's syndrome than use of maternal age alone (51% detection rate, 14% false-positive rate) and is more effective than other second trimester screening tests. Therefore, we conclude that the quadruple test should be the test of choice in second trimester screening for Down's syndrome.Improved antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.Incorporation of inhibin-A in second-trimester screening for Down syndrome.To evaluate the efficacy of the second-trimester quadruple test (maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, human chorionic gonadotropin, and inhibin-A) in prenatal screening for Down syndrome.All quadruple tests performed on singleton pregnancies over a 32-month period were reviewed. The sensitivity and false-positive rates were compared with the theoretic rates predicted by the screening model when applied to a population of women with the same maternal age distribution.Twenty-three thousand seven hundred four women with unaffected pregnancies and 45 women with Down syndrome-affected pregnancies received the quadruple test. Mean analyte values for both unaffected and affected pregnancies were similar to those expected. The sensitivity of the quadruple test, which was based on ascertainment of all viable affected pregnancies in the screened population, was 85.8%. This sensitivity did not significantly differ from an expected 83.8% (P =.8). The initial false-positive rate, 9.0%, was significantly below that expected (9.9%) (P =.002) and was further reduced to 8.2% after correction for major gestational age errors. The positive predictive value of the quadruple test was one in 51. Women with an affected pregnancy and a positive test result (true positives) generally had very high risks (median 1:22) relative to women with false-positive results (median risk 1:111).The quadruple test meets or exceeds performance expectations and appears to represent an improvement over the widely used triple test.Maternal serum hCG and alpha-fetoprotein levels in pregnancies conceived after IVF or ICSI with fresh and frozen-thawed embryos.Studies have shown that levels of serum markers of Down's syndrome were altered in pregnancies conceived after IVF, though the reason for this remains unknown.Second-trimester maternal serum levels of hCG and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) in pregnancies conceived with fresh and frozen-thawed embryos after assisted reproduction were compared with those conceived spontaneously.There were 203 pregnancies with fresh embryo transfers (130 IVF cases, 73 ICSI cases) and 98 pregnancies with frozen-thawed embryo transfers (61 IVF cases, 37 ICSI cases). The controls consisted of 17 145 spontaneous pregnancies. The median hCG multiples of the median (MoM) was significantly increased to 1.24 in 98 pregnancies conceived after frozen embryo transfer. This elevation was observed only in the IVF-frozen embryo transfer subgroup (P < 0.001), but not in the ICSI-frozen embryo transfer subgroup. The median AFP MoM for 203 pregnancies after fresh embryo transfer was 0.90. Among the subgroups, the median AFP MoM was significantly reduced to 0.90 and 0.86 in IVF-embryo transfer (P = 0.04) and ICSI-embryo transfer (P = 0.001) pregnancies respectively, and significantly raised to 1.20 in the IVF-frozen embryo transfer subgroup.The degree of alterations in maternal serum hCG and AFP levels varied between fresh and frozen-thawed embryos, and also between the mode of fertilization. Pregnancies resulting from ICSI or frozen embryo transfer should be regarded as distinct entities from those of IVF-embryo transfer.Midtrimester triple-test levels in women with chronic hypertension and altered renal function.To study the association between midtrimester triple-test levels and renal function in pregnant women with chronic hypertension.Forty-three patients with chronic hypertension for whom renal function was evaluated by the creatinine clearance test between 14- and 20-weeks gestation were studied. Midtrimester triple-test values obtained as part of Down screening program were correlated with renal function.hCG correlated inversely with creatinine clearance (r = -0.345; p = 0.002) and directly with alpha-fetoprotein (r = 0.499; p = 0.003).In pregnant women with chronic hypertension, impaired renal function may alter midtrimester maternal serum hCG levels.First-trimester maternal serum PAPP-A, SP1 and M-CSF levels in normal and trisomic twin pregnancies.To study PAPP-A and SP1 for biochemical trisomy screening in twin pregnancies and to investigate the role of maternal and placental compartments in marker production by comparing the levels of the decidual cytokine M-CSF with the PAPP-A and SP1 from the placenta.Thirteen twin pregnancies with at least one chromosomally abnormal fetus were compared with 68 normal twin pregnancies. Sera were obtained between 11 + 3 and 13 + 6 weeks of gestation, and PAPP-A, SP1 and M-CSF levels were determined by immunoassay. These concentrations were also compared with gestation-matched groups of 18 singleton normal pregnancies and 18 singleton Down syndrome pregnancies.PAPP-A and SP1, but not M-CSF, levels were higher in normal twin pregnancy than in normal singleton pregnancy. SP1 levels, but not PAPP-A, correlated to M-CSF. PAPP-A, but not SP1, levels were reduced in abnormal twin pregnancies, with an increasing effect according to the number of affected fetuses, and were more pronounced in pregnancies with trisomy 18 or 13 than in trisomy 21 fetuses. M-CSF was inconsistent, with a trend towards increased levels in trisomy 21.PAPP-A remains the best biochemical screening marker for fetal trisomies 21, 18 or 13, in singleton as well as in twin pregnancy. In contrast to SP1, its site of production is not likely to be restricted to the placenta. The role of the (maternally produced) M-CSF remains to be further investigated.Maternal serum marker medians in Aboriginal Canadian women.The study evaluates the differences between Aboriginal and Caucasian women in the levels of maternal serum markers used in second-trimester Down syndrome screening (alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, and total human chorionic gonadotrophin).A case-control study compared the levels of serum markers in 401 Aboriginal women and 1565 matched controls selected from 7717 Caucasian women. The cases and controls were screened in a single centre and matched for maternal age, parity, and sample date. Women with multiple pregnancies and pregnancies associated with Down syndrome, open neural tube defects, trisomy 18, and insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus as well as women without weight recorded were excluded from the study.No differences in the levels of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and total human chorionic gonadotrophin were observed between the two groups. Maternal serum unconjugated estriol was 12% higher in Aboriginal women.Since Aboriginal women make up only a small proportion of women screened, correcting the level of uE3 for this group will have little effect on the overall screening performance. However, if these results are confirmed by further study, individual centres may consider making this correction, so optimal screening performance can be achieved in Aboriginal women.Role of ultrasound evaluation of nuchal translucency in prenatal diagnosis.Nuchal translucency (NT) is the ultrasonographic pattern of the accumulation of subcutaneous fluid (> or = 3 mm) behind the fetal neck. The measurement of NT thickness by ultrasound examination at 11-14 weeks of gestation has been associated with maternal age and to be an effective screening tool for trisomy 21; with an invasive method rate of 5%, about 75% of trisomical pregnancies can be identified. With the association of some biochemical markers like maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) to ultrasonography at 11-14 weeks, it is possible to identify about 90% of chromosomal abnormalities. An increase of NT also allows us to identify most other chromosomal abnormalities, a large number of major cardiac defects, skeletal dysplasias, and genetic syndromes. In monochorial twins the discordance in the measurement of NT represents an early sign of twin-to-twin transfusion syndrome (TTTS).The objective of our study was to assess the detection of fetal structural defects with an ultrasound scan at 11-14 weeks of gestation. We submitted 3,157 pregnant women to a routine ultrasound examination at 11-14 weeks. The patients were then submitted to ultrasound scan in the second or third trimester of pregnancy. An isolated increased NT thickness was not considered an abnormality, but these patients, nonetheless, were submitted to an early echocardiographic evaluation. Fetal structural abnormalities were classified as major or minor and of early or late onset.A detection rate of 4.3% (135 cases) of abnormalities was found and 22.6% of these (30 cases) were diagnosed by ultrasound scan at 11-14 weeks, including seven cardiac defects associated with increased NT. The antenatal ultrasound detection rate was 73.5%, and 33.2% were diagnosed in the first trimester assessment. A rate of 76.8% of the major defects were diagnosed by the prenatal scan and 35.8% by the scan at 11-14 weeks. Fetal structural defects with the ultrasonography at 11-14 weeks were diagnosed in about 24.3% of the cases, therefore, a second trimester abnormality is important in routine antenatal care to increase the prenatal assessment of fetal anomalies.As for the introduction of every new technique in routine clinical practice, the operators who perform the ultrasound scan at 11-14 weeks should be submitted to adequate training and to strict quality control.Temporal changes in maternal serum biochemical markers of trisomy 21 across the first and second trimester of pregnancy.Many maternal serum markers show concentration changes in Down's syndrome pregnancies but the magnitude of the change in median marker levels varies with gestation. To date these changes have not been accurately specified.The trends in marker median levels between 6 and 20 weeks of gestation were examined for alphafetoprotein (AFP), free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (Fbeta-hCG), total human chorionic gonadotrophin (ThCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) by a meta-analysis of data obtained from our collaborative studies and routine screening programmes for Down's syndrome over a 10-year period. Data were available from between 709 and 1082 Down's syndrome pregnancies and from between 14607 and 153909 unaffected pregnancies for each marker. The median multiple of the median (MoM) and mean log10MoM for each marker at each completed week of gestation were estimated and the trend with gestation smoothed using a weighted least squares regression model.The gestational ages at which maximum separation of marker levels occurred, comparing affected and unaffected pregnancies, and the respective regressed median MoMs and mean log10MoMs, were: for AFP at 16 weeks, 0.72 MoM, -0.14288log10MoM; for Fbeta-hCG at 15 weeks, 2-24MoM, 0.35034 log10MoM; for ThCG at 16 weeks, 1.93 MoM, 0.28548 log10MoM, as well as before 8 weeks (<0.65 MoM, -0.18853 log10MoM); and for PAPP-A before 8 weeks, <0.33 MoM, -0.47727 log10MoM.There is significant temporal variation in mean log10MoM values for the screening markers investigated. Screening algorithms, modified to take account of this variation, should allow more accurate gestation-specific risks to be calculated in individual pregnancies.First-trimester pregnancy scanning as a screening tool for high-risk and abnormal pregnancies in a district general hospital setting.This study set out to evaluate the feasibility and acceptability of routine early ultrasound (12-14 weeks) within a district general hospital (DGH) for identifying high-risk and abnormal pregnancies. This was a pilot study for screening by ultrasound examination all women who presented to their community midwife before 12 weeks' gestation. The study involved 991 women who presented clinically pregnant before 12 weeks' gestation between May 1998 and May 1999. Women were offered routinely two ultrasound examinations during their pregnancy, the first at 12-14 weeks' gestation and the second at 20-21 weeks' gestation. The main outcome measures were: range and number of abnormal/high-risk pregnancies identified during an ultrasound scan at 12-14 weeks' gestation; range and number of abnormalities diagnosed during scans at later gestations; outcomes of the pregnancies; questionnaires assessing how the women viewed early pregnancy ultrasound as a method of screening. Nine hundred and eighty-four (99%) women accepted the offer of an early ultrasound scan at 12-14 weeks' gestation; of these 840(85%) women accepted screening for trisomy 21 (T21) by fetal nuchal translucency thickness (NT) and maternal age (fetal medicine foundation risk assessment programme) and this was completed successfully in 797(80%) of cases. Twenty-four women (2%) had a failed pregnancy and where necessary an ERPC was performed following a planned admission. Thirty pregnancies (3%) were diagnosed as abnormal or having high risk of abnormality at the early scan. A major abnormality was confirmed before the expected anomaly scan at 20 weeks in five (17%) pregnancies; all of these patients opted for an elective termination. Twenty-six (3%) pregnancies had a diagnosis of abnormality at their anomaly scan. Of these, three pregnancies were diagnosed as major abnormalities with two resulting in termination of the affected pregnancy before 24 weeks' gestation. Eight hundred and thirty-seven women (85%) completed questionnaires, 833 women (84.5%) were satisfied with the counselling they received before the ultrasound scan and 827 women (84%) answered that they would accept an early pregnancy scan if offered during their next pregnancy. Early pregnancy ultrasound at 12-14 weeks' gestation can be used as an effective method of identifying and screening for major abnormalities of pregnancy within a DGH setting, but it is appropriate to use this in conjunction with an anomaly scan at around 20 weeks' gestation. Women found this method of screening acceptable.[A study on the screening of prenatal trisomy 21 using the fucosylated alpha-fetoprotein ratio measured by a liquid-phase binding assay].Nuchal index: a gestational age independent ultrasound marker for the detection of Down syndrome.To determine if the ultrasound marker Nuchal Index (NIx) is gestational age independent, and to determine its specificity and sensitivity for Down syndrome (DS) identification.Prospective cohort. A prospective database of fetal biometry and soft markers of aneuploidy was searched for fetuses with the following criteria: confirmed gestational age, at least two measurements of nuchal thickness and biparietal diameter, no major detectable fetal anomalies, and either normal karyotype or normal postnatal exam. Nuchal Index (NIx) was defined as 100x (mean nuchal thickness [mm])/(mean Biparietal Diameter [mm]). This cohort was divided into two groups according to the last digit of their hospital unit number. Initial analysis was carried out in the first group (analysis group), with the second group (normal) used to test the results. A prospective cohort of pre- and postnatally diagnosed DS fetuses with at least two measurements of nuchal thickness and biparietal diameter constituted the abnormal study group (abnormal) and was used to determine the sensitivity of the index. P value <0.05 was considered significant.Eight hundred and seventy-five fetuses constituted the control group with 455 in the analysis group and 420 in the normal group. In the analysis group, Pearson coefficient and ANOVA confirm that NIx was independent of gestational age between 14 + 0 and 22 + 6 weeks of gestation. For the analysis group, mean NIx was 7.72, (SD = 2.05) and a threshold value of 11.0 yielded a specificity of 94%. Fifty-two DS fetuses made up the abnormal group. Mean NIx in this group was 17.9 (SD = 13.9), which was highly significant (P < 0.00001) compared to the analysis group. Using an NIx threshold of 11.0, sensitivity for any DS was 61.5% (32/52) and specificity (normal group) was 96% (402/420) (False positive rate = 4%). If DS fetuses with effusions, hydrops, cystic hygromas or central nervous system (CNS) defects are excluded, the sensitivity for an NIx of 11.0 was 50.0% (20/40).Nuchal Index (NIx) can be assumed to be constant between 14 + 0 and 22 + 6. Using a threshold of 11.0, the sensitivity for any Down syndrome (DS) fetus was 62% (32/52) with a specificity of 96% (False positive rate = 4%). Even when obvious fetal conditions that can cause an increase in NIx are excluded, the sensitivity remains acceptable at 50%. NIx appears to be a useful, gestational age independent ultrasound marker for Down syndrome.Combined second-trimester biochemical and ultrasound screening for Down syndrome.To evaluate the efficacy of a Down syndrome screening protocol that combines second-trimester maternal serum analytes and the continuous ultrasound measures of nuchal fold thickness and proximal long bone length.Ultrasound measurements of nuchal fold, femur length, and humerus length were reviewed for 72 second-trimester Down syndrome and 7063 unaffected fetuses. Derived statistical variables for these parameters were entered into a multivariable Gaussian model together with the statistical variables used in the "quad" test (maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, human chorionic gonadotropin, and inhibin A). Maternal age-specific sensitivities, false-positive rates, and positive predictive values were generated together with receiver operating characteristic curves. Overall efficacy of ultrasound screening alone, the quad test, and the combination of the ultrasound and quad test were compared using a 1:270 second-trimester risk cutoff applied to 1999 US births.Using ultrasound, a sensitivity of 79.9% and false-positive rate of 6.7% may be achieved (positive predictive value: 1 in 42). The quad test has a sensitivity of 81.5% and false-positive rate of 6.9% (positive predictive value: 1 in 42). The combination of the quad test with nuchal fold and long bone measurements may achieve 90% sensitivity and a 3.1% false-positive rate (positive predictive value: 1 in 18).Combining second-trimester serum testing and fetal biometry is a feasible approach to Down syndrome screening, compatible with current obstetric practice. This modality is substantially more effective than either serum screening or ultrasound alone. Efficacy may be comparable to that reported for combined first- and second-trimester (integrated) screening.Down syndrome maternal serum marker screening after 18 weeks' gestation.Women having access to prenatal care late in pregnancy may still wish to benefit from maternal serum screening for Down syndrome. Therefore, we established reference values for alpha-feto protein (AFP) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG), and assessed the diagnostic value of maternal serum marker screening at 18-35 weeks' gestation based upon a series of 4072 sera from unaffected pregnancies and 118 sera from pregnant women with fetuses affected by Down syndrome. Using a 1/250 risk cut-off, a detection rate of 72.9% (95% CI = 71.5-74.3%) was achieved with a false-positive rate of 7.51% (95% CI = 6.71-8.3%). This was not significantly different from the percentages observed in our 14-17 weeks routine screening (50 596 patients): 71.9% (95% CI = 71.5-72.3%) and 6.48% (95% CI = 6.28-6.68%), respectively. Detection and screen-positive rates were, respectively, 51.3% (95% CI = 35.6-67.0%) and 5.95% (95% CI = 5.12-6.68%) in women aunder 35 years of age, and 84.8% (95% CI = 76.9-92.7%) and 24% (95% CI = 20.7-27.3%) in women aged 35 years and over. In conclusion, maternal serum marker screening is feasible at 18 weeks' gestation and later, which may be of interest in selected cases.Measurement of nuchal translucency as a single strategy in trisomy 21 screening: should we use any other marker?To evaluate the role of nuchal translucency thickness as a single marker in screening for trisomy 21 at 10-16 weeks' gestation.From December 1996 to October 2001, nuchal translucency was measured in 11,281 consecutive early second trimester fetuses referred to our unit for prenatal care and delivery. Scans were performed by eight experienced ultrasonographers, under strict methodological criteria.Chromosomal abnormalities were found in 118 cases (52 trisomy 21). Using nuchal translucency greater than the 95th centile as a cut-off, the overall detection rate was 71.2% with a specificity of 95.4%, and a positive predictive value of 14%. In the trisomy 21 selected group, detection rate, specificity, and positive predictive value for nuchal translucency were 92.3%, 95.4%, and 8.5%, respectively. The detection rate of trisomy 21 reached 100% when nuchal translucency was measured between 10 and 14 weeks' gestation, maintaining the same specificity.Early second trimester nuchal translucency measurement can achieve prenatal detection rates of trisomy 21 greater than 95% with a 5% false-positive rate. With a detection rate so high, the benefits of using additional markers may be less than previously considered. Although maternal age, other sonographic or Doppler markers, and maternal serum biochemistry might play a role in prenatal strategies to detect fetal chromosomal abnormalities, the high detection rate of trisomy 21 fetuses using nuchal translucency as a single parameter suggests that early nuchal translucency measurement between 10 and 14 weeks' gestation can be a simple screening strategy for this condition.Second trimester trisomy 21 maternal serum marker screening. Results of a countrywide study of 854,902 patients.In France, maternal serum marker screening is governed by specific legislation. We conducted a study of the countrywide trisomy 21 screening based on second trimester maternal serum markers.We reviewed the medical records of 854,902 patients prospectively screened for second trimester maternal serum markers in the 60 authorized laboratories over the two-year period 1997-1998. All patients screened in France were included. The risk of trisomy 21 was calculated from the combination of maternal age and maternal serum markers. The same cut-off (1/250) was used in all laboratories.In 1998, 65% of pregnant women underwent maternal serum screening. In the 837,765 patients under 38 years of age who were screened, 54,321 (6.48%; 5% CI 6.42-6.53%) had a calculated risk >1/250. Of the 884 Down syndrome cases observed, 626 were detected by maternal serum markers (70.8%; 5% CI 67.8-73.8%). These good results can be explained by a strict quality control of all steps. For the 13,891 patients over 38 years of age, the Down syndrome detection rate was 98.9% for a 34% false-positive rate.Strict rules covering prenatal trisomy 21 screening are of benefit to patients, practitioners and laboratories alike, and ensure good quality control, a high trisomy 21 detection rate and a low amniocentesis rate.Agreement between predicted risk and prevalence of Down syndrome in first trimester nuchal translucency screening.The agreement between predicted risks of Down syndrome and observed prevalence was investigated in a population of 11,847 singleton pregnancies screened by first trimester nuchal translucency at a single institution. Twenty-seven cases of Down syndrome were observed; 20 were detected prenatally by nuchal translucency and maternal age screening, three by other means and four postnatally. The screened women were grouped according to their predicted risk of having an affected pregnancy, and this was compared with the observed prevalence. A significant correlation between predicted and observed prevalences was noted, thus demonstrating that risk estimates for Down syndrome based on first trimester nuchal translucency screening are accurate.Screening for chromosomal anomalies in the first trimester: does repeat maternal serum screening improve detection rates?To assess the within person biological variability of first trimester maternal serum biochemical markers of trisomy 21 across the 10-14 week gestational period. To evaluate whether repeat sampling and testing of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A during this period would result in an improved detection rate.Women presenting at the first trimester OSCAR clinic have blood collected prior to ultrasound dating and nuchal translucency measurement. All samples are analysed for free beta-hCG and PAPP-A before an accurate estimate of gestation is available. In 10% of cases the gestation is prior to the minimum time for NT measurement (11 weeks) and these women are rebooked for a repeat visit to the clinic at the appropriate time. Our fetal database was interrogated to obtain cases in which two maternal blood samples had been collected and analysed in the 10-14 week period. Using data from the marker correlations and statistical modelling, the impact of repeat testing on detection rate for trisomy 21 at a fixed 5% false positive rate, was assessed.261 pairs of data were available for analysis collected over a 3 year period. The correlation between free beta-hCG in sample 1 and sample 2 was 0.890 and that for PAPP-A was 0.827. The average within person biological variation for free beta-hCG was 21% and 32% for PAPP-A. The increase in detection rate when using both sets of marker data was 3.5% when using serum biochemistry and maternal age, and 1.3% when using nuchal translucency, serum biochemistry and maternal age.Repeat sampling and testing of maternal serum biochemical markers is unlikely to substantially improve first trimester screening performance.Influence of maternal smoking on the birth prevalence of Down syndrome and on second trimester screening performance.To determine the influence of maternal smoking on the birth prevalence of Down syndrome and on second trimester screening performance.First, a meta-analysis of cohort and case-control studies was performed to estimate the effect of maternal smoking on the live birth prevalence of Down syndrome. Then, data from 8779 women screened using the quadruple test (alphafetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated estriol (uE(3)), human chorionic gonadotrophin (free beta-hCG), and inhibin-A levels with maternal age) were used to determine the effect of smoking on the serum markers. A Monte Carlo simulation was used to assess the impact of adjusting for smoking status on screening performance.The relative risk of Down syndrome in smokers (versus non-smokers) was 0.95 (95% confidence interval (CI) 0.87 to 1.03). Serum marker levels were determined as multiples of the median for non-smokers of the same gestational age and adjusted for maternal weight (MoM). The MoM values for AFP were 5% higher (95% CI 2-7%), uE(3) 4% lower (95% CI 2-5%), free beta-hCG 20% lower (95% CI 17-23%) and inhibin-A 62% higher (95% CI 57-67%) in smokers compared with non-smokers. Adjusting marker levels for smoking resulted in less than a 1 percentage point increase in the detection rate for a 5% false positive rate with the double, triple or quadruple tests.There is no evidence of an association between the birth prevalence of Down syndrome and maternal smoking. The case for adjusting screening marker levels for smoking is not compelling. But if smoking data are collected routinely adjustment could be made and this would yield similar detection and false positive rates in smokers and non-smokers.A first trimester trisomy 13/trisomy 18 risk algorithm combining fetal nuchal translucency thickness, maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A.This study examines 45 cases of trisomy 13 and 59 cases of trisomy 18 and reports an algorithm to identify pregnancies with a fetus affected by trisomy 13 or 18 by a combination of maternal age fetal nuchal translucency (NT) thickness, and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 11-14 weeks of gestation. In this mixed trisomy group the median MoM NT was increased at 2.819, whilst the median MoMs for free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were reduced at 0.375 and 0.201 respectively. We predict that with the use of the combined trisomy 13 and 18 algorithm and a risk cut-off of 1 in 150 will for a 0.3% false positive rate allow 95% of these chromosomal defects to be identified at 11-14 weeks. Such algorithms will enhance existing first trimester screening algorithms for trisomy 21.Screening for chromosomal defects by fetal nuchal translucency at 11 to 14 weeks.Double-positive maternal serum screening results for down syndrome and open neural tube defects: An indicator for fetal structural or chromosomal abnormalities and adverse obstetric outcomes.The study was designed to evaluate whether double positive maternal serum screening results for Down syndrome and open neural tube defects indicate an increased risk of adverse perinatal outcome.A retrospective case-control study was conducted. In a cohort of 170,394 women who underwent maternal serum triple screening in Ontario, Canada, between October 1995 and September 1998, 189 women received positive screening results for both Down syndrome and neural tube defects. Each case was matched to 5 control subjects who had negative screening results for test center, maternal age, and specimen date. The risks for adverse perinatal outcomes were compared.Women with double-positive screening results had significantly higher risks of having fetuses with structural abnormalities (odds ratio, 14.5) and chromosomal anomalies (odds ratio, 36.3). They also had higher risks of having preeclampsia (odds ratio, 6.7), small-for-gestational age (odds ratio, 9.7), preterm delivery (odds ratio, 5.9), miscarriage, and intrauterine fetal death (odds ratio, 11.8).Double-positive maternal serum screening results are associated with fetal structural and chromosomal abnormalities and/or adverse pregnancy outcomes. Close fetal and maternal surveillance are indicated when such pregnancies are identified.Comparison of first trimester, second trimester and integrated Down's syndrome screening results in unaffected pregnancies.Our aim was to compare the results of first trimester combined test, second trimester triple test, and integrated test in the same pregnant population. We retrospectively studied 927 women, all giving birth to an unaffected baby except for two cases of Down's syndrome. The women underwent a nuchal translucency ultrasound measurement and a blood sampling for pregnancy-associated plasma protein A and free beta-hCG subunit (free total chorionic gonadotropin subunit) assay in the first trimester of pregnancy. A second trimester biochemical screening (alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol and total hCG) was performed later. The correlations between each pair of markers and between each marker level and maternal age were calculated. No marker showed significant correlation with any other or with maternal age, with the obvious exception of free beta-hCG subunit and total hCG. The false-positive rate (cut-off level: 1 in 350 at term) was 1.5% for the first trimester test, 3.6% for the second trimester test and 0.54% for the integrated test. In 10/14 pregnancies, the increased risk in the first trimester was not confirmed neither in the second trimester nor by the integrated test. In 29/33 women with an increased risk in the second trimester, the first trimester and the integrated test results were discordant. The absence of correlation among different marker levels suggests that the information supplied by the first and second trimester tests is different. Integrating first and second trimester markers in a single test could pose the ethical problem of withholding first trimester results and thus denying the possible advantages of an earlier pregnancy termination.First trimester screening with free beta-hCG, PAPP-A and nuchal translucency in pregnancies conceived with assisted reproduction.To evaluate the effect of in vitro fertilization (IVF) and intracytoplasmic sperm injection (ICSI) on free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG), pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and nuchal translucency (NT).First trimester maternal dried whole blood specimens from 74 singleton pregnancies (32 by IVF and 42 by ICSI) and 30 twin pregnancies (16 by IVF and 14 by ICSI) in which conception was achieved with assisted reproduction techniques were matched with five controls resulting in 370 singleton controls and 150 twin controls. NT was measured using the Fetal Medicine Foundation protocol. Free beta-hCG, PAPP-A and NT levels were compared between the IVF and control groups and between the ICSI and control groups using the Mann-Whitney U test.In singleton pregnancies, the only significant difference was a 21% (95% CI: -35%--7%) reduction in PAPP-A in IVF cases. In twin pregnancies, the only significant difference was a 12% (95% CI: -34%--3%) reduction in NT in IVF cases. In singleton pregnancies, the false-positive rate for Down syndrome screening was 1.4% and 1.9% greater for the IVF and ICSI groups, respectively, compared to controls for a general screening population.Patients undergoing assisted reproduction techniques should be counseled about the possibility of increased false-positive rates. Larger studies are needed to confirm this observation and to develop appropriate adjustment factors to reduce false-positive rates.Maternal serum hyperglycosylated human chorionic gonadotrophin (HhCG) in the first trimester of pregnancies affected by Down syndrome, using a sialic acid-specific lectin immunoassay.In a series of 54 cases of pregnancies complicated by Down syndrome and 224 unaffected pregnancies we examined maternal serum levels of hyperglycosylated human chorionic gonadotrophin (HhCG) in samples collected in the first trimester (11-13 weeks) using a sialic acid-specific lectin immunoassay. We compared these levels with those of other potential first trimester serum markers [free beta-hCG, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and total hCG (ThCG)] and modeled detection rates and false-positive rates of various biochemical markers in conjunction with fetal nuchal translucency (NT) and maternal age using an maternal age standardized population. Maternal serum HhCG in cases of Down syndrome were significantly elevated (median MoM 1.97) with 24/54 (44%) of cases above the 95th centile for unaffected pregnancies. Free beta-hCG was also elevated (median MoM 2.09) with 33% of cases above the 95th centile. PAPP-A levels were reduced (median MoM 0.47) with 38% below the 5th centile. ThCG levels, whilst elevated (median MoM 1.34), had only 20% of cases above the 95th centile. Maternal serum HhCG levels were not correlated with fetal NT but showed significant correlation with ThCG and free beta-hCG and with PAPP-A in the Down syndrome group (r=0.536). Maternal serum HhCG levels in cases with Down syndrome had a significant correlation with gestational age, increasing as the gestation increased. When HhCG was combined together with fetal NT, PAPP-A and maternal age, at a 5% false-positive rate the modeled detection rate was 83%, some 6% lower than when free beta-hCG was used and some 4% better than when ThCG was used. Maternal serum HhCG is unlikely to be of additional value when screening for Down syndrome in the first trimester.Application of ductus venosus Doppler velocimetry for the detection of fetal aneuploidy in the first trimester of pregnancy.To test the hypothesis the application of ductus venosus Doppler velocimetry may serve as a screening tool between 10 and 14 weeks' gestation for the detection of fetuses with chromosomal abnormalities.372 consecutive fetuses were studied. Based on prior study, a chromosomal abnormality was suspected when either the nuchal translucency was above the 95th centile, or there was reversed or absent flow in the ductus venosus during atrial contraction. Sensitivity, specificity, and the negative and positive predictive values were calculated.There were 29 chromosomally abnormal fetuses. Of these 29 fetuses, ductus venosus blood flow during atrial contraction was either absent (n = 2) or reversed (n = 25) in 93.1%. In the chromosomally normal fetuses (n = 343), only 6 (1.7%) had abnormal Doppler profiles in the ductus venosus (specificity = 98.3%, positive and negative predictive values = 81.8% and 99.4%, respectively).The Doppler waveform of the ductus venosus was at least equal to NT thickness measurement for the detection of chromosomal abnormalities.The effect of ethnic origin on nuchal translucency at 10-14 weeks of gestation.Fetal nuchal translucency (NT) increases with gestation and is affected by fetal posture and fetal gender. A recent report suggested that there might also be ethnic differences. We investigated the effect of ethnic origin on NT in an Asian population.NT was measured at 10-14 weeks. The measurements were converted into multiples of the median (MoM) for gestational day. The risk of Down syndrome was calculated by combining NT and maternal age. Cases affected by chromosomal and major structural abnormalities were excluded. NT measurements of different ethnic groups were compared.Between January 1997 and October 2001, 16 981 pregnancies with known ethnic origin and normal fetal outcome were analysed. Median NT MoM (95% CI) of the Filipinos was 1.07 (1.04-1.11). This was significantly higher than that of the Chinese, 1.01 (1.01-1.02); other Asians (Indians, Pakistanis and Nepalese), 0.96 (0.94-0.99), and Caucasians, 0.98 (0.93-1.06) (p<0.05, respectively; Mann-Whitney U-test). An NT risk cut-off of 1:180 would classify 5% of the Chinese, 4.6% of the Caucasians, 5.6% of the Filipinos and 4.2% of the other Asians as screen-positive. There were no statistically significant differences between these screen-positive rates (p>0.05, Chi-square test).Although there were statistically significant differences in NT measurements between different ethnic groups, it was clinically insignificant, as reflected by similar screen-positive rates.Combined ultrasound and biochemical screening for Down's syndrome in the first trimester: a Scottish multicentre study.To evaluate the use of ultrasound measurements of fetal nuchal translucency (NT) obtained in a routine antenatal clinic setting in combination with appropriate biochemical markers as a first trimester screening test for Down's Syndrome.Multicentre observational study.Fifteen Scottish maternity units.Pregnant women (n = 17,229) attending routine antenatal clinics at 10-14 weeks of gestation.NT measurements were attempted in all women along with the measurement of maternal serum free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (F beta hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A). All results were converted to multiples of the appropriate gestational median (MoM) and using a statistical model the risk of an affected pregnancy was derived. No results were given to participating women but all were offered routine second trimester biochemical screening. All cases of Down's Syndrome within the study group were ascertained and the detection rate for each marker was estimated.Success rate of obtaining NT measurements and overall effectiveness of ultrasound and biochemical markers individually and in combination for the detection of Down's Syndrome pregnancies.NT measurements were obtained in 72.9% of women and blood samples in 98.4%. Forty-five cases of Down's Syndrome were ascertained (2.6/1,000). NT measurements were obtained in 37 cases (median NT 1.65 MoM), blood samples in 42 cases and both NT and blood in 34 cases. In combination with the a priori maternal age risk, observed detection rates at a 5% false positive rate were 20/37 (54%) for NT, 23/42 (55%) for F beta hCG and PAPP-A and 28/34 (82%) for a combination of NT, F beta hCG and PAPP-A using a cutoff risk of 1:250. The effect of failing to obtain NT measurements in all cases reduces the overall detection rate to 62% (i.e. 28/45) if the entire series of affected pregnancies within the study group is considered.NT in combination with appropriate serum markers has the potential to detect over 80% of Down's Syndrome fetuses in early pregnancy. However, NT measurement is highly operator-dependent. It requires training, external quality control and adequate time to allow accurate measurement, otherwise suboptimal performance will result.A novel method for the detection of Down syndrome with the use of four serum markers.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the use of the Lens culinaris agglutinin-reactive alpha-fetoprotein ratio for the detection of fetal Down syndrome in combination with traditional serum markers.We obtained maternal serum from 530 women with unaffected pregnancies and 31 women who were pregnant with a fetus with Down syndrome at 14 to 20 weeks of gestation. Various combinations of Lens culinaris agglutinin-reactive alpha-fetoprotein ratio, alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated estriol were evaluated by score, without regard for the maternal age-related fetal Down syndrome risk.The best combination of serum markers, according to our scoring method, was a combination of all 4 markers. This combination showed a sensitivity of 83.9%, with a 5.1% false-positive rate for Down syndrome. Moreover, in older women, high sensitivity was obtained without increasing the false-positive rate.The screen using all 4 markers showed high sensitivity in all age groups without increasing the false-positive rate.The variation of risk estimates through pregnancy in second trimester maternal serum screening for Down syndrome.The variation of risk estimates in second trimester maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome has been shown to be considerable in quality control schemes, i.e. UKNEQAS. We studied the biological variation of risk estimates in 16 women through pregnancy. The maternal serum markers alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), unconjugated estriol (uE3) and beta-hCG were determined six times during late first to late second trimester, and the associated likelihood ratios for Down syndrome were calculated. The interpersonal variation of markers, as well as that of the likelihood ratio, was much greater than the intrapersonal variation. The average intrapersonal standard deviation (SD) of the triple test log likelihood ratio was 0.2291, corresponding to a central 95-percentile interval 0.36-2.81 of the likelihood ratio. The interpersonal SD of the log likelihood ratio was 0.5482, corresponding to a central 95-percentile interval 0.08-11.87 of the likelihood ratio. The large difference between the intra- and interpersonal variation makes it unlikely that biological variation through pregnancy is a major contributor to the variation of risk estimates obtained several times in the same pregnancy. Rather, improvements in analytical quality and laboratory management must be expected to result in reduced variation and, in consequence, better performance of screening.The comprehensive midtrimester test: high-sensitivity Down syndrome test.The purpose of this study was to develop a highly sensitive algorithm for midtrimester Down syndrome detection.Urine (hyperglycosylated human chorionic gonadotropin, beta-core fragment of human chorionic gonadotropin), serum (alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin and unconjugated estriol [uE(3)]), and ultrasound biometry (nuchal thickness, humerus length, the presence of gross ultrasonographic anomalies), and maternal age were measured at genetic amniocentesis. Stepwise logistic regression analysis was used to identify the most significant markers. A multivariate Gaussian algorithm plus age was used to derive patient-specific Down syndrome risk. Sensitivity and false-positive rates at different risk thresholds and the area under the receiver-operating characteristic curve were determined. A probability value of <.05 was significant.There were 568 study cases with 17 Down syndrome cases (3.0%). The mean (+/-SD) maternal and gestational ages for the study group were 36.9 (+/-3.5) years and 16.2 (+/-1.4) weeks, respectively. The significant markers were nuchal thickness (P =.0001), hyperglycosylated human chorionic gonadotropin(P <.001), and beta-core fragment (P <.002). Neither maternal age nor gross sonographic anomaly contributed significantly to Down syndrome detection. The comprehensive midtrimester test was extremely efficient for Down syndrome detection in advanced maternal age only cases with a sensitivity of 92.3% at a 0.8% false-positive rate. In women <35 years old, all the Down syndrome cases were detected at 2.2% false positive rate. For the overall population, the sensitivity was 93.7% at 5% false-positive rate.In a preliminary study, the comprehensive midtrimester test appeared highly sensitive in different age groups. Gross anomaly detection was not required for high performance, which makes the comprehensive midtrimester test potentially suitable for low-risk screening and as an alternative to amniocentesis in women who wish to avoid the procedure. This was a small study; thus, the clinical value of this test can only be established in large trials.Serial first- and second-trimester Down's syndrome screening tests among IVF-versus naturally-conceived singletons.It has been reported that second-trimester serum markers may be affected by assisted reproduction, leading to a higher false-positive rate.A total of 285 naturally and 71 IVF-conceived singletons which underwent a serial disclosure Down's syndrome screening programme were compared. The study protocol included first-trimester combined [nuchal translucency (NT), free beta-HCG and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A)] testing. The second-trimester triple serum screening included alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), intact HCG and unconjugated estriol (uE3). After excluding aneuploidies, miscarriages, anatomical anomalies and cases with incomplete follow-up, the serum samples of normal cases were assessed and correlated.NT measurement was not significantly changed in either group. However, the IVF group had lower PAPP-A [0.96 versus 1.05 multiples of normal median (MoM)] and higher AFP (1.13 versus 1.07 median MoM). Both groups had similar rates of first-trimester false-positive results (FPR; 7 and 9% respectively), but the IVF group had a significantly higher mid-gestation FPR rate (10 versus 5%; Pearson chi2, P = 0.029). This has contributed to amniocentesis uptake rates of 15 and 13% for the IVF and natural conception pregnancies respectively.The IVF group tended to have a significantly higher second-trimester FPR rate. To counterbalance this phenomenon, integrated first- and second-trimester screening tests or the use of NT alone might be a reasonable option that deserves further investigation.Maternal smoking: age distribution, levels of alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotrophin, and effect on detection of Down syndrome pregnancies in second-trimester screening.To study the levels of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) in the second trimester in smokers and non-smokers with unaffected and Down syndrome pregnancies; to examine the rate of smoking in different maternal age groups in a population having routine prenatal screening; and to assess the effect of smoking on the detection rates for Down syndrome and corresponding false-positive rates, both overall and in different maternal age groups.Information on maternal smoking status, maternal age and serum marker levels was collected from case note searches and the screening programme database on 2272 unaffected singleton pregnancies, 36 unaffected twin pregnancies and 103 singleton Down syndrome pregnancies.In unaffected pregnancies the smokers had a median age 3.3 years less than the non-smokers, while in the Down syndrome cases the corresponding age difference was 2.0 years. Median analyte levels in multiples of the median (MoM) in the unaffected singleton pregnancies were, for non-smokers: AFP=0.97, hCG=1.04; and for smokers, AFP=1.04, hCG=0.80. In the Down syndrome pregnancies the medians were, for non-smokers: AFP=0.69, hCG=2.49; and for smokers, AFP=0.70, hCG=1.53. Correction for smoking status gave median MoMs of 1.0 for both AFP and hCG in the unaffected pregnancies in both smokers and non-smokers. In the Down syndrome cases the corrected medians were, for non-smokers: AFP=0.67, hCG=2.29; and for smokers, AFP=0.73, hCG=1.99. Before correction for maternal smoking the overall detection rate for Down syndrome was 66.7% with a false-positive rate of 6.2%. After correction the detection rate was 67.7% with a false-positive rate of 4.9%. Between the smoking and non-smoking groups there was a significant difference in the detection rate (37.5% versus 76.0%) and the false-positive rate (1.8% versus 8.1%), which disappeared after correction for smoking status (detection rate 62.5% versus 69.3%, false-positive rate 3.9% versus 5.4%). No evidence of a lower incidence of Down syndrome in smokers was found.While correcting AFP and hCG results for maternal smoking status will have little impact on the overall detection rate for Down syndrome, it may reduce the false-positive rate and will improve the accuracy of the risks given to individual women.Accuracy of Down syndrome risks produced in a first-trimester screening programme incorporating fetal nuchal translucency thickness and maternal serum biochemistry.Over the past three years approximately 12 000 women have been screened in the first trimester through our OSCAR programme, which utilizes fetal NT and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A. During this time 30 cases of Down syndrome were identified either prenatally or postnatally. Using an established procedure the accuracy of predicted risk for Down syndrome was assessed in a population of 30 cases of Down syndrome and 11 758 unaffected pregnancies. The correlation between predicted risk and prevalence of Down syndrome was very high (r=0.9995). It is concluded that risks produced by the Fetal Medicine Foundation combined risk algorithm agree very closely with Down syndrome prevalence and can be used with confidence when counselling women of their risk.Maternal serum human chorionic gonadotrophin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A in twin pregnancies in the first trimester.To determine the levels of free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) in twin pregnancies in the first trimester.Serum samples were obtained from 67 pregnant women with twin pregnancies and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A concentrations were compared with those of 4279 singleton controls between the 8th and 13th weeks of gestation.The geometric means of chromosomally normal twin pregnancies were 1.85 MoM for free beta-hCG and 2.36 MoM for PAPP-A. There were no cases affected by Down syndrome in either group.Twin pregnancies secrete more PAPP-A than expected on the basis of singleton controls whereas free beta-hCG production is not increased. The results of the present study can be used to establish normal reference values when introducing first trimester Down syndrome screening in prenatal care.Accuracy of expected risk of Down syndrome using the second-trimester triple test.First-trimester placental volume as a marker for chromosomal anomalies: preliminary results from an unselected population.To compare first-trimester placental volume in chromosomally abnormal and normal pregnancies.Placental volumes were routinely recorded at the time of nuchal translucency thickness measurement at 10-13 weeks of gestation. This was done using customized three-dimensional ultrasound equipment and measurements were then converted to the placental quotient (placental volume/fetal crown-rump length). The possible difference in placental quotient between chromosomally normal and abnormal pregnancies was examined.A total of 2863 pregnancies was evaluated, including 17 with major chromosomal defects (nine cases of trisomy 21, four of trisomy 18, two of trisomy 13, and one each of Turner syndrome and 48,XXY + 21). The median placental quotient in the chromosomally abnormal group (0.67) was significantly lower than that in the normal fetuses (0.98). In nine of the 17 affected pregnancies the quotient was below the 10th centile of the normal range.Assessment of placental volume may prove to be useful in first-trimester risk assessment for chromosomal anomalies.Maternal serum urea resistant alkaline phosphatase in Down syndrome pregnancy.The normal levels of alkaline phosphatase (AP) activity in maternal serum are virtually the same as those observed in Down syndrome (DS) pregnancies at 14-20 weeks' gestation. Using urea inhibition of AP, we observed an atypical AP isoenzyme in the neutrophils of mothers with trisomy 21 fetuses.To assess the use of urea as a selective inhibitor of serum AP in order to seek a possible diagnostic difference between normal and DS pregnancies.Serum AP samples from 24 DS pregnancies and 204 control cases were examined at 12-22 weeks' gestation with and without 2.5 M urea AP inhibition at 18 degrees C for 2 h. The levels of AP activity obtained without urea and the percentage urea AP inhibition were analyzed in the two groups.Without urea treatment, no significant difference of total alkaline phosphatase activity levels was detected between the 204 normal controls and the 24 DS samples. Using 2.5 M urea AP inhibition, after 120 min of exposure at 18 degrees C, the residual activity, as a percentage of initial values of AP, showed significantly higher resistance in the DS samples (> or = 50 IU/l of total AP activity) at 15-22 weeks' gestation. However, at 12-14 weeks (< or = 45 IU/l of total AP activity), no significant difference was found between the DS and control cases.Serum urea resistant alkaline phosphatase in DS pregnancies showed a significant difference only at 15-22 weeks' gestation, compared with normal controls.Serum free beta-HCG and alpha-fetoprotein levels in IVF, ICSI and frozen embryo transfer pregnancies in maternal mid-trimester serum screening for Down's syndrome.The aim of this study was to compare the maternal mid-trimester free beta-HCG and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels in pregnancies conceived by assisted reproduction technology and spontaneous pregnancies in Down's syndrome screening. The influence of the number of embryos transferred and the amount of gonadotrophins used on the marker levels was also evaluated.The study population consisted of 58 IVF, 32 ICSI and 26 frozen embryo transfer (FET) singleton pregnancies. The levels of beta-HCG and AFP were compared with the control group of 6548 singleton spontaneous pregnancies.The false positive rate (FPR) in the Down's syndrome screening was 19% overall in assisted reproductive technology pregnancies, being highest (30.8%) in the FET group. The free beta-HCG multiples of the median (MoM) values were statistically significantly elevated only in the FET group (1.33 MoM; P = 0.012). A positive correlation between the number of embryos transferred and the marker levels was observed in the IVF group. No correlation was found between the amount of gonadotrophin medication used and the marker levels.The present data confirm that the overall FPR in the serum screening for Down's syndrome in assisted reproduction pregnancies is high, resulting in unnecessary invasive procedures.Raised maternal serum placenta growth factor concentration during the second trimester is associated with Down syndrome.To compare early second-trimester maternal serum placenta growth factor concentrations in Down syndrome pregnancies and those in normal pregnancies.A case-control study was performed to evaluate the maternal serum placenta growth factor concentrations in 36 Down syndrome and 320 normal pregnancies with matched gestational age during the second trimester. For the detection of serum concentrations of placenta growth factor, a quantitative sandwich enzyme immunoassay technique (R & D Systems Inc., Minneapolis, Minnesota, USA) was performed.Using a multiple linear regression model, maternal serum placenta growth factor level was associated with gestational age (p<0.001) and the existence of Down syndrome pregnancy (p<0.001). After converting maternal serum placenta growth factor concentrations of each analyte to multiples of the appropriate gestational median (MoM), placenta growth factor MoM (p<0.001) was revealed to be an independent variable for Down syndrome pregnancies after adjusting for the effects of maternal age (p<0.001), free beta-hCG (p<0.001) and AFP (p=0.014) by multivariate logistic regression analysis.Maternal serum placenta growth factor concentration was elevated in Down syndrome pregnancies during the early second trimester. Placenta growth factor might be a novel marker for maternal serum Down syndrome screening.The influence of smoking and parity on serum markers for Down's syndrome screening.To evaluate the impact of smoking and number of previous births on maternal serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein and free beta-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin (free beta-hCG).The study included 3,252 completed unaffected singleton pregnancies that proceeded beyond 37 weeks' gestation and resulted with a birth of healthy child. Smoking status of mothers and data concerning gravidity and parity were collected at the sampling date. Serum markers were measured between 13 and 22 gestational weeks, corrected for maternal weight, and converted to multiples of median (MoM) for unaffected pregnancy of the corresponding gestational age. Median MoM values for both markers were examined in relation to both: smoking habits and number of previous births.Smokers had significantly decreased free beta-hCG MoM values compared to nonsmokers (p < 0.001). The median levels showed a negative relationship with the number of previous births. The significance of a decreasing trend was proved, both in smokers (p < 0.001) and nonsmokers (p < 0.001). The median maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein MoM values did not show any significant dependence, neither with regard to smoking (p = 0.65) nor with regard to parity (p = 0.07).The recommendable adjustment of serum markers to smoking habits, especially concerning the free beta-hCG levels, would be worthwhile. The evidence of the coexisting influence of parity on serum levels of free beta-hCG, both in smokers and nonsmokers, should perhaps be a stimulus for reconsideration of which corrections the screening performance is dependent on.Relationship between nuchal translucency at 11-14 weeks and nuchal fold at 20-24 weeks of gestation.To examine the relationship between the measurement of nuchal translucency in the first trimester and nuchal fold in the second trimester in normal pregnancy.This was a prospective study of 592 singleton pregnancies. Fetal nuchal translucency was measured at 11-14 weeks of gestation and nuchal fold at 20-24 weeks of gestation. Linear regression models were used to assess the relationship between nuchal translucency and nuchal fold after adjustment for gestational age.There was no significant association between nuchal translucency and nuchal fold thickness.It is possible that measurement of nuchal translucency and nuchal fold may provide an independent contribution in screening for trisomy 21.Measurement of fetal nuchal translucency thickness by three-dimensional ultrasound.To investigate the feasibility and repeatability of nuchal translucency thickness measurement using three-dimensional ultrasound.Forty consecutive women with uncomplicated singleton pregnancies attending for Down syndrome screening at 11-14 weeks' gestation were included in this prospective crossover trial. Nuchal translucency thickness was measured using both two-dimensional and three-dimensional ultrasound. In each case two three-dimensional volumes were recorded and then examined by using the technique of planar reformatted sections. The initial plane of the first volume always contained a clear image of the nuchal region ('sagittal volume'), whilst the initial plane of the second volume was selected randomly regardless of fetal position ('random volume'). The repeatability of nuchal translucency measurement was examined by constructing a scatter diagram of the difference between the measurements plotted against the mean of two readings.Nuchal translucency measurements could be repeated in 38/40 (95%) sagittal volumes and 24/40 (60%) random volumes. The mean difference between two-dimensional measurements and those obtained by reslicing of sagittal three-dimensional volumes was -0.097 mm (95% limits of agreement from -0.481 to 0.675) and 0.225 mm (95% limits of agreement from -0.369 to 0.819) when random volumes were examined.Reslicing of stored three-dimensional volumes can be used to replicate nuchal translucency measurements only when nuchal skin can also be clearly seen on two-dimensional ultrasound.Total alpha-fetoprotein and Lens culinaris agglutinin-reactive alpha-fetoprotein in fetal chromosomal abnormalities.To examine the differences in multiples of the median (MoM) of total alpha-fetoprotein, and the proportion of Lens culinaris agglutinin reactive alpha-fetoprotein (% alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3) in the maternal serum and amniotic fluid of pregnant women whose fetuses were diagnosed with autosomal or sex chromosomal abnormalities.Prospective consecutive series.University hospital.Maternal sera and amniotic fluids from 46 pregnant women with trisomy 21 fetuses, 10 pregnant women with trisomy 18 fetuses, one pregnant woman with a trisomy 13 fetus, six pregnant women with fetal sex chromosomal abnormalities, and 100 pregnant women for whom the fetal karyotype was diagnosed as normal following a genetic amniocentesis.The proportion of alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3 in maternal serum for trisomy 21 (40.3%. P < 0.0001) and trisomy 18 (39.8%, P < 0.05) showed a significantly higher value compared with normal (32.6%). The proportion of alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3 in amniotic fluid was significantly higher (P < 0.0001) for trisomy 21 (46.6%) than for a normal karyotype (41.5%). Only for the trisomy 21 group was there a strong correlation in the % alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3 between maternal serum and amniotic fluid (r = 0.840, P < 0.0001). For all groups, there was no correlation between alpha-fetoprotein MoM and % alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3 in maternal serum and amniotic fluid.The proportion of alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3 in maternal serum is an appropriate choice for a trisomy 21 biochemical marker, and it is possible that combining alpha-fetoprotein-L2 + L3 analysis with assays of alpha-fetoprotein in maternal serum could further improve the sensitivity and specificity of multiple marker screening.Effect of fetal gender on first trimester markers and on Down syndrome screening.The purpose of the present study was to evaluate whether a gender-related difference exists in first trimester markers used for Down syndrome screening, namely nuchal translucency (NT), maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG), and whether this has an influence on screening performance.A total of 1325 patients with a singleton pregnancy underwent combined first trimester screening at 10-13 weeks' gestation. Maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG were analyzed by fluoroimmunoassay, nuchal translucency (NT) was measured by transvaginal sonography. Only patients with normal outcomes and known fetal gender were included in the study. Data were categorized by gestational age and by fetal gender.There were no significant gender-related differences in NT and PAPP-A levels. However, free beta-hCG was significantly higher (p=0.00004) in the presence of a female fetus than in the presence of a male fetus. Women with female fetuses had a higher median calculated Down syndrome risk (1:5490) compared to those having males (1:6451). This difference was not, however, statistically significant.First trimester free beta-hCG is significantly higher in pregnancies with a female fetus.First-trimester screening for Down's syndrome in in vitro fertilization pregnancies.Age related detection and false positive rates when screening for Down's syndrome in the first trimester using fetal nuchal translucency and maternal serum free betahCG and PAPP-A.To determine how first trimester detection rates for Down's Syndrome vary with maternal age and to calculate the predictive value of an increased risk report at various maternal ages.Mathematical modelling of first trimester screening performance using fetal nuchal translucency and maternal serum free betahCG and pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).From within the Gaussian distributions of each marker in normal pregnancies and those affected by Down's Syndrome a series of 15,000 marker multiple of the medians were obtained for each group. These markers were then used to calculate the risks of Down's Syndrome using maternal ages ranging from 15 to 49 and the background risk of Down's Syndrome at each age. Using a 1 in 300 risk cutoff (at time of sampling) the false positive rate and detection rate was assessed at each year of maternal age. The predictive value of a positive result was calculated using Baye's theorem.False positive rates and detection rates at each year of maternal age between 15 and 49; the predictive value of a positive result for each maternal age between 15 and 49.At 15 years of age the detection rate was 77% at a 1.9% false positive rate, 84% at a 4% false positive rate at age 30, rising to 100% at a 67% false positive rate at age 49. The probability of Down's Syndrome once identified with an increased risk was 1:34 at 15 years, 1:29 at 30 years and 1:6 at 49 years.As with second trimester biochemical screening, the detection rate and false positive rate vary considerably with age. However, detection rates across all ages are significantly higher than with second trimester screening. The risk of a positive screening result being a Down's pregnancy is considerably greater than with second trimester screening with an average probability of 1:29, compared with 1:55 in the second trimester. This information may be useful in counselling women with an increased risk result in first trimester screening.Pregnancy outcome and prognosis in fetuses with increased first-trimester nuchal translucency.One of the concerns of prenatal diagnosis is to find sensitive markers to screen for chromosome abnormalities, such as serum assays or nuchal translucency (NT). This study reports our experience with NT measurement during the first trimester of pregnancy.The study was performed prospectively on 252 fetuses with either NT > or =3 mm or cystic hygroma.We observed 50 abnormal karyotypes, i.e. 19.8%. The incidence of chromosome abnormalities increased with increasing maternal age and increasing NT thickness. For the 202 fetuses with normal karyotypes, outcome was unfavourable in 32 cases: 23 elective terminations of pregnancy, 8 spontaneous abortions and 1 neonatal death. Outcome was favourable in 141 cases. Twenty-nine pregnancies were lost to follow-up.Measurement of NT at 12 weeks' gestation seems to be a good marker for chromosome abnormalities. When the karyotype is normal, the pregnancy outcome remains correlated with the degree of NT thickness. The finding of NT >3 mm between 10 and 14 weeks' gestation dictates rigorous ultrasound monitoring and caution when predicting pregnancy outcome.Lens culinaris agglutinin-reactive alpha-fetoprotein, an alternative variant to alpha-fetoprotein in prenatal screening for Down's syndrome.Three serum tests, alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotrophin and unconjugated oestriol, are now widely used for screening for Down's syndrome. Lens culinaris agglutinin-reactive alpha-fetoprotein (AFP-L3) is a variant of alpha-fetoprotein with alpha1-->6 fucose appended to the reducing terminal N-acetylglucosamine. It is the most prominent AFP detected in the serum of patients with hepatocellular carcinoma.We investigated microheterogeneities of the carbohydrate chain on AFP in fetal liver tissues, amniotic fluids and maternal sera obtained from pregnancies with Down's syndrome using lectin affinity electrophoresis with four lectins. The percentages of AFP-L3 in maternal sera from 22 Down's syndrome and 227 unaffected pregnancies were determined.Unlike the case with AFP concentration, the percentage of AFP-L3 in maternal serum and amniotic fluid was similar, and apparently not influenced by membrane permeability. Knowing the percentage of AFP-L3 in maternal serum was effective for discriminating between Down's syndrome-affected pregnancies and unaffected pregnancies. The percentage of AFP-L3 in maternal serum identified 55% of Down's syndrome cases with a 5% false-positive rate.AFP-L3 should be an effective replacement for AFP in prenatal Down's syndrome screening.Correlations between first and second trimester markers for Down's syndrome screening.First-trimester maternal serum human thyroid-stimulating hormone in chromosomally normal and Down syndrome pregnancies.Maternal serum human thyroid-stimulating hormone (TSH) levels were investigated in chromosomally normal and Down syndrome pregnancies to determine whether TSH can be used as a marker for Down syndrome in the first trimester. Measurements were conducted on stored serum samples collected from 23 Down syndrome pregnancies and 115 unaffected pregnancies before chorionic villus sampling (CVS), between 9 and 11 completed weeks of pregnancy. The samples were matched for gestational age, maternal age, maternal weight and duration of storage of the serum sample. Maternal TSH concentration was slightly decreased in Down syndrome pregnancies, with a median of 0.84 multiples of the median (MoM). Maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) concentration was slightly elevated in Down syndrome pregnancies, with a median of 1.03 MoM. Both differences were not significant applying matched rank analysis (p=0.50 for TSH and p=0.43 for hCG). The association between TSH and hCG in unaffected pregnancies was also measured. The Spearman correlation coefficient between TSH and hCG was -0.21 which was statistically significant (p=0.02, 95% confidence interval -0.38 to -0.03). However, it was concluded that TSH is not a useful marker for distinguishing Down syndrome-affected pregnancies from normal pregnancies in the first trimester.First trimester maternal serum placenta growth factor (PIGF)concentrations in pregnancies with fetal trisomy 21 or trisomy 18.Placenta growth factor (PIGF), an angiogenic factor belonging to the vascular endothelial growth factor family, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) were measured in maternal serum from 45 pregnancies with trisomy 21, 45 with trisomy 18 and 493 normal controls at 10-13 completed weeks of gestation. In the normal pregnancies maternal serum PIGF levels increased exponentially with gestation. The median multiple of the median (MoM) PIGF concentration in the trisomy 21 group (1.26 MoM) was significantly higher (p<0.0001) than in the control group (1.00 MoM). In the trisomy 18 group the median PIGF was lower (0.889 MoM) but this did not quite reach significance (p=0.064). The corresponding median MoM values for PAPP-A were 1.00 MoM for the controls, 0.49 MoM for trisomy 21 and 0.16 MoM for trisomy 18. The median MoM values for free beta-hCG were 1.00 MoM for the controls, 2.05 MoM for trisomy 21 and 0.38 MoM for trisomy 18. In the control group there was a small but significant correlation of PIGF with free beta-hCG (r=+0.1024) and PAPP-A (r=+0.2288). In the trisomy 18 group there was a significant association between PIGF and free beta-hCG (r=+0.2629) but not with PAPP-A (r=+0.0038). In the trisomy 21 group there was a small but significant association with PAPP-A (r=+0.1028) but not with free beta-hCG (r=+0.0339). The separation of affected and unaffected pregnancies in maternal serum PIGF is small, and therefore it is unlikely that measurement of PIGF would improve screening for these abnormalities provided by the combination of fetal nuchal translucency and maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG.Screening for trisomy 21 in twin pregnancies in the first trimester: does chorionicity impact on maternal serum free beta-hCG or PAPP-A levels?In a study of 180 twin pregnancies I have examined the distribution of maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A), in addition to fetal nuchal translucency thickness (NT), in twins classified as monochorionic or dichorionic, based on ultrasound appearance at 10-14 weeks of gestation. In 45 monochorionic and 135 dichorionic twin pregnancies the median MoM free beta-hCG was not significantly different (1.00 vs 1.01), whilst that for PAPP-A was lower (0.89 vs 1.01) but again with no statistical significance. Previous reports of an increased fetal NT in monochorionic twins pregnancies could not be confirmed (1.03 vs 1.00). It is concluded that the existing pseudo risk twin correction algorithm is appropriate for both monochorionic and dichorionic twins in providing accurate first trimester risks for trisomy 21.The effect of fetal gender on second-trimester maternal serum inhibin-A concentration.Second-trimester serum inhibin-A is increasingly used as a fourth marker in addition to the triple test to screen for Down syndrome. We investigated whether fetal gender had an effect on serum inhibin-A concentration. A retrospective analysis was done on 316 normal pregnancies and 48 Down syndrome pregnancies in which maternal serum inhibin-A assays were performed between 15 and 20 weeks of gestation and in which the fetal sex was known. The median inhibin-A MoM (95% CI) for normal pregnancies in the presence of a male fetus was 0.93 (range 0.88-1.03). This was significantly lower than that in the presence of a female fetus (median MoM=1.04). The gender difference was not observed in the Down syndrome pregnancies. The increased inhibin-A concentration would lead to a 2.3-fold higher false-positive rate in the presence of a female fetus (10.6% vs. 4.6%; p<0.05, Chi-square test). Because of the small number of cases studied, the results need to be substantiated by a larger series. If the gender effect is confirmed, adjustment for fetal sex may be necessary when inhibin-A is used as a screening marker.Maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome, open neural tube defects and trisomy 18.Maternal serum screening identifies women at an increased risk of a pregnancy with Down's syndrome or trisomy 18 or an open neural tube defect. The triple test, consisting of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol and human chorionic gonadotropin was carried out by a chemiluminescence immunoassay method in our laboratory. The study consisted of 373 pregnant women. The gestational range for the study group was 14-22 weeks. The mean maternal age for the study group was 28.53 +/- 5.46 years (range 17.4 to 43.5 years); 9.1% of the women were considered at high risk for Down's syndrome based on the test results. In our study the detection rate for Down's syndrome by prenatal karyotyping was 66.6%. Maternal serum screening allows reduction of the number of women requiring amniocentesis without a significant decrease in the detection rate.First trimester screening for Down syndrome and assisted reproduction: no basis for concern.In pregnancies obtained after assisted reproduction the false-positive rate of second trimester Down syndrome (DS) screening is increased by 1.5-3-fold. This may cause an increase in the number of amniocenteses and the fetal loss rate. The present study for the first time examined whether assisted reproductive technologies affect the results of first trimester screening. The markers PAPP-A, free beta-hCG and the nuchal translucency (NT) thickness were examined at 12-14 weeks' gestation. Screening markers in 47 in vitro fertilisation (IVF), 63 ovulation induction (OI) and 3026 spontaneously conceived singleton pregnancies were compared. The MoM (multiples of the median) value in the IVF pregnancies was 1.02 (95% CI: 0.85-1.22) for PAPP-A, 1.14 (95% CI: 0.95-1.37) for beta-hCG and 0.97 (95% CI: 0.89-1.05) for NT; the MoM value in the OI pregnancies was 0.89 (95% CI: 0.76-1.05) for PAPP-A, 1.08 (95% CI: 0.93-1.25) for beta-hCG and 1.02 (95% CI: 0.95-1.11) for NT. The first trimester marker values in assisted reproductive pregnancies and spontaneously conceived pregnancies were not significantly different. Estimated false-positive rates for a risk cut-off of 1:400 varied from 4.7% in IVF pregnancies to 5.1% in OI pregnancies. Therefore the false-positive rate in Down syndrome screening should be independent of the method of conception.Karyotypes found in the population declared at increased risk of Down syndrome following maternal serum screening.Of the 65 328 pregnancies of South Australian mothers screened by the South Australian Maternal Serum Antenatal Screening (SAMSAS) Programme between 1 January 1991 and 31 December 1997, 3431 (5.25%) were declared at increased risk of fetal Down syndrome. Fetal or neonatal karyotype was determined in 2737/3431 (79.8%) of these pregnancies, including 16 with early fetal loss. Interrogation of the database of the South Australian Neonatal Screening Service showed 643 live-born infants whose phenotype was not subsequently questioned among the 694 pregnancies whose karyotype was not determined. Of the remaining 51/3431 pregnancies, 19 ended in early fetal loss without karyotyping and no newborn screening or other records could be found for 32 cases. The 129 instances of abnormal karyotype found were Down syndrome (84), trisomy 18 (four), trisomy 13 (three), triploidy (two), female sex chromosome aneuploidy (six) and male sex chromosome aneuploidy (five), inherited balanced rearrangements (19), mosaic or de novo balanced abnormalities (four) and unbalanced karyotypes (two). In the pregnancies declared at increased risk of fetal Down syndrome, only the karyotype for Down syndrome occurred with a frequency greater than that expected for the general, pregnant population.Screening for Down syndrome using first-trimester ultrasound and second-trimester maternal serum markers in a low-risk population: a prospective longitudinal study.To compare nuchal translucency and second-trimester maternal serum measurements as alternative methods of antenatal screening for Down syndrome in a low-risk population and to evaluate the consequence of combining the results in the estimation of risk.In a consecutive series of 4130 women aged less than 38 years with a singleton pregnancy, we examined both the detection rate of Down syndrome by nuchal translucency measurement at 10-14 weeks and maternal serum screening by human chorionic gonadotrophin and alpha-fetoprotein at 14-18 weeks. Women with a nuchal translucency measurement of > or = 3 mm and women with a maternal serum screening-derived risk > or = 1/250 were recommended to have amniocentesis. A second-trimester detailed ultrasound scan was also performed in all women. The outcome of all pregnancies was recorded prospectively and the detection rate and false-positive rate of different screening strategies were retrospectively analyzed.Out of the 4130 pregnancies that were followed (mean maternal age, 30.1 years), 12 cases of Down syndrome were observed (0.28%), all detected prenatally. Seven of 12 cases had a nuchal translucency measurement of > or = 3 mm (58%), and six out of 10 cases with available maternal serum screening had a calculated risk of > or = 1/250 (60%). Four of the five Down syndrome cases with a nuchal translucency measurement of < 3 mm were detected by subsequent maternal serum screening. At a threshold giving 5% of positive tests, the sensitivity of nuchal translucency, maternal serum screening and combined risk screening were 75%, 60% and 90%, respectively.In screening for Down syndrome, an approach which combines the results from first-trimester nuchal translucency and second-trimester biochemistry is effective and increases the detection rate compared to the use of any single test. However, this strategy is likely to raise the false-positive rate and the interpretation of maternal serum screening-derived risk should be combined with the first-trimester nuchal translucency measurement.Three-dimensional ultrasound measurement of the placental volume in early pregnancy: method and correlation with biochemical placenta parameters.Placental size has been an interesting topic of research for many years. The main aim of this study was to investigate the feasibility of measuring the placental volume at the end of the first trimester using three-dimensional (3D) ultrasound and to correlate these volumes to known placental functional indices and to factors affecting the placenta. Women with singleton pregnancies at the end of the first trimester were included into this study. The volume data of the placentae were correlated to the crown-rump length (CRL), placenta-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A), free beta-human chroangiogonadotropin (f-beta-hCG) and other factors that may affect the placental size or function. A total of 1462 pregnancies could be evaluated. Comparison between CRL and placental volume proved a significant correlation (r=0.43, P< 0.001). Due to the observed proportional growth of CRL and placental volume, a quotient (placental volume/CRL) was calculated for each case. There were no differences between placenta/CRL-quotients in relation to gravidity, parity or smoking. Correlations could be established between the placental volume and PAPP-A and f-beta-hCG (PAPP-A: r=0.28, P< 0.001, f-beta-hCG: r=0.10, P< 0.001). The measurement of the placenta in the first trimester can be performed in a high percentage of cases. The placenta/CRL quotient represents a simple method to compare placentae from different gestational days. The correlation between placental volume and maternal serum screening parameters might provide a chance to refine first trimester Down's syndrome serum screening. Future studies will be needed to evaluate the possible clinical use of first trimester placental volume measurements.Maternal serum levels of dimeric inhibin A in pregnancies affected by trisomy 21 in the first trimester.Dimeric inhibin A was measured in maternal serum samples from 45 pregnancies affected by trisomy 21 and 493 samples from unaffected pregnancies at 10-14 weeks of gestation. Inhibin A levels in affected pregnancies were compared with levels of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in the same series. In the trisomy 21 group, the median multiple of the median (MoM) inhibin A was not significantly elevated (1.28 vs 1.00) with only 15.5% being above the 95th centile. In contrast, the median MoM free beta-hCG was significantly increased (2.05 vs 1.00) with 36% above the 95th centile and PAPP-A was significantly reduced (0.49 vs 1.00) with 42% below the 5th centile. Inhibin A levels in the trisomy 21 group were significantly correlated with gestational age such that median levels rose from 1.04 at 11 weeks to 1.30 at 12 weeks and 1.67 at 13 weeks. These findings suggest that first trimester biochemical screening for trisomy 21, which is currently optimised using maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A and fetal nuchal translucency, will not benefit from the inclusion of inhibin A.Evaluation of first trimester maternal serum and ultrasound screening for Down's syndrome in Eastern and Northern Finland.The current trend in prenatal diagnosis is that trisomy screening is being moved to the first trimester and ultrasonographic nuchal translucency measurement is included in risk calculation. It is likely that biochemical screening in the second trimester will gradually be given up. In Eastern and Northern Finland, during the year 1999 we offered first-trimester ultrasonographic and serum screening for trisomy 21, with measurements of maternal serum PAPP-A and beta-hCG. A total of 2515 pregnant women participated in the screening, yielding the detection of eight foetuses with Down's syndrome. Six affected foetuses (75%) were detected by means of first-trimester serum screening. Since we were in the phase of collecting data for the Finnish medians for PAPP-A and beta-hCG, the women were not given the estimates of risk for trisomy 21. Only 1602 of the 2515 enrolled women had the combination of first-trimester ultrasonographic and serum screening performed, and in that group there were five foetuses with Down's syndrome. The combination ultrasonographic and serum approach yielded a Down's syndrome detection rate of 80% (four out of five) with a 5% false positive rate, whereas in nuchal translucency based-screening the detection rate was 60%, with a 5% false positive rate.Combined measurement of fetal nuchal translucency, maternal serum free beta-hCG, and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A for first-trimester Down's syndrome screening.It has been proposed that first-trimester Down's syndrome screening has a higher detection rate compared to second-trimester biochemical screening. This study investigated the accuracy of Down's syndrome screening during gestational weeks 10 to 13 using the combination of fetal nuchal translucency (NT) measurement with maternal serum concentrations of free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).A total of 1,514 women with singleton pregnancies were enrolled in this study. Fetal NT was measured using the criteria published by the Fetal Medicine Foundation. Maternal serum concentrations of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were determined by microtiter-plate ELISA. Down's syndrome risk was calculated using multivariate Gaussian distribution and Alpha software.Seventeen (1.12%) of the 1514 screened pregnancies had a fetal NT of at least 3 mm, and 41.2% of these had a poor pregnancy outcome, including four fetal aneuploidies. The odds of a fetal aneuploidy when the NT was greater than 2.0 multiples of median (MoM) was 90, when serum PAPP-A concentration was less than 0.45 MoM, it was 8.6, and when serum free beta-hCG concentration was greater than 2.2 MoM, it was 4.7. Using a risk cut-off level of 1 in 400, nine of 10 fetal aneuploidies were identified with a 4.7% false-positive rate, including two with trisomy 21, one with trisomy 18, and three with Turner's syndrome.This study demonstrated that Down's syndrome screening using the combined test in the first trimester had a higher detection rate than that of serum screening in the second trimester. Implementation of NT measurement in the first trimester provides substantial advantages for Down's syndrome detection and early diagnosis of fetal structural abnormalities.First-trimester screening for trisomy 21 in singleton pregnancies achieved by assisted reproduction.The possible effect of assisted reproduction on first-trimester screening for trisomy 21 was examined by fetal nuchal translucency thickness (NT), maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (HCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A).Parameters were measured at 11-14 weeks in 411 singleton pregnancies achieved by controlled ovarian stimulation, including 220 that had undergone IVF. Results were compared with 1233 singleton pregnancies conceived spontaneously.In the IVF pregnancies, the median fetal NT was not significantly different from that in controls, whilst the median free beta-HCG was significantly increased, and PAPP-A was significantly decreased. In the intracytoplasmic sperm injection group, fetal NT and free beta-HCG values were not significantly different from those in controls, but PAPP-A was significantly decreased. In those pregnancies achieved by ovarian stimulation, neither fetal NT, free beta-HCG nor PAPP-A were significantly different from the control group.In IVF pregnancies, screening for trisomy 21 by fetal NT, maternal serum free beta-HCG and PAPP-A levels may be associated with a 1.2% higher false-positive rate than in natural conception.Combined use of genetic sonography and maternal serum triple-marker screening: an effective method for increasing the detection of trisomy 21 in women younger than 35 years.The current standard of practice is to screen women younger than 35 years for trisomy 21 with maternal triple-marker screening, followed by amniocentesis in high-risk (1:10-1:190) patients. Non-high-risk patients are not offered further diagnostic testing. This study was conducted to determine whether genetic sonography of fetuses considered to be at moderate risk (1:190-1:1000) after maternal triple-marker screening increases the detection for trisomy 21, is cost-effective, and reduces the number of amniocenteses required to detect a single fetus with trisomy 21.After triple-marker screening, mathematical modeling was used to classify 500,000 theoretical fetuses as high, moderate, or low risk (>1:1001-1:10,000) for trisomy 21. The sensitivity for genetic sonography varied between 60% and 90%, and false-positive rates varied between 5% and 25%. Two programs (I and II) were compared with the control program. The control program included patients with high-risk fetuses (1:10-1:190) who had amniocentesis. Program I consisted of patients in the moderate-risk group (1:191-1:1000) who had genetic sonography followed by amniocentesis only when an abnormal sonographic finding was present. Program II used an approach in which genetic sonography was done for both high- and moderate-risk fetuses, and amniocentesis was performed only when an abnormal sonographic finding was present.When added to the control program, genetic sonography significantly increased the detection rate of Down syndrome (range, 68.1%-77.8% versus 49%), reduced the cost of detection, and resulted in a ratio of fetuses with Down syndrome detected to normal fetuses lost because of amniocentesis of greater than 1 (range, 2.1-4.2). Compared with the control program, program II significantly increased the detection of fetuses with trisomy 21 (range, 56%-72%) when the sensitivity of genetic sonography was >70%, reduced the cost of detection, and had ratios of trisomy 21 detection to normal fetuses lost because of amniocentesis of between 2.38 and 17.88.Women younger than 35 years and classified as having moderate risk after triple-marker screening could undergo genetic sonography under 1 of 2 approaches, either of which would result in an increased detection rate of trisomy 21 and be cost-effective without increasing the loss rate of normal fetuses after genetic amniocentesis.First-trimester Down's syndrome screening by fetal nuchal translucency measurement in Taiwan.Fetal nuchal translucency (NT) measurement is now widely used in many Western countries as a screening tool for Down's syndrome during the first trimester. However, at present there is no data on its use in Taiwan. The purpose of the present study was to evaluate the efficacy of NT measurement in first-trimester Down's syndrome screening in Taiwan.We conducted a prospective study from October 1997 to May 1999. Sonographic measurement of fetal NT was performed in 1,249 fetuses at 9-14 weeks of gestation. Transabdominal ultrasound scanning was performed to obtain a sagittal section of the fetus for measuring the crown-rump length (CRL) and the maximum thickness of the subcutaneous translucency between the skin and the soft tissue overlying the cervical spine. Two different cut-off points were used for screening: a fixed cut-off point of at least 2.5 mm and a CRL-related cut-off point. In the latter method, fetuses with an NT measurement in the 95th percentile were considered at high risk for Down's syndrome.Three fetuses had Down's syndrome, with NT measurements of 2.1 mm, 2.7 mm, and 4.0 mm. The false positive rates for the fixed cut-off point and CRL-related cut-off point were 6.3% and 4.6%, respectively. Both methods had a sensitivity of 66.7%. However, the screening program using the CRL-related cut-off point had two advantages: a higher specificity (95.5% vs 93.8%) and a more reasonable distribution pattern for screening.This study showed that NT measurement is a potential screening tool for Down's syndrome during the first trimester in Taiwan. Using CRL-related cut-off points for screening is more reasonable than using a fixed cut-off point.Clinical validation of a new dimeric inhibin-A assay suitable for second trimester Down's syndrome screening.To compare the Down's syndrome screening performance of a simplified dimeric inhibin-A assay (Diagnostic Systems Laboratories (DSL)) with an assay whose clinical utility has been established (Serotec).A case control set consisting of 51 Down's syndrome and 245 matched unaffected pregnancies collected as part of an earlier multicentre cohort study.Sera were assayed for dimeric inhibin-A using the DSL assay and Serotec reference assay. Data analysis included a method comparison of mass values, fit of data to a logarithmic Gausian distribution, and determination of detection and false positive rates. In addition, 234 fresh sera were assayed using the simplified method.The two assays showed a high correlation (r = 0.93) but average concentrations of the DSL assay were 48% higher. However, the differences were basically proportional over the range of values important for screening. The detection rate was essentially equivalent for the DSL assay whether analysed univariately or in combination with other markers (for example, 79% v 75% at a 5% false positive rate for the DSL and Serotec assays for the combination of alpha fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol, human chorionic gonadotrophin, and dimeric inhibin-A, respectively). The 234 dimeric inhibin-A values measured on fresh sera fitted a logarithm Gaussian distribution for the DSL assay, as indicated by the fit to a probability plot.The Down's syndrome screening performance of a simplified dimeric inhibin-A immunoassay was equivalent to a more labour intensive established dimeric inhibin-A assay.Does a 'notched' nuchal translucency indicate Down syndrome fetuses or other adverse pregnancy outcome?The aim of the present study was to assess the sonographic contour of the increased nuchal translucency (NT) and to correlate this with pregnancy outcome. Fifty sonographic images of fetuses with increased NT [> 95th centile thickness of the normal range for crown-rump length (CRL) between 38 and 84 mm] were retrospectively assessed. In all the cases a complete pregnancy and even infancy follow-up (< 36 months) was available. The NT appearances were subdivided into two forms: a 'notched' or 'uniform' appearance. The images were correlated with karyotype results [trisomy 21 (DS) vs euploid cases] and pregnancy outcome. Complicated outcomes were classified as being either DS fetuses, miscarriage or termination of pregnancy because of structural anomaly. Thus 30/35 (86%) of the euploid fetuses had a 'uniformly' increased NT, whereas 8/13 DS cases (62%) had a 'notched' appearance (Fisher's exact test, p = 0.004). Additionally, 27/29 fetuses (93%) which had an uneventful pregnancy outcome had a 'uniform' increased NT, whereas 12/26 (57%) of the fetuses which had adverse pregnancy outcome had a 'notched' appearance of their NT (Fisher's exact test, p < 0.001). Although it was not possible to correlate the sonographic data with post-evacuation microdissection findings, it is possible that a uniformly shaped, increased NT may be more representative of a developmental delay in a normal fetus. Conversely, a 'notched' nuchal surface may represent abnormal lymphatic or cardiovascular development more commonly seen in DS fetuses.Maternal serum levels of total activin-A in first-trimester trisomy 21 pregnancies.Maternal serum total activin-A concentration was measured in 45 pregnancies affected by trisomy 21 and 493 control unaffected pregnancies at 10-14 weeks of gestation. In the trisomy 21 pregnancies total activin-A concentration was significantly higher (1.36 MoM of the unaffected pregnancies) and in 16% of cases the level was above the 95th centile of normal. The log10 SD for the control group and the trisomy 21 group were 0.17 and 0.22, respectively. The median pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) in this trisomy 21 series was 0.49 and for free beta-hCG was 2.05. In the trisomy group there were significant positive associations between total activin-A and PAPP-A (0.6071) and free beta-hCG (0.4255). The low median difference and the high overlap in values between trisomic and unaffected pregnancies make total activin-A of little practical use in first-trimester screening for trisomy 21.Comparison of triple serum screening and pregnancy outcome in oocyte donation versus IVF pregnancies.The current study compared triple serum screening results and outcomes in 37 oocyte donation (OD) and 46 self oocyte IVF-conceived singletons of similarly aged women (28.8 +/- 4.4 years and 30.7 +/- 4.5 years respectively). Both groups were followed from their embryo transfer and throughout pregnancy. Although the daily pattern of first-trimester serum beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (HCG) was similar in both groups, higher mid-gestation HCG serum concentrations were found, i.e. 1.38 and 1.32 multiples of the median (median MoM) for IVF and OD respectively, in comparison with 0.99 median MoM from the same reference laboratory. Only the OD group had significantly increased alpha fetoprotein (AFP) concentrations (1.45 median MoM) (P = 0.002) compared with the reference laboratory. A total of 11% of the IVF and 13% of the OD women were found to be screen positive. In neither group were chromosomal abnormalities detected and no fetal or neonatal deaths were recorded. Seven (15%) of the OD and seven (19%) of the IVF women had an adverse obstetric outcome. Of those cases, six IVF and four OD women had serum HCG > or = 1.2 MoM and five OD women had AFP >1.2 MoM. Therefore, in those pregnancies the high serum HCG concentrations may alert for adverse obstetric outcome rather than indicating a high risk for Down's syndrome fetuses.Second-trimester ultrasound to detect fetuses with Down syndrome: a meta-analysis.Second-trimester prenatal ultrasound is widely used in an attempt to detect Down syndrome in fetuses, but the accuracy of this method is unknown.To determine the accuracy of second-trimester ultrasound in detecting Down syndrome in fetuses.English-language articles published between 1980 and February 1999 identified through MEDLINE and manual searches.Studies were included if they recorded second-trimester findings of ultrasonographic markers, chromosomal abnormalities, and clinical outcomes for a well-described sample of women. A total of 56 articles describing 1930 fetuses with Down syndrome and 130 365 unaffected fetuses were included.Articles were independently reviewed, selected, and abstracted by 2 reviewers. Discrepancies in data abstraction were resolved by consensus with a third reviewer. Overall estimates of sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative likelihood ratios were calculated for the following markers: choroid plexus cyst, thickened nuchal fold, echogenic intracardiac focus, echogenic bowel, renal pyelectasis, and humeral and femoral shortening. Results were stratified by whether markers were identified in isolation or in conjunction with fetal structural malformations.When ultrasonographic markers were observed without associated fetal structural malformations, sensitivity for each was low (range, 1%-16%), and most fetuses with such markers had normal outcomes. A thickened nuchal fold was the most accurate marker for discriminating between unaffected and affected fetuses and was associated with an approximately 17-fold increased risk of Down syndrome. If a thickened nuchal fold is used to screen for Down syndrome, 15 893 average-risk women or 6818 high-risk women would need to be screened for each case of Down syndrome identified. For each of the other 6 markers, when observed without associated structural malformations, the marker had marginal impact on the risk of Down syndrome. Because the markers were detected in only a small number of affected fetuses, the likelihood of Down syndrome did not decrease substantially after normal examination findings (none of the negative likelihood ratios were significant).A thickened nuchal fold in the second trimester may be useful in distinguishing unaffected fetuses from those with Down syndrome, but the overall sensitivity of this finding is too low for it to be a practical screening test for Down syndrome. When observed without associated structural malformations, the remaining ultrasonographic markers could not discriminate well between unaffected fetuses and those with Down syndrome. Using these markers as a basis for deciding to offer amniocentesis will result in more fetal losses than cases of Down syndrome detected, and will lead to a decrease in the prenatal detection of fetuses with Down syndrome.Repeat testing in antenatal screening for Down syndrome using dimeric inhibin-A in combination with other maternal serum markers.The effect on screening performance of collecting a second fresh blood sample in antenatal screening for Down syndrome has been previously reported for the commonly used double and triple tests. Recently, dimeric inhibin-A has been used with the triple test (together constituting the quadruple test) in several centres and here we assess the effect of repeat testing using inhibin-A. Routine repeat testing using the quadruple test did not yield a material increase in performance compared with having no repeat testing. For a 5% false-positive rate the increase in detection rate was only about 3-5 percentage points; a modest increase which is probably not worthwhile in the light of the extra cost and delay.Estimates for the sensitivity and false-positive rates for second trimester serum screening for Down syndrome and trisomy 18 with adjustment for cross-identification and double-positive results.Second trimester screening for fetal Down syndrome and trisomy 18 is available through separate protocols that combine the maternal age-specific risk and the analysis of maternal serum markers. We have determined the extent to which additional Down syndrome affected pregnancies may be identified through trisomy 18 screening, and the extent to which additional cases of trisomy 18 may be screen-positive for Down syndrome. The combined false-positive rate, taking into consideration those pregnancies that are screen-positive by both protocols, has also been determined. Sensitivity and false-positive rates were determined by computer simulation of results that incorporated previously published statistical variables into the model. Using second trimester risk cut-offs of 1:270 for Down syndrome and 1:100 for trisomy 18, it was found that few additional cases of Down syndrome are identified through trisomy 18 screening. However, approximately 6-10% of trisomy 18 affected pregnancies will be screen-positive for Down syndrome but screen-negative for trisomy 18. For women aged 40 or more, the false-positive rate for trisomy 18 exceeds 1% and approximately half of these cases will also be screen-positive for Down syndrome. For a population with maternal ages equivalent to that in the United States in 1998, after adjusting for the cross-identification, the sensitivity for three-analyte trisomy 18 screening is 78%. If this testing is performed in conjunction with Down syndrome "triple" screening, the Down syndrome sensitivity is 75% and the combined false-positive rate is 8.5%. If the three-analyte trisomy 18 screening is performed with the Down syndrome "quad" screen, the trisomy 18 sensitivity remains at 78%, the Down syndrome sensitivity is 79%, and combined false-positive rate is 7.5%. Sensitivity and false-positive rates are also provided for other widely used Down syndrome and trisomy 18 risk cut-offs. Sensitivity and false-positive rates that take into consideration cross-identification and double-positives should be helpful for pre-test counseling and the evaluation of serum screening programs.Alpha-fetoprotein microheterogeneity: a potential biochemical marker for Down's syndrome.Our purpose was to examine the utility of analyzing alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) microheterogeneity assessed by lectin affinity in Down's syndrome (DS) screening. Maternal sera and amniotic fluids were collected from 18 women who were carrying DS fetuses and 70 unaffected pregnancies around 16 weeks of gestation. The percentages of AFP which reacted with Lens culinaris agglutinin (AFP-L2,3) were determined by lectin affinity electrophoresis. AFP-L2,3 levels were significantly increased (P<0.0001) in both maternal serum and amniotic fluid from DS-affected versus unaffected pregnancies. The fractional areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves were 0.835 and 0.700 (P=0.106) for AFP-L3 and AFP MoM (multiples of the median) in maternal serum. No correlation was found between AFP-L3 and AFP MoM in maternal serum (r=0.006). Our data suggest that the measurement of AFP-L3 in maternal serum is a potential biochemical marker for DS.Triple marker screening for trisomy 21, trisomy 18 and open neural tube defects in singleton pregnancies of native Japanese pregnant women.To report the results of prenatal triple marker screening on a population of Japanese pregnant women.From April 1994 through March 1999, a total of 32,925 native Japanese women with singleton pregnancies requested a triple marker-screening test. Multiples of the median values for 3 markers and individual risks for each patient were calculated following adjustment for the Japanese weight correction factor. The risk cut-off values used for Down syndrome (T21), open spina bifida (OSB) and trisomy 18 (T18) were 1: 295, 1: 290, and 1: 100, respectively. Follow-up information was collected postpartum and statistically analyzed.Detection rates (DR) of T21 for women less than 35 years, over 35 years and overall were 58, 94, and 83%, respectively. DR of T18 for women less than 35 years, over 35 years and overall were 75, 79, and 79%, respectively. DR of open neural tube defects (ONTD) was 100%.The first cumulative data of an intervention program and prospective follow-up studies in Japan have proven to be similar to other published reports. Individual risk values were calculated for each pregnancy for T21, T18 and ONTD. This screening program is more effective than age-dependent screening for detecting T21, T18 and ONTD pregnancies.Detection of aneuploidy with fetal nuchal translucency and maternal serum markers in Japanese women.Extent of correlation between first and second trimester markers for Down's syndrome screening.The influence of parity and gravidity on first trimester markers of chromosomal abnormality.We have studied changes in first trimester fetal nuchal translucency (NT) and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A with gravidity and parity in 3252 singleton pregnancies unaffected by chromosomal abnormality or major pregnancy complications. We have shown that gravidity and parity is associated with a small but progressive decrease in fetal NT and a small but progressive increase in free beta-hCG and PAPP-A. None of these small changes with increasing gravidity or parity are statistically significant and hence correction for these variables is not necessary when considering first trimester screening for chromosomal abnormalities.Combined first trimester nuchal translucency and second trimester biochemical screening tests among normal pregnancies.We prospectively examined whether first trimester nuchal translucency (NT) and second trimester triple test (TT) results are correlated, and determined overlapping and mutual screen-positive rates. Results of NT, TT, amniocentesis and pregnancy outcome were obtained in 508 normal pregnancies. Inter-test correlation was performed by comparing the likelihood ratios (LR). Overlapping of screen-positive cases, of NT and TT, was determined by comparing mutual risks for Down syndrome (DS) livebirth of > or = 1:380. Combined screen-positive rates were evaluated by using summation risk (NT and/or TT exhibiting a risk > or = 1:380) and calculated risk (new risk > or / =1:380, based on multiplication of LR(NT) and LR(TT)). Screen-positive rates between NT and TT differed significantly and when either test showed an increased risk for DS, the probability of the other to predict the same was negligible (p<0.001). Overall screen-positive rates, at a risk > or = 1:380, were 2% and 5.7% for NT and TT, respectively. Summation and calculated combining methods were associated with 7.5% and 2.0% screen-positive rates, respectively. Amniocentesis was performed on 20.7% of the cases, mostly screen-negative ones. Our results showed that, in normal pregnancies, NT and TT do not correlate and that their combined calculated risk in normal pregnancies is associated with a low screen-positive rate of 2.0%.Fetuses with cystic hygroma. A retrospective study.The aim of this study is to analyse several theories of pathogenesis of cystic hygroma, its correlation with chromosomal abnormalities and the indicators of poor or good prognosis.Nuchal translucency in multiple pregnancies.To evaluate the prevalence of increased nuchal translucency (NT) in multiple pregnancies and its relation to fetal karyotype and pregnancy outcome.We measured fetal nuchal translucency (NT) in 6,338 women pregnant from 10+3 to 13+6 weeks by ultrasound and evaluated the prevalence of NT=95th centile in 115 multiple pregnancies, including 100 pairs of twins (70 dichorionic and 30 monochorionic placentas), 9 triplets, 5 quadruplets, and one quintuplet. Chorionicity, fetal karyotype, and pregnancy outcome were also evaluated in 400 singleton pregnancies.NT=95th centile in a single fetus was found in 10/70 cases of dichorionic twin pregnancies (14%), in two quadruplets, in 7/30 monochorionic twin pregnancies (23.3%), and in both fetuses in one dichorionic twin pregnancy. In the control group, NT=95th centile was found in 17/400 (4.2%) cases. In multiple pregnancies, two cases of trisomy 21 and one of 47, XXY were found. NT=95th centile was found in 2/2 fetuses with trisomy 21 (one dichorionic twin pregnancy and one tetrachorionic pregnancy), but not in the 47, XXY trisomy (trichorionic triplet pregnancy). A skeletal dysplasia and a Goldenhar syndrome were found among the 10 dichorionic pregnancies with increased NT. Three intrauterine deaths of both fetuses, one congenital heart disease, and a case of twin-to-twin transfusion occurred in 7 monochorionic pregnancies with increased NT.Increased NT in multiple pregnancies indicates fetuses at risk of chromosomal abnormalities and fetal malformation, and monochorionic twin pregnancies at higher risk of adverse outcome.The influence of fetal sex in screening for trisomy 21 by fetal nuchal translucency, maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 10-14 weeks of gestation.In a study of 2923 normal pregnancies and 203 pregnancies affected by trisomy 21 we have shown a significant difference in the median MoM of the markers: fetal nuchal translucency, maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in the presence of a female fetus compared with a male fetus. For maternal serum free beta-hCG levels are higher by 15% if the fetus is chromosomally normal and by 11% if the fetus has trisomy 21. For maternal serum PAPP-A the levels in chromosomally normal fetuses are 10% higher in the presence of a female fetus and 13% higher if the fetus has trisomy 21. In contrast, fetal nuchal translucency is 3-4% lower in both chromosomally normal and trisomy 21 female fetuses. The consequence of such changes when screening for trisomy 21 will be a reduction in the detection rate in female fetuses by a factor of 1-2%. Correction of risk algorithms for fetal sex, however, is probably not feasible, since ultrasound detection of fetal sex is only 70-90% accurate in the 10-14 week period.Second-trimester prenatal screening for Down syndrome and the relationship of maternal serum biochemical markers to pregnancy complications with adverse outcome.In a group of 26 524 control pregnancies and a group of 3728 pregnancies affected by one or more of the pregnancy complications of low birthweight, intra-uterine growth restriction (IUGR), preterm delivery and stillbirth, I have compared the relative risk of occurrence of these complications in pregnancies which had a raised maternal serum AFP (>2.0 MoM), raised maternal serum free beta-hCG (>2.0 MoM), low AFP (<0.5 MoM), low free beta-hCG (<0.5 MoM), combined raised AFP and free beta-hCG (>2.0 MoM), and in those with an increased Down syndrome risk (1 in 250 or greater). In the low birthweight group, only an increased AFP and decreased free beta-hCG showed significance with relative risks of 1.6 and 2.1. In the IUGR group, also only an increased AFP and decreased free beta-hCG showed significance with relative risks of 1.6 and 2.3. In the preterm delivery group, raised AFP, reduced free beta-hCG, and combined elevated AFP and free beta-hCG showed significance with relative risks of 3.8, 1.8 and 6.2. In the stillbirth group, raised AFP, reduced free beta-hCG, and combined elevated AFP and free beta-hCG showed significance with relative risks of 4.5, 2,4 and 7.2. An isolated raised free beta-hCG or an increased Down syndrome risk were not associated with an increased relative risk for any of the pregnancy complications investigated. However, apart from the six to seven-fold increased risk when both AFP and free beta-hCG are above 2.0 MoM, suggesting increased risk of preterm delivery or impending fetal death, the clinical utility of such significant differences is probably poor.The influence of fetal sex in screening for Down syndrome in the second trimester using AFP and free beta-hCG.In a study of 30 802 unaffected pregnancies and 90 cases of Down syndrome I have analysed second trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) and grouped the data by fetal sex. In pregnancies with an unaffected female fetus maternal serum AFP was significantly lower (3%) than in the presence of a male fetus, whilst free beta-hCG was significantly raised (7%) in the presence of a female fetus. These differences led to a significantly higher false positive rate in women carrying a female fetus (5.78% versus 4.64%). In pregnancies affected by Down syndrome the median AFP in the presence of a female fetus was not significantly different to that with a male fetus (0. 72 versus 0.73); similarly for free beta-hCG the difference (2.37 versus 2.48) was not statistically significant. Although the detection rate amongst male fetuses was slightly higher than in females (74% versus 66%), this was not statistically significant. Although fetal gender does appear to have a significant effect on maternal serum marker levels, leading to a higher false positive rate in females, in cases of Down syndrome there is no evidence that such marker differences are significant and consequently little evidence for any fetal gender bias in detection rates.Dimeric inhibin A as a fourth marker for Down's syndrome maternal serum screening in native Japanese women.This study was conducted to assess the usefulness of dimeric inhibin A as a fourth marker for Down's syndrome screening in addition to AFP, hCG and uE3 markers for native Japanese women.Serum specimens from 367 native Japanese women in the second trimester were assayed for dimeric inhibin A levels. Day specific dimeric inhibin A medians were established for gestational ages 15.0-21.9. Weekly median values for the native Japanese were compared with those of a U.S. population. Selected Japanese specimens from 15 diagnosed Down's syndrome and 3 trisomy 18 cases were also assayed for dimeric inhibin A.Dimeric inhibin A levels did not vary greatly over the gestational age range as expected. Median value comparison showed that native Japanese dimeric inhibin A medians are higher than the U.S. population medians by an average of 7.95%. Native Japanese dimeric inhibin A median values in this study are 1.77 times higher in Down's syndrome cases than in unaffected pregnancies. Trisomy 18 dimeric inhibin A levels show no significant difference from the unaffected pregnancies.This report shows for the first time that dimeric inhibin A can be informative as a fourth marker for Down's syndrome screening in native Japanese women. We expect the addition of dimeric inhibin A to a triple marker protocol will increase the accuracy of predicted risk for all pregnancies screened and increase the detection rate of Down's syndrome affected pregnancies.First-trimester Down syndrome screening using dried blood biochemistry and nuchal translucency.To assess the effectiveness of free beta-hCG, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A, and nuchal translucency in a prospective first-trimester prenatal screening study for Down syndrome and trisomy 18.Risks were calculated for Down syndrome and trisomy 18 based on maternal age and biochemistry only (n = 10,251), nuchal translucency only (n = 5809), and the combination of nuchal translucency and biochemistry (n = 5809).The study population included 50 Down syndrome and 20 trisomy 18 cases. Nuchal translucency measurement was done on 33 Down syndrome and 13 trisomy 18 cases. Down syndrome screening using combined biochemistry and ultrasound resulted in a false-positive rate of 4.5% (95% confidence interval [CI] 3.9%, 5.2%) and detection rate of 87.5% (95% CI 47%, 100%) in patients under age 35 years. In older patients, the false-positive rate was 14.3% (95% CI 12.7%, 15. 8%) and detection rate was 92% (95% CI 74%, 99%). For trisomy 18 screening, the false-positive rate was 0.4% (95% CI 0.24%, 0.69%) and detection rate was 100% (95% CI 40%, 100%) in younger patients, whereas in older patients the false-positive rate was 1.4% (95% CI 0. 9%, 2.0%) and detection rate was 100% (95% CI 66%, 100%). Using modeling, at a fixed 5% false-positive rate, the Down syndrome detection rate was 91%. Conversely, at a fixed 70% Down syndrome detection rate, the false-positive rate was 1.4%.First-trimester screening for Down syndrome and trisomy 18 is effective and offers substantial benefits to clinicians and patients.The influence of ethnic origin on first trimester biochemical markers of chromosomal abnormalities.In a first trimester study of 5422 Caucasian women, 752 Afro-Caribbean women and 170 Asian women we have shown that the median maternal serum marker MoMs for free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were 19% and 48% higher in Afro-Caribbean women and 19% higher and 35% higher in Asian women, compared to Caucasian women. Correcting for maternal weight made very little difference to the effect in Afro-Caribbeans (21% and 57% higher after weight correction) but reduced the effect in Asians (4% and 17% higher after weight correction ). It is estimated that correcting for maternal weight and ethnicity overall would increase the detection rate by a modest 1.4%. However, the effect on an individual's risk could result in as much as a two-fold increase in the patient specific risk for trisomy 21. The impact of ethnic origin seems to be greater than that observed with second trimester biochemical markers and larger studies are required in order to develop robust algorithms for correcting for ethnic origin in the first trimester.Acceptability of serum screening as an alternative to cytogenetic diagnosis of down syndrome among women 35 years or older in Hong Kong.The addition of second trimester serum markers to maternal age increases the efficacy of screening for Down syndrome by maternal age alone. Among women aged 35 years or older, serum screening makes a large proportion of amniocentesis unnecessary. However, there are ethical and medicolegal concerns about serum screening in 'old' women, largely because some of the pregnancies affected by Down syndrome and other chromosomal abnormalities may not be detected. We investigated the acceptability of serum screening in women aged 35 years or older when it was offered as an alternative to prenatal cytogenetic diagnosis after detailed counselling. Women referred for prenatal diagnosis of Down syndrome because of advanced maternal age were given the options of cytogenetic diagnosis by chorionic villus sampling (CVS) or amniocentesis. As an alternative, they could choose to undergo second trimester serum human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) screening first before deciding on whether to undergo amniocentesis. Between January 1997 and October 1999, 3419 subjects were recruited. 1807 women (52. 9%) chose to undergo serum screening, 1516 women (44.3%) chose to have amniocentesis and 96 women chose to have CVS (2.8%). The proportion of women who chose serum screening rose steadily from 38. 8% in the year of 1997 to 63.4% in 1999. Significantly fewer Chinese women chose serum screening than non-Chinese. The decision as to whether to undergo an invasive diagnostic procedure or to be content with the relatively safer but less accurate screening test varies, being affected by the women's background and culture.Maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A in fetal sex chromosome defects in the first trimester.We have studied maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A, and fetal nuchal translucency (NT) in a series of 46 cases of fetal Turner's syndrome, 13 cases of other sex chromosomal anomalies and compared these with 947 control pregnancies in the first trimester. In cases of Turner's syndrome (45,X) the median fetal NT was significantly higher than in controls (4.76 MoM), the median PAPP-A was significantly lower (0.49 MoM), whilst the free beta-hCG was not significantly different (1.11 MoM). For NT, 93% (43/46) of cases were equal to or greater than the 95th centile of controls, for PAPP-A 35% (16/46) of cases were less than or equal to the 5th centile of controls and for free beta-hCG 15% (7/46) of cases were equal to or greater than the 95th centile of controls. For other sex chromosomal anomalies (47XXX, XXY, XYY) the median NT was increased (2.07 MoM) whilst PAPP-A was not significantly decreased (0.88 MoM) and free beta-hCG was not significantly different (1.07 MoM) from controls. Using a previously derived multivariate risk algorithm for trisomy 21, incorporating NT, PAPP-A, free beta-hCG and maternal age, 96% of the Turner's cases and 62% of the other sex chromosomal anomalies would have been identified.Is maternal serum total hCG a marker of trisomy 21 in the first trimester of pregnancy?In a study of 130 first trimester cases of trisomy 21 and 959 controls we have shown that the median MoM for alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) is lower (0.82) and that for total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) is higher (1.31) than in the control group. For AFP 15.3% of cases were below the 5th centile and for total hCG 19. 8% were above the 95th centile. The median shift observed for AFP and total hCG is poorer than that for pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) or free beta-hCG and together with maternal age, AFP and total hCG could only be expected to detect 40% of cases. In combination with PAPP-A, total hCG would identify 52% of cases, somewhat less than the 67% observed with free beta-hCG and PAPP-A. However, we have demonstrated for total hCG a significant temporal change in median MoM with gestational age. Before 70 days the median MoM was less than 0.5, between 70 and 83 days this increased to 1.13, and between 84 and 97 days this increased to 1.52. This median shift has significant implications for interpreting previous studies and even more significant implications for detection rates. When population parameters specific to the gestational age in question are used, detection rates with total hCG and PAPP-A increase from 47% at 70-83 days to 60% at 84-97 days. This observation explains much of the confusion around total hCG in the first trimester and shows the importance of selecting analyte pairs and population parameters appropriate to the time in gestation when screening is performed.[Significance of nuchal edema in fetuses of pregnant women under 35 years of age].The aim of this study was to survey the connection between the fetal nuchal oedema and the increased risk of the aneuploidies. According to the prenatal care the thickness of the nuchal fold was measured on the 11-12th gestational week by 6.5 MHz transvaginal transducer (ATL-HDI and Hitachi EUB-450). Cases were underlined where the presence of nuchal oedema (> or = 3 mm) made the indication for chromosomal analysis among the 280 single pregnancies and fetal karyotyping was carried out. Nuchal oedema was observed in 72/280 cases of pregnant women under 35 years old and in 20/280 cases of that above 35 years old, the nuchal oedema was another indication beside the age. Abnormal karyotype was observed in 9/72 (12.5%) cases among the pregnant women under 35 years old and in 10/92 (10.87%) cases among the pregnancies with fetal nuchal oedema. It was also observed abnormal karyotype in 6/188 (3.19%) cases of pregnancies without nuchal oedema and in 16/280 (5.71%) cases of chromosomal analyses with or without nuchal oedema. This can be an effective method for screening the fetal aneuploidies and other fetal anomalies, both in the high risk and the normal pregnant population, especially in cases of pregnant women under 35 years old belonging to the normal genetical risk population.Maternal midtrimester serum AFP and free beta-hCG levels in in vitro fertilization twin pregnancies.We aimed to compare the levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta-hCG) levels as multiples of the median (MoM) values between spontaneous and in vitro fertilized (IVF) twin pregnancies. The control group of spontaneous singleton pregnancies was used for calculating the gestational age specific median levels of the values. Within a cohort of 19 310 pregnancies, 145 twin pregnancies were identified. The data were collected from Down syndrome (DS) screening programmes in four University catchment areas in Finland between 1994-98. Maternal midtrimester serum marker levels were measured across gestational weeks 14-18. There were no fetal chromosome anomalies in either of the twin groups or the singleton group. Serum AFP of 145 and beta-hCG values of 39 spontaneous twin pregnancies were compared to the values of 6548 singleton pregnancies. In IVF twins 30 AFP and 29 beta-hCG values were compared to the levels of the control group. Both AFP and beta-hCG values were twice as high in the spontaneous twin pregnancies (medians 2.18 and 1.83 MoM respectively) as in the singleton group (medians 1.00 and 1.00 MoM respectively). In IVF twin pregnancies beta-hCG levels were higher (median 2.20 MoM) than in spontaneous twins (p=0.08), whereas no significant difference was found in AFP levels (2.30 MoM). In conclusion, the higher levels of beta-hCG levels in IVF twin pregnancies should be considered in DS screening to avoid high false positive rates.Six year survey of screening for Down's syndrome by maternal age and mid-trimester ultrasound scans.To assess the effectiveness of antenatal screening for Down's syndrome by maternal age and routine mid-pregnancy ultrasound scanning.Retrospective six year survey.Maternity units of a district general hospital.Pregnant women booked for delivery in hospital between 1 January 1993 and 31 December 1998.All cases of Down's syndrome occurring in district identified from regional congenital anomaly register and cytogenetic laboratory records. Women's case notes were examined to identify indication for karyotyping, gestation at diagnosis, and outcome of pregnancy.31 259 deliveries occurred during study period, and 57 cases of Down's syndrome were identified, four in failed pregnancies and 53 in ongoing pregnancies or in neonates. The analysis was confined to ongoing pregnancies or liveborn children. Invasive antenatal tests were performed in 6.6% (2053/31 259), and 68% (95% confidence interval 56% to 80%) of cases of Down's syndrome were detected antenatally, giving a positive predictive value of 1.8%. There were 17 undetected cases, and in seven of these the women had declined an offer of invasive testing. In women aged less than 35 years the detection rate was 53% (30% to 76%). Most of the cases detected in younger women followed identification of ultrasound anomalies.The overall detection rate was considerably higher than assumed in demonstration projects for serum screening. As a result, the benefits of serum screening are much less than supposed. Before any new methods to identify Down's syndrome are introduced, such as nuchal translucency or first trimester serum screening, the techniques should be tested in properly controlled trials.Screening for trisomy 21 in twin pregnancies in the first trimester using free beta-hCG and PAPP-A, combined with fetal nuchal translucency thickness.In the first trimester of pregnancy the biochemical markers free beta-hCG and pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) are used for the prenatal screening of trisomy 21, either alone or in combination with nuchal translucency (NT) thickness. In this study, I have analysed the distribution of these biochemical markers in 159 twin pregnancies and compared this with 3466 singleton pregnancies. On average free beta-hCG values are 2.099 times greater in twins than in singletons and PAPP-A some 1.86 times greater. The width of the analyte distribution in twins is very similar to that in singleton pregnancies. Using statistical modelling techniques I have predicted that at a 5% false positive rate the detection rate in twins discordant for trisomy 21 will be 52% and in twins concordant for trisomy 21 will be 55%, if correction for twin pregnancy is carried out using the 'pseudo risk' approach. The detection rate using biochemical parameters is less than that achievable for twins using NT (75%). However, the combination of NT and maternal serum biochemistry will give detection rates approaching 80%. These rates are some 10% less than in singleton pregnancies, but nevertheless combining NT and biochemistry will allow high rates of detection of affected twins with the benefit of ultrasound and NT being able to specifically locate the affected twin. Twin screening using both modalities should be considered when introducing first trimester screening.[Measurement of pregnancy-associated plasma protein A in maternal peripheral blood and Down syndrome].Integrated screening for Down's syndrome.Serum markers for Down's syndrome in women who have had in vitro fertilisation: implications for antenatal screening.To examine the Down's syndrome screening positive rate among in vitro fertilisation (IVF) pregnancies, we measured second trimester serum marker levels in singleton IVF pregnancies (cases) and in five non-IVF pregnancies (controls) matched to each case for gestational age, age of mother, and duration of storage of the serum sample. There were 151 IVF pregnancies in which alpha fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol (uE3), free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and total hCG were measured, 104 IVF pregnancies in which free alpha-hCG was measured, and 39 IVF pregnancies in which inhibin A was measured. Median uE3 levels were 6% lower (P = 0.003), median free beta-hCG 9% higher (P = 0.024), and median total hCG 14% higher (P = 0.026) in IVF pregnancies compared with controls. The screen positive rate in the IVF pregnancies (28%) was about twice as high as that in controls (17%). High hCG levels may be explained by progesterone remaining high in IVF pregnancies. The low uE3 levels remain unexplained. In Down's syndrome screening in IVF pregnancies hCG and uE3 values should be adjusted to avoid the high screen positive rate.Second trimester prenatal screening for Down's syndrome using alpha-fetoprotein and free beta hCG: a seven year review.To determine the value and impact over a seven year period of a second trimester screening programme for trisomy 21 and trisomy 18, using the two maternal serum markers alpha-fetoprotein and free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin.Retrospective review.A biochemical screening laboratory serving three health districts with three antenatal clinics in both teaching and nonteaching hospitals.67,904 pregnancies in women of all ages screened between 14 and 22 weeks of gestation between 1 April 1991 and 31 March 1998.All women booked into three major antenatal clinics were offered biochemical screening. Women at increased risk of trisomy 21 or trisomy 18 (> or =1 in 250 at term) were offered an invasive diagnostic procedure. Follow up of the outcome of all pregnancies was performed.Detection rate for trisomy 21 and trisomy 18, false positive rates, uptake of screening, uptake of amniocentesis in women identified at increased risk, prevalence of trisomy 21 at birth, detection and false positive rates by maternal age, fetal loss rate after amniocentesis, report turn around time, and identification of other anomalies.Overall, 87% (67,904/78,501) of women underwent screening. The rate of detection of trisomy 21 was 75% (80/107; 95% CI 66 to 83) with a 5.1% false positive rate (3466/67,904; CI 4.9 to 5.3%). In women under 30 years of age the detection rate was 60% (18/30; CI 41 to 77) with a 2.6% false positive rate (956/36,371; CI 2.5 to 2.8). The rate of detection of trisomy 18 was 57% (8/14; CI 29 to 82) with a 0.7% false positive rate (475/67,904; CI 0.64 to 0.76). Uptake of amniocentesis was 83% (2912/3508). Women were 3.3 times more likely to refuse amniocentesis if the risk was close to the cutoff (1 in 250) than if the risk was > or =1 in 50. Fetal loss within 28 days of amniocentesis was 0.9% (25/2912). Prenatal screening identified 84 other anomalies in addition to 41 cases of impending fetal death.Second trimester prenatal screening for trisomy 21 and trisomy 18 using a simple two marker approach incorporating free beta hCG can achieve high detection rates over a long period of time. Health authorities who still have not introduced trisomy 21 screening should be encouraged by what can be achieved and should consider making such screening available to all women. Established second trimester detection rates of 75% for a 5% false positive rate will be the benchmark by which first trimester screening using nuchal translucency, PAPP-A and free beta hCG will be judged.Maternal serum s100b protein is ineffective for Down syndrome screening.The influence of smoking on maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta hCG levels in the first trimester of pregnancy.In an analysis of 3111 singleton pregnancies routinely screened in the first trimester with nuchal translucency, free beta hCG and pregnancy associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) smoking has been found to occur in 20.8 per cent of pregnant women. When the individual marker levels were assessed in smokers and non-smokers, levels of PAPP-A were reduced in smokers by some 15 per cent. Despite free beta hCG levels being reduced by 10-14 per cent in the second trimester of smoking women, in the first trimester period this is not evident. Simulation studies would suggest that in smokers the detection of trisomy 21 using free beta hCG, PAPP-A and maternal age will be reduced by some 5 to 6 per cent compared with that of the general population.Maternal serum superoxide dismutase (SOD): a possible marker for screening Down syndrome affected pregnancies.Superoxide dismutase (SOD: EC1.15.1.1) has been shown to increase in Down syndrome (DS) subjects and in amniotic fluid from DS affected pregnancies. In order to verify a possible increase of maternal serum SOD in DS affected pregnancies and its possible contribution in prenatal screening, the serum enzyme activity was retrospectively measured in samples from normal and DS affected pregnancies. Alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), unconjugated oestriol (uE3) and serum SOD were measured in serum samples collected from 80 normal and 9 DS affected second-trimester pregnancies. The maternal serum SOD activity in the DS group (3. 12+/-0.73 U/ml) was significantly higher (p<0.001) than in the control one (2.20+/-0.7 U/ml). The addition of SOD appeared to be capable of improving the sensitivity of the conventional multi-parametric test (AFP, uE3 and hCG) even if the small number of subjects did not allow the achievement of statistical significance.Elevated second-trimester maternal serum hCG in patients undergoing haemodialysis.Prenatal Down syndrome screening with maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) has become common. High levels of maternal serum hCG and low levels of AFP have been associated with an increased risk of fetal Down syndrome. In this paper, we report five pregnancies in patients undergoing long-term haemodialysis, all of whom had false-positive second-trimester Down syndrome screening results. All of our five patients had extremely high levels of maternal serum hCG, but normal AFP values for their gestational age, and all had serious complications during pregnancy.The proform of eosinophil major basic protein: a new maternal serum marker for Down syndrome.The proform of eosinophil major basic protein (proMBP), the most abundant protein in the eosinophil specific granule, is synthesized by the placenta and secreted into the maternal circulation, where it is found complex-bound to pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) and other proteins. We examined the potential of proMBP as a maternal serum marker for fetal Down syndrome (DS) by determining its maternal serum concentration (MSpMBP) in 25 Down syndrome (DS) pregnancies and 152 control pregnancies in the first trimester, and in 105 DS pregnancies and 156 control pregnancies in the second trimester. The median (95 per cent confidence interval) MSpMBP MoM in DS pregnancies (n=15) was 0.66 (0.49-0.79) in gestational weeks 5-9; 1.06 (0.71-1.97) in weeks 10-12 (n=10) and 1.62 (1.18-1.98) in weeks 14-20 (n=105). Using parameterized receiver operator characteristics analysis for proMBP as a single marker for DS, detection rates (DRs) of 22 per cent and 38 per cent, for false-positive rates (FPRs) of 5 per cent, were found in weeks 5-9 (using MSpMBP</=cut-off) and weeks 14-20 (using MSpMBP>/=cut-off), respectively. When age and MSpMBP were used as markers in combination, a DR of 36.8 per cent for an FPR of 5.5 per cent was obtained in weeks 5-9 using a risk cut-off of 1:250. In weeks 14-20 the DR was 48.4 per cent for an FPR of 5.3 per cent using the same risk cut-off. This makes proMBP a marker comparable in diagnostic efficiency to human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and exceeding that of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and unconjugated oestriol (uE3), in the second trimester.Increased first trimester nuchal translucency: pregnancy and infant outcomes after routine screening for Down's syndrome in an unselected antenatal population.Although increased nuchal translucency (NT) has been linked to a wide range of fetal chromosomal abnormalities and genetic syndromes, very few studies have looked at the outcomes of chromosomally normal pregnancies in unselected obstetric populations. This study aims to evaluate the outcomes of pregnancies with nuchal translucency measurements greater than or equal to 4 mm in a low risk obstetric population attending for routine first trimester screening. Women attending for booking scans were routinely offered nuchal translucency measurement as a screening test for Down's syndrome between 10 and 14 weeks gestation. The prevalence of increased nuchal translucency was 0.8% (n = 53). There were 15 (28.3%) chromosomal abnormalities, the commonest of which was Down's syndrome. Of the 38 chromosomally normal pregnancies, seven resulted in intrauterine death, early neonatal death or termination of pregnancy. The remaining 31 cases resulted in livebirths, of which two infants now exhibit developmental delay of unknown aetiology and one has been diagnosed as having Noonan's syndrome. 10 (19%) pregnancies were diagnosed as having major anatomical malformations resulting in fetal or neonatal demise or requiring postnatal surgery. In a routine obstetric population, the finding of an NT measurement greater than or equal to 4 mm is associated with a poor pregnancy outcome in the majority of cases, mainly owing to chromosomal abnormality. This study establishes the need for focused fetal assessment in cases with such first trimester findings.Maternal urine alpha-fetoprotein concentrations between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation.The aim of this study was to ascertain the normal range of the midtrimester maternal urine alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) concentrations in Taiwanese pregnancies.AFP was measured in the urine samples, obtained before genetic amniocentesis, from 268 women with normal singleton pregnancies between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation. Week-specific median values for urine AFP/creatinine (Cr) were calculated by weighted linear regression after log transformation and the data were converted to units in the multiple of the median (MoM). The gestational age in all cases was determined by ultrasound parameters.The levels of urine AFP and AFP/Cr increased gradually with advancing gestational age. The AFP/Cr MoM values of singleton pregnancies after log transformation showed a normal distribution with a mean (standard deviation) of 0.0071 (0.3228). The median, 10th and 90th centiles of AFP/Cr were 0.98, 0.43 and 3.61 MoM, respectively. Of the pregnant Taiwanese women studied, 4.9% (13/268) and 16% (43/268) had urine AFP/Cr MoM levels less than 0.31 MoM and 0.5 MoM respectively.The establishment of a reference range which allows for gestational differences in AFP/Cr levels is essential for further antenatal testing.The value of sonography in early pregnancy for the detection of fetal abnormalities in an unselected population.To determine the value of early pregnancy sonography in detecting fetal abnormalities in an unselected obstetric population. DESIGN Prospective cross-sectional study. All women initially underwent transabdominal sonography and when the anatomical survey was considered to be incomplete, transvaginal sonography was also performed (20.1%). Nuchal translucency was measured and karyotyping was performed as appropriate.University Department of Obstetrics and Gynaecology.6634 sequential unselected women (mean maternal age 29.9 years, range 13-50; mean gestational age 12+4 weeks, range 11+0-14+6), carrying 6443 live fetuses participated in this study.Detection rate of fetal anomalies and the associated cost per case detected in early pregnancy.The incidence of anomalous fetuses was 1.4% (92/6443) including 43 chromosomal abnormalities. The detection rate for structural abnormalities was 59.0% (37/63, 95% CI 46.5-72.4) and the specificity was 99.9% in early pregnancy. When the first and second trimester scans were combined, the detection for structural abnormalities was 81.0% (51/63, 95% CI 67.7-89.2). Seventy-eight percent (31/40) of chromosomal abnormalities (excluding three cases of XXY) were diagnosed at 11-14 weeks, either because of a nuchal translucency greater than or equal to the 99th centile for gestational age (43%; 17/40, 95% CI 27.4-60.4), or due to the presence of structural abnormalities (35%; 14/40, 95% CI 21.2-52.8). Sixty-five percent (15/23) of cases of trisomy 21 were also diagnosed either because of having a nuchal translucency greater than or equal to the 99th centile (57.0%; 13/23) or due to the presence of a structural abnormality (9.0%; 2/23). Overall, the detection rate of structurally abnormal fetuses was 59% (37/63) in early pregnancy and 81% in combination with the second trimester scan. The cost per abnormality diagnosed in early pregnancy is estimated to be pound sterling 6258 per structurally abnormal fetus, pound sterling 7470 per chromosomal abnormality and pound sterling 4453 per anomalous fetus.The majority of fetal structural and chromosomal abnormalities can be detected by sonographic screening at 11-14 weeks, but the second trimester scan should not be abandoned.Integrated screening for Down's syndrome based on tests performed during the first and second trimesters.Both first-trimester screening and second-trimester screening for Down's syndrome are effective means of selecting women for chorionic-villus sampling or amniocentesis, but there is uncertainty about which screening method should be used in practice. We propose a new screening method in which measurements obtained during both trimesters are integrated to provide a single estimate of a woman's risk of having a pregnancy affected by Down's syndrome.We used data from published studies of various screening methods employed during the first and second trimesters. The first-trimester screening consisted of measurement of serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A in 77 pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome and 383 unaffected pregnancies and measurements of nuchal translucency obtained by ultrasonography in 326 affected and 95,476 unaffected pregnancies. The second-trimester tests were various combinations of measurements of serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, human chorionic gonadotropin, and inhibin A in 77 affected and 385 unaffected pregnancies.When we used a risk of 1 in 120 or greater as the cutoff to define a positive result on the integrated screening test, the rate of detection of Down's syndrome was 85 percent, with a false positive rate of 0.9 percent. To achieve the same rate of detection, current screening tests would have higher false positive rates (5 to 22 percent). If the integrated test were to replace the triple test (measurements of serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, and human chorionic gonadotropin), currently used with a 5 percent false positive rate, for screening during the second trimester, the detection rate would be higher 85 percent vs. 69 percent), with a reduction of four fifths in the number of invasive diagnostic procedures and consequent losses of normal fetuses.The integrated test detects more cases of Down's syndrome with a much lower false positive rate than the best currently available test.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotrophin in pregnancies conceived after intracytoplasmic sperm injection and conventional in-vitro fertilization.Data in the Caucasian population suggest that maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and unconjugated oestriol concentrations are reduced and human chorionic gonadotrophin (HCG) concentrations are elevated in pregnancies conceived after in-vitro fertilization (IVF), leading to a higher than expected Down's syndrome screen-positive rate. There are no previous reports on the serum marker values in pregnancies conceived after intracytoplasmic injection (ICSI). Between 1996 and 1998, we measured maternal serum total HCG and AFP concentrations between 15 and 20 weeks gestation in 42 in-vitro fertilization (IVF) pregnancies and 23 ICSI pregnancies with known normal outcome. The results were compared with that of 2799 naturally occurring singleton pregnancies who were known to have a normal outcome. Median AFP multiple of the median (MOM) in ICSI pregnancies was significantly reduced to 0.76 compared with both that of the controls and that of the IVF pregnancies. For the IVF pregnancies, median HCG MOM was elevated to 1.15, and median AFP MOM was reduced to 0.88 compared with the controls, but these differences were not statistically significant. In both the IVF and ICSI pregnancies the changes might result in a falsely high Down's syndrome risk. In particular, the reduced AFP concentration in ICSI pregnancies was substantial. If this preliminary finding is substantiated by other series, the appropriate adjustment needs to be made to allow for valid interpretation of the screen result and to avoid an unnecessarily high false positive rate.A six year study of the antenatal detection of fetal abnormality in six Scottish health boards.To assess the sensitivity of prenatal diagnosis by ultrasound and biochemical methods, to evaluate the reasons for non-detection and to make appropriate recommendations.Six year observational study, during which biochemical screening for trisomy 21 was introduced and there was an increase in routine ultrasound scanning at 18-22 weeks.Six health boards in Scotland.264,481 pregnancies, of which 862 were terminated because of fetal abnormality, and 2123 delivered with prenatally detectable major fetal abnormalities.The prenatal detection of trisomies 13, 18 and 21, and 12 major structural abnormalities, which the average ultrasonographer with average skills using average equipment would be expected to detect.Serum biochemical screening improved detection of trisomy 21 from 33% to 57%. The detection rate for the major abnormalities was 62% (815/1320) and 73% (598/818) when the trisomies were excluded. 18-22 weeks scanning yielded a 92% detection rate. Of the 505 undetected cases, 15% declined prenatal screening, 46% were unscreened because they were ineligible for testing, unbooked, booked too late or scanned too early for a diagnosis to be made, 2% had findings suspicious of a chromosomal abnormality but testing was not undertaken and 37% had a negative scan at a gestation when the abnormality was potentially detectable.A policy of first trimester scanning followed by serum alpha-fetoprotein screening and additional scanning as clinically indicated is effective in detecting major structural abnormalities, but scanning at 18-22 weeks and serum biochemical screening for trisomy 21 improved the detection rates. Supervised training and adequate equipment are essential. Present prenatal diagnostic tests will not detect all abnormalities and patients must be made aware of this.Second trimester maternal serum beta human chorionic gonadotrophin and pregnancy outcome.The aim of this prospective, controlled study was to examine the relation between second trimester maternal serum beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (HCG) and birthweight. The study population consisted of 192 women with maternal serum betaHCG > or = 3.5 multiple of the median and a control group with the same number of women with maternal serum betaHCG < or = 2.0 multiple of the median. There was no difference in birthweight and other pregnancy outcomes between the two groups. When used prospectively, elevated betaHCG in the mid-trimester is not a predictor for intrauterine growth restriction or other pregnancy complications.Maternal serum prostate-specific antigen and Down syndrome in the first and second trimesters of pregnancy. International Prenatal Screening Research Group.It has been suggested that high levels of maternal serum prostate-specific (PSA) may be associated with fetal Down syndrome. We retrieved stored blood samples from 102 singleton Down syndrome pregnancies at 8-14 weeks' gestation and 99 at 15-22 weeks' gestation, together with samples from five unaffected singleton control pregnancies matched for gestational age. PSA was measured using an ultrasensitive assay. Contrary to earlier reports, PSA levels were similar in affected and unaffected pregnancies in both the first and second trimester of pregnancy; 1.1 and 0.9 multiple of the normal median, respectively, in affected pregnancies. There was no indication that PSA would be a useful screening marker.Urine free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin levels between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation in Taiwanese pregnancies.The purpose of this study was to determine the reference range of maternal urine free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta -hCG) concentrations between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation.We measured the concentrations of urine free beta -hCG from 268 healthy singleton Taiwanese pregnancies between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation. Results were corrected for creatinine (Cr) concentration and converted to the multiple of the median (MOM) level for the appropriate gestation. Gestational ages of all cases were determined using ultrasound dating.The median levels of urine free beta -hCG and free beta-hCG/Cr had a downward trend in association with the increasing gestation age. The median, 5th, 10th, 90th and 95th centiles of free beta- hCG/Cr MOM values were 1.02, 0.20, 0.25, 2.32 and 3.38 MOM, respectively. Urine free beta- hCG/Cr MOM values showed a log Gaussian distribution with the mean and standard deviation (SD) distribution of -0.0657 and 0.3792, respectively.To allow for differences in free beta -hCG/Cr median values at various ages of gestation, establishment of the reference range is essential for further development of maternal urine screening for Down syndrome.SP1 in pregnancies with Down syndrome in the first trimester of pregnancy. International Prenatal Screening Research Group.We conducted a study to determine the value of serum pregnancy-specific beta-1-glycoprotein (Schwangerschafts protein 1, SP1) as an antenatal screening test for Down syndrome in the first trimester. Serum samples collected from women at 8 to 14 weeks of pregnancy, immediately prior to having a chorionic villus sampling procedure on account of advanced maternal age, were retrieved from 96 women with Down syndrome pregnancies (cases) and from 480 women with unaffected pregnancies (controls). Cases and controls were ascertained at 21 obstetric centres in nine countries. Each case was matched with five controls for maternal age (same five-year age groups), duration of storage of the serum sample (same calendar year) and gestational age (usually the same week of pregnancy). The levels of SP1 were lower in pregnancies associated with Down syndrome: the median level was 0.86 multiples of the median level in the controls (95 per cent confidence interval 0.76 to 0.97). This difference, though statistically significant, was not large enough for SP1 to be a useful marker in screening, at least from 10 weeks onwards where most of our data lie.Maternal serum activin A and follistatin levels in pregnancies with Down syndrome.Inhibin A is now an established second-trimester maternal serum marker of Down syndrome. Since activin A has a common beta-subunit to inhibin A we evaluated this substance and its binding protein, follistatin, as potential markers. We studied 30 affected and 199 unaffected pregnancies at 13-16 weeks' gestation. There was a statistically significant increase in activin A level among the cases with 8 (27 per cent) exceeding the 90th centile in the controls, and 6 (20 per cent) above the 95th centile. However, the extent of overlap was too great to be of value in screening. There was a small decrease in follistatin levels among cases but it did not reach statistical significance.Appropriate biochemical parameters in first-trimester screening for Down syndrome.Meta-analysis was used to calculate maternal serum marker distribution parameters for Down syndrome risk estimation in the first trimester. Data from 44 series were combined: relating to pregnancy associated plasma protein (PAPP)-A in 18, free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) in 17, alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) in 26 and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) in 9. All levels were expressed in multiples of the normal median (MOM) for gestational age. Individual PAPP-A levels were available for 439 first and second-trimester Down syndrome pregnancies. The median MOM value increased with gestation: 0.35 at 6-8 weeks (31 cases), 0.40 at 9-11 weeks (197), 0.62 at 12-14 weeks (113) and 0.94 thereafter (98). A cubic regression equation was fitted so it could be estimated for each week of gestation. For the other markers the median value in Down syndrome was estimated from the weighted mean across all first-trimester series: 1.98 MOM for free beta-hCG in 579 cases; 0.79 MOM for AFP in 243 and 0.74 MOM for uE3 in 226. Variance-covariance matrices were calculated directly in unaffected pregnancies and from the difference between affected and unaffected pregnancies in Down syndrome. Based on these parameters we estimate that screening at 9-11 weeks with PAPP-A and free beta-hCG will yield a 64.6 per cent detection rate for a 5 per cent false-positive rate. Adding a third marker will increase detection to 66.6 per cent for AFP and 68.6 per cent for uE3; using all four markers it increases to 70.1 per cent. Routine ultrasound nuchal translucency measurement in addition to serum testing will increase the rates to 86.4 per cent, 87.2 per cent, 87.9 per cent and 88.3 per cent, respectively.Maternal serum screening for Down syndrome in the first trimester: experience from Belarus.We have carried out a large retrospective study of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), free-beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein (PAPP-A) in the first trimester of pregnancy. Unlike other studies all women had routine ultrasound dating, carried out during a nuchal translucency measurement project. A total of 13,477 serum samples were tested for AFP and 11,659 for free beta-hCG. A subset of 1564 samples from unaffected pregnancies were also tested for PAPP-A on a case-control basis. All three markers were also determined in 31 samples from pregnancies with Down syndrome. Equations were derived to express results in multiples of the median using both gestational age and crown rump length and to adjust for maternal weight. Statistical modelling with Gaussian distribution parameters obtained in the study were used to predict the detection rate for a 5 per cent false-positive rate. The predicted rates were: 73.7 per cent for all three markers; 69.1 per cent for PAPP-A and free beta-hCG; 47.4 per cent for PAPP-A and AFP; 57.6 per cent for free beta-hCG and AFP. As these rates are similar to those in the second trimester, health planners may now want to consider a change in policy from second-trimester to first-trimester screening with biochemical markers.Predictive value of the triple screening test for the phenotype of Down syndrome.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE3) are routinely measured in the second trimester ("triple" test) and combined with maternal age to evaluate risk for fetal Down syndrome. Triple test results and clinical findings were retrospectively reviewed for 30 newborns with Down syndrome to determine whether analyte values or second trimester risks for Down syndrome were more extreme in affected pregnancies where cardiac or other severe congenital malformations were present compared to those cases where major anatomical abnormalities were absent. Mean MS-AFP, uE3, maternal age, and second trimester Down syndrome risk were all similar in the two groups of pregnancies. However, hCG concentrations did appear to be higher in the group of Down syndrome pregnancies with anatomical anomalies (mean 1.74 MoM versus 1.19 MoM) (P<0.05). Overall, there was no significant difference in the incidence of major anomalies in patients with screen-positive test results versus those cases that were not identified by the triple test. Prenatal counseling should therefore reflect the general expectations of the Down syndrome phenotype that have been established from live-born infants with this disorder.MULTISCAN--a Scandinavian multicenter second trimester obstetric ultrasound and serum screening study.To study the detection rates of second trimester ultrasound screening for neural tube defects (NTD), abdominal wall defects (AWD) and Down's syndrome (DS) in low risk populations at tertiary centers, and to compare the ultrasound screening detection rates with those that were obtainable by biochemical serum screening (double test: alpha-fetoprotein/human chorion gonadotrophin/age test).Prospective multicenter study with a three year inclusion period: 1/1/1989-31/12/1991.27,844 low-risk women at 18-34 years of age who had a second trimester ultrasound screening examination. Of these, 10,264 also had a serum test.An ultrasound malformation scan and a serum test were carried out at 17-19 weeks of gestation. Risk calculations regarding DS were based on alpha-fetoprotein, human chorion gonadotrophin and maternal age; performed retrospectively for the first two years.In total 73 cases were identified in the study population: NTD (n=34), AWD (n=7) and DS (n=32). The detection rates, (%, with 95% confidence interval) for ultrasound screening were: NTD: 79.4 (62.1-91.3); AWD: 85.7 (42.1-99.6); DS: 6.3 (0.8-20.8). In the subgroup of women who had both tests, the detection rates for ultrasound screening vs double test were: NTD: 62.5 (24.5-91.5) vs 75.0 (34.9-96.8); AWD: 66.7 (9.4-99.2) vs 100 (29.2-100.0); DS: 7.7 (0.2-36.0) vs 46.2 (19.2-74.9). The false positive rates (%) for ultrasound screening vs double test were: NTD: 0.01/3.3; AWD: 0.01/3.3; DS: 0.1/4.0.Second trimester ultrasound screening in a low risk population gave a low detection rate for fetal DS (6.3%) and an acceptable detection rate for NTD (79.4%) and AWD (85.7%). In the subgroup of women who had both tests, serum screening performed better than ultrasound as applied in the present study, especially regarding DS.Accuracy of Down's syndrome risks produced in a prenatal screening program.Down's syndrome screening in the second trimester using a variety of combinations of maternal serum markers has become an established part of antenatal care over the past decade. The methodology of calculating Down's syndrome risk using statistical models based on the Gaussian distribution functions of the various markers used is often considered daunting, and many screening centres rely on specific screening computer software to undertake the relevant calculations. Such software is often a closed system which does not allow the user to check or change any of the parameters within the model. It is clear from a recent UK NEQAS survey of Down's syndrome screening laboratories (Spencer, Ellis, Seth, 1997, unpublished data) that many centres are unsure what method of calculating risk and what population parameters are used in their software, and how appropriate these are for the population being screened. This confusion has led to uncertainty over the reliability of the risk estimates produced in Down's syndrome screening programs.Second-trimester maternal serum inhibin-A screening for fetal Down syndrome in Asian women.Case control studies in the Caucasian population showed that maternal serum inhibin-A is elevated in Down syndrome pregnancies and may be a useful second-trimester marker in addition to human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP). Data in the Asian population are lacking. We measured inhibin-A levels in the stored maternal sera of 49 Down syndrome pregnancies and 341 controls with a commercially available assay and expressed them as the multiples of the median of the gestational week. The log means and standard deviations for case and control inhibin-A MOMs were 0.209, 0.226, and 0.002 and 0.177, respectively. Median inhibin-A MOM in Down syndrome cases was elevated to 1.62 (95 per cent confidence interval, 1.29-1.82). 36 per cent of Down syndrome cases were expected to be detected at a 5 per cent false-positive rate. However, inhibin-A MOMs were strongly correlated with hCG MOMs in the cases (r=0.73, p<0.001) and the controls (r=0.56, p<0.001). This will diminish the value of adding inhibin-A to the existing hCG and AFP screening protocol.Early pregnancy screening for fetal aneuploidy with serum markers and nuchal translucency.We determined the aneuploidy detection rate achievable by early pregnancy screening with pregnancy associated plasma protein (PAPP)-A, free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and ultrasound nuchal translucency (NT) measurement. Women having prenatal diagnosis were scanned, and a blood sample was taken and stored. Stored samples were tested and a total of 37 were found to have Down syndrome, 8 to have Edwards syndrome and 255 were controls. Results were expressed in multiples of the gestation-specific median (MOM) value in the controls after regression and, for the serum markers, maternal weight adjustment. In Down syndrome the medians were for PAPP-A 0.63 MOM (95 per cent confidence interval (CI) 0.45-0.87); free beta-hCG 1.88 MOM (1.33-2.66); and NT 2.34 MOM (1.70-3.22). Using these parameters the expected detection rate for a 5 per cent false-positive rate for different marker combinations were: 55.3 per cent for PAPP-A and free beta-hCG; 68.4 per cent for NT alone; and 84.6 per cent for PAPP-A, free beta-hCG and NT. The median values for Edwards syndrome were: 0.17 MOM for PAPP-A; 0.18 MOM for free beta-hCG; and 2.64 MOM for NT. Early pregnancy screening with the combined measurement of maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG and fetal nuchal translucency could achieve a high Down syndrome detection rate.A screening program for trisomy 21 at 10-14 weeks using fetal nuchal translucency, maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A.To examine the potential impact of combining maternal age with fetal nuchal translucency thickness and maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) in screening for trisomy 21 at 10-14 weeks of gestation.Maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A were measured by Kryptor, a random access immunoassay analyzer using time-resolved amplified cryptate emission, in 210 singleton pregnancies with trisomy 21 and 946 chromosomally normal controls, matched for maternal age, gestation and sample storage time. In all cases the fetal crown-rump length and nuchal translucency thickness had been measured by ultrasonography at 10-14 weeks of gestation and maternal blood had been obtained at the time of the scan. The distributions (in multiples of the median; MoM) of free beta-hCG and PAPP-A (corrected for maternal weight) and fetal nuchal translucency (NT) were determined in the trisomy 21 group and the controls. Likelihood ratios for the various marker combinations were calculated and these were used together with the age-related risk for trisomy 21 in the first trimester to calculate the expected detection rate of affected pregnancies, at a fixed false-positive rate, in a population with the maternal age distribution of pregnancies in England and Wales.In a population with the maternal age distribution of pregnancies in England and Wales, it was estimated that, using the combination of maternal age, fetal nuchal translucency thickness and maternal serum free beta-hCG and PAPP-A, the detection of trisomy 21 pregnancies would be 89% at a fixed false-positive rate of 5%. Alternatively, at a fixed detection rate of 70%, the false-positive rate would be 1%. The inclusion of biochemical parameters added an additional 16% to the detection rate obtained using NT and maternal age alone.Rapid diagnostic technology like Kryptor, which can provide automated reproducible biochemical measurements within 30 min of obtaining a blood sample, will allow the development of interdisciplinary one-stop clinics for early fetal assessment. Such clinics will be able to deliver improved screening sensitivity, rapidly and more efficiently, leading to reduced patient anxiety and stress.First-trimester nuchal translucency and maternal serum biochemical screening for Down's syndrome: a happy union?First-trimester screening for Down syndrome using nuchal translucency measurement with free beta-hCG and PAPP-A between 10 and 13 weeks of pregnancy--the combined test.In a population of 1467 women attending the 'G. Gaslini' Institute for antenatal care, we evaluated first-trimester risk screening for Down syndrome using the 'combined test' based on ultrasound measurement of nuchal translucency (NT), maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and free beta-hCG, and maternal age. No clinical action was taken on these results. The gestational age, determined by scan measurement of crown rump length, ranged from 10 weeks to 13 weeks 6 days. The median maternal age was 31 years 8 months. There were 13 Down syndrome pregnancies. The risk of having an affected pregnancy was estimated from a multivariate Gaussian distribution, using commercially available software. With a risk cut-off of 1 in 350, 11 affected pregnancies were detected (detection rate 85 per cent, 95 per cent confidence interval: 56-100 per cent) with a 3.3 per cent false-positive rate. The odds of being affected given a positive result were 1 in 30. Further data are needed to determine, with greater statistical reliability, the relative performance of the combined test with current second-trimester screening.Risk of abnormal triple screen for Down syndrome is significantly higher in patients with female fetuses.Previous studies have shown that mid-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels are significantly higher and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) levels significantly lower in women with male compared with female fetuses. We have evaluated whether triple-screen criteria are more likely to identify women with female fetuses as at risk for Down syndrome. From the Georgetown University genetics database we obtained the absolute values and corresponding multiples of the median (MoM) for AFP, hCG and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) in singleton gestations for the period database November 1992 July 1996. A Down syndrome risk of 1/270 or greater at mid-trimester was considered as high risk. A total of 977 patients with triple screen and outcome information were identified, including 502 female and 475 male fetuses. Patients with female fetuses were significantly more likely to have lower serum AFP (p=0.003) and a positive triple screen for Down syndrome (72 (14 per cent) versus 45 (9 per cent), p<0.02) than those with male fetuses. The gestational age at triple screen, maternal serum hCG and uE3, race and diabetes were not significantly different between the two groups. Since Down syndrome is less common in female than male fetuses, and the rates of female and male Down syndrome fetuses detected by triple screen and subsequent amniocentesis are not significantly different, the excess of positive mid-trimester maternal serum triple screen in women with female fetuses is likely due to false-positive results.Maternal serum S100 protein in normal and Down syndrome pregnancies.Protein S100 is a low molecular weight (10-12 kD) calcium-binding protein the beta subunit of which is coded for at the 22.2-22.3 region of the long arm of chromosome 21. This region has also been shown to be responsible for the phenotypic expression of Down syndrome. Previous studies demonstrated increased immunoreactivity to protein S100 in brain tissue from adults with Down syndrome. We have previously observed a higher concentration of S100 protein in the fetal blood of trisomy 21 fetuses compared with normal subjects. The aim of this study was therefore to investigate the use of measuring S100 protein concentration in maternal blood for Down syndrome screening. Maternal blood was taken at the time of chorionic villus sampling or cordocentesis (11-38 weeks' gestation) for fetal karyotyping. Protein S100 was measured by a two-site immunoradiometric assay (S-100 IRMA, Sangtec). There was no significant difference in the concentration of maternal S100 protein between normal and trisomy 21 pregnancies (p<0.10). Moreover, there was no significant association between maternal serum S100 protein concentration and gestational age (r(s)=0.27, p=0.07), maternal age (r(s)=-0.17, p=0.7) or maternal weight (r(s)=-0.013, p=0.9). This study shows that measurement of maternal serum S100 protein concentration does not appear to have a value in Down syndrome screening.Clinical follow-up of high mid-trimester maternal serum intact human chorionic gonadotrophin concentrations in singleton pregnancies.Mid-trimester biochemical screening of 38 143 pregnancies in south-east Scotland revealed 127 cases (0.34 per cent) in which the maternal serum (MS) intact human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) concentration was > or = 4 multiples of the median in singleton pregnancies (MOM). Three were lost to follow-up but in 72 (58 per cent) complications developed or there were associated fetal abnormalities. This percentage was greatest at very high hCG concentrations, 92 per cent with hCG > or = 10 MOM (n = 12) compared with 48 per cent with hCG concentrations of 4-4.99 MOM (n=69). 22 cases had an MS alpha-fetoprotein > or = 2 MOM in addition to an MS hCG > or = 4 MOM, and in only 3 of these was the pregnancy uneventful; 86 per cent were associated with abnormalities or pregnancy complications.Maternal age- and gestation-specific risk for trisomy 21.To provide estimates of maternal age- and gestational age-related risks for trisomy 21.The prevalence of trisomy 21 was examined in 57,614 women who had fetal karyotyping at 9-16 weeks of gestation for the sole indication of maternal age of 35 years or more. On the basis of the maternal age distribution and the reported maternal age-related risk for trisomy 21 at birth, the expected number of trisomy 21 cases was calculated for each gestational age subgroup (9-10 weeks, 11-14 weeks and 15-16 weeks). The ratio of the observed to expected number of cases of trisomy 21 was then calculated and regression analysis was applied to derive a smoothened curve. The formula for maternal age- and gestational age-related risk was then applied to a population of 96,127 pregnancies that were examined at 10-14 weeks to calculate the expected number of trisomy 21 pregnancies, and this number was compared to the observed number of 326.In the 57,614 pregnancies there were 538 cases of trisomy 21. The relative prevalences of trisomy 21, compared to a prevalence of 1.0 at 40 weeks, was 10 exp(0.2718 x log(10)(gestation)2 - 1.023 x log10(gestation) + 0.9425). On the basis of the estimated maternal age- and gestational age-related risks, the expected number of trisomy 21 cases at 10-14 weeks of gestation in the 96,127 pregnancies was 329 (95% confidence interval 291-361), which was not significantly different from the observed number of 326 cases (chi2 = 0.02).The risk for trisomy 21 increases with maternal age and decreases with gestation. The prevalence of trisomy 21 at 12 and 16 weeks of gestation is higher than the prevalence at 40 weeks by 30% and 21%, respectively.Efficiency of ultrasound and biochemical markers for Down's syndrome risk screening. A prospective study.To evaluate the sequential combination of ultrasound screening for fetal aneuploidy at 11-14 weeks with maternal biochemistry at 12-14 and 15-18 weeks of gestation.A prospective study including 1,656 women, with a singleton pregnancy booked before 13 weeks of gestation. Nuchal translucency (NT) thickness was measured by transabdominal ultrasound examination. alpha-Fetoprotein, free betahCG and hCG were measured by immunoradiometric (12-14 weeks) or immunometric (15-18 weeks) assays. Derived risks were then calculated. Cutoff risks were chosen first arbitrarily at 1/250 and then adjusted for a 5% false-positive rate.Seven fetal aneuploidies were diagnosed, including 5 Down's syndromes, 1 trisomy 18 and 1 triploidy. Three Down's syndromes had concordant high risk with the 3 screenings. One was at low risk with NT, and another was at low risk by maternal serum screening, but sequential combination of screenings led to a 100% detection rate with cutoffs of 1/240, 1/160 and 1/250 for NT, first- and second-trimester biochemistry, respectively (i.e. for a cutoff adjusted for a 5% false-positive rate).This preliminary study suggests a benefit in combining maternal age-related risk together with NT and biochemical markers in the first or the second trimester. The algorithm combining these risks needs to be established in a wide population.Nuchal thickness, urine beta-core fragment level, and maternal age for down syndrome screening.Our purpose was to report the midtrimester Down syndrome screening efficiency of a 2-analyte algorithm, urine beta-core fragment (a metabolite of human chorionic gonadotropin) and nuchal thickness, along with maternal age in a high-risk population undergoing genetic amniocentesis.Nuchal thickness, humerus length, and maternal urine beta-core fragment levels were measured prospectively before genetic amniocentesis in 1360 singleton pregnancies, 21 (1.5%) of which had fetal Down syndrome. All analyte levels were expressed as multiples of the normal medians based on biparietal diameter. Backward-stepwise logistic regression was used to determine whether the markers were significant independent predictors of fetal Down syndrome. Matrix analysis was used to calculate an adjusted Down syndrome likelihood ratio for each patient based on the significant screening markers. Multiplication by age-related midtrimester risk gave the adjusted Down syndrome risk. The sensitivity and false-positive rates at different Down syndrome screening thresholds were used to generate a receiver-operator characteristics curve. The area under the curve was used to assess the value of this screening test.On the basis of logistic regression, beta-core fragment level (P 1/60 the sensitivity and false-positive rate for Down syndrome were 85.7% and 4.9%, respectively, when beta-core fragment level, nuchal thickness, and maternal age were used. Correspondence screening values at a risk threshold > 1/150 were 95.2% and 10.8%, respectively. The area under the receiver-operator characteristics curve was 0.9357 (SE = 0. 0137), indicating that the algorithm is excellent for Down syndrome screening.In this study, a combination algorithm consisting of nuchal thickness, urine beta-core fragment level, and maternal age had a high screening efficiency for Down syndrome. This algorithm should be investigated as a new option for women at high risk of having a fetus with Down syndrome.Midtrimester maternal serum screening after multifetal pregnancy reduction in pregnancies conceived by in vitro fertilization.Data about the effect of multifetal pregnancy reduction on midtrimester maternal serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE3) are scarce and contradictory. Differing gestational ages at fetal reduction, transvaginal versus transabdominal needle insertion, and injection of different feticidal agents compound the analysis of published data.We examined clinical and laboratory data about 27 high-order gestations that were reduced to twins in the first trimester. Fetal reductions were performed transabdominally at 11.41 +/- 1.15 weeks' gestation by fetal intrathoracic injection of KCl, and maternal blood sampling was performed at 16.48 +/- 1.05 weeks. "Pseudo-risks" for singleton pregnancies were calculated by correcting serum analyte levels for twins.Twenty-four (88.9%) of 27 patients had maternal serum AFP levels above 2.0 MoM (mean, 4.60 +/- 3.48 MoM; range, 1.49-14.85 MoM), however, none of the newborns had structural anomalies. AFP serum levels did not correlate with the number of reduced fetuses or with adverse obstetric outcome. The mean hCG levels were 1.22 +/- 0.49 MoM (range, 0.14-2.47), and the mean uE3 levels were 1.15 +/- 0.31 MoM (range, 0.56-1.84). Based on maternal age alone, seven patients (25.9%) would have been offered amniocentesis for a term Down syndrome risk greater than 1:384, whereas combined risk calculations with hCG and uE3 levels resulted in 1 (3.7%) screen-positive case (P < 0.01).Analysis of triple test results in 27 cases of twin pregnancies.The study comprises 889 pregnant women between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation. The control group consisted of 862 pregnant women with unburdened obstetric anamnesis with an uneventful singleton pregnancy. The examined group consisted of 27 pregnant women with uncomplicated twin pregnancy. In the sera of pregnant women AFP (Microparticle Enzyme Immunoassay AxSYM Abbott), total beta-hCG (Microparticle Enzyme Immunoassay AxSYM Abbott) and unconjugated estriol (Radioimmunoassay Amerlex-M. 2T Johnson & Johnson Ortho Clinical Diagnostics Ltd.) were determined. The risk of fetal trisomy 21 was calculated with the use of PRISCA 3.0 software, which corrected the MoM values for twin pregnancy. Ulm Index was also calculated. In the majority of twin pregnancies increased concentrations of AFP, total beta-hCG and uE3 in the range over 1.0 MoM was noted. In the group of women below 35 years of age with singleton pregnancies using PRISCA 3.0 software it approximated to 95%. For women older than 35 optimum index for fetal trisomy 21 risk calculation was Ulm Index with the specificity 93.8%. The specificity of AFP determination in the detection of fetal open NTD in singleton pregnancy was 99%. In the group of women with twin pregnancy the obtained specificity of 77.8% for PRISCA 3.0 software is low, a more advantageous way to calculate the risk of fetal trisomy 21 is Ulm Index with the specificity of 85.2%. The specificity of AFP determination as a screening for fetal open NTD in twin pregnancy was 96.3%.[Clinical uses of maternal serum markers in the prenatal diagnosis].The significance of choroid plexus cysts, echogenic heart foci and renal pyelectasis in the first trimester.To determine the significance of certain soft ultrasonographic markers for chromosomal abnormalities in the first trimester.This was a prospective cross-sectional study.University Department of Obstetrics and Gynaecology, London, UK.A total of 5385 women from an unselected population underwent a detailed assessment of fetal anatomy at 11-14 weeks of gestation (confirmed by crown-rump length) by transabdominal sonography (5.0 MHz) and transvaginal sonography (6.0 MHz) when necessary.In normal fetuses, the prevalences of choroid plexus cysts, pyelectasis and echogenic heart foci were 2.2, 0.9 and 0.6%, respectively in the first trimester and 2.0, 0.8 and 0.8%, respectively in the second trimester. Pyelectasis (likelihood ratio = 8.0, p = 0.03) and echogenic heart foci (likelihood ratio = 10.3, p = 0.02) were found to be associated significantly with fetal aneuploidy, while choroid plexus cysts were not.Although the majority of aneuploidies were detected by increased nuchal translucency and/or the presence of structural abnormalities (78%; 25/32), the use of soft ultrasonographic markers in the first trimester would have increased the overall detection by a further 3%. These data are preliminary and many thousands of pregnancies will need to be examined to determine the significance of the individual markers in different chromosomal abnormalities.Prenatal diagnosis using the triple test.A screening study performed on 2,803 pregnant women using the "triple test" is reported.Nine hundred and twenty-one had a high prior risk, having > 35 years while, after the screening, only 201 women had a positive test at risk higher than 1:270, and underwent to amniocentesis. The detection rate (DR) for all abnormalities was 91% while for Down's syndrome (DS) it was 87.5% and for neural tube defects 85.5%. Foetal abnormalities were detected in 20 cases (1:10) while 181 were false positive cases (6.5%), of which 151 for DS (5.4%). False negative were observed only in 2 cases within 2,339 at term pregnancies.The authors retain that high DR is related to the exactness of determination of gestation age calculated by scan and to the homogeneity of the examined population.Inhibin A and pro-alpha C inhibin in Down syndrome and normal pregnancies.Using two enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays specific for inhibin A and pro-alpha C inhibin, levels of the two proteins were assessed in maternal serum from 43 Down syndrome and 300 chromosomally normal pregnancies at 15-17 weeks' gestation. Compared to the control pregnancies, both inhibin A and pro-alpha C inhibin were significantly elevated in the Down syndrome pregnancies with median levels, expressed as multiples of the normal median, of 1.53 MoM and 1.34 MoM, respectively (P < 0.001 and P = 0.046 compared to controls). Levels of inhibin A and pro-alpha C inhibin were weakly but significantly correlated in both the control and the Down syndrome sera (r = 0.25, P < 0.0001; r = 0.4, P = 0.008, respectively). These data suggest that the mechanism(s) underlying the elevated inhibin levels observed in Down syndrome may affect the regulation of both the inhibin alpha- and beta A-subunits.Midtrimester maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin levels: normal reference values for Taiwanese women.The purpose of this study was to establish normative median values for maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) during the second trimester of pregnant Taiwanese women.We collected the data of midtrimester serum free beta-hCG concentration levels from 15,132 normal Taiwanese singleton pregnancies between 14 and 22 weeks' gestation. The maternal age on the day of delivery and maternal weight at the time of sampling were recorded in all cases. The relationship between gestational days and multiple of the median (MoM) levels of serum markers was analyzed using nonlinear regression methods.The median values of free beta-hCG in pregnant Taiwanese women were higher than those of pregnant white women. The log10 standard deviation distribution of free beta-hCG MoM values in the study population was 0.275 with a log10 mean of 0.0097. There were 1.81% of pregnancies with free beta-hCG levels less than 0.3 MoM and 11.33% with levels less than 0.5 MoM; 12.91% had serum levels greater than 2.0 MoM and 5.29% had serum levels greater than 3.0 MoM.Because of differences in race and methodology, any laboratory intended to provide determination of free beta-hCG for Down syndrome screening should establish its own normal reference values.Schwangerschafts protein 1 (SP1) adds little to the age-related detection of fetal Down syndrome in the first trimester of pregnancy.Schwangerschafts Protein 1 (SP1), being a placental protein appearing in the maternal circulation early in pregnancy, has been investigated as a potential marker for Down syndrome in the first trimester. Our study compared SP1 levels in 15 pregnancies with a Down syndrome fetus and 97 matched controls. Although the median MoM in Down syndrome pregnancies (0.49) was lower than in controls, its use as a marker added very little to the detection rate above the maternal age alone.Maternal serum placental growth hormone and insulinlike growth factor binding proteins 1 and 3 in pregnancies affected by fetal aneuploidy and other abnormalities: implications for prenatal diagnosis of trisomy 21.In the present study, we determined circulating serum levels of human placental growth hormone (hPGH) and insulinlike growth factor binding proteins 1 and 3 (IGFBP-1 and IGFBP-3) using two-site radioimmunoassays during the gestational midtrimester of pregnancies affected by chromosomal disorders with the aim of identifying potential marker substances that might have a significant discriminative and predictive value for prenatal diagnosis of fetal chromosomal aberrations and of organ malformations such as neural-tube defect. Our results show that the maternal serum levels of hPGH were significantly elevated in pregnancies affected by chromosomal anomalies or organ malformations as compared with controls. The distribution of IGFBP-1 concentrations for all experimental groups except trisomy 21 were closely similar to the normal population. IGFBP-3 decreased slightly in pregnancies affected by Down syndrome. These findings suggest that hPGH may be useful as an additional marker in prenatal screening for Down syndrome.Influence of smoking habits on Down's syndrome risk evaluation at mid-trimester through biochemical screening.Expectant mothers who smoke have higher levels of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and lower levels of unconjugated estriol and total human chorionic gonadotrophin than non-smoking mothers. This significantly affects performance of screening for Down's syndrome. This study includes 22,169 pregnant women: 18,876 non-smokers, 2,660 smoking < or = 10 cigarettes/day, and 633 smoking > 10 cigarettes/day. Mean maternal age (32.6 years), maternal weight (60.5 kg), and gestational age (114.7 days) were similar or only slightly different between the three groups. To verify the effects of smoking on screening, we studied retrospectively 130 sequential Down's syndrome cases (47 from the screening program, 83 from the prenatal diagnosis program). The proportion of smokers in the Down's syndrome and unaffected pregnancies was similar, whilst the false-positive rate and detection rate, based on fetal outcome, differed: false-positive rates were 5.63% in smokers and 9.42% in non-smokers, and detection rate 55.6% in smokers and 83.0% in non-smokers. Since the prevalence of Down's syndrome pregnancies was the same at mid-trimester in smokers and non-smokers and the proportion of smokers was not related to maternal age, we propose an adjustment of the Down's syndrome risk evaluation algorithm according to smoking habits.Is prostate-specific antigen a marker for pregnancies affected by Down syndrome?Agreement between predicted risk and prevalence of Down syndrome in second-trimester triple-marker screening in Japan.Based on 9350 pregnant Japanese women who were screened by serum triple-marker determination, accuracy of predicted risk for Down syndrome was examined using 24 Down syndrome cases detected either prenatally or postnatally. The correlation is statistically very high (r = 0.98) between the predicted risks and the prevalence of Down syndrome cases. Here we emphasize that this could be accomplished only by an extensive follow-up study, implemented in our prospective intervention programme.Comparison of urinary free beta (hCG) and beta-core (hCG) in prenatal screening for chromosomal abnormalities.To evaluate the potential utility of free beta (hCG) and beta-core (hCG) in a prenatal screening protocol for Down syndrome we analysed these markers in dried maternal urine specimens from 163 control, 13 Down syndrome and 5 trisomy 18 pregnancies from 8 to 25 weeks' gestation. All results are reported after normalization for urinary creatinine determined by modified Jaffe reagent assay. The correlation of urinary free beta (hCG) and urinary beta-core (hCG) was 0.61 in controls and 0.93 in Down syndrome. Median MoM values in Down syndrome were 2.42 for urinary free beta (hCG) and 2.40 for beta-core (hCG). In trisomy 18 the Median MoM was 0.35 and 0.34 for free beta (hCG) and beta-core (hCG), respectively. The degree of elevation observed in DS cases with urinary free beta (hCG) is consistent with previous reports. Studies of beta-core (hCG) in Down syndrome have yielded discrepant results. In this study, beta-core (hCG) in Down syndrome is lower than values observed in early reports but consistent with more recent reports.Age-specific variation in aneuploidy incidence among biochemical screening programs.Our purpose was to compare the observed age-related incidence of Down syndrome in two large screening programs with the commonly quoted incidences used in biochemical screening programs.Data from two large prenatal screening programs were stratified in 5-year age groups. The age-related incidence of Down syndrome was compared with the commonly used incidence as reported by Cuckle.No significant differences were found in age-related incidences of Down syndrome in any age group between the screening groups or among women ages 15 through 29 in any of the three groups. However, for women 30 to 34 and > or = 40 years old, a trend was noted toward a higher incidence in the screening groups. For women ages 35 to 39, the observed incidence was significantly greater in the screening groups compared with the data of Cuckle.Our data suggest an underascertainment in Down syndrome risk built into the Cuckle model, particularly in high-risk patients.First trimester screening for Down's syndrome using maternal serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG in combination with fetal nuchal translucency thickness.The aim of this study was to evaluate the potential effectiveness of maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and free beta-hCG in combination with nuchal translucency thickness in first trimester screening for Down's syndrome. Maternal serum levels of PAPP-A and free beta-hCG were assayed in stored sera from 32 Down's syndrome and 200 unaffected pregnancies. Fetal nuchal translucency was measured by ultrasound at the time of blood sampling. Screening of Down's syndrome using a combination of maternal age, PAPP-A, free beta-hCG and nuchal translucency would achieve a detection rate of 75.8% for a false positive rate of 5%.The value of screening for Down's syndrome in a socioeconomically deprived area with a high ethnic population.To assess the utility of biochemical antenatal screening for Down's syndrome in a socioeconomically deprived area with a high proportion of Asian women from the Indian Subcontinent.Audit of Down's syndrome biochemical screening service over a four-year period.Teaching hospital and community antenatal clinic in inner city Birmingham.Women booked between October 1992 and December 1996.Blood for screening was collected between 14 and 21 weeks gestation, alpha-fetoprotein and intact human chorionic gonadotrophin were measured in serum and the risk of Down's syndrome was calculated.Uptakes of screening and amniocentesis, screen positive rate, odds of being affected given a positive result, miscarriages associated with amniocentesis offered following a high risk result, detection rate, number of Down's cases prevented and a cost analysis. Outcome measures were compared between Asians and Caucasians.Overall 11,974 women (71%) accepted serum screening. The screen positive rate was 8.3% in Asians and 5.0% in Caucasians. The uptake of amniocentesis in women following a high risk result was 54% overall (35% Asian, 67% Caucasian). Nineteen cases of Down's syndrome were identified, of which 13 occurred in women who opted for biochemical screening. The detection rate of the biochemical screening programme was 85% (11/13). Of these 11 cases, six (none of whom were Asian) elected to have an amniocentesis, of whom four thereafter had a termination.In this study the public health benefits of screening for Down's syndrome in a socioeconomically deprived area with a high Asian population, were small.Influence of ethnic origin on nuchal translucency screening for Down's syndrome.To determine the influence of ethnic origin on access to and equity of nuchal translucency screening for Down's syndrome in a multiethnic population.An observational study in a district general hospital with a large multiethnic population.1944 women attending at a hospital antenatal clinic.First-trimester fetal nuchal translucency measurements at 10-14 weeks in women from different ethnic groups.The racial origin of the screened population was not significantly different from that of the population attending for initial antenatal examination. Multiple regression analysis showed a small but significant difference in nuchal translucency measurement between fetuses of different ethnic origin.Nuchal translucency screening can be effectively and equitably delivered to a multiethnic population. Although there are significant differences in nuchal translucency measurement between ethnic groups, these differences are too small to require correction when nuchal translucency is used to screen for Down's syndrome.Population screening for aneuploidy using maternal age and ultrasound.The coexistence of an epidemiological register and a multidisciplinary centre for prenatal diagnosis promoted us to report data collected during six years (1990-1995) in Isère county on prenatally detected chromosomal aberrations. During the whole study period prenatal diagnosis strategy towards chromosome aberrations was based solely on maternal age and ultrasound examination. Results showed a respective contribution of one-third/two-thirds for the two detection modes (maternal age/ultrasound signs). From 1990 to 1995 a significant increase in the proportion of prenatally detected autosomal aneuploidy was observed, from 52 per cent to 75 per cent (P < 0.001). This significant variation was mainly due to an increase in the proportion of prenatally detected trisomy 21 cases, and to an increase in the proportion of aberrations which were detected through first trimester ultrasound examination. The highest positive predictive values were observed for polymalformation, cardiac anomalies and cystic hygroma ultrasound signs (51 per cent, 21 per cent and 26 per cent, respectively). Our results for trisomy 21 are close to those obtained in other studies, even when prenatal strategies are different. Their interest lies in the fact that they can be considered as a reference level of prenatal diagnosis efficiency due to a strategy based on maternal age and ultrasound signs, a level which has to be taken into account when evaluating the benefits of additional serum screening policies in other studies.First trimester maternal serum concentrations of fetal antigen 2 in normal pregnancies and those affected by trisomy 21.Serum concentrations of fetal antigen 2 (FA-2), the amino-propeptide of the alpha1 chain of collagen type I, were measured in peripheral blood from women with normal (n = 234) and trisomy 21 affected (n = 14) pregnancies between 9 and 11 weeks gestation. Serum FA-2 concentrations were seen to be stable throughout this period, and though raised FA-2 concentrations were seen at the 10th week of gestation, a statistically significant difference between normal and trisomy 21 affected pregnancies was not found overall. Therefore it seems unlikely that FA-2 has a role in first trimester screening for trisomy 21, despite the fact that significantly higher FA-2 concentrations in trisomy 21 and significantly lower concentrations in trisomy 18 had been previously demonstrated in amniotic fluid in the second trimester.Second-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotrophin screening for Down's syndrome in Hong Kong.Second-trimester maternal serum screening for fetal Down's syndrome is well established in many Western countries. Its usefulness and acceptability is unknown in the Asian countries. Between June 1994 and December 1996, we offered second-trimester serum AFP and hCG screening to pregnant women in Hong Kong who were less than 35 years old and without other risk factors for chromosome abnormalities. Each woman was assigned a risk of having a Down's syndrome term pregnancy by using a computer software program that took into account her age. weight, AFP and hCG MOMs. All those with a risk of one in 250 or greater were designated screen-positive, subject to the revision of gestation by ultrasound examination. 9,177 women with singleton pregnancies (93 per cent were Chinese) were screened. The uptake of screening was 75 per cent. 281 women (three per cent) were initially classified to be screen-positive. After revision of the gestation by ultrasound examination, 183 women (two per cent) were 'true' screen-positive and 164 (90 per cent) accepted the offer of amniocentesis. Eight of these pregnancies were affected by Down's syndrome and all the women elected pregnancy termination. The odds of being affected, given a positive screening result, were one in 23. Six Down's syndrome pregnancies were missed by screening programme. The detection rate was 57 per cent. The study showed that second-trimester serum screening for fetal Down's syndrome was feasible and accepted in the Hong Kong population.Nuchal translucency as a screening test for chromosomal abnormalities in a routine first trimester ultrasound examination.To evaluate the implementation of nuchal translucency measurement as an additional examination within the first trimester routine ultrasound in an unselected population of women.A prospective study in which all pregnant women during 1994, referred for the first trimester routine ultrasound scan, were asked to participate. Of a total of 1852 women with a viable pregnancy, results from 1444 women were evaluated. When a nuchal translucency of 4 mm or more was found, the woman was offered both a genetic amniocentesis in gestational week 13-15 and an additional ultrasound examination in gestational week 18-19.Six fetuses had a nuchal translucency of 4 mm or more and none of these had any chromosomal abnormality. Neither had any of the fetuses in the study, karyotyped for other reasons, any chromosomal defect and nor was there any child born with aneuploidy in the study population. No strong relation between major malformations e.g. abnormalities of the heart and increased nuchal translucency was found. The fetus with the largest nuchal translucency (=6 mm) was born healthy.The efficacy of nuchal translucency measurement needs further evaluation before it can be introduced as a screening method in an unselected pregnant population.Down syndrome screening in Singapore--the effectiveness of a second trimester serum screening policy modelled on 29,360 pregnancies in KK Women's and Children's Hospital.To assess the effectiveness of a proposed second trimester Down syndrome serum screening policy in Singapore.Auditing the effectiveness of an age-only policy and comparing it against a serum screening policy modelled on the same maternal population of KK Women's and Children's Hospital in 1994 and 1995.KK Women's and Children's Hospital's (KKH) maternal age distribution is similar to the national age distribution of mothers. Sixteen percent (16.7%) of mothers in KKH, in 1994 and 1995, were 35 years or older at delivery. Based on our hospital birth defect registry, 66% (35/53) of Down Syndrome pregnancies occurred in mothers who were 35 years or older at delivery and 43% (23/53) in the oldest 6.5% of mothers (38 years or older at delivery). Using various models on KKH's population structure to estimate the expected number of Down Syndrome livebirths expected, 52%-55% and 34%-36% of Down Syndrome livebirths were expected to occur in the oldest 16.7% and 6.5% of mothers respectively. These simulated figures are much lower than the figures from the data and needs further study, assuming that the Western Down Syndrome risk model to be applicable to our population. The overall uptake of amniocentesis irrespective of gestational age at booking was 28%. In mothers who were 35 years or older at delivery and booked before 22 weeks gestation, the uptake rate of amniocentesis was 49%. There was a substantial difference in the uptake rate when the counselling was done by trained counsellers compared to those who were not.We would expect that for a fixed amniocentesis rate of 6.5% and 16.7%, serum screening would be able to detect 71% and 85% respectively of the Down syndrome pregnancies. This is more efficient than figures published from Western populations as our patients are older.Triple-marker test as screening for Down syndrome: a meta-analysis.The effectiveness of triple-marker testing as screening for Down syndrome needs to be evaluated by means of formal meta-analytic techniques. We did a MEDLINE search to identify studies evaluating the detection of Down syndrome by use of the triple-marker test. Reference lists of articles were also checked. Papers published in either English, French, or German from 1966 to November 1996 were eligible for this review. Twenty cohort studies were identified. Results of sensitivities and false-positive rates from different subgroups of the study sample were compared by using summary receiver-operating characteristic curve analysis. Medians of sensitivities and false-positive rates were also estimated. A total of 194,326 patients were included. In women of all ages, the medians for sensitivities were 67, 71, and 73 percent when the cutoffs used were 1:190-200, 1:250-295, and 1:350-380, respectively. The median false-positive rates fluctuated between 4 and 8 percent. For women at or above 35 years old, the medians of sensitivity and false-positive rate were 89 and 25 percent, respectively, when the chosen cutoff was 1:190-200. In patients below 35 years old, the median sensitivity was 57 percent if the cutoff used was 1:250-295. Summary receiver-operating characteristic curves showed that 1:190 was the best cutoff for predicting Down syndrome. The triple-marker testing is an effective screening method of detecting Down syndrome pregnancies. It is less effective in younger than in older age groups and may be offered as an alternative to amniocentesis to pregnant women over 35.Preliminary evidence for associations between second-trimester human chorionic gonadotropin and unconjugated oestriol levels with pregnancy outcome in Down syndrome pregnancies.Fifty-six cases of Down syndrome were identified in a population of women who had undergone maternal serum triple marker screening [alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) analyses]. These affected pregnancies represented all known cases present in the population of 34,368 women screened. Using a 1:270 mid-trimester Down syndrome risk to define the screen-positive group, 42 affected pregnancies were screen-positive (medians: AFP = 0.79 MOM, hCG = 2.13 MOM, uE3 = 0.62 MOM, age 34.6 years) and 14 pregnancies were screen-negative (medians: AFP = 0.82 MOM, hCG = 1.57 MOM, uE3 = 0.92 MOM, age 24.2 years). Four affected pregnancies were associated with in utero death and each of these cases was associated with relatively extreme values of AFP, hCG, and uE3, including the three highest levels of hCG in the entire series of Down syndrome pregnancies. Twenty-nine (15 screen-positive and 14 screen-negative) affected pregnancies resulted in liveborns. Down syndrome pregnancies had a significantly shorter gestational term than controls, and Down syndrome babies were also lighter than controls, even after adjustment for sex and gestational age. In affected pregnancies, a low uE3 level appeared to be associated with a greater chance of a small-for-gestational age baby. No correlations could be demonstrated between AFP or hCG levels and gestational age-adjusted term weight. Based on this small series, it would appear that uE3 may be particularly useful in detecting those Down syndrome cases associated with small-for-gestational age fetuses. A very high hCG value may indicate a higher probability of fetal death.Second trimester levels of maternal serum total activin A and placental inhibin/activin alpha and betaA subunit messenger ribonucleic acids in Down syndrome pregnancy.Previous data have shown that inhibin A (alpha/betaA) is increased about twofold in maternal serum samples from Down syndrome pregnancy. Our objectives were to determine whether activin A (betaA/betaA) was similarly increased in maternal serum from pregnancies affected with fetal Down syndrome, and to investigate whether increased expression of each inhibin/activin subunit occurred in placental tissue from cases of fetal Down syndrome.Maternal serum total activin A levels were measured in 20 cases of fetal Down syndrome and 100 unaffected pregnancy samples. In addition, analysis of inhibin/activin alpha and betaA subunit mRNA levels was performed in placental tissue extracts from six cases of fetal Down syndrome and six tissues with a normal karyotype.The median total activin A level in the Down syndrome cases was 0.82 MoM (multiples of the median); values did not differ significantly (P = 0.36, Mann-Whitney U analysis) from those in unaffected pregnancies. The inhibin alpha subunit/GAPDH mRNA ratio, but not that of betaA subunit/GAPDH mRNA, was significantly greater (P < 0.01, ANOVA) in placental tissue from Down syndrome than in control placental tissue.Unlike inhibin A, activin A is not significantly increased in Down syndrome relative to unaffected pregnancy. Furthermore, increased amounts of maternal serum inhibin A in Down syndrome pregnancy probably result from increased placental expression of inhibin alpha, but not betaA, subunit.Second trimester maternal dimeric inhibin-A in the multiple-marker screening test for Down's syndrome.The aim of this study was to evaluate the additional value of dimeric inhibin-A serum concentration in second trimester multiple-marker screening tests for pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome. We anticipated that second trimester maternal serum dimeric inhibin-A concentrations would be altered in pregnancies complicated by fetal Down's syndrome and that dimeric inhibin-A would perform better than one of the three substances analysed in the multiple-marker screening test currently in use. A total of 1156 serum samples were screened for dimeric inhibin-A in parallel with the routine classic triple test screening programme performed on a random obstetric population. Classic triple test performance was compared with detection rates obtained after substitution of unconjugated oestriol by inhibin-A and with the performance of inhibin-A and alpha-fetoprotein alone. Absolute dimeric inhibin-A maternal serum concentrations of Down's syndrome pregnancies were indeed significantly higher than those of normal pregnancies in our screened population. The performance of dimeric inhibin-A in combination with the multiple-marker screening test, however, is limited because of its strong correlation with intact human chorionic gonadotrophin.Fetal gender impact on multiple-marker screening results.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE3) are used in combination with maternal age to calculate the risk for Down syndrome (DS) in pregnancy. Increased levels of hCG and decreased levels of MSAFP and uE3 are consistent with an increased risk for DS. We retrospectively evaluated second-trimester maternal serum marker levels in a large cohort of patients with known normal outcomes and documented fetal gender. These included 15,428 patients who had MSAFP measurements, 11,428 patients with both MSAFP and hCG, and 6,090 patients with all three markers including uE3. MSAFP levels in patients with female fetuses were consistently lower than those with males. Conversely, hCG was higher in pregnancies with females as compared to males. No gender-related difference was noted for uE3. These results would suggest that the computed DS risk for female fetuses is higher than for males, despite the fact that the incidence of DS is similar in both genders. This information could be useful for calculating gender-specific DS risk; however, this would require ultrasonographic determination of fetal sex.Screening for Down syndrome at 14 weeks of pregnancy.To investigate whether statistical parameters used in Down syndrome screening between 15 and 22 weeks of pregnancy can be used at 14 weeks, we assayed alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), free alpha-hCG, free beta-hCG, and inhibin-A in 16 pregnancies with Down syndrome in the 14th week of pregnancy and expressed values in multiples of the normal median. The median and standard deviation values for these 16 pregnancies were not materially different from those published for 15-22 weeks. It is reasonable, therefore, to offer Down syndrome screening using these markers starting at 14 completed weeks of pregnancy instead of 15 weeks. It needs to be recognized, however, that serum AFP measurement for neural tube defect screening is less effective at this time than between 16 and 18 weeks of pregnancy.The distribution of nuchal translucency at 10-13 weeks of pregnancy.There is a need for a simple method of expressing nuchal translucency measurement in early pregnancy that will allow for gestational age and be useful in screening for Down's syndrome. To achieve this objective, we conducted a prospective study of 561 women with singleton pregnancies that were not affected by Down's syndrome at 10-13 weeks of gestation. Nuchal translucency measurements and crown rump length measurements were determined. Nuchal translucency measurement increased by about 17 per cent per week. Expressing the result as a multiple of the median (MOM) nuchal translucency for a given crown rump length allowed for this increase with gestational age and yielded a distribution of values that was approximately Gaussian. About 96 per cent of values lay between 0.5 and 2.0 MOM. The variance and therefore the false-positive rate of nuchal translucency were significantly reduced by recording several measurements and using the average: for example, the false-positive rate reduced from 8.3 per cent to 5.0 per cent if the average of six measurements were used instead of one--a potential 40 per cent reduction in the false-positive rate if the test were used in screening. Estimating the distribution of nuchal translucency in MOM values will assist in specifying the statistical parameters to be used in prenatal screening for Down's syndrome and the use of repeated nuchal translucency measurements is expected to have a useful effect on reducing the screening false-positive rate at a given MOM cut-off level.The influence of smoking on maternal serum AFP and free beta hCG levels and the impact on screening for Down syndrome.I have studied the impact of maternal smoking on the levels of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) during the second trimester in a large series (30,727) of self-reported smokers and non-smokers whose pregnancy resulted in the birth of a normal fetus. I have confirmed in a smaller subset of this population that self-reporting is an accurate method of assessing smoking status as confirmed by biochemical (serum cotinine) assessment. In addition, I have investigated marker levels among 195 pregnancies affected by Down syndrome with smoking status confirmed by measurement of serum cotinine. In both unaffected and Down syndrome groups, the incidence of smoking was 19 per cent but a considerable variation was observed with maternal age when the incidence in younger women (under 25) was 32 per cent. AFP median levels in unaffected smokers were 3 per cent higher, whilst in the Down syndrome group smoker medians were increased by 10 per cent compared with the non-smoker group. Free beta hCG levels in unaffected smokers were reduced by 14 per cent, whilst in the Down syndrome group smoker median levels were decreased by 16 per cent. In the smoker group, the Down syndrome detection rate was 10 per cent lower than in the non-smoker group, whilst the false-positive rate was also 2 per cent lower. Correcting for smoking status would redress this inequality and produce an overall 2 per cent increase in the detection rate for a 0.4 per cent increase in the false-positive rate. This increase in screening performance may be worth building into screening programmes, particularly in populations with a high smoking incidence.Screening of maternal serum for fetal Down's syndrome in the first trimester.Screening of maternal serum to identify fetuses with Down's syndrome is now routinely offered during the second trimester of pregnancy. Prenatal screening by means of serum assays or ultrasonographic measurements, either alone or in combination, may also be possible in the first trimester.We measured serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), the free beta subunit of hCG, and pregnancy-associated protein A in 4412 women (82 percent of whom were 35 years of age or older) who came to 16 prenatal diagnostic centers for chorionic-villus sampling or early amniocentesis at 9 to 15 weeks of gestation. Ultrasound measurements of fetal nuchal translucency were also reported. Fetal chromosomal analysis was performed in all pregnancies. Altogether, there were 61 fetuses with Down's syndrome.A total of 48 pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome and 3169 unaffected pregnancies were identified before 14 weeks of gestation; the rates of detection of Down's syndrome for the five serum markers were as follows: 17 percent for alpha-fetoprotein, 4 percent for unconjugated estriol, 29 percent for hCG, 25 percent for the free beta subunit of hCG, and 42 percent for pregnancy-associated protein A, at false positive rates of 5 percent. The results of the measurements of serum hCG and its free beta subunit were highly correlated. When used in combination with the serum concentration of pregnancy-associated protein A and maternal age, the detection rate was 63 percent for hCG (95 percent confidence interval, 47 to 76 percent) and 60 percent for its free beta subunit (95 percent confidence interval, 45 to 74 percent). Measurements of nuchal translucency varied considerably between centers and could not be reliably incorporated into our calculations.Screening for Down's syndrome in the first trimester is feasible, with use of measurements of pregnancy-associated protein A and either hCG or its free beta subunit in maternal serum.Is maternal serum triple screening a better predictor of Down syndrome in female than in male fetuses?Among euploid gestations, female fetuses have been reported to have significantly lower maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) and higher human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) levels than male fetuses. Since in maternal serum triple screening, low MSAFP and high hCG MOM independently confer greater risk of a Down syndrome fetus, we investigated the hypothesis that maternal serum triple screening is more efficacious at detecting female than male Down syndrome fetuses. A database containing all karyotypes from amniocentesis performed between August 1994 and August 1996 was accessed. All trisomy 21 cases were identified. The male-to-female ratio among trisomy 21 fetuses detected at amniocentesis after abnormal maternal serum triple screening was compared with that among trisomy 21 fetuses detected at amniocentesis for advanced maternal age (AMA), which served as the control group. Statistical analysis utilized chi-square, Fisher's exact test, and Student's t-test. A P value of less than 0.05 was considered statistically significant. Forty-nine trisomy 21 fetuses were detected in the women who underwent amniocentesis because of abnormal triple screening and 311 were detected in the control group. The proportion of male fetuses among the triple screening group was not significantly different from that of the AMA group (55 per cent vs. 57 per cent; P=0.9). Our study had a power of 80 per cent to detect a difference of 25 per cent in the male-to-female ratio (alpha=0.05, beta=0.20). The reported differences in MSAFP and hCG levels between male and female euploid fetuses do not appear to affect the sex ratio among Down syndrome fetuses detected because of an abnormal maternal serum triple screening.The role of midtrimester targeted fetal organ screening combined with the "triple test" and maternal age in the diagnosis of trisomy 21: a retrospective study.Our purpose was to evaluate the role of fetal ultrasonography in prenatal detection of trisomy 21.A retrospective study was performed on all cases of trisomy 21 diagnosed prenatally or postnatally between January 1990 and December 1993 in the Jerusalem metropolitan area. Our program of prenatal detection of trisomy 21 is a three-tiered, chronologically progressive screening that includes maternal age, biochemical serum markers, and targeted fetal organ survey. Sixty-seven thousand ninety-two babies were born during the study period; 17,084 maternal biochemistry analyses (triple test) were performed; and 6315 fetuses were karyotyped.One hundred eight cases of trisomy 21 were diagnosed prenatally and postnatally. The overall rate of detection of trisomy 21 was 92.2% when our recommendations were followed. Among those cases diagnosed prenatally, 66.6% of trisomy 21 cases had been referred for fetal karyotyping because of maternal age > or = 35 years, 18.5% because of abnormal triple test results, and 11.1% because of fetal ultrasonographic findings associated with trisomy 21. Among women < 35 years old, 80% of trisomy 21 cases were detected prenatally. Of these, 50% had been referred for karyotyping because of triple test results and 30% because of abnormal ultrasonographic findings.Midtrimester ultrasonographic targeted fetal organ screening plays a critical role in prenatal diagnosis of trisomy 21 among women under the age of 35 years.Effect of adjustment of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein levels in insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.Our objective was to determine the effect of the 20% upward adjustment of maternal serum alphafetoprotein (MSAFP) in patients with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM) on the number of patients that would be classified at increased risk for pregnancy complicated by either Down syndrome (DS) or neural tube defect (NTD). We retrospectively evaluated a database containing 63,110 patients who underwent multiple serum marker screening between 14 and 22 weeks gestation; 620 patients with IDDM had measurements of MSAFP of which 479 also had measurements of beta-HCG, allowing calculation of DS risk. Increased NTD risk was defined as MSAFP >2.5 MOM while increased DS risk was defined as a calculated risk > or =1/270. One IDDM patient delivered an infant with a NTD; it was not detected on serum screening. No infants were born with DS. Of the 620 patients with MSAFP determinations, 9 had values >2.5 MOM before adjustment. After upward adjustment, 7 additional patients were identified. Sixteen patients were identified at increased risk for DS before and after adjustment. Our data suggest that the 20% upward adjustment of MSAFP increases by 78%, the number of patients who would require further evaluation for NTD's. Although we were able to identify 620 women with IDDM who underwent serum screening for NTD, the low prevalence of NTD's did not allow us to demonstrate an increased detection rate. The effect of upward adjustment of MSAFP on the number of patients categorized at increased DS risk appears to be minimal.First trimester sonographic detection of chromosomal abnormalities in an unselected population.To investigate the role of first trimester sonography in detecting chromosomal abnormalities in an unselected obstetric population.2281 women (mean maternal age 30 years [range 16-47]; mean gestational age 12(+3) weeks [range 11-14]) underwent transabdominal scanning to assess fetal structure and, if anatomical survey was considered to be incomplete (31% of cases), transvaginal sonography was also performed. Measurement of nuchal translucency was included and karyotyping performed as considered appropriate.There were 16 chromosomal abnormalities; 13 (81%) were diagnosed at 11-14 weeks either because of a nuchal translucency greater than or equal to the 99th centile for gestational age (7/16; 44% [95% CI 25-63]) or due to the presence of structural abnormalities (6/16; 38% [95% CI 14.2-61.8]). Seventy-five percent of cases of trisomy 21 were also diagnosed either because of having a nuchal translucency greater than or equal to the 99th centile (5/8; 63%) or due to the presence of a structural abnormality (1/8; 13%).A significant proportion of fetal chromosomal abnormalities can be detected by first trimester sonographic screening to assess fetal structural appearance. The sensitivity of detection can be improved by combining measurement of nuchal translucency with detailed examination of fetal anatomy.[AFP, uE3, beta-hCG levels applied for prenatal diagnosis of Down's syndrome].To investigate the relationship between fetal trisomy 21 and alpha fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3) and beta human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) levels in maternal serum, amniotic fluid and fetal serum.AFP, uE3 and beta-hCG levels in maternal serum, amniotic fluid and fetal serum from 17 pregnancies with fetal trisomy 21 and 131 unaffected control pregnancies were measured between 16 to 28 weeks gestation using radioimmunoassay.In these pregnancies with fetal trisomy 21, the AFP and uE3 levels in maternal serum, amniotic fluid and fetal serum were lower than those in controls; but beta-hCG levels were higher (P < 0.05).To measure maternal serum AFP, uE3 and beta-hCG levels will be useful in prenatal detection of trisomy 21.First-trimester screening for fetal aneuploidy: biochemistry and nuchal translucency.Maternal dried whole-blood specimens were collected prospectively from 2010 singleton pregnancies between 9 + 0 and 13 + 4 weeks that included 18 chromosomally abnormal pregnancies (11 Down's syndrome, four trisomy 18, two trisomy 13 and one triploidy). A subset of 744 pregnancies underwent ultrasound nuchal translucency measurement and included seven Down's syndrome, four trisomy 18, two trisomy 13 and one triploidy. Patients were evaluated for risk of Down's syndrome and trisomy 18 based on biochemistry (free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A), nuchal translucency and the combination of both. In prospective biochemical screening, false-positive rates for Down's syndrome and trisomy 18 were 5.1% (66/1297) and 1.9% (25/1297) in women < 35 years of age and 14.2% (99/695) and 1.6% (11/695) in women > or = 35 years of age, respectively. The detection efficiency of aneuploidy was 6/6 (100%) in women < 35 years and 11/12 (92%) in women > or = 35 years. Nuchal translucency measurement alone detected 57% (8/14) of cases of aneuploidy at a 5.8% (42/730) false-positive rate. Modelling with the age distribution of live births, a 5% false-positive rate resulted in Down's syndrome detection efficiency of 61% by biochemistry, 73% by nuchal translucency and 87% by combining both methods. The data in this study demonstrate that combined biochemical and ultrasound evaluation for Down's syndrome and other chromosomal abnormalities in the first trimester of pregnancy yield a detection capability that may exceed that of current second-trimester prenatal screening protocols. The potential for enhanced detection coupled to an earlier alert of fetal complications could represent a substantial advantage to both clinician and patient.Screening for fetal anomalies by ultrasound at 14 and 21 weeks.A prospective study of screening for fetal abnormalities and chromosomal defects was carried out by ultrasound examination at 13-15 weeks of gestation and 20-22 weeks; the first scan was performed transvaginally and the second transabdominally. During a 4-year period (1991-95), 3490 unselected consecutive pregnancies with a total of 3514 fetuses were examined. There were 21 chromosomally abnormal fetuses, including ten with trisomy 21, and, in 19 (90.5%), fetal defects were detected at the first and/or second ultrasound examination. The most effective marker for chromosomal defects was increased nuchal translucency thickness (> or = 4 mm) at the 13-15-week scan, which was present in seven of the ten fetuses with trisomy 21 and in six of the 11 with other chromosomal abnormalities.Levels of urinary beta-core fragment, total oestriol, and the ratio of the two in second-trimester screening for Down syndrome.Levels of beta-core fragment and total oestriol in second-trimester maternal urine samples were measured in 32 Down syndrome pregnancies and 206 control pregnancies. Beta-core fragment and total oestriol values were corrected for the urinary creatinine level and expressed as multiples of the control medians (MOM). In addition, the ratio of the beta-core fragment level to the total oestriol level, without creatinine correction, was calculated, and expressed as MOM values. The median beta-core fragment, total oestriol, and ratio levels in Down syndrome cases were 5.42, 0.64, and 9.32 MOM, respectively. In the Down syndrome pregnancies, 66 per cent of the beta-core fragment levels were above the 95th centile of control levels, while 22 per cent of the total oestriol levels were below the fifth centile of control levels. In combination with maternal age, measurement of beta-core fragment and total oestriol levels in Down syndrome pregnancy resulted in an 80 per cent detection rate at a 5 per cent false-positive rate. Use of the ratio resulted in a univariate detection rate of 72 per cent. In combination with maternal age, the ratio resulted in a detection rate of 81 per cent at a 5 per cent false-positive rate. Based on this unmatched study, the measurement of a ratio of beta-core fragment to total oestriol levels, without the need for creatinine correction, may be useful in screening for fetal Down syndrome in second-trimester urine.Second-trimester maternal urinary gonadotrophin peptide screening for fetal Down syndrome in Asian women.Maternal urinary gonadotrophin peptide (UGP) was recently found to be elevated in second-trimester Down syndrome pregnancies. There is controversy about its screening efficacy. Data in the Asian population are scanty. We measured the UGP levels in 29 Down syndrome pregnancies and 297 controls and expressed them as a ratio of the urine creatinine concentration. Median UGP MOM was elevated to 3.44 (95 per cent confidence interval 1.99-5.13) in cases, compared with controls. UGP values were widely scattered in cases and controls with extensive overlap such that only 35 per cent of Down syndrome cases were expected to be detected at a 5 per cent false-positive rate. The data of the present study and previous reports show that there is a wide variability of gestation-specific UGP median values. UGP alone does not appear to be an effective screening marker for fetal Down syndrome.Differential increases in AFP, hCG, and uE3 in twin pregnancies: impact on attempts to quantify Down syndrome screening calculations.Since the advent of multiple marker screening (MMS) for Down syndrome (DS) risk calculations, limitations for twins have been apparent. Recent attempts have been made to extrapolate mathematically singleton risks to twins. Here we investigate the pattern of levels among AFP, hCG, and uE3 in twins. MMS screening data from 4,443 twin pregnancies were compared to those from 258,885 singletons from 14-21 weeks of gestational age during a 3-year period (1992-1994) in our laboratory. Medians were determined for singletons and twins, and the ratios of twins to singletons were derived. Median AFP levels for twins are approximately double those of singletons, but median increases for hCG and uE3 are less than double. The data were divided further by ethnic groups (white, African American, Asian, and Hispanic), among which there were significant variations in medians, but not in the ratios of twins to singletons. The increased serum levels of different markers in twins are not consistent across analytes, possibly reflecting independent development of different compartments. Such differences mean that a mere mathematical conversion of singleton DS risks would be imbalanced among the analytes and cannot be applied reasonably to twins. Ethnic-specific databases are as important in twins as they are in singletons.Influence of maternal age and weight on second-trimester serum alpha-fetoprotein, total and free beta human chorionic gonadotropin levels.The purpose of this study was to assess the relation of maternal age and weight on the maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), total human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) and free beta-hCG levels during the second trimester.We collected 419 serum samples from normal singleton pregnancies to assay serum marker levels of AFP, total hCG and free beta-hCG between 14 and 21 weeks of gestation. Maternal age at the day of delivery and maternal weight at the time of sampling were recorded in all cases. The relationship between maternal weight and multiple of the median (MoM) levels of serum markers was analysed by regression models.There was an inverse trend in median MoM levels of serum markers in relation to maternal weight. No significant association between maternal age and serum marker levels was found.Because of its impact on serum marker levels, weight correction may be mandatory for further refinement in the maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome.Maternal serum analyte levels in pregnancies with fetal Down syndrome resulting from translocations.Our purpose was to determine whether pregnancies affected by fetal Down syndrome resulting from Robertsonian translocations are associated with second-trimester maternal serum analyte levels different from those resulting from fetal trisomy 21.Pregnancies with Down syndrome caused by Robertsonian translocations were identified through the cytogenetics laboratories at the participating institutions. Those with maternal serum screening values between 15 and 20 weeks were evaluated.Eleven cases of fetal Down syndrome caused by Robertsonian translocations were identified. The median alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, and human chorionic gonadotropin levels were 0.68, 0.67, and 2.83 multiples of the median, respectively. These analyte levels are similar to those for fetal trisomy 21.These data suggest that Down syndrome resulting from either Robertsonian translocations or trisomy 21 will be detected in a similar percentage of cases because the second-trimester maternal serum analyte levels are similar.Maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome on population basis.The favorable attitude among the public towards prenatal diagnostics in Finland allowed us to start a trial on population basis when screening for Down's syndrome by maternal serum markers and age was introduced.Screening by maternal serum markers for Down's syndrome was offered to all 17,200 pregnant women in the Helsinki area during the study period of 2.5 years. Screening due to advanced maternal age, 37 years or more, was continued as previously, and 1133 pregnant mothers used this option. Alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotrophin, and during the first year also unconjugated estriol were used as markers.The uptake of serum screening was 84%. The proportion of false positive results i.e. risk for Down's syndrome, 1:350 or more at term, was initially 5.7%. After ultrasound scan 4.1% of the mothers remained 'screen positive'. The amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling uptake was 98.4%. Ten out of eighteen cases of Down's syndrome were detected by maternal serum screening, sensitivity 56%, 95% CI 31-79%. Other chromosomal abnormalities were found in three cases, and there were four cases of mosaicisms confined to the placenta. These were trisomies 16, 7 and 2, and tetraploidy. Elevated serum alpha-fetoprotein was found initially in 0.7% of the cases. One case of congenital nephrosis of the Finnish type and ten other, mainly structural, abnormalities were detected by high AFP.The screening was well received by the mothers. The detection rate of 56% is in the same range as in previous studies. Ultrasound scan before the test would effectively lower the false positive rate caused by incorrect timing.Combining ultrasound and biochemistry in first-trimester screening for Down's syndrome.Data on pregnancies with and without Down's syndrome between 10 and 14 weeks of pregnancy were used to determine the performance of combined ultrasound and biochemical markers in prenatal screening for Down's syndrome. We used three datasets: one published by Pandya et al. (1995) on nuchal translucency measurement in 86 Down's syndrome pregnancies; one published by Wald et al. (1996a) on free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) in 77 affected pregnancies and 385 unaffected pregnancies; and the third from Schuchter et al. on 561 unaffected pregnancies with nuchal translucency measurement. Combining the data from these three datasets showed that screening between 10 and 14 weeks by combining the serum markers with nuchal translucency measurement had a detection rate of 80 per cent for a 5 per cent false-positive rate, better than maternal age with two serum markers (62 per cent for 5 per cent) or maternal age with nuchal translucency measurement (63 per cent for 5 per cent). At this time in pregnancy, it appears that screening using the combined test is better than second-trimester serum screening (76 per cent for 5 per cent), though these estimates do not allow for any association between the markers and spontaneous fetal loss, an issue that needs to be clarified by further research. Meanwhile, these results provide a reasonable working estimate of screening performance using different combinations of these markers.Maternal serum inhibin-A in pregnancies complicated by insulin dependent diabetes mellitus.We have examined whether insulin dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM) affects maternal serum levels of inhibin-A, a recently described prenatal marker of Down's syndrome, by comparing levels in 169 women with IDDM with levels in 432 nondiabetic pregnant women between 15 and 20 weeks of gestation. There was a small but significant increase in the inhibin-A level in the diabetic women only when levels were corrected for maternal weight: median MoM 1.17 (P < 0.01 vs controls, Student's t test). The underlying mechanism for this elevation in pregnancies complicated by IDDM currently remains obscure.Screening for Down's syndrome: changes in marker levels and detection rates between first and second trimesters.To monitor changes with gestation in levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (F beta hCG) and pregnancy associated plasma protein-A (PAPP-A) in Down's syndrome pregnancies and to compare risks estimated in the first trimester with those obtained by routine screening in the second trimester for the same pregnancies.In each of 47 Down's syndrome pregnancies two maternal serum samples were obtained, one in the first trimester and one in the second trimester. Comparison of marker levels with 10,600 first trimester controls and a smaller sample of second trimester controls allowed case identification criteria based on optimum marker combinations to be developed and compared directly between trimesters.Biochemical genetics laboratory.F beta hCG was an effective marker of Down's syndrome in both the first and second trimesters. PAPP-A levels were significantly reduced in trisomy 21 pregnancies in the first trimester only. Using a population model, these two markers in combination with maternal age gave an overall detection rate of 55% for a 5% false positive rate in the first trimester. For the paired first and second trimester samples, three of six cases classified as low risk by routine second trimester screening were classified as high risk by the first trimester screening protocol of F beta hCG/PAPP-A/maternal age. However, fifteen cases identified as high risk by routine second trimester screening were classified as low risk in the first trimester, a net loss in detection of 12 cases by first trimester screening.The data suggest that first trimester detection rates for Down's syndrome using a combination of F beta hCG and PAPP-A may vary with gestation and will be lower than those currently obtained by routine second trimester screening with AFP/hCG.Results and views of women in population-wide pregnancy screening for trisomy 21 in east Finland.The serum screening test for trisomy 21 was offered to all pregnant women in East Finland during 1993. The results and the women's views on trisomy screening are reported here. A total of 9,343 (89%) of the pregnant women participated in the screening. A total of 615 women were eligible for amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling; among them 22 pregnancies were affected by Down Syndrome. Fifteen of them were detected by double screening; in 2 missed cases only maternal-serum alpha-fetoprotein had been determined. In all 5 cases missed by double screening the maternal age was less than 30 years. The women's attitudes were studied by means of a questionnaire, which was mailed to 214 women. The response rate to our questionnaire was 74%. A total of 87% of respondents highly or very highly valued the opportunity to participate in the screening. Despite the existing problems caused by late testing, 87% of respondents want to be tested again in their future pregnancies.Screening for Down syndrome during first trimester: a prospective study using free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A.Early screening for Down syndrome is desirable so that more time is left for intervention in the event of a positive test. In retrospective first trimester studies, maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A have been reported as useful markers. Our objective was to confirm these results in a prospective study carried on an unselected population.In a cohort of pregnant women recruited prospectively between 9 and 13 weeks' gestation, we measured maternal free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A in all affected pregnancies and 500 representative uneffected pregnancies. Serum concentrations were transformed to multiples of the median value in normal pregnancies of the same length of gestation, and rates of detection of various combinations of the markers were estimated by multivariate analysis.Down syndrome was observed in 18 fetuses from the 10, 160 women recruited. Levels of free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin were elevated in affected pregnancies with an overall median value 1.8 times the median of women with normal pregnancies while pregnancy-associated plasma protein A was significantly diminished (0.51 multiples of the median). At a fixed false-positive risk of 10%, 33% (11-55), 50% (27-73), 44% (11-67), and 67% (45-89) of the affected pregnancies would have been detected (95% CI) with maternal age alone or combined with with free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin, pregnancy-associated plasma protein A or both, respectively.We confirm in a prospective noninterventional study that maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A can be used in the first trimester of pregnancy to screen for Down syndrome with a performance similar to second trimester screening programs.Serum triple-marker screening in in vitro fertilization and naturally conceived pregnancies.To determine whether results of second-trimester maternal serum triple-marker screening for Down syndrome and open neural tube defects in singleton pregnancies conceived from in vitro fertilization (IVF) differ from those of pregnancies conceived spontaneously.The screen-positive rates and triple-marker levels of patients conceiving singleton pregnancies by IVF were compared to age-adjusted standards.Sixty-nine singleton IVF pregnancies with maternal serum screening were identified. Twenty-one (30.4%) of the 69 IVF singleton pregnancies had a positive screen for Down syndrome compared with a 14.4% expected screen-positive rate for the maternal age distribution in our observed sample (P = .013). The screen-positive rate for open neural tube defects in the measured population was similar to anticipated values based on historic controls (5.8% in IVF patients versus 5.3% in the total population). The median levels of the triple markers were 0.95 multiples of the median (MoM) for alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), 0.90 MoM for unconjugated estriol (E3), and 1.22 MoM for hCG.The increased hCG levels as well as the slightly lower AFP and unconjugated E3 levels may contribute to the higher Down syndrome screen-positive rate in this IVF singleton population. These results may be due to the number of embryos transferred, the maternal hormonal environment of the IVF process, or other factors. Pregnancies conceived by IVF may be twice as likely to have a positive maternal serum screening test. As additional data are collected, corrected standards should be determined.First-trimester urine free beta hCG, beta core, and total oestriol in pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome: implications for first-trimester screening with nuchal translucency and serum free beta hCG.We have examined maternal urine concentrations of beta core, free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and total oestriol in 373 control pregnancies and 43 pregnancies affected by aneuploidy (including 22 cases of Down's syndrome) in an attempt to see if any of the analytes have a value in Down's syndrome screening between the tenth and 14th week of pregnancy. We have compared the performance of these analytes against nuchal translucency measurement combined with maternal serum free beta hCG at the same period of pregnancy. Our results show that levels of urine free beta hCG and beta core are increased in Down's syndrome with average multiple of the median levels of 1.81 and 2.91, respectively. Urine total oestriol was reduced (0.83) whilst maternal serum free beta hCG was increased (1.72). In trisomy 18 the levels of all analytes were reduced, although serum free beta hCG was the most discriminating. The spread of results in the control and the Down's group for urine beta core was more than three times than that for serum free beta hCG and with urine free beta hCG it was two times wider. In combination with maternal age, urine total oestriol had a 32 per cent detection rate at a fixed 5 per cent false-positive rate; urine beta core 34 per cent, urine free beta hCG 36 per cent, maternal serum free beta hCG 44 per cent, and nuchal translucency 82 per cent. In combination with nuchal translucency, urine total oestriol added an extra 1 per cent detection, urine beta core an extra 2 per cent, urine free beta hCG an extra 3 per cent, and serum free beta hCG an extra 5 per cent. It is unlikely that any of the urine markers will be of value in first-trimester screening. Optimal first-trimester screening programmes will rely for the foreseeable future on nuchal translucency, serum free beta hCG, and possibly pregnancy-associated plasma protein A.Maternal serum free beta-hCG at 10 to 14 weeks of gestation in trisomic twin pregnancies.Maternal serum free beta-hCG was measured at 10 to 14 weeks of gestation in 136 normal twin pregnancies and in 12 twin pregnancies where one or both fetuses had trisomy 21. The values were compared with a normal range from 4181 singleton pregnancies. In the normal twins the median free beta-hCG (65 ng/mL) was about twice as high as in singletons (34 ng/mL z = -12.1, P < 0.0001). In the trisomy 21 group the median free beta-hCG (95 ng/mL) was significantly higher than in normal twins (z = 2.1, P < 0.05). However, only one of the trisomic pregnancies had a level above the 95th centile. In twin pregnancies maternal serum free beta-hCG at 10 to 14 weeks of gestation is unlikely to be useful in the prediction of fetal trisomy 21.Urinary beta-core hCG: screening for aneuploidies in early pregnancy (11-14 weeks' gestation).Initial studies at 17-22 weeks' gestation evaluating urinary beta-core human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) as a marker for Down's syndrome had suggested that it may have more potential than its serum counterpart. This study measured maternal urinary beta-core-hCG and creatinine at 11-14 weeks' gestation in a series of 26 aneuploidies (nine trisomy 21, five trisomy 18, four 45,X0, and eight others). The normal range for beta-core-hCG and beta-core-hCG/ creatinine was derived from 198 normal singleton pregnancies. Trisomy 18 cases (n = 5) had low maternal urinary beta-core-hCG creatinine levels (median 0.35 MOM, range 0.08-0.82 MOM). Whereas the other aneuploidies had no particular pattern; in particular, the trisomy 21 cases (n = 9) (median 1.16 MOM, range 0.3-4.74 MOM) did not differ significantly from 1 MOM. The findings imply that maternal urinary beta-core-hCG is not as discriminating for Down's syndrome between 11 and 14 weeks as later on in pregnancy.First trimester isolated fetal nuchal lucency: significance and outcome.In this study, we determined the outcome in cases of isolated nuchal lucency seen sonographically in the first trimester in fetuses without karyotypic abnormalities. We reviewed all cases of isolated localized fetal nuchal lucency (3 mm or greater) in 9 to 14 week fetuses over a 4 year period. Fetuses with additional sonographic abnormalities were excluded. The width of the nuchal lucency at initial sonogram as well as findings on subsequent scans were tabulated. Karyotypic, pathologic, and clinical follow-up data were obtained. Of 44 fetuses with an isolated, localized first trimester nuchal lucency, one was lost to follow-up and two were excluded owing to pregnancy termination without karyotype or pathologic analysis, thus resulting in 41 fetuses in our study group. Five fetuses (12%) had abnormal karyotypes. Twenty-seven of the remaining 36 fetuses had normal karyotypes, eight others showed no evidence of aneuploidy at birth, and one patient underwent spontaneous abortion prior to a karyotypic analysis. Among the 36 fetuses without evidence of aneuploidy, six had a poor outcome: two were spontaneous abortions, one was a therapeutic abortion of a fetus with hydrops and a pericardial effusion seen on fetopsy; one fetus died at birth of pulmonary hypoplasia associated with autosomal recessive polycystic kidney disease, and one fetus each had Noonan syndrome, and Joubert syndrome. In addition, three patients delivered their infants prematurely. Overall, 32 of 41 fetuses survived, and two (6%) were abnormal. Excluding premature infants, 27 were normally grown, term survivors. We conclude that other than having an increased risk for aneuploidy, fetuses with isolated nuchal lucency are also at risk for spontaneous miscarriage, premature delivery, and congenital anomalies unassociated with an abnormal karyotype.Maternal serum inhibin-A and free beta-hCG concentrations in trisomy 21 pregnancies at 10 to 14 weeks of gestation.To determine the relation between maternal serum inhibin-A and free beta-hCG concentrations in chromosomally normal pregnancies and to compare the two biochemical markers for their sensitivity in identifying trisomy 21 pregnancies.Inhibin-A and free beta-hCG were measured in maternal serum samples from 800 chromosomally normal singleton pregnancies at 10 to 14 weeks of gestation and 76 singleton pregnancies with fetal trisomy 21.In the normal group maternal serum inhibin-A was significantly associated with both maternal weight and gestational age (F = 11.2, P < 0.0001). In pregnancies with trisomy 21 the maternal serum inhibin-A and free beta-hCG concentrations were significantly increased (mean difference inhibin = 0.51 SD, F = 18, P < 0.0001 and mean difference free beta-hCG = 1.13 SD, F = 80, P < 0.0001). For a 5% false positive rate, the sensitivity of maternal serum free beta-hCG in identifying pregnancies with trisomy 21 was 28.9% compared with 12.8% for maternal serum inhibin-A. Delta inhibin-A was significantly associated with delta-free beta-hCG (r = 0.345, P < 0.01) and the deviation from the normal mean for free beta-hCG was significantly greater than the deviation for inhibin-A (t = 4.0, P < 0.0001). For a 5% false positive rate, the sensitivity achieved by combining information from delta inhibin-A and delta free beta-hCG was similar to the sensitivity of free beta-hCG alone (30.3% compared with 28.9%).At 10 to 14 weeks of gestation fetal trisomy 21 is associated with increased maternal serum inhibin-A and free beta-hCG levels. However, the degree of elevation of inhibin-A is less than that of free beta-hCG, and there is a significant association between levels of the two proteins. The sensitivity for trisomy 21 achieved with the combination of maternal serum inhibin-A and free beta-hCG is not significantly different from that achieved with maternal serum free beta-hCG alone.Maternal serum screening for fetal genetic disorders.Maternal serum analyte screening is an integral component of contemporary antenatal care. Based on elevated MSAFP levels, 85% to 90% of NTDs (e.g., anencephaly or spina bifida) can be detected. Using a combination of serum analytes (e.g., MSAFP, hCG, UE3) 55% to 60% of fetal Down's syndrome can be detected. Future strategies for Down's syndrome screening may include the use of new markers such as dimeric inhibin-A and urinary beta-core fragment of hCG, as well as first-trimester screening, particularly with PAPP-A and free beta-hCG.[Biochemical and ultrasonic screening of chromosomal aneuploidies in the second trimester of pregnancy].For prenatal screening of chromosomal aneuploidies (primarily the most frequent Down syndrome) maternal serum AFP screening in the second trimester of pregnancy has been supplemented by the determination of hCG in Hajdú-Bihar county. In pregnancies at risk on the basis of biochemical tests, a thorough, aimed ultrasound examination for the detection of minor and major anomalies characteristic for chromosomal abnormalities was carried out. If both biochemical and ultrasound examinations were suggestive of high risk prenatal karyotyping was offered. During a two-years prospective study 14328 pregnancies were screened. Authors could detect 38% of Down-syndrome cases prenatally, 5 cases in pregnant women at age under 35 years and at the same time the number of amniocenteses increased only by 70. It was concluded that 66% of all Down syndrome cases could have been prenatally diagnosed if prenatal chromosome test were performed in all cases at high risk on the basis of screening tests and maternal age.Maternal urinary beta-core hCG in chromosomally abnormal pregnancies in the first trimester.We evaluated urinary beta-core human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-core hCG) in the detection of fetal Down's syndrome (DS) in the first trimester of pregnancy. Urine was collected prior to performing chorionic villous sampling (CVS) between 10 and 12 completed weeks from the last menstrual period. In the 9 months of the study, there were 15 chromosomal abnormalities detected by CVS: five trisomy 21, four monosomy X, two trisomy 18, and four cases of confined placental mosaicism (CPM). In these 15 aneuploid pregnancies, the levels of urinary beta-core hCG were expressed as multiples of the median (MOM) of the ratio of beta-core hCG/creatinine for gestational age. The MOMs of this ratio in each of the five DS pregnancies were 0.2, 0.5, 1.3, 1.4, and 1.7. No difference was found between fetuses with DS or any of the other chromosomal abnormalities tested and normal fetuses. Contrary to optimistic reports of urinary beta-core hCG in the second-trimester detection of fetal DS, our data suggest that this is not a useful screening test for DS in the first trimester of pregnancy.Schwangerschaftsprotein 1 (SP1) as a maternal serum marker for Down syndrome in the first and second trimesters.The potential of the maternal serum concentration of schwangerschaftsprotein 1 (MSSP1) as a marker for Down syndrome (DS) pregnancies was evaluated in the fifth to the 20th gestational week using 156 DS pregnancies and 546 unaffected control pregnancies. In DS pregnancies, the median of the multiple of the median (MOM) of MSSP1 was 0.27 [95 per cent confidence interval (CI) 0.11-0.59] in weeks 5-9 (n = 25) and 1.28 (CI 1.11-1.49) in weeks 14-20 (n = 117), significantly different from controls (P < 10(-6). In weeks 10-12, the median MSSP1 MOM was 0.89 (CI 0.20-2.09) (n = 14), not different from controls (P = 0.42). Using MSSP1 alone as a marker for DS gave--in empirical receiver-operator-characteristics (ROC) analysis--a detection rate of about 44 percent for a false-positive rate of about 5 per cent in weeks 5-9 (using MSSP1 MOM < or = cut-off), whereas a sensitivity of about 20 percent was found for a false-positive rate of 5 percent in weeks 14-20 (using MSSP1 MOM > or = cut-off). In parameterized ROC analysis, the detection rates were 38 and 18 percent for a false-positive rate of 5 per cent in weeks 5-9 and 14-20, respectively.Race-ethnicity-specific variation in multiple-marker biochemical screening: alpha-fetoprotein, hCG, and estriol.To identify any race-ethnicity-specific differences in serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), hCG, and unconjugated estriol (E3) levels in women between 14 and 21 weeks' gestation.Data from the 3-year period 1992-1994 were analyzed from 208,257 women who had AFP screening, of whom 155,142 also had hCG and 62,121 also had E3 screened, between 14 and 21 weeks' gestation. Subjects were categorized into four groups: white, black, Asian, and Hispanic.There was a consistent pattern of analyte differences across gestational ages. Levels for AFP were generally higher in Asian and black women than in Hispanic and white women (median AFP at 16 weeks-31.2, 30.9, 27.4, 27.3, respectively), and levels of hCG and E3 were highest in Asians (hCG at 16 weeks-34.7, 30.3, 28.2, 26.8, respectively). Weight correction for AFP, hCG, and E3 levels did not compensate for the ethnic differences.Because hCG and E3 demonstrate the same general pattern of differences as AFP among ethnic groups, averaging values for all ethnic groups tends inappropriately to lower calculated Down syndrome risks for black and Asian women. Additionally, the slopes of the curves are not parallel, such that separate data bases are preferable to multiplicative correction factors. Separate data bases should be used in laboratories with volume sufficient to permit the establishment of race-ethnicity-specific regressions. Use of separate data bases should result in more accurate screening.Medians for second-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated estriol; differences between races or ethnic groups.Second-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE3) are routinely measured in screening fetuses at high risk for Down syndrome or open neural tube defects (ONTD). For test interpretation, individual patient values of these three analytes are related to population-derived median values. We evaluated data from >21000 pregnancies to determine the extent of race-specific differences in median concentrations. For samples at most gestational ages, median AFP, hCG, and uE3 values for white, black, Hispanic, and other patients were all significantly different. Differences remained significant even when data were corrected for patient weights. For each analyte, the extent of the variation was not the same at different gestational ages. Differences in median values across race/ethnicity groups appear to have only a small impact in Down syndrome screening but it may be appropriate to use alternative sets of AFP medians or adjustment factors to AFP medians for some Asian populations receiving ONTD screening.Sonography in the first trimester screening of trisomy 21 and other fetal aneuploidies.Detection of beta-core fragment in second trimester Down's syndrome pregnancies.Urinary analysis for Down's syndrome: is the measurement of urinary beta-core the future of biochemical screening for Down's syndrome.Most Down's Screening protocols have concentrated on the analysis of oncofetal antigen levels present in serum. Urine has largely been ignored, but mass screening based on a urine text has several logistical advantages. We have examined the levels of urinary beta-core as a marker of Down's syndrome. (beta-core is a major immunoreactive degradation product of hCG and in particular its beta-subunit). Elevated maternal serum hCG is the single most effective biochemical marker of Down's syndrome and levels are more than doubled. Measurement of elevated free beta-subunit has been shown to be a superior discriminator than measurement of intact or total-hCG. This was shown by an increase in comparative serum levels from 2.04 to 2.41 multiples of the control population medium (MoM). The median MoM value of beta-core for Down's cases in studies has varied between 4.38 and 6.28. The proportion of true Down's cases having a beta-core value greater than the 95th centile of the controls varied from 61 to 93%. This is far superior to any single serum marker. If other complimentary urinary markers can be found urinary screening could replace serum screening not only because of the logistical advantages but increased sensitivity.Prenatal screening for Down syndrome: should first trimester ultrasound replace maternal serum screening?Refinements in managing maternal weight adjustment for interpreting prenatal screening results.This study examines the relationship between maternal weight and serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol, and human chorionic gonadotropin in a population of 47,585 women being provided with prenatal screening for Down's syndrome and open neural tube defects. The study population contains sufficient numbers of women at the extremes of weight to allow the determination that a reciprocal-linear equation more accurately describes the weight relationship for two of the three analytes than the currently used log-linear equations. The reciprocal-linear equations, while more appropriate, provide only a minimal advantage over the log-linear equations. A more important finding is that published weight equations may not be optimal for some screening programmes, due to differences in the mean weight of the populations being tested. Screening programmes are encouraged to calculate their own weight correction formulae, based on data from their own population, and to monitor the mean maternal weight to detect when modifications in the weight correction formulae might be indicated.Down's syndrome screening marker levels following assisted reproduction.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) levels were examined in 1632 women who had ovulation induction and 327 who had in vitro fertilization. There was a highly statistically significant increase in hCG and reduction in uE3 among those with ovulation induction. The median levels were respectively 1.09 and 0.92 multiples of the normal gestation-specific median (MOM) based on a total of 34582 women. Ovulation induction appeared to have no material effect on the median AFP level but this masked a significant increase when treatment was with Clomiphene (1.05 MOM) and a significant decrease when Pergonal was used (0.93 MOM). There was a highly statistically significant reduction in uE3 among women having in vitro fertilization with a median level of 0.92 MOM. Those fertilized with a donor egg (21) had significantly higher AFP and uE3 levels than when their own egg was used. Our results were confounded by differences in gravidity, but formally allowing for this factor did not materially change the findings. None of the observed effects is great enough to warrant routine adjustment of marker levels to allow for them. Moreover, women with positive Down's syndrome screening results can be reassured that this is unlikely to be due to them having had assisted reproduction.Second-trimester dimeric inhibin-A in Down's syndrome screening.Initial studies of immunoreactive inhibin using a commercial assay have shown levels to be increased in three second-trimester series of maternal samples from Down's syndrome-affected pregnancies. This assay detected non-specifically all forms of circulating inhibin, dimeric and free alpha subunits, whether fully or partially processed. More recently, a new specific assay for dimeric inhibin-A has shown elevated results in both a first-trimester and a second-trimester series of cases. In order to assess the value of dimeric inhibin-A as a potential marker in the second trimester, we have analysed 157 Down's syndrome cases and used 367 unaffected cases across the gestational range 14-20 weeks to establish control medians and population parameters. In our series, the median MOM in Down's cases was 1.77, significantly higher than in the controls. At a 5 per cent false-positive rate, dimeric inhibin-A alone identified 37 per cent of cases. When used in conjunction with maternal age and other marker combinations, mathematical modelling showed detection rates rising from 48 per cent (inhibin-A plus age) to 61 per cent (inhibin-A, free beta hCG, age) and 68 per cent (inhibin-A, AFP, free beta hCG, age). Our data suggest that dimeric inhibin-A may have greater potential earlier in gestation when median levels at 14-16 weeks are 1.92 compared with 1.46 at 17-23 weeks. Dimeric inhibin-A may be a valuable addition to screening protocols, particularly in early gestations.Combining inhibin A with existing second-trimester markers in maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome.To assess the value of inhibin A as an additional second-trimester maternal serum marker of Down's syndrome we studied 56 affected and 280 unaffected pregnancies matched for gestational age. The median level in the cases was 1.62 multiples of the gestation-specific median (MOM) in the controls, with 95 per cent confidence limits of 1.34-1.96. The distribution of inhibin levels in affected and unaffected pregnancies was approximately log Gaussian, with means about 1 standard deviation apart. This degree of separation was similar to that for human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), free beta-hCG, and unconjugated oestriol (uE3), but about double that of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) measured in the same samples. Inhibin was largely uncorrelated with AFP and uE3, whereas the log correlation coefficient with hCG was 0.29 (P = 0.19) for Down's syndrome and 0.41 (P < 0.0001) for unaffected pregnancies; with free beta-hCG, it was 0.18 (P = 0.38) and 0.38 (P < 0.0001), respectively. On the basis of these results and other published studies, we estimate that measuring inhibin A in addition to AFP and hCG or free beta-hCG (with or without uE3) will increase the detection rate for a fixed 5 per cent false-positive rate by about 7 per cent.Screening for Down's syndrome: experience in an inner city health district.To review the experience of Down's syndrome screening in an inner city health district.In this retrospective study the names of the women were obtained from the Regional Cytogenetic Laboratory and District Down's Syndrome Register. Antenatal notes of the mothers were studied. Maternal age during the affected pregnancy, screening test performed if any, gestational age at booking and at screening, screening test results, and pregnancy outcome were reviewed.An inner city health district.Down's syndrome cases diagnosed prenatally and postnatally.None.Antenatal diagnosis of Down's syndrome was made in 15/45 women (33.3%); Edwards' syndrome was diagnosed antenatally in 2/5 women. Screening was not performed in eight women (17.8%) whose infants were affected by Down's Syndrome; it was also not performed in one woman whose baby was affected by Edwards' syndrome due to late presentation to the antenatal clinic or loss of the blood sample. Nineteen women (42.2%) with a Down's syndrome pregnancy and two women with a Edwards' syndrome pregnancy had had a negative screening test. Three women had had a positive screening test but declined amniocentesis. Among those who had a screening test, the overall detection rate of screening was 48.6% (18/37) for Down's syndrome and 50% (2/4) for Edwards' syndrome. The detection rates in different ethnic groups did not show significant difference. Four women chose not to have termination following diagnosis of Down's syndrome, giving a total reduction rate of 21%.Screening programmes for Down's syndrome have not yet resulted in a substantial reduction in the number of affected babies. In addition to trials at developing screening programmes with better detection rates, efforts should be made to improve the provision of the screening service and the quality of antenatal care in general with emphasis on early presentation and optimal understanding of the implications of the tests.Heat-stable and immunoreactive placental alkaline phosphatase in maternal serum from Down's syndrome and trisomy 18 pregnancies.Placental alkaline phosphatase (ALP) activity was investigated in second-trimester maternal sera from 37 pregnancies with Down's syndrome, 28 pregnancies with trisomy 18, and in a series of 497 controls using a fluorimetric heat inactivation assay and specific immunoassay. After conversion of individual analyte values to multiples of the normal gestational median (MOM), no significant differences in total or placental ALP activities were found in the trisomy 21 or trisomy 18 cases (P > 0.01). In the Down's syndrome pregnancies, total ALP activity was 0.93 MOM, heat-stable ALP activity was 1.09 MOM, and placental ALP (by immunoassay) 0.96 MOM. In the trisomy 18 cases, total ALP activity was 0.90 MOM, heat-stable ALP activity was 0.79 MOM, and placental ALP (by immunoassay) 0.94 MOM. We conclude that neither total nor placental ALP activity is a useful marker for Down's syndrome or trisomy 18 screening.Insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus and prenatal screening results: current experience from a regional screening programme.From around 91,000 women having routine prenatal screening for Down's syndrome and neural tube defects between July 1992 and October 1995, 261 women were identified as having insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM). Alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) levels were reduced in these women, with median levels of 0.89 and 0.91 multiples of the median (MOM), respectively. The IDDM patients had a median weight which was 6 kg heavier than that of non-IDDM women. After correction for maternal weight, the AFP and hCG levels in the IDDM patients were 0.98 and 0.92 MOM, respectively. In routine practice, using results which were not weight-corrected, the IDDM women were neither over- nor under-represented in the high-risk group for Down's syndrome, but showed a tendency to be under-represented in the high-risk group for neural tube defects.Maternal serum inhibin-A levels in twin pregnancies: implications for screening for Down's syndrome.A nested case-control study using stored serum samples collected as part of a prospective study of the outcome of pregnancy was performed to investigate concentrations of (dimeric) inhibin-A in maternal serum between 15 and 22 weeks of pregnancy in 200 twin pregnancies and 600 singleton control pregnancies. Each twin pregnancy was matched with three singleton pregnancies for gestational age (same completed week) and duration of sample storage (same calendar year), although for one twin there was insufficient serum. The median inhibin-A level in the twin pregnancies was 1.99 multiples of the median (MOM) for singleton pregnancies (P < 0.001) [95 per cent confidence interval (CI) 1.83-2.16]. These results enable inhibin-A values to be adjusted so that prenatal screening for Down's syndrome can be performed using this marker in twin pregnancies as well as in singleton pregnancies.Maternal serum inhibin-A in pregnancies with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus: implications for screening for Down's syndrome.A nested case-control study using stored serum samples collected as part of a prospective study of the outcome of pregnancy was performed to investigate concentrations of (dimeric) inhibin-A in maternal serum between 15 and 22 weeks of pregnancy in 126 pregnancies among 92 women with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM). Each IDDM pregnancy was matched with two control singleton pregnancies for gestational age (same completed week) and duration of sample storage (same calendar quarter). The median inhibin-A level in the IDDM pregnancies was 0.88 multiples of the median (MOM) for pregnancies without IDDM at the same gestational age (P = 0.05) (95 per cent confidence interval 0.78-1.00) or 0.91 MOM after adjustment for maternal weight. These results enable inhibin-A values to be adjusted so that prenatal screening for Down's syndrome can be performed using this marker in IDDM pregnancies as well as in non-diabetic pregnancies.Nuchal translucency cannot be used as a screening test for chromosomal abnormalities in the first trimester of pregnancy in a routine ultrasound practice.We decided to assess the practicability of introducing nuchal translucency (NT) measurements as a screening programme for fetal Down's syndrome in the first trimester of pregnancy, within the population of women who receive ultrasound examinations in our department. Over a 1-year period, measurements were made in 923 fetuses at < or = 13 weeks' gestation. Fifty-two per cent of the mothers were 36 years or older or had a past history of a chromosomally abnormal fetus or child. Measurements were only successful 58 per cent of the time; this improved to 74 per cent if the fetus was > or = 10 weeks' gestation. Inter-observer variability did not cause a major problem. There were 36 fetuses with an NT > or = 3 mm. Two of these fetuses had a chromosomal abnormality (both trisomy 21). The translucency in these two cases was so large that they would have been detected and offered prenatal diagnosis even prior to this study. There was a total of ten aneuploidies in the study group. Only two of these fetuses were detected by this screening method; five had an NT measurement < 3 mm and in three fetuses (all trisomy 21), measurements were not successful. We outline the practical problems that could be expected by introducing ultrasound screening in a routine setting. Although the efficacy of the test in a research setting may seem good, the effectiveness in everyday usage appears much less impressive, making its uptake as a screening technique in a general ultrasound practice at this stage imprudent.Abnormal biochemical serum screening versus 2nd-trimester ultrasound-detected minor anomalies as predictors of aneuploidy in low-risk patients.To compare the yield of multiple-marker biochemical screening with that of minor fetal anomalies observed on ultrasound for detection of aneuploidy in low-risk patients.The results of 1,073 amniocenteses performed because of abnormal biochemical screening tests were compared against 197 amniocenteses performed for minor anomalies as detected on level II ultrasound at 15-22 weeks of gestation.False-positive results were observed in about 7% of serum screening patients and in 1.7% of the ultrasound cases. Chromosomally abnormal fetuses were detected in 2% of the amniocenteses performed because of abnormal serum screening and in 2.5% of the cases with ultrasound-defined minor anomalies.Both methods identify patients at risk for abnormal karyotypes. Although the evaluation of serum biochemical markers yielded more false-positive results, it is more suitable than ultrasound for mass population screening.Risk of Down syndrome and any clinically significant chromosome defect in pregnancies with abnormal triple-screen and normal targeted ultrasonographic results.Our purpose was to study prospectively the use of ultrasonographic biometry to refine the risk estimates for both Down syndrome and any clinically significant chromosome defect in women with abnormal biochemical triple-screen results.Ultrasonographic biometry and anatomic survey were performed on study and control cases. Expected values for humerus, femur, combined humerus plus femur lengths, and abdominal circumference were generated on the basis of biparietal diameter obtained from a normal group. Threshold observed/expected values of each measurement for screening for Down syndrome and clinically significant chromosome defects were determined with receiver-operator characteristic curves. By stepwise logistic regression analysis the optimal screening parameters, including nuchal thickness, for detection of Down syndrome and clinically significant chromosome defect were determined. Risk tables for chromosome anomalies were developed on the basis of ultrasonography and triple-screen values.Of 1034 cases at risk for Down syndrome (risk > or = 1/270) or trisomy 18 on the basis of triple-screen results, there were 11 cases of Down syndrome, 1 of trisomy 18, and 17 clinically significant chromosome defects. Abnormal nuchal thickness or observed/expected humerus length < 0.92 was the most sensitive parameter for Down syndrome detection. Abnormal nuchal thickness or observed/expected combined femur and humerus length < 0.90 was the most sensitive for significant chromosome defects. With abnormal biometry or anatomy the Down syndrome risk was 8 of 127 versus 1 of 753 in normals, odds ratio 50.4 (95% confidence interval 6.4 to 90.2), p < 0.00001, and the risk of significant defects was 11 of 90 versus 6 of 830 in normals, odds ratio 19.3 (95% confidence interval 6.4 to 60.5), p < 0.00001. In a pregnancy with a 1 in 270 triple-screen risk for Down syndrome, normal biometric and anatomic results reduce the risk to 1 in 2100.Normal ultrasonographic anatomy and biometry significantly reduces the risk of both Down syndrome and any significant chromosome defects in pregnancies with abnormal triple-screen results.Triple marker screening in native Japanese women.Prenatal screening using the maternal serum markers alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated oestriol was investigated in a native Japanese population. Comparison with a Caucasian U.S. population revealed differences which led to modification of the generally used equations for risk calculations. Prenatal screening was shown to be clinically useful.Serum markers for Down's syndrome in relation to number of previous births and maternal age.We conducted a study to investigate the effect of parity on the following six serum markers used in screening for Down's syndrome, after adjusting them for ethnic group and maternal weight: alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), free alpha-hCG, free beta-hCG, and dimeric inhibin A. We aimed to estimate the effect of adjusting for any differences found on the screening performance. AFP, uE3, and hCG concentrations were available from 16,666 women with singleton pregnancies without Down's syndrome or neural tube defects and without insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus, who were screened between 15 and 22 weeks' gestational age. Stored serum samples were available on a subset of 1347 women and these were used to measure free alpha-hCG, free beta-hCG, and inhibin A. Serum concentrations were expressed as multiples of the median (MOM) for women of the same gestational age, weight, and ethnic group. Of the six markers, only hCG levels were affected by parity; hCG levels decreased by 3.1 per cent per previous birth (95 per cent confidence interval 2.2-4.0 per cent); there was no significant relationship between the number of previous abortions and hCG level after adjustment for the number of previous births. The effect of previous births on hCG was not due to maternal age. Only AFP was affected by maternal age, but the effect was small; levels increased by 4.4 per cent per 10 years of age (3.2-5.7 per cent). It is not worthwhile adjusting serum markers for parity or for maternal age in prenatal screening for Down's syndrome because their effect on the performance of screening is negligible.Effect of allowing for ethnic group in prenatal screening for Down's syndrome.We conducted a study to investigate ethnic group differences in levels of serum markers used in screening for Down's syndrome [serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), free alpha- and free beta-hCG, and dimeric inhibin-A], to estimate the extent to which maternal weight differences between ethnic groups explain these differences, and to estimate the effect of adjusting for ethnic group and maternal weight on screening performance. Serum measurements were taken from women who were screened prenatally for Down's syndrome. AFP, uE3, and hCG concentrations were available from 9462 white, 4215 black, and 4392 South Asian women with singleton pregnancies without Down's syndrome or neural tube defects between 15 and 22 weeks' gestational age. Frozen serum samples were available from a subset of 922 white, 449 black, and 135 South Asian women and were used for measurement of free alpha-hCG, free beta-hCG, and inhibin. Values were expressed as multiples of the median (MOM) for women of the same gestational age. There were statistically significant differences in the serum marker levels between ethnic groups that were not explained by differences in maternal weight. The main differences were found in black women compared with white women; black women had serum AFP levels 22 per cent higher (95 per cent confidence interval 20-24 per cent), total hCG levels 19 per cent higher (16-22 per cent), and free beta-hCG levels 12 per cent (3-21 per cent) higher. The other differences were less than 10 per cent. Adjusting for ethnic group only had a small estimated effect on screening performance: a maximum of about 0.5 per cent extra detection at a 5 per cent false-positive rate. At a fixed risk cut-off level, the false-positive rate will not be materially different between different ethnic groups. Adjusting serum markers for ethnic groups improves Down's syndrome screening performance to a very small extent. It is worthwhile because of its established value in AFP screening for open neural tube defects.Can reliable Down's syndrome detection rates be determined from prenatal screening intervention trials?OBJECTIVES - To develop a standardised approach for analysing Down's syndrome screening performance in clinical practice and to apply it to published intervention trials in order to estimate detection and false positive rates more accurately. METHODS - Peer reviewed intervention trials, grouped by specific combination of analytes, were reanalysed. Revised detection rates were calculated for each study, taking into account both the high spontaneous loss during the last half of pregnancy and the possible under ascertainment of Down's syndrome live births not detected by screening. Collective screening performance was estimated, when possible, using a published methodology based on fitting receiver-operator characteristic curves. RESULTS - Sixteen trials were analysed; 11 using three, and five using two, analytes. Collective screening performance for the triple analyte trials was Down's syndrome detection rates of 57, 64, and 69% at amniocentesis referral rates of 3, 5, and 7% respectively. Four of the five studies involving two analytes performed less well, individually, when compared with the overall performance of the three analyte studies. It was not possible to estimate collective performance for the two analyte studies because there were too few. CONCLUSIONS - Accurate Down's syndrome detection rates are difficult to obtain in intervention trials owing to two potential biases, both of which tend to produce overestimates of the true rates. These sources of bias need to be taken into account when analysing and reporting Down's syndrome intervention trials. The methodology presented here offers the opportunity to achieve a more reliable, standardised estimate of both individual and collective intervention trial screening performance.Second trimester levels of maternal serum inhibin A, total inhibin, alpha inhibin precursor, and activin in Down's syndrome pregnancy.To determine the levels of various biochemical forms of the placental protein, inhibin (total inhibin, inhibin A, and alpha inhibin precursor) and activin in maternal serum samples from fetal Down's syndrome, and to determine which of these analytes most effectively identifies samples from affected pregnancies.Maternal serum samples were collected from 100 unaffected pregnancies and 20 cases of fetal Down's syndrome during gestational weeks 15-20 for routine triple marker screening, and were stored frozen after clinical assay. Levels of inhibin A, total inhibin, alpha inhibin precursor (pro-alphaC), and activin were compared retrospectively in the Down's syndrome cases and control samples.There was no association of the inhibin or activin levels with gestational age or length of freezer storage, and therefore single median values were determined for the unaffected pregnancies for each analyte. Multiples of the unaffected median (MoM) values were calculated for all cases, showing that inhibin A (1.95 MoM) provided the best discrimination between cases and controls, followed by total inhibin (1.37 MoM). Mann-Whitney U analysis showed significant group differences in inhibin A (P = 0.0001) and total inhibin (P = 0.0005). In contrast, alpha inhibin precursor (0.81 MoM) and activin (1.16 MoM) levels in Down's syndrome cases were not significantly different from those in unaffected patients.Levels of inhibin A and total inhibin, but not alpha inhibin precursor or activin, are significantly raised in maternal serum from cases of fetal Down's syndrome. These data, taken together, indicate that inhibin A levels are specifically raised in Down's syndrome pregnancy. 45% of the inhibin A levels in the Down's syndrome samples were above the 90th centile of unaffected levels, indicating that inhibin A may be as good a marker as human chorionic gonadotrophin, the most informative serum marker currently in use.First-trimester biochemical screening for Down syndrome with the use of PAPP-A, AFP, and beta-hCG.Biochemical screening for Down syndrome (DS) is well established in the second trimester of pregnancy, but there is little information available on its value in the first trimester. This study describes our preliminary results with biochemical screening for DS in the first trimester of pregnancy in order to evaluate its efficacy at this time. Our study population, including 19 DS pregnancies, was evaluated using maternal serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG), and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A). At a false positive rate (FPR) of 5 per cent, the detection rate (DR) for DS is 9 per cent for beta-hCG, 18 per cent for AFP, and 66 per cent for PAPP-A when considering these parameters individually. With different combinations of the analytes, the best detection rates are obtained with the association of PAPP-A and AFP (85 and 82 per cent DR for a 10 and 5 per cent FPR, respectively). Our data support the value of first-trimester biochemical screening for DS and that of PAPP-A as a single marker.Maternal serum triple analyte screening and adverse pregnancy outcome.The prognostic value of maternal serum triple analyte screening with AFP, hCG and uE3 (unconjugated estriol) was studied early in the second trimester of pregnancy. In this case-control study of 38 women and 76 matched controls derived from a consecutive screened population of 28,897, case selection was based upon elevated MSAFP and MShCG (> or = 2 MOM) and low MSuE3 (< or = 0.6 MOM). Adverse pregnancy outcome was found in 65.8% of cases and 2.6% of controls (RR 25, 95% CI 6.3-100.0). When increased odds (> or = 1 in 270) for Down's syndrome were considered with the abnormal analyte screen, fetal/congenital defects, fetal neonatal loss or low birth weight were noted in 17/26 cases (65.4%). Elevated MSAFP and MShCG with low values for estriol, with or without increased odds for Down's syndrome, imply an unfavorable prognosis for both the fetus and the child.Maternal serum screening for fetal Down syndrome in IVF pregnancies.To assess the influence of in vitro fertilization (IVF) on maternal serum human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), the maternal serum hCG and AFP values were studied in 67 IVF pregnancies and compared with the results of a control group of 4732 spontaneously conceiving patients. Maternal serum hCG was significantly higher and AFP significantly lower in the IVF group. Possible explanations and implications for prenatal diagnosis in IVF pregnancies are discussed.Multiple marker screening for Down syndrome in twin pregnancies.This study documents the screening performance, in practice, of a published protocol for interpreting second-trimester Down syndrome risk in twin pregnancies, using maternal serum biochemical markers. Within a cohort of 35,150 pregnancies, 410 twin pregnancies were identified. The rate of twinning was positively associated with maternal age. Of the 274 twin pregnancies known prior to screening, 15 (5.5 per cent) were classified as being screen-positive for Down syndrome. When maternal age and dating method were taken into account, the screen-positive rates in twin and singleton pregnancies did not differ significantly. Nine of the 14 screen-positive women with viable twin pregnancies chose amniocentesis [64 per cent, 95 per cent confidence interval (CI) 35-87]. No cases of Down syndrome were identified. Based on modelling, an estimated 73 per cent of monozygotic twin pregnancies and 43 per cent of dizygotic twin pregnancies with Down syndrome would be identified at a 5 per cent false-positive rate. The overall detection rate would be about 53 per cent. When laboratories offer multiple marker screening to women with twin pregnancies, the false-positive rate ought to be similar to that found in singleton pregnancies; the detection rate is, however, likely to be lower for dizygotic twins.Similarity of insulin-dependent diabetics' and non-insulin-dependent diabetics' levels of beta-hCG and unconjugated estriol with controls: no need to adjust as with alpha-fetoprotein.To determine if the same systematic alteration of serum values seen for alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) in diabetic patients is also seen for beta-hCG and unconjugated estriol (uE3).Serum AFP, beta-hCG, and uE3 results were obtained in 18,639 patients for whom complete follow-up information was obtained. Patients were divided into euglycemic (n = 18,088), insulin-requiring diabetics (n = 104), and non-insulin-requiring diabetics (n = 437), as well as by race.The 20% adjustment used for AFP appropriately corrects serum values. No such systematic variation is seen for either beta-hCG or uE3 by glycemic status or race.No adjustment for beta-hCG or uE3 is necessary for diabetes for biochemical screening programs.Prenatal screening using maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated estriol: two-year experience in a health maintenance organization.The objective of this study was to evaluate a 2-year experience in a health maintenance organization with mid-trimester maternal serum screening with alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (HCG), and unconjugated estriol (UE) as a screen for fetal Down's syndrome. Women at 15-20 weeks gestation were offered triple marker screening. A patient-specific second trimester risk of 1:295 for Down's syndrome was used as a threshold for referral. Women at risk for trisomy 18 were identified by a protocol with fixed low cutoffs. The AFP threshold for referral for neural tube defects (NTD) was 2.0 multiples of the median (MoM). Patients at risk were offered ultrasonography, genetic counseling, and prenatal diagnosis. A total of 6,474 samples were drawn. The initial screen positive rate for Down's syndrome was 7.1%. After ultrasound evaluation, 351 (5.7%) of the remaining 6,197 women were still at risk for Down's syndrome. After genetic counseling, 292 (4.7%) women underwent prenatal diagnosis. Overall, 12 of 16 (75%) cases of Down's syndrome were detected antenatally by triple marker screening. Using AFP alone, only 3 of 14 (21%) cases of Down's syndrome in women under 35 years would have been detected. We detected 1 abnormal karyotype (including one 45, X) for every 22 amniocenteses performed for abnormal Down's syndrome screening. For trisomy 18, 13 women (0.2%) were at risk and, of these, 3 cases were diagnosed. All 6 cases of NTD during the study period were detected by AFP after identifying 3.8% of women as at risk. In conclusion, in the setting of a health maintenance organization where abnormal screening tests were managed by a single referral center, triple marker screening was effective not only for screening for fetal Down's syndrome, but also for trisomy 18 and NTD.Maternal serum screening of fetal chromosomal abnormalities by AFP, UE3, hCG and free-beta hCG. Prospective and retrospective results.We have conducted a prospective study to ascertain the reliability of the triple test in detecting aneuploid fetuses in a Mediterranean, pregnant population. 2978 singleton pregnancies in the 15-22 completed week's gestational range were enrolled in this study between January 1992 and June 1994. The measurements of the analytes AFP, hCG and UE3 in the maternal serum combined with maternal age in a multivariate risk approach were utilized to detect pregnancies at increased risk (cut of > or = 1:270) to undergo prenatal diagnosis by amniocentesis. This screening was preferentially reserved to young patients (median age of the population 29 years). 212 pregnancies resulted screen positive to triple test and 178 accepted fetal chromosomal analysis. Three Down's syndrome, a Turner 45XO and a triploidy 69XXY were detected in the sample undergoing prenatal diagnosis. One aneuploid pregnancy (Down's syndrome) was recorded in the population with negative result (risk < 1:270). As part of this study we have subsequently compared the sensitivity of the test substituting total hCG with free-beta marker in samples from aneuploid pregnancies (16 cases) and unaffected pregnancies (300 cases). The detection rate for the two combinations was identical (81%) as well as the false positive rate (5.7% versus 5.3%) derived from the normal samples. All together these combined results of our study support the increasing call for triple test in screening programmes and indicate that further data be collected before recommending the replacement of total hCG with free-beta analyte.Effect of in vitro fertilization on human chorionic gonadotropin serum concentrations and Down's syndrome screening.To investigate the association between IVF and Down's syndrome screening analytes (alpha-fetoprotein [AFP] and hCG) during the second trimester.Retrospective analysis.University-based tertiary care infertility clinic.Data on 41 consecutive singleton IVF pregnancies and 4,935 naturally occurring singleton pregnancies.Maternal serum hCG concentrations were elevated (mean 1.52 multiples of the median [MoM]) in IVF pregnancies, whereas there were no significant differences in AFP levels (mean 1.02 MoM). The mean maternal age was higher in the subjects than in controls (33.8 compared with 28.7 years). In relation to Down's syndrome risk assessment, the pattern of the two markers, together with maternal age, indicated high risk more often in the study subjects than in the controls. In vitro fertilization patients had a false-positive rate of 26.8% compared with 6.6% in women without fertility problems.The increased false-positive rate in Down's syndrome screening is related not only to advanced maternal age but also, in part, to the elevated hCG concentrations observed in pregnancies after assisted reproduction. The mechanism behind increased hCG production remains to be elucidated, but it may be an effect associated with infertility or the procedures by which these women conceive. To provide an objective assessment of an individual patient's risk of fetal abnormality, the impact of IVF on hCG biochemistry should be studied further in larger samples and adjustments made if appropriate.Multiple marker screening in multifetal gestations: failure to predict adverse pregnancy outcomes.The objective of the study was to assess whether the association known in singleton pregnancies of high maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) or human chorionic gonadotropin (HCG) with adverse outcomes applies also to multifetal gestations. Maternal serum AFP and HCG were evaluated in 207 multifetal pregnancies. High values were defined as a maternal serum AFP of > 4.5 and a HCG of > 4.0 multiples of the median (MoM), with appropriate adjustments. Results were correlated with premature delivery, stillbirths, or pregnancy termination for fetal anomalies. There were 10 stillbirths, 7 terminations of pregnancy for fetal anomalies, and 66 premature deliveries in the study group. Maternal serum AFP was somewhat higher in abnormal pregnancies than in those with normal outcome (3.4 vs. 2.5 MoM, respectively, NS). A high AFP level was found in 6% of pregnancies with adverse outcomes and in 4% of uncomplicated gestations (NS). High HCG values, also observed in 5% of cases, were all associated with normal outcome. Multiple marker screening suggested an increased risk for aneuploidy in 9% of patients, all of whom were euploid on amniocentesis karyotypes. Maternal serum screening in multiple gestations is confounded by the differing contributions of fetuses, and abnormal results cannot reliably predict adverse pregnancy outcomes.Maternal serum screening for birth defects: results of a Connecticut regional program.Second trimester maternal serum screening provides a method to identify pregnancies at high risk for fetal Down's syndrome, trisomy 18, open neural tube defects, and a variety of other chromosomal and nonchromosomal fetal anomalies. Results are presented for a regional program to identify high-risk pregnancies using alpha feto-protein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated estriol (uE3) analyses (triple marker testing). A total of 27,140 women received screening. Using a midtrimester Down's syndrome risk of 1:270 to define the high-risk group, 5.26% of women of all ages were screen-positive for Down's syndrome resulting in the eventual detection of approximately 72% of the affected fetuses. The detection rate for patients under 35 at estimated date of delivery was 61% and for women 35, or older, the detection rate was 100%. A separate protocol to screen for trisomy 18 identified 0.2% of pregnancies, with 38% of the trisomy 18 cases present in this group. Over 3% of women screen-positive for Down's syndrome or trisomy 18 had a serious fetal chromosome anomaly. In addition, 2.89% of women had an elevated AFP (greater or equal to 2.0 multiples of median). This component of the screening resulted in the identification of 86% of the neural tube defects, 75% of the ventral wall defects, and also some of the other various fetal anomalies present in the screened population. Since both laboratory and clinical data are combined to generate patient-specific risks, there is a need for quality control elements that go beyond that normally required for a clinical laboratory alone. We stress the need for comprehensive follow-up programs to evaluate screening programs and maintain high quality.Prenatal screening for Down's syndrome using inhibin-A as a serum marker.The value of measuring inhibin-A (a beta A dimer) with human chorionic gonadotrophin (total or the sub-units free a-hCG and free beta-hCG separately), alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) was examined to determine the effect on the performance of serum screening for Down's syndrome between 15 and 22 weeks of pregnancy. The study was based on stored serum samples from 77 Down's syndrome singleton pregnancies and 385 unaffected singleton pregnancies, matched for maternal age, gestational age, and duration of storage of the sample, supplemented by data from 970 white women with unaffected pregnancies. Inhibin-A was elevated in the serum of women with Down's syndrome pregnancies with a median of 1.79 multiples of the median (MOM). Using the four serum markers AFP, uE3, total hCG, and inhibin-A, in addition to maternal age, 70 per cent of Down's syndrome pregnancies were detected for a 5 per cent false-positive rate compared with 59 per cent with the conventional triple test (AFP, uE3, and total hCG with maternal age). If the estimate of gestational age were based on an ultrasound scan examination, the detection rate would be 77 per cent [95 per cent confidence interval (CI) 69-85 per cent] using the four serum markers including inhibin-A, compared with 67 per cent with the triple test or 79 per cent (95 per cent CI 71-87 per cent) if marker values were adjusted for maternal weight. If the detection rate were kept at 70 per cent and the gestational age were estimated by an ultrasound scan examination, the four-marker test would reduce the false-positive rate from 6-1 per cent using the triple test to 2-9 per cent. The results were virtually the same if free beta-hCG was used instead of total hCG. The inhibin-A-based four-marker test is the most effective method of prenatal screening for Down's syndrome suitable for routine use. If the extra cost required to carry out the inhibin-A test were less than about [symbol: see text]3 per woman screened, the four-marker test including inhibin-A would be financially cost-effective.Serum screening for Down's syndrome between 8 and 14 weeks of pregnancy. International Prenatal Screening Research Group.To determine the value of serum screening for Down's syndrome at 8-14 weeks of pregnancy using seven potential serum markers (alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol, total human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), free alpha-hCG, free beta-hCG, pregnancy associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A), and dimeric inhibin A).Stored blood samples collected from women at about 10 weeks of pregnancy, prior to having chorionic villus sampling procedure on account of advanced maternal age, were retrieved from pregnancies associated with Down's syndrome and from matched unaffected pregnancies.Twenty-one obstetric centres in nine countries.Seventy-seven pregnancies associated with Down's syndrome each matched with five controls (except in two cases that were matched with four controls) for maternal age (same five year age groups), duration of storage of the serum sample (same calendar year), and gestational age (usually same week of pregnancy).The levels of two potential markers differed between affected and unaffected pregnancies sufficiently to be of value in screening--free beta-hCG and PAPP-A. The median free beta-hCG level in affected pregnancies was 1.79 times the median level for unaffected pregnancies, and the median PAPP-A level was 0.43 times the normal median. These two markers were combined with maternal age to estimate a woman's risk of having a fetus with Down's syndrome. A screening programme that used a risk cutoff level of 1:300 would detect 63% of affected pregnancies and also classify 5.5% of unaffected pregnancies as screen positive. None of the other five markers added more than 2% detection for the same false-positive rate.The performance of screening using maternal age and serum-free beta-hCG and PAPP-A at 10 weeks of pregnancy was better than the double test (alpha-fetoprotein and hCG with maternal age) and similar to the triple test (alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol and hCG with maternal age) at 15-22 weeks.First-trimester Down syndrome screening: free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A.Our purpose was to determine the feasibility of a first-trimester Down syndrome screening protocol including free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A.First-trimester maternal blood samples from 22 Down syndrome and 483 control cases were assayed for free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay procedures. False-positive and detection rates were determined on the basis of Down syndrome risks calculated from the levels of biochemical markers and maternal age. Because 11 of the 22 Down syndrome cases were from older pregnancies (> or = 35 years old), rates were recalculated with the United States age distribution of live births to get a more representative estimate of false positives and detection efficiency.The median free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A levels in cases of Down syndrome was 2.09 (95% confidence interval 1.69 to 2.62) and 0.405 multiples of the median (95% confidence interval 0.28 to 0.67), respectively. At a 5.0% false-positive rate, 15 (68.2%) Down syndrome cases were detected. By the use of the age distribution of live births, 63% of cases could be expected to be detected at a 5.0% false-positive rate.First-trimester free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A screening for Down syndrome can achieve detection rates as high as those associated with alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotropin or alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated estriol screening in the second trimester. Prospective studies are needed to further assess first-trimester screening.Nicked free beta-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin: a potential new marker for Down syndrome screening.Our purpose was to investigate maternal serum levels of nicked free beta-subunit in normal and Down syndrome pregnancies.Serum specimens were obtained from 64 karyotypically normal and 6 Down syndrome pregnancies before amniocentesis. Two immunoenzymometric assays for the beta- subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin were used to determine the level of free beta-subunits with peptide linkage breaks ("nicks") between residues 43 to 48.The mean level of nicked free beta-subunit in Down syndrome was 4.76 multiples of the median, which was significantly elevated compared with normal controls (1.07 multiples of the median, p<0.05). In 5 of 6 cases levels were > or = 2 multiples of the median, with a range of 1.96 to 15.43 multiples of the median, which was 2- to 3-fold higher than the regular free beta-subunit assay (mean level 1.53 multiples of the median, range 0.70 to 3.10 multiples of the median). In one case no nicked free-beta subunits were detectable.Our preliminary data indicate that nicked free beta-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin might be a sensitive marker for Down syndrome screening.Prenatal maternal dried blood screening with alpha-fetoprotein and free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin for open neural tube defect and Down syndrome.Our purpose was to evaluate second-trimester prenatal screening for open neural tube defects and Down syndrome by use of dried blood specimen collection and transport.A prospective study of 7497 dried blood specimens from patients <35 years old was performed. Specimens were assayed for maternal blood alpha-fetoprotein and free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin. Patient-specific risks for both disorders were calculated and used to determine whether further evaluation was indicated. The study included an evaluation of the median and SD of analyte multiple of the median levels.The initial positive rate for open neural tube defect was 4.4% adjusted to 2.7% after ultrasonographic revision and collection of a second sample. The initial positive rate for Down syndrome was 3.6% adjusted to 2.8% after ultrasonographic revision. All seven cases of open neural tube defect were detected within the increased risk group. Six of 8 (75%) cases of Down syndrome were detected. The median alpha-fetoprotein multiple of the median was 3.5 in open neural tube defect cases and 0.6 in Down syndrome cases. The median free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin multiple of the median was 2.4 in Down syndrome cases. The SD (log e) of alpha- fetoprotein and free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin in 5868 unaffected white patients was 0.4022 and 0.5635, respectively.Second-trimester dried blood screening for open neural tube defects and Down syndrome can achieve screening efficiency comparable to serum-based protocols with distinct advantages over the conventional method of blood collection.Dimeric inhibin A as a marker for Down's syndrome in early pregnancy.In screening for Down's syndrome in the second trimester of pregnancy, the concentrations of alpha-fetoprotein, the beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin, and intact human chorionic gonadotropin in material serum are widely used markers. We investigated a new marker, dimeric inhibin A, and compared its predictive value with that of the established markers.Serum samples were obtained at 7 to 18 weeks of gestation from 58 women whose fetuses were known to be affected by Down's syndrome, 32 whose fetuses were affected by trisomy 18, and 438 whose fetuses were normal, and the samples were analyzed for each marker. Individual serum concentrations of each marker were converted to multiples of the median value at the appropriate length of gestation in the women with normal pregnancies, and rates of detection of Down's syndrome by screening for inhibin A in various combinations with the other markers were estimated by multivariate analysis.In the women with fetuses affected by Down's syndrome, the serum inhibin A concentrations were 2.06 times the median value in the women with normal pregnancies (P < 0.001). This compared with 2.00 times the median for the beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin, 1.82 times the median for intact human chorionic gonadotropin, and 0.72 for alpha-fetoprotein. The serum concentrations of inhibin A in the women with fetuses affected by Down's syndrome did not appear to be significantly elevated above normal until the end of the first trimester and were not significantly different from normal in the women with fetuses affected by trisomy 18 (P = 0.17). The rate of detection of Down's syndrome was 53 percent and the false positive rate was 5 percent when alpha-fetoprotein, the beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin, the maternal age were used together as predictors. The detection rate increased to 75 percent when inhibin A was added (P = 0.002).In the second trimester of pregnancy, measuring inhibin A in maternal serum, in combination with measurements of alpha-fetoprotein and beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin, significantly improved the rate of detection of Down's syndrome.Screening for fetal trisomy 21 in the first trimester of pregnancy: maternal serum free beta-hCG and fetal nuchal translucency thickness.The aim of this prospective study was to measure the contribution of maternal serum free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-hCG) in a screening program for fetal trisomy 21 based on fetal nuchal translucency in the first trimester of pregnancy. The maternal serum was collected at the time of the ultrasound scan and assayed without knowledge of the nuchal translucency measurement or karyotype. A total of 2529 pregnancies were examined (normal group, n = 2427; trisomy 21 group, n = 102). Maternal serum free beta-hCG was significantly associated with gestational age and maternal weight. In the trisomy 21 group the free beta-hCG was significantly higher than in the normals, being above the 95th centile in 29% of the cases. There was no significant association between the deviation from the mean for free beta-hCG and nuchal translucency thickness in either the normal or the trisomy 21 groups. When maternal serum free beta-hCG was added to a model based on maternal age and fetal nuchal translucency thickness, the detection rate for trisomy 21 was increased from 80% to 85%.Enhanced twin pregnancy detection within an open neural tube defect and Down syndrome screening protocol using free-beta hCG and AFP.We have applied our multimarker approach of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free-beta human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) for Down syndrome screening to multiple gestations to assess its efficacy for improved detection of twin and triplet pregnancies. This study matched 225 cases of twin pregnancy and 39 cases of triplet pregnancy each with ten singleton pregnancies based on gestational week, race, time to receive sample, time of year of sample, and geographical area. The ratios of the MOM for each group at the tenth, 50th, and 90th percentiles were compared by the Wilcoxon test. Risks for twins were calculated using Bayes' rule, the age-related incidence of twins, and the levels of AFP and free-beta hCG. The tenth, 50th and 90th percentiles of free-beta hCG MOMs in twin and triplet cases were 0.85, 1.99, and 4.51, and 1.38, 2.78, and 4.07, respectively. For AFP, the MOMs at these percentiles were 1.26, 1.91, and 2.99, and 2.02, 2.68, and 5.30, respectively. The twin and triplet distributions for each marker were statistically significantly different from the singleton distributions (P < 0.0001) and from each other (P = 0.0012). At a twin risk cut-off of 1 in 50, 77.4 per cent of all twin gestations can be detected in a second-trimester AFP and free-beta hCG screening protocol with 5.1 per cent of singleton pregnancies falsely identified as at risk for twins. Our dual marker protocol for mid-trimester pregnancy screening combining AFP and free-beta hCG can identify over 77 per cent of twin pregnancies in women less than 35 years of age. This benefit may contribute to an improved outcome of pregnancy by early detection of multiple gestation.Repeat maternal serum testing for Down's syndrome screening using multiple markers with special reference to free alpha and free beta-hCG.To determine the effect of routine repeat testing in serum screening for Down's syndrome, we compared estimates of the detection and false-positive rates. Five serum markers were measured--alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and its two subunits, free alpha and free beta-hCG. First and repeat test marker levels were available from 142 women whose samples had been routinely collected and stored in an antenatal serum bank. Different repeat testing policies were compared for various combinations of the markers. If all women had repeat tests using the four markers AFP, uE3, and free alpha and free beta-hCG, the detection rate for a 5 per cent false-positive rate was 69 per cent compared with 65 per cent if no women were repeated. Policies of repeating selected women gave similar results. The small gain in screening performance with repeat testing performed routinely is not worthwhile. If a woman does happen to have a repeat test, her risk estimate should, however, be based on both results, not just the second.Screening for Down's syndrome: the first two years experience in Bristol.To evaluate the effectiveness of a programme for antenatal screening for Down's syndrome using alpha fetoprotein and total human chorionic gonadotrophin as maternal serum markers.A district general hospital providing a screening service to a local purchasing authority and (under contract) to another purchasing authority in the same region.Patients were counselled and screened between 15 and 20 weeks gestation and Down's risk estimates calculated using the maternal serum marker results as modifiers of the age related risk. Outcome was determined in collaboration with the Regional Cytogenetics Unit.Detection rate for Down's syndrome, false positive rate, uptake of screening, and uptake of amniocentesis.In two years 22816 women were screened (approximately 84% of population); 32 Down's pregnancies were identified, 19 (59.4%) had a reported risk of > or = 1:250 and 20 (62.5%) a reported risk of > or = 1:300. Of those screened before 17 weeks, 16/20 (80%) had a reported risk of > or = 1: 300 compared with 4/12 (33%) of those screened later (P = 0.008); 4.64% of patients screened had reported risks > or = 1: 250 and 5.87% reported risks of > or = 1:300. Amniocentesis uptake was 70% in patients with reported risks of > or = 1:300.Overall the screening programme was effective but screening before 17 weeks was very much more effective than screening later.Screening for chromosomal abnormalities in an unselected population by fetal nuchal translucency.The aim of this prospective study was to examine the value of nuchal translucency measurement for the detection of fetal aneuploidies in an unselected population of an Austrian National Health Service hospital. A total of 1972 women with singleton pregnancies who attended at 10-13 weeks for the initiation of routine antenatal care at our hospital were examined. Chromosomal abnormalities were found in 11 fetuses, four of then with Down's syndrome. Eight of the 11 chromosomally abnormal fetuses, including two of the four with Down's syndrome, were detected by a nuchal translucency thickness of > or = 2.5 mm. Three of the fetuses with abnormal karyotype had a nuchal translucency thickness of < 2.5 mm. Two of these were fetuses with Down's syndrome, one of which was identified by karyotyping for maternal age, the second one by positive biochemistry testing (triple test). The additional chromosomal abnormality was identified by karyotyping for maternal age. These data suggest that nuchal translucency screening for aneuploidies is efficient even in an unselected population.Maternal serum Schwangerschafts protein-1 (SP1) and fetal chromosomal abnormalities at 10-13 weeks' gestation.Maternal serum SP1 concentration was measured at 10-13 weeks' gestation in samples from 87 pregnancies with fetal chromosomal abnormalities (trisomy 21 n = 45; trisomy 18 n = 19; trisomy 13 n = 8; Turner syndrome n = 7; 47,XXX or 47,XXY n = 4; triploidy n = 4), and in samples from 348 matched controls. In the control group, SP1 increased significantly with fetal crown-rump length (r = 0.20, P < 0.0001) and there was no significant association with fetal nuchal translucency thickness (r = 0.03). Similarly, in the group with fetal chromosomal abnormalities, SP1 increased significantly with crown-rump length (r = 0.31, P < 0.01) and there was no significant association with nuchal translucency thickness (r = -0.08). In the groups with fetal trisomy 18 and trisomy 13, the median SP1 (0.76 MoM and 0.57 MoM, respectively) was significantly lower than in the controls (z = 2.64 and z = 3.27, respectively); in 21% and 25% of the cases, values were below the 5th centile. In the group with trisomy 21 and other chromosomal abnormalities the median SP1 (0.96 MoM and 0.93 MoM, respectively) was not significantly different from controls (z = 1.17 and z = 0.67, respectively). Measurement of SP1 concentration at 10-13 weeks' gestation is not likely to be useful in the prediction of fetal chromosomal abnormalities.Measurement of urinary free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin by immunoradiometric assay.An immunoradiometric assay for free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (F beta hCG) is now available. Measurement of serum F beta hCG has been shown to be valuable for the diagnosis of trophoblastic disease and for screening Down's syndrome pregnancies. Urine specimens may be preferable to blood samples since collection of urine specimens usually are less inconvenient to patients than venipuncture. We have evaluated whether the immunoradiometric assay can be applicable to urine samples. The assay was sensitive and precise. When urine samples were diluted 4-fold or more, the diluted samples gave quantitative values, and recovery of beta hCG added to urine samples was satisfactory. Creatinine corrected urinary F beta hCG levels correlated with serum F beta hCG levels. Thus, the immunoradiometric assay was considered to be applicable to urine samples. Serum F beta hCG to hCG ratio has been reported to be important to distinguish among normal pregnancies, hydatidiform mole and choriocarcinoma. However, urinary F beta hCG to hCG ratio did not significantly correlate with serum F beta hCG to hCG ratio. And therefore, the clinical value of urinary F beta hCG to hCG ratio should be further investigated.Screening for Down syndrome during the first and second trimesters: impact of risk estimation parameters.To evaluate impact of risk estimation parameters for screening for Down Syndrome during the first and second trimesters.We prospectively examined for their performance in the prenatal prediction of trisomy 21, alphafetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated estriol (uE3), total human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and its free subunits (free alpha-hCG, free beta-hCG) at both the first and second trimesters, and the impact of three sets of published risk estimation parameters. A total of 14,612 pregnancies were studied. All Down syndrome specimens (12 and 11 cases for first and second trimesters, respectively) and a sample of the unaffected pregnancies were analyzed.The median multiple of median (MoM) for total hCG was lower in the first trimester (1.83 vs. 2.01 in the second trimester) but no loss in discriminative power was observed if the lower variability of the results in the first trimester is taken into account (interquartile range of 0.251 vs. 0.338). The choice of distribution parameters did not alter significantly the detection rates for the various combinations of markers (p > 0.05). False positive rates were affected significantly however and for the combination AFP-uE3-free beta-hCG they varied from 14.6% to 22.6% (p < 0.001).Our results suggest that specific distribution parameters would be necessary to account for the lower variability of the markers in the first trimester and the peculiarity of the total hCG assay we used.First-trimester Down's syndrome screening using nuchal translucency: a prospective study in patients undergoing chorionic villus sampling.The value of the measurement of nuchal translucency thickness for predicting fetal Down's syndrome and other aneuploidies was prospectively evaluated at 8-15 weeks of gestation in 1819 consecutive pregnancies scheduled for karyotyping by chorionic villus sampling. In 43 cases, a chromosomal unbalanced aberration was found. Two teams of ultrasonologists who examined patients attending either National Health Service (Series 1) or private practice clinics (Series 2) were involved in the study. The same type of ultrasound machine and standardized approach were used in both study groups. In those cases in which the maximum subcutaneous thickness of the translucency was 3 mm or greater, the incidence of chromosomal aberration was 18.6% compared to 1.7% in the cases in which this was below 3 mm. The sensitivity, specificity and relative risk for all aneuploidies were 30%, 96% and 10.83, respectively, and no difference was found between trisomy 21 and other types of aneuploidy. The sensitivity and specificity and relative risk were significantly higher at 9-10 weeks than between 11 and 15 weeks. The results were concordant in the two series; however, the overall values for sensitivity (20% vs. 39%), specificity (94% vs. 98%) and relative risk (4.13 vs. 24.20) were clearly higher in the group of private patients. The results obtained confirm the potential application of the measurement of nuchal translucency thickness for fetal aneuploidy screening before the end of the first trimester and suggest that a multiplicity of individual, structural and organizational factors may interact and play a crucial role in determining the actual efficiency of ultrasound screening programs.Maternal serum screening and routine 18-week ultrasound in the detection of all chromosomal abnormalities.Over a 15-month period, maternal serum screening (alpha fetoprotein, oestriol, chorionic gonadotrophin) and ultrasound were evaluated in the detection of all chromosomal abnormalities. Of the 981 screened, there were 8 chromosomally abnormal pregnancies. Six of these were considered to be at increased risk on serum screening, all of which were detected. Of the remaining 2, one was detected by ultrasound and the other resulted in a liveborn baby with trisomy 21. The positive and negative predictive values for serum screening for all chromosomal abnormalities was 7.8% and 99.9% respectively. The sensitivity and specificity was 87.5% and 91.5% respectively. Serum screening is useful in the detection of many chromosomal abnormalities, not just Down syndrome. The combination of maternal serum screening and ultrasound has a high negative predictive value and is valuable in providing reassurance of no underlying chromosomal abnormality. With a positive predictive value of 7.8% a chromosomal abnormality will be found once in every 13 amniocenteses performed.Evaluation of maternal serum dimeric inhibin A as a first-trimester marker of Down's syndrome.While second-trimester prenatal screening programmes for Down's syndrome have become established in prenatal care, it would be advantageous to be able to offer screening in earlier pregnancy. To this end, we have evaluated a new potential maternal serum marker, dimeric inhibin A, as a possible first-trimester marker. Dimeric inhibin A was measured in prospectively collected maternal serum from 23 cases of Down's syndrome and matched chromosomally normal controls, at 11-13 weeks' gestation. Levels of this protein were significantly elevated in the Down's pregnancies compared with the control pregnancies. The median multiple of the normal median (MOM) for the Down's samples was 2.46 (95 per cent confidence interval: 2.11-3.26, P < 0.0001 vs. controls). These results suggest that dimeric inhibin A is a useful discriminator of Down's-affected pregnancies from normal pregnancies in the first trimester and that sensitive screening in combination with maternal age and other possible markers may be practicable in the first trimester.First trimester fetal nuchal translucency: problems with screening the general population. 1.To evaluate the feasibility of measuring first trimester nuchal translucency in an unselected population, to assess the relationship with gestation and maternal age and to measure reproducibility.A prospective observational study.University College Hospital, London.One thousand and four women attending for a routine first trimester dating scan between eight and thirteen weeks of gestation. Measurements of nuchal translucency were attempted in 1368 (80.3%) and successful in 1127 (82% of attempts).Nuchal translucency is most easily measured at 11 weeks of gestation. If a cut-off of > or = 3 mm is used, 6% of unselected fetuses between eight and thirteen weeks of gestation are classified as abnormal. Nuchal translucency increases with gestational but not maternal age. Reproducibility is poor: by repeating measurements with a different operator, the same operator using a different still image, or the same operator using the same still image, 18.8%, 17.5% or 12.4% of nuchal translucency measurements, respectively, change their classification as normal or abnormal.If nuchal translucency > or = 3mm were used as an indication for karyotyping, 6% of the normal pregnant population would be screen positive. However, the percentage will vary greatly depending on the gestational age profile of the screened population. The poor reproducibility of nuchal translucency measurement could diminish its usefulness as a screening test for Down's syndrome.Ultrasonography of the fetal neck in the first and second trimesters. Part 2. Anomalies of the posterior nuchal region.Over a 5-year period, the author examined the posterior nuchal region of the fetus in 7200 first- and second-trimester sonograms. Nuchal fluid collections were analysed to differentiate physiologic collections, which resolve spontaneously, from pathologic ones, which necessitate invasive testing for chromosomal abnormalities. Recommendations for evaluating ultrasonographic findings, based on the results of the study, are presented algorithmically in this pictorial essay. A single echogenic line representing a skin reflection was usually visible in normal fetuses. Thin double echogenic lines, observed in eight cases in this series, were due to fetal rotation or the presence of an amniotic membrane adjacent to the normal dorsal pseudomembrane and were not indicative of abnormality. In three cases the spectral reflection of the fetal neck surface was relatively thick, leading to the appearance of thick double echogenic lines; of these, two cases involved Down's syndrome. Therefore, karyotyping is suggested in all cases of thick echogenic lines. Of the 11 nuchal fluid collections up to 5 mm in diameter observed in this series, 10 resolved spontaneously by 24 weeks gestational age. In the other case the collection enlarged, and karyotyping revealed Turner's syndrome. Of the 16 cases of nuchal fluid collections greater than 5 mm in diameter, 5 were associated with an abnormal karyotype (Down's syndrome in 4); karyotyping is recommended in all such cases. Nuchal edema occurred in 22 cases. It was associated with Down's syndrome in 8 cases and with trisomy 18 in 1 case. Among fetuses with nuchal edema, the frequency of aneuploidy was substantially greater if other abnormalities were also present.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Analysis of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin in the first trimester: implications for Down's syndrome screening.The aim of this study was to determine the maternal population, pregnancy, serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta subunit of human chorionic gonadotrophin (F beta hCG) parameters in a large series of women attending prenatal clinics before 15 weeks' gestation and to assess the practical problems of population screening for Down's syndrome in the first trimester using these markers. Serum samples were collected from 8600 women attending prenatal clinic booking visits. Maternal serum AFP and F beta hCG medians were calculated for each day of gestation (49-104 days), using both dates and ultrasound estimates of gestation. The effects of maternal weight, twin pregnancies, and threatened abortion on AFP and F beta hCG levels were analysed. The median age of the population was 27.1 years and the median weight 62.1 kg. Twenty-six per cent of samples were collected before 70 days and 50 per cent before 78 days' gestation. Eighty-nine per cent of all samples had gestational estimates by dates, 60 per cent by ultrasound and 52 per cent by both dates and ultrasound. The AFP median was 5 kU/l at 49 days, 5.9 kU/l at 70 days, and 17.9 kU/l at 100 days. The peak median F beta hCG level was 66.4 ng/ml at 64 days, falling to 20.6 ng/ml at 100 days' gestation. Both AFP and F beta hCG levels showed log Gaussian distributions but the standard deviation for AFP was 20 per cent greater than that found in the second trimester. AFP and F beta hCG levels showed an inverse relationship with maternal weight and were increased in twin pregnancies (1.68 and 1.97 multiples of the median, respectively). AFP and F beta hCG can be readily measured in a large screening population in the first trimester. Down's syndrome screening protocols based on these markers could be refined by the use of gestations in individual days but AFP is likely to be a less effective marker and detection rates are likely to be lower than in the second trimester. To realize the potential of first-trimester screening, more women should be encouraged to attend the prenatal clinic in early pregnancy and ultrasound dating should be carried out for all pregnancies at this stage.Maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome in the first trimester of pregnancy.Prenatal diagnosis of diverse chromosome abnormalities in a population of patients identified by triple-marker testing as screen positive for Down syndrome.Our purpose was to determine the incidence of all types of chromosome abnormalities (i.e., trisomy 21 and other abnormalities) in women receiving prenatal chromosome analysis after a Down syndrome screen-positive result by maternal serum triple-marker testing (alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated estriol analyses).A total of 11,434 patients between 15.0 and 21.9 weeks' gestation received second-trimester Down syndrome risk evaluation by triple-marker testing. By use of a 1:270 midtrimester Down syndrome risk cutoff value, and after ultrasonographic confirmation of gestational age, 677 patients were screen positive for Down syndrome (corrected screen-positive rate 5.92%). Karyotypes were reviewed for 468 (69%) of these patients who received prenatal chromosome analysis.In addition to 12 cases of Down syndrome, 12 other fetal chromosome abnormalities were found (i.e., 5.13% had a chromosome abnormality of some type). Expressed as a proportion of all patients with a corrected Down syndrome screen-positive result, at least 3.69% had a chromosome abnormality. The overall spectrum of abnormal karyotypes (approximately 50% autosomal trisomy, 25% structural and 25% sex chromosome abnormality) appears to be comparable to that seen in patients undergoing amniocentesis because of advanced maternal age.As is the case for women of advanced maternal age, preamniocentesis counseling for patients with positive triple-marker testing results should reflect the relatively high probability that an abnormality other than Down syndrome may be identified.First trimester fetal nuchal translucency.This review examines the development of a new method of screening for Down's syndrome based on the combination of fetal nuchal translucency thickness, maternal age and maternal serum biochemistry at 10-14 weeks of gestation. This method can potentially identify more than 80% of affected fetuses for a false-positive rate of less than 5%.Maternal serum hCG and fetal nuchal translucency thickness for the prediction of fetal trisomies in the first trimester of pregnancy.To compare the potential value of maternal serum total hCG and free beta-hCG in predicting the risk for fetal trisomies during the first trimester of pregnancy and to examine whether data on maternal hCG and fetal nuchal translucency thickness can be combined to derive risks.Maternal serum total hCG and free beta-hCG were measured in samples from 83 singleton pregnancies with fetal chromosomal abnormalities (trisomy 21 (n = 41), trisomy 18 (n = 19), trisomy 13 (n = 8) sex chromosome aneuploidies (n = 11), triploidy (n = 4) and 394 chromosomally normal controls at 10 to 13 weeks gestation. In all cases, the fetal nuchal translucency thickness was measured at the time of fetal karyotyping.In the 249 chromosomally normal controls with fetal nuchal translucency less than 3 mm, total hCG and free beta-hCG decreased significantly with increased fetal crown-rump length. In 145 chromosomally normal fetuses with nuchal translucency 3 to 9 mm total hCG and free beta-hCG were not significantly different from the 249 with nuchal translucency less than 3 mm. In fetuses with trisomy 21, total hCG and free beta-hCG were significantly higher, whereas in trisomies 18 and 13 levels were lower than in chromosomally normal controls. When the cutoff levels for total hCG and free beta-hCG were selected to include 4% of chromosomally normal fetuses, the detection rates for trisomy 21 were 24% and 32%, respectively. There was no significant association between hCG and nuchal translucency thickness in either the chromosomally normal (r = -0.01) or abnormal group (r = -0.15).An improved estimate of risk for fetal trisomies at 10 to 13 weeks gestation can be derived by combining data on maternal age, maternal serum total or free beta-hCG and fetal nuchal translucency thickness.The influence of gravidity on Down's syndrome screening with free beta hCG.Total human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) levels have been shown in one previous small study to vary with gravidity. In order to establish if maternal serum free beta hCG was similarly affected, approximately 4500 pregnancies of varying gravidity were analysed. The results indicated that there was a 6 per cent higher median MOM in primigravid compared with multigravid women. The impact of such elevation in Down's syndrome screening programmes will be minimal.Maternal urinary beta-core fragment of hCG/creatinine ratios and fetal chromosomal abnormalities in the second trimester of pregnancy.Our aim was to evaluate the potential value of the ratio of the maternal urinary beta-core fragment of human chorionic gonadotropin (beta C-hCG) to creatinine (Cr) in discriminating between normal pregnancies and pregnancies associated with fetal chromosomal abnormalities. We hypothesized that pregnancies with fetal chromosomal abnormalities had abnormal quantities of beta C-hCG in the urine. The aims of the present study were to investigate retrospectively whether maternal urinary ratios of beta C-hCG/Cr are abnormal in women carrying fetuses with chromosome aberrations and to determine normative median values and a reference range for beta C-hCG/Cr between 14 and 19 weeks' gestation. Maternal urinary beta C-hCG and Cr concentrations were measured in 150 healthy women from 14 to 19 weeks and compared with ten cases of fetal chromosomal abnormalities matched for gestational age. The preliminary cut-off points corresponded to 0.29 multiple of the normal median (MOM) and 2.83 MOM, which were equivalent to the tenth and 90th centiles of the normal range. Of ten cases of fetal chromosomal abnormalities, one out of one (100 per cent) case with trisomy 18 and three of four (75 per cent) cases of variant 9 chromosomes had low beta C-hCG/Cr (< or = 0.29 MOM). One of five (20 per cent) cases with Down syndrome had elevated beta C-hCG/Cr (> or = 2.83 MOM). Urinary beta C-hCG/Cr ratios obtained in the second trimester may be useful for improved detection efficiency of Down syndrome, trisomy 18, and inversion of chromosome 9. Second-trimester maternal urinary beta C-hCG/Cr should be investigated further as a potential marker for fetal chromosome anomalies.The advantages of using triple-marker screening for chromosomal abnormalities.Our purpose was to assess the utility of triple-marker serum screening for chromosomal abnormalities.Our laboratory received 10,605 samples that were between 15 and 22 weeks' gestation for maternal serum screening of chromosomal abnormalities. Triple-marker maternal serum screening consisted of alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated estriol in conjunction with maternal age. Women > or = 35 years old were first offered amniocentesis. If they refused amniocentesis, they were offered the screening test. A second-trimester risk for trisomy 21 > or = 1:270 was considered screen positive. Patients were screen positive for trisomy 18 if all three markers were low: alpha-fetoprotein < or = 0.75 multiples of the median, unconjugated estriol < or = 0.60 multiples of the median, and human chorionic gonadotropin < or = 0.55 multiples of the median.The initial screen-positive rate was 8.3% (880 women); amniocentesis was offered to 766 (7.2%). Twelve of 16 ascertained cases of trisomy 21 (75%), two of three cases of trisomy 18 (67%), five cases of 45,X karyotype, and one case each of 45,X/46,XX, 47,XXY, 47,XYY, 46,XX,ins(2)(q21p13p15)mat, and 69,XXX karyotypes were identified in the screen-positive patients. All four known cases of trisomy 21 in the 886 women > or = 35 years old who were screened were detected, with a 21% false-positive rate. Omitting unconjugated estriol from our screening program would have resulted in detecting nine of 16 trisomy 21 and six of 12 other chromosomal abnormalities. The false-positive rate would have remained the same.In our sample cohort addition of unconjugated estriol to the screening program resulted in an increased detection rate of chromosomal abnormalities with no change in the false-positive rate. Considering the advancement in screening for chromosomal abnormalities, maternal age alone as an indication for amniocentesis should be reevaluated.First trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein in fetal trisomies.To evaluate the potential value of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein concentration in the detection of fetal trisomy at 10 to 13 weeks gestation and to examine the possible association between maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and fetal nuchal translucency thickness.Cross-sectional study.Harris Birthright Research Centre for Fetal Medicine, King's College Hospital Medical School, London.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein concentration was measured at 10 to 13 weeks gestation in samples from 57 pregnancies with fetal trisomies (trisomy 21 (n = 35), trisomy 18 (n = 16), and trisomy 13 (n = 6)) in 228 matched controls in whom the fetal nuchal translucency was < 3 mm and in 114 chromosomally normal fetuses with translucency > or = 3 mm.In the control group maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein increased significantly with fetal crown-rump length (r = 0.451). In this group, the median maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein was not significantly different from that in the groups with trisomy 21 (median = 0.84 MoM), trisomy 18 (median = 0.86 MoM), or trisomy 13 (median = 0.94 MoM), respectively. Neither in the control group nor in the group with trisomic fetuses was maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein significantly associated with fetal nuchal translucency thickness (r = 0.01 and r = 0.03).Measurement of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein concentration in the first trimester of pregnancy is not likely to be useful in the prediction of fetal trisomies.Triple marker (alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, human chorionic gonadotropin) versus alpha-fetoprotein plus free-beta subunit in second-trimester maternal serum screening for fetal Down syndrome: a prospective comparison study.Our purpose was to compare the efficacy of triple-marker screening (alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, human chorionic gonadotropin) with alpha-fetoprotein plus free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin.Free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin was concurrently assayed in 2349 maternal serum samples. Trivariate and bivariate algorithms were used to calculate the risk for fetal Down syndrome by the two protocols. Free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin from 12 cases of fetal Down syndrome previously screened with the triple marker was retrospectively assayed.Mean maternal age of our study was 29.8 years (range 14 to 51 years). The initial screen-positive rate with the triple marker was 8.0% compared with 12.8% for alpha-fetoprotein plus free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin. All three cases of fetal Down syndrome ascertained in our prospective study were detected by the triple marker; in contrast, one of three was detected by alpha-fetoprotein plus free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin. By adding 12 additional cases of fetal Down syndrome, 12 of 15 (80%) were screen positive with triple marker and nine of 15 (60%) were screen positive with alpha-fetoprotein plus free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin.The detection rate of fetal Down syndrome was greater by use of a triple marker screen than when using alpha-fetoprotein plus free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin. Our data do not support the claims of other studies that suggest that alpha-fetoprotein plus free beta-human chorionic gonadotropin is superior to triple markers.The influence of maternal weight on human chorionic gonadotropin in the multiple-marker screening test for fetal Down syndrome.Our purpose was to determine the effect of maternal weight on human chorionic gonadotropin concentration in the multiple-marker screening test for fetal Down syndrome.Two genetics databases were used: database I contained the results of 8297 multiple-marker screening tests and database II contained the results of 1936 multiple-marker screening tests and fetal karyotypes.The overall screen-positive rate in database I was 7.1%; it was 7.5% in patients weighing < 180 pounds and 5.1% in patients weighing > or = 180 pounds (p = 0.001). Weight significantly affected the screen-positive rate only in women > or = 30 years old (p = 0.003 for 30 to 34 years, p = 0.00004 for > or = 35 years). A weight correction formula was derived; when applied to database II it eliminated individual weight-related differences but had no effect on the overall screen-positive rate or Down syndrome detection rate.Human chorionic gonadotropin concentration is affected by maternal weight. A weight correction formula eliminates individual weight-related differences in the screen-positive rate but has no discernible effect on the overall screen-positive or Down syndrome detection rates.Comparison of multiple-marker screening with amniocentesis for the detection of fetal aneuploidy in women > or = 35 years old.Our purpose was to compare the multiple-marker screening test with elective amniocentesis for the detection of fetal Down syndrome and other aneuploidies in women aged > or = 35.Our database included the multiple-marker screening test (maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, unconjugated estriol, and maternal age) and genetic amniocentesis results from 1942 women aged > or = 35. A Down syndrome risk > or = 1:190 was considered screen positive. An algorithm to detect trisomy 18 was also used.The multiple-marker screening test Down syndrome screen-positive rate was 26.1% (507/1942). The Down syndrome detection rate was 75% (33/44); the trisomy 18 detection rate was 75% (3/4). However, the multiple-marker screening test detection rate for all aneuploidies was only 61%. Missed aneuploidies included trisomy 21, sex chromosome abnormalities, trisomy 13, trisomy 22, and trisomy 18.The multiple-marker screening test fails to detect approximately 39% of all fetal aneuploidies in women aged > or = 35. These data should be provided to women considering prenatal diagnosis so that they can make an informed decision regarding the multiple-marker screening test versus amniocentesis for advanced maternal age.Normal nuchal thickness in the midtrimester indicates reduced risk of Down syndrome in pregnancies with abnormal triple-screen results.Our purpose was to determine whether nuchal thickness measurement can identify the euploid fetuses in midtrimester pregnancies at increased risk for Down syndrome on the basis of maternal age and serum screening.Nuchal thickness was obtained prospectively in 651 consecutive fetuses at 14 to 21 weeks' gestation and at > or = 1:270 risk for Down syndrome on the basis of unconjugated estriol, alpha-fetoprotein, and human chorionic gonadotropin levels. The risk of Down syndrome with a normal nuchal thickness was determined. A receiver-operator characteristic curve was used to determine a serum-based risk threshold below which the risk for Down syndrome was low. The prevalence of Down syndrome in fetuses with both a normal nuchal thickness and a below-serum-risk threshold was compared with prevalence in either those above threshold risk or with an abnormal nuchal thickness.There were eight cases of trisomy 21 and one case each of 46,XX/47,XXX, 46,XY/47,XY, +7, and 46,XX, 11q-. The sensitivity of an abnormal nuchal thickness (> or = 6 mm) for detecting Down syndrome was four in eight (50%) (95%) confidence interval 15.3% to 84.6%). The risk of Down syndrome was significantly increased with an abnormal compared with a normal nuchal thickness, four in 13 (30.8%) versus four in 638 (0.6%), p < 0.0001. A risk threshold was defined at > or = 1:100 on the basis of the receiver-operator characteristic plot. Of 390 cases with a normal nuchal thickness and a serum risk estimate < 1:100, there were no cases of Down syndrome (0/390 vs 8/253, p = 0.002).Normal nuchal thickness significantly reduces the risk of Down syndrome and may help reduce the number of amniocenteses done for abnormal triple screen results.Second-trimester levels of maternal urinary gonadotropin peptide in Down syndrome pregnancy.Urinary gonadotropin peptide (UGP; beta-core fragment), a major metabolite of human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), was shown recently to be markedly elevated in Down syndrome pregnancy between 19 and 22 weeks of gestation. To confirm and extend this finding, we obtained maternal urine and matching maternal serum samples from 14 cases of Down syndrome and six other aneuploidies between 17 and 21 weeks of gestation. UGP was measured in all these samples and in 91 singleton control urines. Results were corrected for urinary creatinine level and expressed as multiples of the control median (MOM). hCG levels were assayed in all serum samples from the cases and compared with previously established reference values. The median UGP level in Down syndrome cases was 5.34 MOM (range 2.71-12.57); 88 per cent of the values were above the 95th centile of control levels after modelling. The median maternal serum hCG level for the same cases was 2.20 MOM (range 0.84-3.40); 36 per cent of the values were above the 95th centile. The level of UGP in every case including all other aneuploidies was higher than the comparable maternal serum hCG level. Elevated UGP measurements are strongly associated with fetal Down syndrome during the second trimester and could contribute to improved Down syndrome screening protocols that are more accessible and less expensive than are currently available.Choice of serum markers in antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.First-trimester maternal serum immunoreactive inhibin in chromosomally normal and abnormal pregnancies. Dutch Working Party on Prenatal Diagnosis.To investigate the maternal serum immunoreactive inhibin level in chromosomally normal and abnormal pregnancies in the first trimester.This was a retrospective study under the auspices of the Dutch Working Party on Prenatal Diagnosis. Maternal serum samples were taken before prenatal diagnosis. Forty-eight maternal serum samples from chromosomally abnormal pregnancies, including 23 with Down syndrome, were available for analysis; 284 samples from chromosomally normal pregnancies were used to establish reference ranges.The median value of maternal serum immunoreactive inhibin in the 23 Down syndrome pregnancies was 1.3 multiples of the normal median (95% confidence interval 0.8-2.1). No significant difference was found between the distributions of the inhibin concentrations in the normal and the Down syndrome pregnancies or in the normal and the other chromosomally abnormal pregnancies.In contrast to the second trimester of pregnancy, the level of maternal serum immunoreactive inhibin in the first trimester is not related to fetal chromosomal abnormalities and therefore is not useful as a biochemical screening index.Trisomy 21 and cystic hygromas in early gestational age fetuses.Chromosomal aberrations are associated with 60% of cystic hygromas and the majority of these are females with a 45,X karyotype. Trisomy 21 has rarely been reported. Six cases of cystic hygromas with trisomy 21 were detected during a 6-month time period in our laboratory. An earlier gestational age of 14 weeks was present in our cases compared with a gestational age of 18 weeks reported in the literature. Because of the high rate of fetal loss prior to 16 weeks, many cases of trisomy 21 with cystic hygromas may go undetected. This suggests that cystic hygromas detected before 16 weeks of gestation may be clinically different from those detected later in gestation. With the increasing use of chorionic villus sampling and amniocentesis at 10 to 12 weeks of gestation, trisomy 21 may be a common finding in fetuses with cystic hygromas.First-trimester fetal nuchal translucency thickness and risk for trisomies.To define the relation between fetal nuchal translucency thickness at 10-13 weeks' gestation and the risk for fetal trisomies and pregnancy outcome.Five hundred sixty fetuses with nuchal translucency thickness of 3-9 mm at 10-13 weeks' gestation were karyotyped. The ratio of the observed number of fetal trisomies to that expected on the basis of maternal age was calculated.The incidence of trisomies 21, 18, or 13 was 18% (102 of 560 cases) and was significantly associated with both maternal age (r = 0.97) and fetal nuchal translucency thickness (r = 0.75). In 383 fetuses with nuchal translucency of 3 mm, the observed number of fetal trisomies was 23, in contrast to the frequency of 6.0 expected on the basis of maternal age. In 177 fetuses with nuchal translucency of 4 mm or more, 79 cases were observed, compared with 2.7 expected on the basis of maternal age. In fetuses with nuchal translucency of 4 mm or more and normal karyotype, there was a high association with other defects and the prognosis was often poor, whereas the translucency resolved for those with 3 mm and the pregnancy outcome was usually normal.At 10-13 weeks' gestation, fetal nuchal translucency of 3 mm is associated with a fourfold increase, and translucency of greater than 3 mm with a 29-fold increase, in the maternal age-related risk for trisomies 21, 18, and 13. Fetal nuchal translucency of 4 mm or more is associated with poor pregnancy outcome even when the fetal karyotype is normal.Do racial differences exist in second-trimester maternal hCG levels? A study of 23,369 patients.In Down syndrome screening by maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) determination at 15, 16, 17, and 18 weeks of gestation, we prospectively examined 23,369 sera from white (21,549), North African (970), black African (525), and Asian (325) patients. When expressed as multiples of the median (MOM), no difference was observed between white, North African, and black African patients. However, higher serum hCG concentrations were noted in Asians, for whom we therefore recommend correction of hCG values before calculation of the risk of Down syndrome.Evaluation of maternal serum immunoreactive inhibin as a first trimester marker of Down's syndrome.Maternal serum immunoreactive inhibin has been shown to be significantly elevated in Down's affected pregnancies in the second trimester, suggesting that it may be useful in prenatal diagnosis. We have investigated whether it is similarly elevated in the first trimester.Stored maternal sera from women with Down's affected pregnancies and chromosomally normal control pregnancies were retrieved for analysis. These sera had been collected prospectively at either 11 or 12 weeks gestation as a routine antenatal booking procedure.From records, 11 women were identified as having had a Down's pregnancy. For each of these, 4 controls matched for gestation and duration-of-storage were also identified.Two different inhibin immunoassays were evaluated, one using an antibody raised against 31 kDa bovine inhibin and the other, a commercial two-site assay, using two antibodies directed against two distinct alpha-subunit epitopes.Neither assay detected a significant effect of gestation on serum inhibin levels. After combining the data from both gestations, no significant difference between the Down's samples and controls for either assay was detected. However, analysis of the data for each gestation separately revealed that one assay detected a significant difference in inhibin levels between Down's affected and unaffected pregnancies at 11 weeks gestation (mean +/- SEM 3186 +/- 195 vs 2020 +/- 172 ng/l, P < 0.01) but not at 12 weeks. The other, commercial, assay did not detect a significant difference at either gestation. In addition, there was poor association between the results of the two assays.These data suggest that immunoreactive inhibin, as detected by these assays, will not be useful as a late first trimester marker for Down's syndrome and also that these two assays detect different inhibin species in pregnancy serum.Serum PAPP-A and free beta-hCG are first-trimester screening markers for Down syndrome.Serum measurements of pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and the free beta-human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) subunit were made in 13 women with Down syndrome (DS) pregnancies and six other women with fetal aneuploidy ascertained at chorionic villus sampling (CVS), as well as 89 women with contemporaneous normal control pregnancies. Median serum PAPP-A measurements (0.31 MOM, 95 per cent confidence interval (CI) 0.22-0.65 vs. normal 1.06, 95 per cent CI 0.89-1.20) were lower and free beta-hCG subunit measurements (1.13 MOM, 95 per cent CI 0.93-2.63 vs. normal 0.91, 95 per cent CI 0.79-1.03) were higher at statistically significant levels. Receiver operator characteristics (ROC) curves showed that the highest sensitivity for detection, 71.2 per cent (95 per cent CI 54.7-87.6 per cent), was for depressed PAPP-A levels; the combination of low serum PAPP-A levels, maternal age, and elevated free beta-hCG levels yielded a detection rate of 78.9 per cent (95 per cent CI 64.9-92.8 per cent) of the affected pregnancies at 8-12 weeks' gestation.First trimester maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A and pregnancy-specific beta 1-glycoprotein in fetal trisomies.To examine the potential value of maternal serum levels of pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and pregnancy-specific beta 1-glycoprotein (SP1) in the detection of fetal trisomy.Cross-sectional study.The Harris Birthright Research Centre For Fetal Medicine, King's College Hospital Medical School, London, UK and Division of Maternal-Fetal Medicine, Jefferson Medical College, Philadelphia, USA.Maternal serum PAPP-A and SP1 concentrations were measured at 10 to 13 weeks gestation in samples from 42 pregnancies with fetal trisomy (trisomy 21, n = 29; trisomy 18, n = 9; trisomy 13, n = 4) and in samples from 210 matched controls.In controls, both maternal serum PAPP-A and SP1 increased significantly with gestation and in trisomic fetuses levels of both hormones were reduced. However, discriminant analysis demonstrated that SP1 did not contribute significantly in the distinction between trisomic and control pregnancies. Although levels of PAPP-A were reduced throughout the gestational range examined (10 to 13 weeks), especially in cases with fetal trisomy 21, the deviation was more pronounced at 10 to 11 weeks than at 12 to 13 weeks gestation. In 45% of pregnancies with fetal trisomy 21 and 70% of pregnancies with trisomies 18 or 13 maternal serum PAPP-A levels at 10 to 11 weeks gestation were below the 5th centile of the normal range.Maternal serum PAPP-A concentration in the first trimester of pregnancy may prove to be useful in the prediction of risk for fetal trisomies.Maternal serum free alpha-human chorionic gonadotrophin levels in twin pregnancies: implications for screening for Down's syndrome.Maternal serum free alpha-human chorionic gonadotrophin (free alpha-hCG) levels were determined in twin and singleton pregnancies at 15-22 weeks of gestation using a set of stored serum samples relating to 200 twin pregnancies and 600 singleton control pregnancies matched for gestational age and duration of storage. Free alpha-hCG values are, on average, 1.66 times greater in twin pregnancies than in singleton pregnancies (95 per cent confidence interval 1.56-1.76). If maternal serum free alpha-hCG is used in screening for Down's syndrome, values in twin pregnancies can be adjusted using this result so that screening can be performed in twin pregnancies as well as in singleton pregnancies.Maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A and fetal nuchal translucency thickness for the prediction of fetal trisomies in early pregnancy.To determine if the risk for fetal trisomies during the first trimester of pregnancy can be derived by combining data from maternal serum pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) and fetal nuchal translucency thickness.Pregnancy-associated plasma protein A was measured in samples from 87 singleton pregnancies with fetal chromosomal abnormalities (45 trisomy 21, 19 trisomy 18, eight trisomy 13, 11 sex chromosome aneuploidies, four triploidies) and 348 chromosomally normal controls at 10-13 weeks' gestation. Likelihood ratios for trisomies 21, 18, and 13 in relation to PAPP-A, in multiples of the normal median (MoM) for crown-rump length, were derived from the overlapping gaussian frequency distribution curves for normal and abnormal pregnancies.In the chromosomally normal group, maternal serum PAPP-A correlated significantly with fetal crown-rump length (r = 0.421, P < .0001). In the chromosomally abnormal group, the median PAPP-A was significantly lower than in the normal controls. The respective median values expressed in MoM for trisomies 21, 18, and 13 and other aneuploidies were 0.5 MoM (90% confidence interval [CI] 0.09-1.67, z = 6.0, P < .001), 0.17 MoM (90% CI 0.06-1.45, z = 6.6, P < .001), 0.25 MoM (90% CI 0.10-0.62, z = 4.5, P < .001), and 0.72 MoM (90% CI 0.09-2.48, z = 2.2, P < .05), respectively. There was no significant linear association between PAPP-A and fetal nuchal translucency thickness in either the chromosomally normal (r = -0.01, P = .89) or abnormal groups (r = -0.19, P = .08).The risks for fetal trisomies at 10-13 weeks' gestation can be derived by combining data on maternal age, maternal serum PAPP-A, and fetal nuchal translucency thickness.Expanded maternal serum alpha fetoprotein screening.Multiple marker screening.Second-trimester maternal serum screening using alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotrophin, and unconjugated oestriol: experience of a regional programme.Over a 2-year period from January 1991 to December 1992, second-trimester maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome using alpha-fetoprotein (alpha FP), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) was made available to five health districts in East Anglia, with a total population of 1.2 million. Amniocentesis was offered when the risk of Down's syndrome at term was 1:200 or greater. 25,359 singleton pregnancies were screened, representing an uptake of 77 per cent. The recall rate for the 24 per cent of women who had not had a dating scan prior to the test was 9.4 per cent compared with 3.9 per cent for those who had been scanned (P < 0.0005). Seventy-five per cent (36/48) of Down's syndrome pregnancies were detected for a false-positive rate of 4.0 per cent. Twenty-five out of 36 of detected Down's syndrome pregnancies were dated by scan prior to sampling, and in the 11 remaining cases, the dates were confirmed by scan after a high-risk result was obtained. The exclusion of uE3 from the screening protocol would have reduced the detection rate to 52 per cent (25/48) for the same false-positive rate. Eighty-five per cent of women identified at high risk accepted the offer of an amniocentesis. Other fetal abnormalities detected were trisomy 18 (3), trisomy 13 (2), 45,X (6), 69,XXX (5), other chromosome abnormalities (9), open neural tube defects (26), hydrocephalus (7), abdominal wall defects (4), and steroid sulphatase deficiency (6).Maternal serum human chorionic gonadotrophin and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A, markers for fetal Down syndrome at 8-14 weeks.Maternal serum levels of human chorionic gonadotrophin and its subunits (intact, alpha, and free beta h CG) and pregnancy-associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) were measured in 279 women between 8 and 14 weeks' gestation. This group included 23 pregnancies in which the fetus had Down syndrome (DS), diagnosed either at birth or during the second trimester (n = 17) or from chorionic villus sampling (CVS) (n = 6). Normal medians were determined from the 258 apparently normal pregnancies. The median levels of intact hCG (1.4 MOM) and free beta hCG (2.1 MOM) were significantly raised, whereas the median level of PAPP-A (0.39 MOM) was significantly lower in the DS pregnancies when compared with the control group. Levels of alpha hCG were similar in both the control and the DS pregnancies. Analysis of samples taken prior to 14 weeks' gestation demonstrated that only PAPP-A (0.34 MOM) was significantly altered in DS pregnancies. However, after the exclusion of DS cases diagnosed at CVS, the median intact hCG (1.56 MOM), free beta hCG (2.27 MOM), and alpha hCG (1.8 MOM) were all raised in DS pregnancies. This emphasizes the problem of the interpretation of biochemical markers when DS cases are diagnosed at CVS.Effectiveness of combining maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and hCG in a second-trimester screening program for Down syndrome.To evaluate the efficacy of combining hCG and alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) with maternal age in a two-analyte maternal serum screening program for Down syndrome.A prospective study involved the screening of 12,170 maternal sera from patients at 14-25 weeks of gestation. The risk for Down syndrome at term was calculated from maternal serum hCG and AFP, and maternal age. For women 36 years of age and younger, a risk of 1:307 or greater was considered screen-positive. For women over 36, a risk greater than that a priori was considered screen-positive. False-positive rates and detection rates were compared with those resulting from a screening protocol using only AFP and age.Seven hundred eighty-two sera were initially screen-positive (6.4%). Subsequent sonography decreased this total to 687 (5.6%), and 467 (3.8%) of these patients accepted amniocentesis. Ten cases of Down syndrome and seven other chromosomal abnormalities were detected. Follow-up investigations revealed eight additional Down syndrome cases that were missed by screening. The identification of 18 Down syndrome cases in 12,170 pregnancies corresponds closely with the prediction of 14.1 Down syndrome births (18.2 second-trimester fetuses) in this population calculated from age-dependent risks. The detection rate for Down syndrome was 56% (ten of 18 expected cases). Only five of 18 (28%) would have been detected by AFP and age alone.These results support the mathematical model that hCG is the major contributor to the increased sensitivity of multi-analyte screening and demonstrate that screening programs can attain substantial improvement in detection of second-trimester Down syndrome by adding hCG to AFP and age.Maternal serum free beta hCG screening: results of studies including 480 cases of Down syndrome.The median maternal serum free beta human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) multiple of the median (MOM) of 480 Down syndrome cases in the second trimester was 2.64, significantly greater than the reported median MOM of intact hCG (p < 0.0001). In 234 of these cases from retrospective and prospective studies, the effectiveness of maternal serum free beta hCG was evaluated in combination with alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and maternal age in second-trimester Down syndrome screening. Down syndrome detection in the gestational age range of 14-16 weeks was 82 per cent. In all gestational weeks (14-22), a 77.7 per cent Down syndrome detection rate was achieved. In prospective screening of 44,272 patients under the age of 35 years, 69 per cent of Down syndrome cases were detected (73 per cent in gestational weeks 14-16). The false-positive rate for the prospective study was 3.8 per cent. The use of free beta hCG combined with maternal serum AFP and maternal age-related risk for Down syndrome in a screening population (i.e., women under 35 years) yields an improved detection efficiency over other protocols.Human chorionic gonadotropin and unconjugated oestriol measurements in insulin-dependent diabetic pregnant women being screened for fetal Down syndrome.This prospective study investigates the relationship between insulin-dependent diabetes and maternal serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), and human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG). It also examines the potential impact on screening for Down syndrome. The population-based cohort included 20,321 pregnant women in Maine who underwent routine serum screening for Down syndrome in the second trimester. The cohort included 52 women with insulin-dependent diabetes. Maternal serum AFP levels are now routinely adjusted for insulin-dependent diabetes. These adjustments, therefore, were made routinely in the diabetic women, but no equivalent adjustments were made for uE3 and hCG values. The initial false-positive rate (using all three markers) among the women with diabetes was not significantly different from that in the non-diabetic population (7.7 and 5.4 per cent, respectively). Prior to adjustment for insulin-dependent diabetes, the median AFP level in the 52 women was 0.73 multiples of the median (MOM); the median levels of uE3 and hCG were 0.93 and 0.98 MOM, respectively. When the uE3 and hCG levels were adjusted, the initial false-positive rate was unchanged. Median serum levels of uE3 were significantly higher in the 33 women whose onset of diabetes was prior to 19 years of age (0.99 MOM) than in the 19 women whose onset of diabetes was at age 19 or older (0.84 MOM). This is the first population-based study to investigate the relationship between diabetes and serum levels of AFP, uE3, and hCG, and confirms earlier observations from a case-control study that found only slightly lower uE3 and hCG levels.Elevated levels of maternal serum inhibin immunoreactivity in second trimester pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome.First-trimester simple hygroma: cause and outcome.First-trimester fetuses with simple nuchal hygromas represent a population that is different from midgestation nuchal cystic hygroma in terms of karyotype abnormalities and long-term prognosis.Sixty-eight consecutive fetuses diagnosed with simple nuchal hygromas between 10 and 14 weeks' gestation were evaluated ultrasonographically and karyotyped. Those with normal chromosome complements were ultrasonographically monitored throughout the remainder of the pregnancy for resolution of their hygromas.Twenty-three of 27 fetuses with normal karyotypes resolved their hygromas within 4 weeks of diagnosis and were phenotypically normal at birth. Forty-one fetuses were karyotypically abnormal, with trisomy 21 being the most common abnormality.Fetuses with first-trimester simple nuchal hygromas are at high risk for aneuploidy and should be offered prenatal testing. Such fetuses with normal karyotypes will likely resolve their hygromas by 18 weeks' gestation, and most will be phenotypically normal at birth.First-trimester maternal serum Schwangerschafts protein 1 (SP1) in pregnancies associated with chromosomal anomalies.The relationship between first-trimester maternal serum Schwangerschafts protein 1 (SP1) and the karyotype of the pregnancy was examined in 692 women who underwent chorionic villus biopsy at 6-12 weeks. There were 30 pregnancies with abnormal karyotypes, consisting of 14 Down's syndrome (DS), eight trisomy 18, and eight other anomalies, two of which were mosaics. The normal ranges and medians for gestation were defined from the 662 cases in which the karyotype was normal. The median SP1 (0.5 MOM) of the abnormal group was significantly lower than that of the normal group (1.0 MOM). This relationship was maintained for the DS pregnancies (0.4 MOM) and for anomalies other than trisomy 18 (0.43 MOM) but not trisomy 18 (1.1 MOM). It is possible that the use of SP1 as a screening test for chromosome anomalies in the first trimester could have a 43 per cent detection rate for a 5 per cent false-positive rate.Ultrasound screening for chromosomal anomalies in the first trimester of pregnancy.For the last 6 years, sonographic signs for excessive fluid accumulation in the backs of 10- to 12-week-old fetuses have been looked for prior to transabdominal chorionic biopsy. In 1400 pregnancies, subsequent karyotype analyses revealed 28 cases of Down syndrome. In 15 (= 54 per cent), a large fluid cushion over most of the back had been documented at the time of biopsy. Only a few chromosomally normal fetuses with the same peculiarity were observed. The cushion was also present in fetuses with trisomies 18 and 13, and in Turner syndrome. Systematic first-trimester screening for nuchal fluid accumulation seems to be a recommended method for the detection of Down syndrome and other chromosome anomalies in young pregnant women at low risk. It compares favourably with current methods of maternal serum screening performed at 16-18 weeks which require a higher number of invasive procedures.First-trimester biochemical screening for fetal chromosome abnormalities and neural tube defects.Alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (UE3), intact human chorionic gonadotrophin (intHCG), and the free beta subunit of chorionic gonadotrophin (F beta HCG) were investigated in a series of 21 chromosomally abnormal and 14 open neural tube defect pregnancies ascertained from a series of 14,000 prospectively collected maternal serum samples at 6-14 weeks' gestation. In 16 cases of Down's syndrome, significant reductions were found for AFP (0.65 multiples of the normal median) and UE3 (0.67 MOM). IntHCG levels were unaltered (0.97 MOM) but a significant increase was found for F beta HCG (1.96 MOM). Significant correlations were found for AFP and UE3 in the controls and for intHCG and F beta HCG in both the control and the Down's syndrome pregnancies. In a group of five trisomy 18 pregnancies, median MOMs were for AFP 0.71, for UE3 0.34, for intHCG 0.27, and for F beta HCG 0.15. None of 13 pregnancies with open neural tube defects at 8-13 weeks gestation had elevated maternal serum AFP levels, whereas matched second-trimester samples from the same pregnancies at 16-18 weeks gestation all had significantly elevated AFP levels. Thus, biochemical screening for chromosome abnormalities may be practicable in the first trimester using free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin in combination with AFP and maternal age. However, a separate screening protocol using AFP at 15-18 weeks gestation would still be required for effective detection of neural tube defects.[Maternal serum markers and prenatal screening for trisomy 21].Nuchal translucency in the first trimester.All fetuses reported as having nuchal (nape of the neck) thickening or translucency detected by a first trimester ultrasound at 2 centres were reviewed to determine the incidence of aneuploidy. Twenty nine pregnancies were registered, amongst which 12 (41%) had an abnormal karyotype, the most common aneuploidy being trisomy 21 (5 fetuses). The likelihood of aneuploidy increased with increasing thickness of the translucency. Where the karyotype was found to be normal, there was complete resolution of this ultrasound appearance by the second trimester in 15 of the 16 ongoing pregnancies: 9 have delivered normal neonates and 6 pregnancies are continuing. The other fetus developed evidence of a skeletal dysplasia by the second trimester.Maternal serum CA 125 levels in pregnancies with chromosomally-normal and -abnormal fetuses. Dutch Working Party on Prenatal Diagnosis.We measured the maternal serum cancer antigen 125 (MS-CA 125) levels in 98 nonpregnant women, 765 first- and second-trimester pregnancies with chromosomally-normal fetuses, and 54 chromosomally-abnormal pregnancies. To determine the MS-CA 125 concentration, we used a new automated microparticle enzyme immunoassay with low inter-assay variability. The median MS-CA 125 level decreased from the first to the second trimester of pregnancy and was higher than that in non-pregnant women. We found no difference between normal and Down's syndrome (n = 29) pregnancies (t-test: t = 0.57, p > 0.5). The MS-CA 125 levels in pregnancies with other chromosomal abnormalities showed no difference either, compared with the normals. We conclude that MS-CA 125 is not a useful marker for fetal Down's syndrome, nor for other chromosomal disorders in pregnancy.Evaluation of multiple-marker screening for Down syndrome in a statewide population.Our purpose was to evaluate our experience with a statewide, multiple-marker Down syndrome screening program.The results of 18,712 screening tests performed from July 1, 1991, to Oct. 31, 1992, were reviewed. Amniocentesis and aneuploidy detection rates were compared with the experience of a previous year (1989-1990) in which material serum alpha-fetoprotein was used for detection of Down syndrome.Positive screening tests (Down syndrome risk > or = 1/190) occurred in 665 of 18,712 (3.5%) patients; 516 of 665 (78%) patients accepted amniocentesis. Fifteen aneuploidies were identified: 12 trisomy 21, one trisomy 18, one trisomy 13, and one 48,XXXY. The overall detection rate was one in 34 amniocenteses performed; for trisomy 21 it was one in 43. In a previous year in which maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein alone was used, 3.6% had positive screening tests (Down syndrome risk > or = 270); the detection rate for all aneuploidies was one in 57 amniocenteses, and for trisomy 21 it was one in 114. The expanded maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein test was well accepted by clinicians, with 36% of gravid state residents undergoing screening.The multiple marker test is a good screening tool and is superior to material serum alpha-fetoprotein alone.Prospective study of prenatal screening for Down's syndrome with free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin.To assess the value and impact of a screening programme for Down's syndrome that uses the two maternal serum markers: alpha fetoprotein and free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin.All women booked into clinics were screened. Further tests were offered to women with a risk of one in 300 or greater of having an affected baby. Follow up of outcome of all pregnancies.Biochemical screening laboratory serving two health districts.8179 women of all ages with singleton pregnancies screened between 15 and 22 weeks' gestation from 1 April 1991 to 31 March 1992.Detection rate of Down's syndrome, false positive rate, uptake of screening, uptake of amniocentesis in women identified as at increased risk, prevalence of Down's syndrome at birth.Overall 89% (8317/9345) of women underwent screening. The rate of detection of Down's syndrome was 69% (11/16; 95% confidence interval 41 to 89%) with a 5.2% false positive rate (426/179; 4.7 to 5.7%). In women under 30 the detection rate was 50% (four out of eight; 32 to 86%) Uptake of amniocentesis was 89% (389/437), resulting in a reduction of prevalence of Down's syndrome at birth from 1.1 per 1000 in previous years (66/59,696) to 0.4 per 1000 during the screening year (4/9345). Additionally, several other abnormalities were identified.The benefit of a high detection rate with this approach and the additional anomalies identified should encourage others to introduce screening programmes for Down's syndrome that use free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin and alpha fetoprotein.Dual analyte immunoassay in neural tube defect and Down's syndrome screening: results of a multicentre clinical trial.We report a multicentre clinical field trial of a novel dual analyte enzyme immunoassay method for the simultaneous measurement of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and free beta-human choriogonadotropin (hCG) in the same microtitre well. The assay was shown to have good technical performance in the hands of all trial centres, with between assay coefficients of variation better than 10% for both analyte across the whole of the assay ranges. The method compared well with single analyte measuring procedures and produced acceptable performance as judged by external quality assurance criteria. Recovery of added analyte and analyte dilution curves also showed acceptable performance. In clinical evaluation of a large set of neural tube defect cases, good clinical discrimination from unaffected cases was observed using AFP. With over 150 Down's syndrome cases, the combination of AFP and free beta hCG confirmed the high detection rates achievable using this marker combination, with detection rates in excess of 70% in early gestation. We conclude that the combination of clinically superior markers coupled with technologically innovative assay design will lead to more efficient Down's screening programmes.The use of free beta-hCG in antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.To investigate the value of the measurement of free beta human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) as a serum marker of Down's syndrome in the second trimester of pregnancy.A prospective observational study using stored antenatal serum samples.Serum samples collected from women receiving routine antenatal care in Oxford.Seventy-five singleton pregnancies with fetal Down's syndrome and 367 unaffected singleton pregnancies. Each affected pregnancy was matched with five control pregnancies for maternal age, gestational age, and duration of storage of the serum sample. None of the pregnancies were associated with neural tube defects.Maternal serum free beta-hCG levels. These were compared with total hCG levels in the same pregnancies. The performance of screening using free beta-hCG was compared with that using the principal markers, namely alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), and total hCG together with maternal age.The median free beta-hCG level in the affected pregnancies was 2.22 multiples of the normal median (MoM), significantly higher than in the unaffected pregnancies (95% confidence interval, 1.84-2.68 MoM). The discriminatory performances of free beta-hCG and total hCG, each considered separately, were similar; with a cut-off level of 2.5 MoM the detection rate was 43% and 5.7 of unaffected pregnancies had raised free beta-hCG levels (likelihood ratio of 7.5 (43/5.7)), somewhat better discrimination than the 32% and 4.6% respectively using total hCG (likelihood ratio of 7.0 (32/4.6)). With a higher cut-off level of 3.5 MoM, the rates were 19% and 2.7% respectively (likelihood ratio of 7.0), using free beta-hCG, worse than the 19% and 1.4% using total hCG (likelihood ratio of 13.6). Screening using maternal age, AFP, uE3 and free beta-hCG (instead of total hCG) yielded a detection rate of 62% (instead of 58%) at a screening risk cut-off level corresponding to a 5% false-positive rated).The main advantage in using free beta-hCG instead of total hCG is that there is a small increase in the detection rate (4%) for a given false-positive rate when used with maternal age, AFP and uE3. The main disadvantage is that there is less practical experience with free beta-hCG measurement and insufficient data to screen in certain categories of pregnancy (e.g. twins). The best practical advice is to use total hCG for the present but consider changing to free beta-hCG either (i) after further data are available that will permit the interpretation of screening results in the same way as is currently available with total hCG, or (ii) if its use with another marker confers a worthwhile increase in the detection rate for a given false-positive rate.Second-trimester unconjugated oestriol levels in maternal serum from chromosomally abnormal pregnancies using an optimized assay.Second-trimester unconjugated oestriol (UE3) levels were measured retrospectively in maternal serum from 78 chromosomally abnormal pregnancies and 390 matched controls using a radioimmunoassay kit (Amersham AMERLEX-M) optimized for use in the second trimester. Reduced levels of UE3 were found in a group of 49 Down's syndrome pregnancies with a median UE3 level of 0.79 multiples of the median (MOM) of the controls. Four trisomy 18 pregnancies had UE3 levels less than 0.7 MOM. There was a highly significant level of correlation between alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and UE3 levels in the controls (r = 0.25, p < 0.01), the Down's syndrome pregnancies (r = 0.44, p < 0.01), and the other chromosome abnormalities (r = 0.61, p < 0.01). When used as an additional marker to AFP and human chorionic gonadotrophin in screening for Down's syndrome, UE3 does not appear to add to the sensitivity of such screening.Racial differences in maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin and unconjugated oestriol levels.We assayed maternal serum samples from 134 black and 268 white women from 16 to 18 weeks of gestation for intact human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated oestriol (uE3). Serum from women with high (> or = 2.5 MOMs) or low (risk for Down syndrome > or = 1/365) maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) levels were excluded. After correcting for maternal weight, we found that median hCG levels were 16 per cent higher in black women but uE3 levels were not significantly different. These results confirm three other studies for hCG and one study for uE3. Corrections are recommended for both maternal serum hCG and AFP before calculating the risk for Down syndrome in black women.Stability of intact chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) in serum, liquid whole blood, and dried whole-blood filter-paper spots: impact on screening for Down syndrome by measurement of free beta-hCG subunit.The use of multiple maternal serum biochemical markers in screening for Down syndrome is gaining worldwide acceptance. We sought to study the impact of the potential instability of intact human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) on free beta-hCG subunit, a marker that has recently been used successfully in such screening. We found that, in practice, any changes in free beta-hCG due to the instability of intact hCG do not inhibit the effectiveness of free beta-hCG as a marker for Down syndrome. This was proven by controlled laboratory experiments at various stress temperatures, freeze-thaw studies, and analysis of a large set of screening data with particular reference to time in transit for individual samples. Data from controlled dissociation studies demonstrate that any apparent increase in free beta-hCG due to the instability of intact hCG cannot be attributed simply to the dissociation of intact hCG. Finally, for large-scale mass population screening in areas of the world where transport delays, safety concerns, and high temperatures preclude the shipment of liquid whole blood, dried whole-blood spots in filter paper provide a suitable delivery system with many advantages.Low maternal serum levels of pregnancy associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) in the first trimester in association with abnormal fetal karyotype.To assess the relation between maternal serum pregnancy associated plasma protein A (PAPP-A) in the first trimester and the outcome of pregnancy by karyotype.A retrospective study of PAPP-A levels in blood samples collected prior to chorionic villus sampling.Milan, Italy.Five hundred twenty-two women aged 20 to 47, at 7 to 11 weeks gestation, prior to undergoing chorionic villus sampling. Four hundred forty-five women had a pregnancy with a normal karyotype; in 30 pregnancies the karyotype was abnormal (including 14 cases of Down's syndrome and 7 of trisomy 18).Normal or abnormal fetal karyotype. Serum PAPP-A at 6 to 11 weeks gestation measured by radioimmunoassay.The median value of PAPP-A in the abnormal group was 0.27 multiples of the normal median (MoM). This is significantly lower than the median value in the normal group (1.01 MoM) (95% CI for the difference 0.46-0.84 MoM; P < 0.00001 Mann-Whitney test).There is an association between low levels of PAPP-A in the first trimester with chromosome anomalies. Screening by measurement of PAPP-A might detect 60% of cases of Down's syndrome in the first trimester with a false positive rate of 5%.Cigarette smoking and levels of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, and hCG: impact on Down syndrome screening.To investigate the association between maternal cigarette smoking and serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated estriol (uE3), and hCG and to determine whether it is appropriate to take smoking status into account when screening for fetal Down syndrome.Smoking information was obtained from 23,668 pregnant women at the time of routine screening for fetal Down syndrome. Serum levels of AFP, uE3, and hCG were stratified by smoking status and compared. Individual risks for fetal Down syndrome were analyzed both before and after adjusting the hCG levels for the effect of smoking. The prevalence of Down syndrome in the study population was calculated for both smokers and non-smokers.The average AFP, uE3, and hCG levels in women who smoked cigarettes were 3% greater (95% confidence interval [CI] 2-4%), 3% less (95% CI 2-4%), and 23% less (95% CI 22-24%), respectively, compared with levels in non-smokers. At comparable maternal ages, women who smoked cigarettes were identified as being at high risk for fetal Down syndrome 40% less often than non-smokers (4.0 versus 7.1% at a risk level of 1:250). Adjusting hCG levels for smoking status reduced the overall false-positive rate from 6.4 to 6.1% (using a term risk cutoff level of 1:250). The predicted effect on detection was small (a 0.7% increase). The prevalence of Down syndrome was lower among smokers, but the difference was not statistically significant (odds ratio 0.51, 95% CI 0.15-1.5).Adjusting the serum markers used for Down syndrome screening for the effect of maternal smoking has a small effect on overall screening performance. Given the uncertainty over whether there is a lower birth prevalence among women who smoke cigarettes, such adjustment is not currently justified.Adjustment formulae for maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, human chorionic gonadotropin, and unconjugated oestriol to maternal weight and smoking.Serum levels of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) were measured in serum samples of 4131 non-smoking and 1018 smoking women during the second trimester of pregnancy. The levels of all three analytes decreased with increasing body weight. The AFP median was significantly increased in smokers in a dose-response association; hCG decreased by 21 per cent and uE3 decreased by 3 per cent in smokers in a non-dose-related fashion. Regression functions for adjustment of serum levels for weight and smoking should be considered in risk estimation for Down syndrome in order to give a woman's individual risk more precisely.Free alpha-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin in Down syndrome.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the potential value of maternal serum free alpha-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin concentrations in discriminating between pregnancies associated with Down syndrome and normal matched controls.Maternal serum concentrations were evaluated in 36 cases of fetal Down syndrome and compared with concentrations in 180 control unaffected pregnancies within the gestational age range 16 to 20 weeks matched for maternal age, gestational age, and storage duration.The results of the study indicate that free alpha-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin concentrations in the Down syndrome group were not significantly different from those in the unaffected group (median multiple of the median: for Down syndrome group, 0.991; for unaffected group, 1.000).Caution is urged in the interpretation of published data; a case for using this subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin in Down syndrome screening protocols in the second trimester is not yet proved.A prospective evaluation of a second-trimester screening test for fetal Down syndrome using maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, hCG, and unconjugated estriol.To test the efficacy of a screening protocol using a combination of maternal age plus three biochemical markers--maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP), hCG, and unconjugated estriol (E3)--for the antenatal detection of fetal Down syndrome.We conducted a prospective cohort study of 7718 women who underwent the triple-marker analysis between weeks 15-18 of pregnancy. A second-trimester risk for Down syndrome of 1:195 or greater was considered positive. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and their 95% confidence intervals (CIs) were calculated. We evaluated test performance for various maternal age groups and screen-positive cutoffs, as well as the relative screening efficacies of maternal age and MSAFP, MSAFP plus hCG, and MSAFP, hCG, and unconjugated E3.Four hundred sixty-one of the 7718 women screened (6%) were identified as positive; 319 women chose amniocentesis, for an overall amniocentesis rate of 4.1%. Twenty of 22 pregnancies affected with Down syndrome were correctly identified, as were 7255 of 7696 unaffected pregnancies, yielding a sensitivity and specificity of 91% (95% CI 79-100%) and 94% (95% CI 93.8-94.8%), respectively. The use of maternal age plus all three analytes improved test performance compared with maternal age plus MSAFP and hCG, but either had a significantly improved detection rate compared with that for maternal age and MSAFP alone.The triple-marker screen appears to be an effective method of detecting Down syndrome pregnancies while maintaining an acceptable amniocentesis rate.Serum PAPP-A measurements in first-trimester screening for Down syndrome.Serum PAPP-A measurements taken from 254 women in the first trimester are reported. Eleven chromosomal abnormalities were detected. The mean serum PAPP-A levels in cases of Down syndrome were 0.44 MOM at 9 weeks gestation, 0.15 MOM at 10 weeks, and 0.29 MOM at 11 weeks. The PAPP-A level at 10 weeks was below those of pregnancies which aborted spontaneously. At 11 weeks, the pregnancies with Down syndrome recorded the lowest PAPP-A levels at that gestation. On this small sample, offering chorionic villus sampling to women with singleton pregnancies and a PAPP-A level below 0.3 MOM (approximately 6.5 per cent of this at-risk group) would have detected all the Down syndrome fetuses at 10 weeks and 50 per cent at 11 weeks without selecting those cases destined to abort. This suggests that serum PAPP-A should continue to be investigated as a potential first-trimester screening test for Down syndrome.Maternal serum screening for neural tube defects and Down syndrome.Screening for fetal Down syndrome with maternal serum hCG and oestriol: a prospective study.We report the preliminary results of a prospective study aimed at evaluating the effectiveness of Down syndrome (DS) screening using second-trimester measurement of maternal serum human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) and unconjugated oestriol (uE3) together with maternal age. Reference values for hCG, uE3, and the hCG/uE3 ratio in normal pregnancies were established from more than 3000 normal gestations and found to follow a log-normal statistical distribution. Risk evaluation was made using reference values for affected pregnancies from retrospective studies. Screening of 10,000 women under 38 years resulted in 412 amniocenteses and the prenatal diagnosis of six cases of DS, whereas four cases remained undetected until term. In a parallel study, diagnostic amniocentesis was performed in women over 38 years and in women with a previous affected child, and an evaluation of the risk of fetal DS based on serum hCG and uE3 levels was made in all cases. Fourteen cases of DS were detected. Median values for hCG and uE3 in the 24 affected pregnancies were close to the 90th and tenth centiles of the normal reference values, respectively, and thus are in good agreement with the values reported by others in retrospective studies.Maternal serum CA 125 for aneuploidy detection in early pregnancy.Maternal serum CA 125 levels were determined at 9-11 menstrual weeks for 26 cases of trisomy 13 (n = 4), trisomy 18 (n = 7), trisomy 21 (n = 15), and appropriate controls. There were no statistically significant differences between groups.First-trimester maternal serum human chorionic gonadotrophin as a marker for fetal chromosomal disorders. The Dutch Working Party on Prenatal Diagnosis.The Dutch Working Party on Prenatal Diagnosis has initiated a study on the possibilities of first-trimester screening for fetal chromosomal disorders. We report on maternal serum human chorionic gonadotrophin (MS-hCG) measurements in 1348 pregnancies with a chromosomally normal fetus and 53 pregnancies with a chromosomally abnormal fetus. The median MS-hCG concentration in 24 pregnancies with Down's syndrome was 1.19 multiples of the normal median (MoM). The MS-hCG distributions in normal and Down's syndrome pregnancies did not differ significantly (t-test: t = 1.945, p greater than 0.05). We also found no difference between normal pregnancies and pregnancies with other chromosomal disorders (six cases of trisomy 18, MoM = 0.80; four cases of sex chromosome abnormality, MoM = 1.01; 17 cases of chromosomal mosaicism in chorionic villi, MoM = 1.11). Selecting an upper limit at the 90th centile could detect 25 per cent of pregnancies with Down's syndrome. We conclude that, in the first trimester, MS-hCG as a screening factor for Down's syndrome is of minor value. However, MS-hCG could be a useful factor in a first-trimester screening programme based on a combination of markers.Antenatal maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome: results of a demonstration project.To assess the implementation of antenatal screening for Down's syndrome in practice, using individual risk estimates based on maternal age and the three serum markers: alpha fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol, and human chorionic gonadotrophin.Demonstration project of Down's syndrome screening; women with a risk estimate at term of 1 in 250 or greater were classified as "screen positive" and offered diagnostic amniocentesis.Hospital and community antenatal clinics in four health districts in London.12,603 women of all ages with singleton pregnancies seen between February 1989 and the end of May 1991, with follow up of the outcome of pregnancy completed to the end of 1991.Uptake of screening, detection rate for Down's syndrome, false positive rate, odds of being affected given a positive result, and uptake of amniocentesis in women with positive screening results, together with the costs of the screening programme.The uptake of screening was 74%. The detection rate was 48% (12/25), and the false positive rate was 4.1%, consistent with results expected from previous work based on observational studies. There was a loss of detection due to the selective use of ultrasound scans among women with positive screening results. One affected pregnancy occurred among 205 reclassified as negative; this illustrated the danger of false negatives occurring in this group and lends weight to the view that if an ultrasound estimate of gestational age is used it should be carried out routinely on all women rather than selectively among those with positive results. The estimated cost of avoiding the birth of a baby with Down's syndrome was about 38,000 pounds, substantially less than the lifetime costs of care.Antenatal maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome is effective in practice and can be readily integrated into routine antenatal care. It is cost effective and performs better than selection for amniocentesis on the basis of maternal age alone.Maternal serum screening for fetal Down syndrome in women less than 35 years of age using alpha-fetoprotein, hCG, and unconjugated estriol: a prospective 2-year study.To evaluate prospectively maternal serum screening with alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), hCG, and unconjugated estriol (uE3) as a screen for fetal Down syndrome.Women less than 35 years of age were offered screening between 15-20 weeks' gestation. Screening results calculated by an algorithm to be equal to or greater than 1:274 (the risk of a 35-year-old for fetal Down syndrome at the second trimester) were considered positive. If gestational age was confirmed by ultrasonography, genetic counseling and amniocentesis were offered.In the first 2 years of our program, 9530 women were screened, of which 686 (7.2%) were found to be screen-positive. Ultrasonographic examination explained the abnormal values in 379 (4.0%). The remaining 307 (3.2%) received genetic counseling and 214 (2.2%) elected amniocentesis or CVS. Four cases of fetal Down syndrome and one de novo chromosomal marker were detected. In three additional cases of fetal Down syndrome, triple-analyte screening failed to identify the pregnancies to be at increased risk. None of the seven cases of fetal Down syndrome would have been detected through screening with maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) and age alone.Measurement of MSAFP, hCG, and uE3 in women less than 35 years old is an effective screening test for fetal Down syndrome, with a sensitivity of 57% in our study and an amniocentesis rate (false-positive rate) of 3.2%.Prenatal screening for Down's syndrome with use of maternal serum markers.Approximately 35 percent of all cases of Down's syndrome in fetuses can be detected by measuring maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein during the second trimester in the general population of pregnant women. Recent case-control studies indicate that this detection rate could be approximately doubled by measuring serum levels of unconjugated estriol and chorionic gonadotropin, which are abnormally low and abnormally high, respectively, in women carrying fetuses affected by Down's syndrome.We prospectively screened 25,207 women and adolescents in the second trimester of pregnancy and assigned each a risk of fetal Down's syndrome with an algorithm that took into account measurements of all three serum markers in combination with maternal age. On this basis, 1661 subjects (6.6 percent) were initially assigned a second-trimester risk of fetal Down's syndrome of at least 1 in 190, and 962 (3.8 percent) were offered amniocentesis for chromosomal analysis after verification of gestational age. Gestational age was determined on the basis of the first day of the last menstrual period or, when available, by ultrasonography.Among the 760 women and adolescents who chose amniocentesis, 20 cases of fetal Down's syndrome were detected, along with 7 other chromosomal disorders. There was 1 additional case of fetal Down's syndrome among the 202 women who chose not to have amniocentesis. The rate of detection of Down's syndrome was thus 58 percent (21 of 36 expected cases), and the frequency of identifying a fetus with Down's syndrome in women undergoing amniocentesis was 1 per 38 amniocenteses (95 percent confidence interval, 1 in 25 to 1 in 62).Measuring serum alpha-fetoprotein, chorionic gonadotropin, and estriol is more effective in screening for fetal Down's syndrome than measuring maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein alone. Such an expanded protocol can readily be incorporated into existing prenatal screening programs.Improved performance in a prenatal screening programme for Down's syndrome incorporating serum-free hCG subunit analyses.A prenatal screening programme for Down's syndrome potentially detecting 76 per cent of affected pregnancies in the South Australian general population at an amniocentesis rate of 3.9 per cent was designed following analysis of mid-trimester serum samples from 57 women who carried an affected fetus. This equates to one affected pregnancy being detected for 41 chromosomal analyses performed. For the experimental series, 75.4 per cent of affected pregnancies were detected, while 4.1 per cent of control specimens produced estimated risk odds consistent with further action. A maternal risk odds of birth of a Down's syndrome fetus of 1:420 was taken as the decision value, which is the prevalence of Down's syndrome births to 35-year-old mothers in South Australia. This screening performance was achieved by investigating combinations of serum analytes not previously reported and by refining the calculation of maternal risk odds to include selective weighting of indicator analytes. Combination of the measurements of free alpha-subunits and beta-subunits of chorionic gonadotrophin, alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol, and placental lactogen was found to be most effective in indicating Down's syndrome fetuses. In all combinations of analytes tested, replacing the measurements of free alpha-subunits and free beta-subunits of chorionic gonadotrophin with the measurement of intact chorionic gonadotropin produced a less effective screen.CA-125 as a maternal serum marker for Down's syndrome in the first and second trimesters.CA-125, alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), and human chorionic gonadotropin (HCG) were determined in maternal serum in the first trimester from 14 women with a Down's syndrome fetus and 61 women with a healthy fetus. In the second trimester, 15 and 60 serum samples were determined from women with a Down's syndrome and a healthy fetus respectively. In both trimesters, maternal serum CA-125 was found to be elevated in Down's syndrome pregnancies compared with controls. Using discrimination functions, our preliminary results indicate that CA-125 is a better marker than AFP and HCG respectively for a Down's syndrome fetus in the first trimester and improves the detection rate in the second trimester.Maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome: the effect of routine ultrasound scan determination of gestational age and adjustment for maternal weight.To investigate the effect of using a routine ultrasound estimate of gestational age and maternal weight adjustment on maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) levels in antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.Women with a singleton pregnancy without Down's syndrome were screened using the three serum markers and an estimate of gestational age based on 'dates' (time since first day of the last menstrual period) and one based on an ultrasound scan examination was recorded together with maternal weight.Women attending the Homerton Hospital, Hackney, for their antenatal care between February 1989 and January 1990.2113 women with a singleton pregnancy without Down's syndrome.The use of ultrasound to estimate gestational age (usually based on the biparietal diameter of the fetal skull) led to a significant reduction in the variance of each marker at a given week of pregnancy. The level of each marker was negatively associated with maternal weight, so that adjustment for weight also led to a reduction in variance. These data on gestational age and maternal weight, taken together with published data on pregnancies associated with Down's syndrome, indicate that the routine use of ultrasound to estimate gestational age will increase the detection rate from 58% to 67% while maintaining the false-positive rate at 5%, or reduce the false-positive rate from 5.7% to 3.1% while maintaining the detection rate at 60%. Routine maternal weight adjustment for the serum marker levels was much less useful, increasing the detection rate by about 0.5% for a given false-positive rate, or reducing the false-positive rate about 0.1% for a given detection rate.An ultrasound gestational age estimate available at the time of Down's syndrome screening confers a substantial advantage to screening performance with a further small benefit resulting from maternal weight adjustment, which is worth adopting if it can be done without difficulty or extra cost.Maternal serum unconjugated oestriol and human chorionic gonadotrophin levels in pregnancies with insulin-dependent diabetes: implications for screening for Down's syndrome.To investigate maternal serum unconjugated oestriol (uE3) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) levels in pregnant women with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus and to consider the implications of the results for antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.Descriptive study using stored antenatal serum samples.Stored serum samples collected from women receiving routine antenatal care in Oxford.126 singleton pregnancies in 92 women with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus and for each pregnancy, two pregnancies without diabetes matched for gestational age and duration of storage of the serum sample. None of the pregnancies was associated with fetal neural tube defect or Down's syndrome.Maternal serum uE3 and hCG levels at 15-22 weeks gestation. Alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels were also measured for comparison.The median uE3 level in the diabetic pregnancies was 0.92 multiples of the median (MoM) for pregnancies without diabetes at the same gestational age (P less than 0.05); and the hCG level was 0.95 MoM (P = 0.48). The median AFP level was also reduced to 0.77 MoM (P less than 0.001).The reduction in uE3 and AFP levels in insulin-dependent diabetic pregnancies is sufficiently great to be taken into account in maternal serum screening programmes for Down's syndrome. Dividing the uE3 and AFP levels in such pregnancies by the corresponding median for insulin-dependent diabetic pregnancies will yield a similar false-positive rate in pregnancies with and without insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.Second-trimester cancer antigen 125 and Down's syndrome.This study explores if assay of cancer antigen 125 (CA 125) in maternal serum might aid the detection of Down's syndrome in the second trimester of pregnancy. CA 125 levels were determined retrospectively in stored maternal serum samples from ten Down's syndrome pregnancies and 78 controls matched for gestational and maternal age. In addition, second-trimester amniotic fluid samples from nine Down's syndrome and 109 unaffected pregnancies were analysed for CA 125. Maternal serum CA 125 values for Down's syndrome pregnancies were lower, with the median being 0.72 multiples of the unaffected population median. The medians for affected and unaffected pregnancies did not differ significantly and there was a considerable overlap in the range of values of cases and controls. The distribution of amniotic fluid CA 125 levels for Down's syndrome pregnancies resembled that for controls. From our present results, we could not find an association between Down's syndrome and second-trimester maternal serum or amniotic fluid CA 125 levels.Free beta human choriogonadotropin in Down's syndrome screening: a multicentre study of its role compared with other biochemical markers.To ascertain the value of maternal serum free beta-human choriogonadotropin subunit measurement in Down's syndrome screening and to compare its effectiveness when screening with a variety of biochemical markers, we have evaluated maternal serum free beta-human choriogonadotropin, total human choriogonadotropin, alpha-fetoprotein and unconjugated oestriol in a large multicentre study of over 2800 unaffected cases and 90 affected cases, the largest collection of Down's cases ever reported. Of all the markers identified to date, free beta-human choriogonadotropin is the marker of choice for use in Down's syndrome screening. When used in early gestation (14-16 weeks) in combination with alpha-fetoprotein and maternal age, it will allow the detection of 77% of Down's cases. A side-by-side comparison with the performance of total human choriogonadotropin shows the superior detection efficiency of free beta-human choriogonadotropin. Unconjugated oestriol adds nothing further to the detection rate compared with the use of alpha-fetoprotein and free beta-human choriogonadotropin alone, and its use results in a 1% increase in false positive rate. We conclude that unconjugated oestriol has no value in Down's screening. The superior detection rate obtained using free beta-human choriogonadotropin is a result of superior detection of Down's cases in women under 30 years old, where the free beta-human choriogonadotropin combination detects 100% more cases than does the total human choriogonadotropin combination.Maternal serum CA125 is not a second trimester marker for Down's syndrome.First trimester CA 125 and Down's syndrome.First-trimester aneuploidy screening using serum human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), free ahCG, and progesterone.Immunochemical serum assays for human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG), the free ahCG subunit, and progesterone (P) were considered separately and in combination for their ability to screen for chromosomally abnormal pregnancies in the first trimester. Maternal serum was collected from 141 women undergoing chorionic villus sampling at 9-12 menstrual weeks. Trisomy 21 pregnancies had significantly higher hCG levels, while trisomy 18 and 13 pregnancies had markedly lower hCG and progesterone levels than those of chromosomally normal pregnancies. However, the discrimination of normal from aneuploid pregnancies was poor with either hCG alone, progesterone alone, or free ahCG alone. Much improved discrimination was obtained by combining hCG, free ahCG, and P into an aneuploidy index [(P/hCG)(free ahCG/hCG)]. This index distinguished 9 out of 17 (53 per cent) of the trisomy 21 pregnancies, while only misidentifying 5 out of 112 (4.5 per cent) of the normal pregnancies. The aneuploidy index thus appears promising as a first-trimester biochemical screen for aneuploid pregnancies.[Proposed normal values for alpha fetoprotein in maternal serum for the detection of neural tube closure defects and Down syndrome. Preliminary study].To establish a normal range of alpha fetoprotein in maternal serum (AFP sm) in the population at the "20 de Noviembre" Hospital in Mexico City, there were studied 46 patients with a normal pregnancy confirmed with ultrasonography between 16 to 18 week of gestation. The 97 determinations of AFPsm were made by radioimmunoanalysis. The multiples of the median (MoM) were 2.16 al 16th weeks, 2.33 a 17th week 2.43 al 18th week of pregnancy. Now the methods to determine abnormalities in the product and the genetics studies are proposed only to the patients considered high risk (older than 35 years old, previous malformed son or family history of those abnormalities). AFPsm and the establishment of normal range allow us to amplify the study to every pregnant woman and to determine those malformations in the pregnant women of low risk which represents about 90-95% of DCTN and about 80% of SD.First-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and chorionic gonadotropin in aneuploid pregnancies.First-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and human chorionic gonadotropin (HCG) levels were measured in samples from 29 women with cytogenetically abnormal pregnancies and 145 women with cytogenetically normal pregnancies matched for gestational age, race, and sample storage time. All patients had a risk of fetal aneuploidy greater than or equal to that of a mother 35 years of age. AFP was significantly lower in samples from pregnancies affected with trisomy 21 (0.67 MoM; p less than 0.05), while HCG values were no different from those of matched controls. Trisomies 13 and 18 could not be distinguished from matched controls by AFP. However, levels of HCG were significantly lower in such pregnancy samples, with median values of 0.65 MoM in trisomy 13 and 0.32 MoM in trisomy 18 (p less than 0.05). Variations in AFP and HCG levels suggest that expressed differences between autosomal aneuploidies include differences in fetal and placental protein production in the first trimester.Estimating the risk of a fetal autosomal trisomy at mid-trimester using maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and age: a retrospective study of 142 pregnancies.Risks appropriate for mid-trimester prenatal screening for autosomal trisomies have been estimated from a combination of maternal age and maternal serum (MS) alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels at 16-20 weeks gestation. Published data on the frequency of Down's syndrome births relative to maternal age were modified to include the additional age-related frequency of trisomy 18 and trisomy 13 cases to provide an overall risk for an autosomal trisomy at mid-trimester. MSAFP results from a retrospective study of 142 affected (114 trisomy 21, 19 trisomy 18, and 9 trisomy 13) and 113,000 unaffected pregnancies were converted to multiples of the appropriate gestational median (MOM). The AFP levels in the autosomal trisomy pregnancies were found to be significantly reduced at 0.72 MOM of the unaffected pregnancies. Risks (likelihood ratios) were derived from the overlapping log Gaussian distributions for affected and unaffected pregnancies and combined with maternal age risks to give the overall odds of an affected pregnancy. A mid-trimester cut-off risk of 1:280 gave an estimated 37 per cent detection rate for autosomal trisomies in the west of Scotland population for a follow-up (false-positive) rate of 6.6 per cent. These figures compare with a 30 per cent detection and 6.7 per cent false-positive rate if age 35 years and over is used as the sole criterion for selection of at-risk pregnancies.[Antenatal screening of maternal alpha-fetoprotein with dried-blood spot samples on filter paper].Abnormal levels of maternal serum alphafetoprotein (AFP) have been used as a good biochemical marker for the screening of neural tube defects (NTD) and Down syndrome. From January 1988 to June 1989, we conducted a community-based maternal AFP screening program in Nan-Tou County, which is located in the middle of Taiwan. A total of 3,776 pregnant women, which accounted for about 42% of the total number of women pregnant during that period of time in Nan-Tou county, were screened using the filter paper blood collecting technique. Of those screened, 5.1% of them were found to be borderline positive for NTD (2.0 less than MoM less than 2.5). The screening positive rates for NTD (MoM greater than 2.5) and Down syndrome (Down's risk greater than 1/100) were 3.7% and 1.7%, respectively. Except for those lost to follow-up, 3 (2.1%) of the borderline cases were confirmed to have serious pregnancy complications (porencephaly, fetal demise, and imminent miscarriage). Eleven (10.8%) of the abnormal pregnancies, which included 1 case of possible hydrocephalus, 2 cases of anencephalus, and 1 case of triploid, were found in the NTD positive group. Six (18.7%) anomalies (1 Down syndrome, 1 hydatidiform mole, and 4 miscarriages) were detected in the increased Down's risk group. Totally, 20 adverse pregnancies, i.e. 0.5% (20/3,776) of the screened women, were confirmed in this screening program. No false-positive cases were reported, or were found among the 1,777 post-delivery questionnaires completed.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Maternal serum unconjugated oestriol and human chorionic gonadotrophin levels in twin pregnancies: implications for screening for Down's syndrome.To investigate maternal serum unconjugated oestriol (uE3) and human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) levels in twin pregnancies and to consider the implications of the results for antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.Measurement of maternal serum uE3 and hCG levels from 15-22 weeks of gestation in twin and singleton pregnancies. Previously available maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels were also presented.Stored serum samples collected from women receiving routine antenatal care in Oxford were used.200 women with a twin pregnancy and, for each, three singleton control pregnancies matched for gestational age (same completed week of pregnancy) and duration of storage of the serum sample (same calendar quarter).The median uE3, hCG and AFP levels in the twin pregnancies were respectively, 1.67 (95% CI 1.56-1.79), 1.84 (95% CI 1.64-2.07) and 2.13 (95% CI 1.97-2.31) multiples of the median (MoM) for singleton pregnancies at the same gestational age. The variance of values for the three serum markers (expressed in logarithms), and the correlation coefficients between any two, were similar in the twin and singleton pregnancies.In maternal serum screening programmes for Down's syndrome dividing uE3, hCG and AFP MoM values in twin pregnancies by the corresponding medians for twin pregnancies will, in expectation, yield a similar false-positive rate in twin pregnancies as in singleton pregnancies.Maternal serum screening for neural tube defects and Down's syndrome.Prenatal screening for chromosome abnormalities using maternal serum chorionic gonadotrophin, alpha-fetoprotein, and age.Human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG) levels were assayed retrospectively in stored maternal serum samples from 78 chromosomally abnormal pregnancies and 410 controls matched for gestation and maternal age. The median serum hCG concentration in 49 pregnancies with Down's syndrome was significantly elevated, at 2.18 multiples of the normal median. Significantly reduced hCG concentrations were found in a group of four trisomy 18 pregnancies (all less than 0.4 multiples of the median). Eight cases of unbalanced chromosome rearrangements appeared to show some lowering of hCG levels, while there was no significant difference in the levels in the cases of trisomy 13, balanced translocations, and sex chromosome abnormalities. Maternal serum hCG alone is a better indicator of Down's syndrome pregnancies than maternal age or maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), either individually or in combination, and provides a further virtually independent measure of risk. On the basis of our findings, screening for Down's syndrome using hCG and AFP results combined with maternal age risks is predicted to result in a higher detection rate (57 per cent) for a lower false-positive rate (5.0 per cent) than would be attainable by combined AFP and age screening (37 per cent detection at a 6.6 per cent false-positive rate).Evaluation of an assay of the free beta-subunit of choriogonadotropin and its potential value in screening for Down's syndrome.In this study I investigated the analytical and clinical performance of the measurement of the free beta-subunit of choriogonadotropin (hCG) in normal pregnancies and in pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome. Free beta-hCG in maternal serum has been shown to be increased in Down's syndrome-affected pregnancies and is proportionally increased in more cases than is total hCG. This study confirms previous findings of low concentrations of unconjugated estriol and alpha-fetoprotein in maternal serum in Down's syndrome-affected pregnancies. Using a multivariate risk analysis of maternal age and concentrations of alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated estriol, and hCG in maternal serum, I determined that, at a risk cutoff value of 1 in 300, 52% of Down's cases could be detected with total hCG in the calculation, compared with 66% with the free beta-hCG concentration. The false-positive rate was 5.9% in both cases. Therefore, free beta-hCG can be used effectively in a screening program for Down's syndrome; however, further studies are required to ascertain whether the measurement of free beta-hCG has any advantages over the use of total hCG for detecting Down's syndrome.Alteration in age-specific risks for chromosomal trisomy by maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotropin screening.Maternal serum screening for alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) increases the detection rate of Down's syndrome (DS) pregnancies. To estimate the risk of a DS pregnancy for a particular woman, Wald et al. combine a trivariate function of AFP, hCG, and unconjugated oestriol with age-specific risk. Calculation of independent likelihood ratios (LRs) for AFP and hCG has allowed us to examine the predictive value of each test alone and the combination. AFP and hCG were measured in stored serum samples from 672 normal, 8 trisomy 21 (DS), 9 trisomy 18, and 2 trisomy 13 pregnancies. AFP and hCG multiples of the median (MOM) were calculated for each sample. The LRs for AFP MOM and hCG MOM were calculated and combined with age-specific risk. Of eight DS pregnancies, six had increased risk based on age and AFP. Addition of hCG detected two additional DS pregnancies. Of nine trisomy 18 pregnancies, four (44 per cent) had hCG MOM under 0.25. Three out of nine would have been classified as high risk by AFP, but none by combined AFP and hCG. Amniocentesis would have been recommended in 74 per cent of aneuploid pregnancies if both age and serum screening were used. Abandonment of amniocentesis based on age alone would have excluded two abnormal pregnancies from detection. Screening programmes should note that combined risk figures are specific for DS and do not include other trisomies. Detection of other trisomies requires inclusion of low hCG level as a discriminator and continuation of age-based testing.Ultrasound detection of fetal aneuploidy in patients with elevated maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein.Increasing confidence in the ability of high-resolution ultrasound to detect neural tube and ventral wall defects has enabled us to offer a revised risk estimate to the patient with an elevated maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) level, such that amniocentesis may not be necessary. Recent authors have suggested that a reduced emphasis on follow-up amniocentesis fails to consider an increased risk for chromosomal anomalies in pregnancies with an elevated MSAFP, and that amniocentesis should still be performed. We reviewed our ultrasound findings from patients who underwent amniocentesis for evaluation of an elevated MSAFP and who had a karyotype prepared from the amniotic fluid sample. Four abnormal karyotypes were detected among 313 amniocenteses, and three of these were correctly predicted based on an abnormal ultrasound. The risk of an unexpected fetal aneuploidy after a normal consultative ultrasound in our series was one in 310. This is comparable to the risk of detecting abnormal chromosomes in the fetus of a 32-year-old woman, an age at which amniocentesis is not routinely offered.Sensitivity and specificity of screening for Down syndrome with alpha-fetoprotein, hCG, unconjugated estriol, and maternal age.The sensitivity and specificity of maternal serum screening for Down syndrome with different biochemical markers were evaluated. Detection rates with different combinations of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP), hCG, and unconjugated estriol (uE3) were established by retrieving and analyzing 54 serum specimens from women with confirmed Down syndrome pregnancies, compared with 657 specimens from women with normal outcomes. With a risk cutoff of 1:270 at the second trimester, the detection rate with MSAFP, hCG, and uE3 was two to three times higher than with MSAFP alone. With all three markers, the detection rate for Down syndrome increased from 50 to 77% as maternal age increased, and was 60% in a representative screened population. If uE3 was omitted, the detection rate decreased from 60 to 48%. One thousand women were screened prospectively, either with MSAFP or with all three markers prospectively, either with MSAFP or with all three markers and 4.1% with MSAFP. With the three markers, the positive predictive value for Down syndrome was 2.2% overall and as high as 5.9% in older women. Therefore, the addition of hCG and uE3 to the maternal serum screen increases the positive predictive value by 50-300%, depending on maternal age. These results confirm the efficacy of screening for Down syndrome using maternal age and three serum markers.Diagnosis and significance of cystic hygroma in the first trimester.Thirty cases of cervical cystic hygroma were diagnosed in the first trimester of pregnancy. Karyotype analysis was available in 29 (97 per cent). Fifteen (52 per cent) had a chromosomal abnormality. The ultrasound appearance was described as posterior cervical, lateral cervical, or cervical hygroma with hydrops. Of the 14 euploid embryos, six were electively aborted, two are undelivered, and six have been delivered as phenotypically normal infants. In cases in which the chromosomes were normal and the pregnancy continued, all lesions resolved by 18 weeks.Identification of haptoglobin alpha-2FF variants in mid-trimester maternal serum as potential markers for Down syndrome.Exploratory protein analysis in mid-trimester maternal sera by 2-dimensional electrophoresis and image analysis was performed to determine the differences between mothers carrying fetuses with Down syndrome (DS) and control mothers. Nine haptoglobin alpha-1 and alpha-2 (Hp1 and Hp2) variants were detected. Three apparent isoforms of the Hp2FF protein having the same relative charge but different Mr's were detected, with the two smaller variants--Hp2FF (-0.7k) and Hp2FF (-1.3k)--believed to be first reported here. Ninety-two percent of the cases (n = 83) had the Hp2FF (-0.7k) protein, and 61% had Hp2FF (-1.3k). The geometric mean concentration of Hp2FF (Mr = 18.0 kd) was found to be significantly increased (P less than 0.01) in mid-trimester sera from cases (n = 27) compared to controls (n = 56). When the concentrations of the three Hp2FF isoforms were added, the cases had larger sums on average than controls (P less than 0.01).The role of ultrasound in screening for Down syndrome.First-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and human chorionic gonadotropin screening for chromosome defects.The aim of this study was to determine the efficacy of combined maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) and maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin (MShCG) screening in detecting chromosome defects in the first trimester of pregnancy. Sera of 492 women (previously assayed for MSAFP) were analysed for MShCG under code without knowledge of cytogenetic results. Overall, 48 of 492 patients (9.8 per cent) had either an MSAFP multiple of the median less than or equal to 0.5 or an MShCG beta/alpha ratio multiple of the median less than or equal to 0.25, eight of whom had a fetus with a serious chromosome defect. A third of fetuses with Down's syndrome and 83 per cent with trisomy 18 were detected at a potential 'cost' of providing chorionic villus sampling or amniocentesis in 8.6 per cent of women screened.Maternal serum Down syndrome screening: free beta-protein is a more effective marker than human chorionic gonadotropin.The use of quantitative human chorionic gonadotropin measurement in obstetrics has a long and successful history. Prior studies on the utility of human chorionic gonadotropin in Down syndrome screening have utilized assays that measure the intact human chorionic gonadotropin molecule. This study targeted a distinct marker, the human chorionic gonadotropin free beta-protein, which is present in second-trimester maternal serum at much lower concentrations than is intact human chorionic gonadotropin. Our study of 29 cases of trisomy 21 and 450 control samples shows 80% detection efficiency with maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, the free beta-protein, and maternal age in pregnancies under 17 weeks' gestation. We conclude that the combination of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and the human chorionic gonadotropin free beta-protein will be useful in the prenatal detection of trisomy 21.First-trimester maternal serum biochemical indicators in Down syndrome.A set of 21 early maternal serum samples (19 first-trimester and two at 14 weeks) from pregnancies resulting in a child with Down syndrome was matched for gestation and length of storage with 63 samples from unaffected pregnancies. The concentrations of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), unconjugated oestriol (uE3), human chorionic gonadotrophin (hCG), pregnancy-specific beta 1-glycoprotein (SP1), and placental alkaline phosphatase (PALP) were measured. The ratios of the medians for Down syndrome pregnancies compared with the medians for controls were AFP 0.71, uE3 0.67, hCG 1.43, SP1 0.79, and PALP 0.92. Although the differences between the medians for affected and unaffected pregnancies were not significant, the trends for AFP, uE3, and hCG confirm earlier findings on first-trimester samples.Down syndrome screening in women under 35 with maternal serum hCG.Human chorionic gonadotropin and maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) concentrations were measured in frozen maternal serum samples from 16 pregnancies with Down syndrome and from 614 unaffected pregnancies in women younger than 35. By using only maternal age and MSAFP level to determine Down syndrome risk, four of 16 (25%) Down syndrome pregnancies were identified, using risk estimates as a screening variable. This detection rate required performing amniocentesis on 4.8% of pregnancies with a normal outcome. By adding hCG level as a third risk parameter, ten of 16 (62.5%) Down syndrome pregnancies were detected. To achieve this detection rate, 4.7% of women under 35 would be recommended for amniocentesis. These results indicate that the estimation of risk for Down syndrome based on the addition of maternal hCG level to MSAFP level and maternal age will substantially improve the detection rate for Down syndrome, with no change in the amniocentesis rate. These findings are in agreement with other studies that suggest that hCG is a valuable addition to screening programs for Down syndrome.The effect of smoking in pregnancy on maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein, unconjugated oestriol, human chorionic gonadotrophin, progesterone and dehydroepiandrosterone sulphate levels.Maternal serum markers in screening for Down syndrome.The addition of two new markers in maternal serum, estriol and HCG, to those already known, namely the level of maternal serum alfa-fetoprotein and maternal age, considerably improves the expected results of a screening strategy for Down syndrome. The detection rate is slightly increased from 53.0% to 57.6%, but, more importantly, the false-positive rate decreases from 9.4% to 7.3%. It is our belief that, at least in women aged less than 35 years, a screening strategy based on a combination of maternal age and biochemical markers should be incorporated into antenatal care. For older women, the results of such a maternal serum test may refine counseling for genetic amniocentesis, as a much more explicit risk calculation can be performed than that based on age alone.Prenatal screening for Down syndrome with maternal serum human chorionic gonadotropin levels.Human chorionic gonadotropin levels in midtrimester pregnancies may be predictive of Down syndrome. A commercially available enzyme immunoassay kit was used to measure the beta-subunit of human chorionic gonadotropin in maternal sera from 38 Down syndrome pregnancies and 114 gestational age matched controls. The human chorionic gonadotropin levels were also assayed in 236 normal sera and plasma samples to determine normative values and appropriate individual corrections. Serum and plasma human chorionic gonadotropin levels are closely correlated and are stable at room temperature, during refrigeration, and throughout freeze-thaw cycles. There is no correlation between the human chorionic gonadotropin level and maternal age, weight, or race. However, the human chorionic gonadotropin level decreases with each week of gestation from 15 to 19 weeks. Medians for each week of gestation were established to account for this variable. Up to 63% of the Down syndrome pregnancies were detected with a cutoff of 2.0 multiples of the normal median. A computational combination of human chorionic gonadotropin and maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein testing will detect additional Down syndrome pregnancies and decrease the false-positive rate. The measurement of human chorionic gonadotropin appears to be a valuable addition to maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening programs that can significantly increase the proportion of Down syndrome cases diagnosed.Evaluation of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and ultrasound examination to screen fetal chromosomal abnormalities.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP), anatomic anomalies and precocious defects of foetal growth were shown as possible "indicators" of foetal chromosomal pathology, in particular Down's syndrome, and thus suggested for prenatal screening of risk patients for this chromosomal abnormalities. The Authors carried out a retrospective study on 1472 patients who underwent amniocentesis for prenatal diagnosis. Between the 15th and the 20th week, a dosage of MSAFP was effected, in order to evaluate if the serum concentration of this substance could predict Down's syndrome. A contemporary study by echographic monitoring was effected on 500 patients from the 1st trimester of pregnancy, in order to detect possible foetal growth retardation precociously and to determine the karyotype in these cases. Results are very interesting and suggest both the dosage of MSAFP and the ecographic monitoring for prenatal screening of trisomy 21, especially in maternal age classes younger than 40 years, where the cost/benefit ratio of screening for maternal age is less favourable.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein prenatal screening for Down syndrome.The relationship between maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (MSAFP) levels, maternal age and Down syndrome risk factors were studied in the greater Birmingham and North Alabama areas. After adjustment for race and maternal weight, 3.84 percent of women in this study were determined to have Down syndrome risk factors equal to or greater than that of a 35 year old woman with a normal pregnancy. Maternal weight adjustment was of special importance, reducing the number of MSAFP values considered low from 5.12 percent to 3.40 percent. The use of race and area specific medians was also important in the use of prenatal MSAFP screening for Down syndrome affected pregnancies.[Screening for chromosomal anomalies with maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein].Between July 1, 1986 and January 31, 1988, genetic amniocentesis was performed on 205 patients. The maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and amniotic fluid AFP levels were measured by enzyme immunoassay. Gestational dates were confirmed by sonography, and AFP results were expressed as multiples of the median (MOM). The median of maternal serum AFP from 15 to 17 weeks of gestation was 43.4, 62.6 and 72.5 ng/ml. Three fetuses with chromosomal anomalies were diagnosed; trisomy 21, 4p trisomy, and trisomy 18 (trisomy 18 was in one fetus of a twin pregnancy; the other fetus was normal). Maternal serum AFP levels were, 0.41, 0.49 and 1.30 MOM. Maternal serum AFP less than 0.5 MOM in normal pregnancies was 1/205 (0.5%) and less than 0.6 MOM was 9/205 (4.4%). There was no relationship between maternal serum AFP and amniotic fluid AFP levels. Our results are in agreement with the majority of the results in the literature, showing that maternal serum AFP levels are lower in association with autosomal trisomy fetuses.Maternal serum AFP levels in the first trimester of pregnancy.Maternal serum alphafetoprotein was assayed in 436 women presenting for termination of pregnancy at 6 to 12 weeks. The normal range for each week is presented. There was a progressive rise of AFP levels from week 7 onwards, but a clear separation from non-pregnant values was only apparent after 8 weeks. The definition of a 'low normal' range for the identification of cases at risk of Down's syndrome will probably only be possible at 11 weeks or later.Combining maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein measurements and age to screen for Down syndrome in pregnant women under age 35. New England Regional Genetics Group Prenatal Collaborative Study of Down Syndrome Screening.Eight prenatal diagnostic centers in New England enrolled 77,273 second-trimester pregnant women between January 1986 and March 1987 to study prospectively the sensitivity and detection efficiency of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein measurement as a screening test for Down syndrome. The study was limited to women under the age of 35 because it is accepted practice to offer amniocentesis to all women above that age. Based on risk estimates derived from a combination of maternal age and maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein measurement, 4.7% of the study population was initially classified as being at high risk for having a Down syndrome fetus (second-trimester odds for Down syndrome greater than or equal to 1:270). Forty percent of the high-risk population were subsequently placed in the low-risk category, usually because ultrasound findings corrected the gestational dates and caused the maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein interpretation to be changed. Seventy-six percent of the 2.7% of women remaining at high risk had amniocentesis; 18 fetuses with Down syndrome and 4 fetuses with trisomy 18 were identified in that group. Overall, one fetus with Down syndrome was detected per 89 amniocenteses, and an estimated 25% of all fetuses with Down syndrome were identified. These data establish the feasibility of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein measurements as a method to screen for Down syndrome and suggest the possibility that such screening might be applicable in women over age 35 as well.Maternal levels of pregnancy-specific beta 1-glycoprotein (SP-1) are elevated in pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome.Concentrations of pregnancy-specific beta 1-glycoprotein (SP-1) were measured in maternal blood and amniotic fluid of patients with a trisomic fetus and compared with that of a cytogenetically normal fetus at weeks 16-19 of pregnancy. The SP-1 concentrations were significantly elevated in the sera of women with a Down's syndrome fetus, whereas amniotic fluid levels were only slightly increased. It is suggested that high levels of maternal SP-1 in the second trimester of pregnancy may be a valuable indicator in the prenatal detection of fetal trisomy 21.Low second trimester maternal serum unconjugated oestriol in pregnancies with Down's syndrome.Second trimester maternal serum unconjugated oestriol levels were measured in the stored serum samples from 22 pregnancies associated with Down's syndrome and 110 unaffected control pregnancies, matched for maternal age, gestational age, duration of storage of the serum sample, smoking habits and maternal weight. The serum unconjugated oestriol level of each affected pregnancy was expressed as a multiple of the median (MoM) of its five matched controls. The unconjugated oestriol levels were significantly lower in the affected pregnancies than in the unaffected pregnancies; the median MoM was 0.79 (P less than 0.05). This association between low serum unconjugated oestriol and fetal Down's syndrome early in pregnancy raises the possibility that serum unconjugated oestriol measurement may be added to maternal age and alpha-fetoprotein measurement in the antenatal screening for Down's syndrome.[Prenatal screening for Down's syndrome by measuring the AFP concentration in the maternal serum].California's experience with low MS-AFP results.The California AFP Screening Program was developed to offer pregnant women the opportunity to have their pregnancies screened for open neural tube defects (NTD). Because it is unwise to withhold potentially important clinical information about low MS-AFP results from the screened women and their physicians, follow-up diagnostic evaluations and counseling were offered to women with low MS-AFP results in addition to those with high results or positive family histories of NTD. Between April 7, 1986 and September 30, 1987, over 275,000 women voluntarily participated in the screening program. During the first year of the program 3,939 women were seen for follow-up evaluations due to low MS-AFP results. These evaluations occurred at state-approved AFP follow-up centers where ultrasonographic dating led to reinterpretation of 35% of the results. Of the remaining 2,552 (65%), 1,940 women (76%) had an amniocentesis. Sixteen Down syndrome fetuses were detected for a yield of 1/121 amniocenteses. Additional chromosome abnormalities included trisomies 18 and 13, Ullrich-Turner syndrome, (45,X), Klinefelter syndrome (47,XXY) and triploidy. The total yield of significant chromosome abnormalities was 1/78 amniocenteses.First-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening for chromosome defects.Low maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein values during the second trimester of pregnancy are associated with an increased risk of Down syndrome in the fetus. In this study a sensitive, monoclonal-based radioimmunoassay for alpha-fetoprotein was used to determine whether such an association also applies to the first trimester and if maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening could successfully detect a significant number of pregnancies in which the fetus had a trisomy or other chromosome disorder. Sera were obtained prospectively from 540 women just before chorionic villus sampling for prenatal diagnosis of chromosome defects (largely because of advanced maternal age) at 8 to 12 weeks' fetal age and assayed for alpha-fetoprotein under code without knowledge of the cytogenetic results. Eight of 27 (29.6%) of all serious chromosome defects were associated with low maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein values (less than or equal to 0.6 multiples of the median). Overall, 59 of 540 patients (10.9%) had maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein values less than or equal to 0.6 multiples of the median, eight of whom had a fetus with a serious chromosome defect. Women whose maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein value was less than or equal to 0.6 multiples of the median had one in eight odds of carrying a fetus with a trisomy and one in seven odds of the fetus having any serious chromosome defect. From this study of a group of women at higher risk, we conclude that first-trimester maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening for chromosome defects is feasible. A prospective study to determine detection efficiency is now required of a consecutive routine pregnancy population in whom gestational age is determined by menstrual dates as is usually the case in clinical practice.Maternal serum screening for Down's syndrome in early pregnancy.The possibility of improving the effectiveness of antenatal screening for Down's syndrome by measuring human chorionic gonadotrophin concentrations in maternal serum during the second trimester to select women for diagnostic amniocentesis was examined. The median maternal serum human chorionic gonadotrophin concentration in 77 pregnancies associated with Down's syndrome was twice the median concentration in 385 unaffected pregnancies matched for maternal age, gestational age, and duration of storage of the serum sample. Measuring human chorionic gonadotrophin in maternal serum was an effective screening test, giving a lower false positive rate (3%) at a 30% detection rate than that for maternal age (5%) and the two existing serum screening tests, unconjugated oestriol (7%) and alpha fetoprotein (11%). The most effective screening results were obtained with all four variables combined; at the same 30% detection rate the false positive rate declined to 0.5%. The new screening method would detect over 60% of affected pregnancies, more than double that achievable with the same amniocentesis rate in existing programmes (5%), and could reduce the number of children born with Down's syndrome in the United Kingdom from about 900 a year to about 350 a year.Maternal serum unconjugated oestriol as an antenatal screening test for Down's syndrome.The median maternal serum unconjugated oestriol level between 13 and 27 weeks gestation in 77 pregnancies associated with Down's syndrome was lower than the median level in 385 unaffected control pregnancies matched for maternal age, gestational age, and duration of serum sample storage (P less than 0.001). The median level for the affected pregnancies was 73% of that in the controls. Low unconjugated oestriol levels can be used to detect fetal Down's syndrome; at cut-off levels selected to detect at least 35% of affected pregnancies, unconjugated serum oestriol was a better screening test than either maternal age or serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP). The use of all three variables in combination to select women with a 1:250 or greater risk of a Down's syndrome term pregnancy would yield a 45% detection rate with a false-positive rate of 5.2%. The same detection rate using maternal age alone or using age and serum AFP in combination would yield higher false-positive rates, 15% and 9.8% respectively. The addition of unconjugated oestriol to a Down's syndrome screening programme would therefore be more efficient than the use of age and AFP alone; for a given detection rate fewer women would need an amniocentesis or, for a given percentage of women having an amniocentesis, more pregnancies with Down's syndrome would be detected.Screening for Down's syndrome using an iso-risk curve based on maternal age and serum alpha-fetoprotein level.On the basis of the significantly different distributions of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels in 86 pregnancies associated with fetal Down's syndrome and in 2018 unaffected pregnancies, an iso-risk curve for Down's syndrome was constructed. An iso-risk curve shows, for women of all ages, which combinations of maternal age and level of maternal serum AFP result in the same risk of carrying a fetus with Down's syndrome. A 1:400 risk of Down's syndrome, corresponding to the risk of a 35-year-old woman, was chosen as the lowest risk indicating referral for amniocentesis. If all women, irrespective of their age, are offered amniocentesis, when their risk of carrying a Down's syndrome fetus is 1:400 or higher, 53% of the affected fetuses can be detected as compared with 28% of the affected fetuses diagnosed at present in women above 35 years of age.Screening for fetal Down's syndrome in pregnancy by measuring maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein levels.Although the risk of Down's syndrome increases with maternal age, women under 35 bear about 80 percent of the infants born with this condition. We prospectively investigated the utility of measuring maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein during the second trimester in women under 35 in order to identify pregnancies in which the fetus was affected with Down's syndrome. Over a two-year period, 34,354 women in this age group were screened. Amniocentesis was offered when the risk of Down's syndrome, calculated as a function of maternal age and maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein concentration adjusted for maternal weight and race, was 1:270 or higher, the risk for a 35-year-old woman. This threshold was exceeded in 1451 women in whom gestational age was confirmed by ultrasound; 9 women in this group had a fetus with the syndrome. In three women whose fetuses had trisomy 18 and one whose fetus had trisomy 13, the calculated risk of Down's syndrome was 1:270 or higher. Thus, among women in whom the risk exceeded our cutoff point, 1 in 161 were found to have a pregnancy in which the fetus was affected with Down's syndrome; the figure was 1 in 112 for all autosomal trisomies. Eighteen pregnancies involving Down's syndrome, three involving trisomy 18, and two involving trisomy 13 were not associated with a calculated risk above the cutoff point. The available data indicate that in our population, using a cutoff for risk at which 5 percent of women under 35 are offered amniocentesis, we will detect one quarter to one third of pregnancies in which the fetus has Down's syndrome.Estimating a woman's risk of having a pregnancy associated with Down's syndrome using her age and serum alpha-fetoprotein level.The risk of an individual woman having a pregnancy associated with Down's syndrome was estimated from her age and her serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) level at 14-20 weeks gestation. The estimates were made using published data on the risk of Down's syndrome in relation to maternal age from 4528 affected and over 5 million unaffected pregnancies, and on the risk in relation to serum AFP from 68 affected and 36,645 unaffected pregnancies. Separate estimates were derived for AFP levels using gestational age based on the time since the first day of the last menstrual period and on an ultrasound biparietal diameter measurement. In each case this was done with and without adjusting AFP levels to take account of maternal weight. The same sources of data were also used to construct six Down's syndrome screening policies, each combining information on maternal age and serum AFP. For example with one policy the detection rate would be 28% and would involve selecting 2.8% of unaffected pregnancies for amniocentesis; using age alone the same detection rate could only be achieved by selecting 4.3% of unaffected pregnancies for amniocentesis--an increase of 50%. In general, screening for Down's syndrome using both maternal age and serum AFP is more efficient than either alone.Screening for maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein: what about the low side?Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and fetal trisomy-21 in women 35 years and older: implications for alpha-fetoprotein screening programs.A retrospective study of 3,411 women who underwent midtrimester amniocentesis for fetal chromosome analysis between June 1979 and August 1984 was performed to evaluate an association between low maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) concentrations and Down syndrome (DS) pregnancies. A total of 71 pregnancies was found with abnormal fetal chromosomes; of these, 26 cases were trisomy-21 and 10 cases were trisomy-18. The maternal serum AFP in women with DS fetuses was relatively lower than levels in women with fetuses that had normal chromosomes. In addition, the AFP concentrations in amniotic fluid were decreased in cases involving DS fetuses. We have estimated the risks for DS pregnancy at all maternal ages and most serum AFP concentrations. Using these calculations, genetic counselors will be able to provide more accurate risk estimates for trisomy-21 following maternal serum AFP testing.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening: low and high values for detection of genetic abnormalities.In initiating a maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening program, we pursued not only elevated values for the detection of neural tube defects but also low values to detect trisomic fetuses. We detected neural tube defects (0.2%) as expected but were surprised by the efficacy with which low serum alpha-fetoprotein values identified aneuploid fetuses. In 1421 pregnant women, 132 (9.3%) showed maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein values less than 0.4 multiple of the median. After repeat sampling, 57 women still had low values. These 57 women and six others who were too anxious for repeat sampling underwent level I ultrasound examination with the following results: gestational age overestimated by 2 weeks (n = 8), fetal death (n = 1), and no explanation (n = 54). Of the 54, 49 underwent amniocentesis with detection of three aneuploid fetuses: trisomy 18 (n = 2) and trisomy 21 (n = 1); maternal ages were 27, 29, and 31 years, respectively. Autosomal aneuploidy did not occur in other women screened. We conclude that low maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein values could efficiently detect aneuploid fetuses, perhaps with greater sensitivity than previously predicted.Combining maternal age and serum alpha-fetoprotein to predict the risk of Down syndrome.Twenty-eight cases of Down syndrome with maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) measured at second trimester were added to 137 previously reported cases. Seventy-eight percent of affected pregnancies had levels at or below the median AFP value, compared with 50% of unaffected pregnancies. Maternal age at delivery and serum AFP levels by multiples of the median were used to construct a table to determine the risk of Down syndrome. This was compared with the risk for a 35-year-old woman (one in 365). Similar risks were estimated for a 21-year-old with AFP below 0.4 multiples of the median, a 23-year-old below 0.5, a 26-year-old below 0.6, and a 29-year-old below 0.7 multiples of the median. This study provides guidelines for counseling pregnant women who have low serum AFP levels.Alpha-fetoprotein: an enhanced-sensitivity assay for neural tube defect and Down syndrome evaluation.[Low maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein concentration and Down syndrome].Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and fetal autosomal trisomies.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein values in 61 patients with fetal autosomal trisomies diagnosed at 6581 genetic amniocenteses were significantly lower than those in an equal number of matched control subjects. The genetic risk of fetal autosomal trisomies for women less than age 35 offered amniocentesis with maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein values less than 0.5 multiples of the median is in the same range as that currently accepted for advanced maternal age. Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening for autosomal trisomies (mainly Down syndrome) is feasible.Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening of fetal trisomies.Thirty-two trisomy pregnancies were retrospectively studied in which the maternal serum level of alpha-fetoprotein was determined prior to amniocentesis. Median levels of alpha-fetoprotein in serum (0.83 multiples of the median) and in amniotic fluid (0.72 multiples of the median) were lowered, but this was statistically significant only in the case of amniotic fluid.Screening for Down's syndrome using serum alpha fetoprotein: a retrospective study indicating caution.A report was made on the outcome of a four year retrospective study in 27 064 pregnancies, of the clinical efficiency, sensitivity, and specificity of a screening programme for Down's syndrome based on reported strategies related to the measurement of maternal serum alpha fetoprotein. This study identified 27 pregnancies affected by Down's syndrome with a median multiple of the median maternal serum alpha fetoprotein concentration of 0.82. This figure is considerably higher than that obtained from previous reports on this subject. With an age related multiple of the median maternal serum alpha fetoprotein strategy, 30.8% of Down's affected pregnancies were identified as well as 11.6% of unaffected pregnancies. Perhaps a United Kingdom collaborative study should begin to investigate the reasons for such wide population variance in the reports for the median multiple of the median for Down's affected pregnancies. Until such studies are carried out, screening for Down's syndrome based on low maternal serum alpha fetoprotein concentration is premature.An association between low maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein and fetal chromosomal abnormalities.An index case of "undetectable" maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein at 16 weeks in the first pregnancy of a 28-year-old woman was associated with birth of an infant with trisomy 18. This fortuitous finding stimulated a retrospective study of prenatally diagnosed chromosomal abnormalities. From among a series of 3,862 genetic amniocenteses, 32 cases of fetal autosomal trisomy were diagnosed for which corresponding maternal serum and amniotic fluid alpha-fetoprotein data could be retrieved. From a second laboratory, nine additional cases were added. The maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein levels expressed as multiples of the median were significantly lower in distribution for these 41 women than those from a group of normal matched control subjects (p less than 0.001). Since maternal age is shown to be a less than adequate predictor of autosomal trisomic birth, we proposed that a low level of maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein obtained through routine screening may prove to be valuable in improving the prenatal detection of these serious anomalies.